,Job Title,Salary Range,Job Description,Rating,Company Name,Location,Headquarters,Size,Founded,Type of ownership,Industry,Sector,Revenue,Competitors
0,Data Analyst,$42k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Purpose of Position
The Data Analyst is responsible for the financial planning for managed clients to include creating and managing client operating budgets and client financial workbooks. In addition, the Data Analyst provides business review presentations, client operational analysis, client savings data, and non-standard or customized analysis and reporting.
Tasks and Responsibilities
Creates and presents annual operating budgets for managed clients. Generates business review presentations to support quarterly or annual client meetings. In addition, work on continuous improvement of the budgeting process and templates.
Develops new client workbooks and provides monthly or quarterly client workbook updates. These updates include budget updates and variance analysis in addition to summary updates, operational updates, and additional analysis or reporting as requested or customized for each client.
Creates ad-hoc or customized reports, as requested by clients or OS teams, including savings data or pro forma budgets.
Supports the Owner Services and Managed Sales team with other duties as assigned.
Education
Bachelor's in Finance or Accounting
Years of Experience
0-2 years of experience
Core Competencies
Attitude
Communication & Listening Skills
Initiative
Interest in Company & Position
Knowledge of Specific Job Skills
Related Education or Training
Related Job Experience
Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Other (KSAOs)
Work experience, preferably in financial/operation analysis and/or planning environment
Strong analytical and organizational skills
Strong communication skills; capable of presenting complex financial information in an easy-to-understand format
Familiar with concepts, practices, and procedures of financial planning & analysis
Advanced proficiency with excel, access and other Microsoft Office applications
Advanced proficiency with Tableau Software
Strong multi-tasking skills
Aviation experience also preferred

Benefits Package:
Full complement of attractive benefits to our team members, including Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance
401(k) Savings Plan. The company provides a 57% matching contribution of your pretax contributions, up to the first 20% of your contributions per pay
Company provided Short Term Disability
Flexible Spending Account (FSA)
Prescription Drug Benefit Plan
Two-week paid vacation
Executive Jet Management is an equal opportunity employer.
To ensure a safe environment, we conduct pre-employment drug screening and background checks.",4.3,"NetJets
4.3","Cincinnati, OH",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1964,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Charter Air Travel,Travel & Tourism,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
1,Data Analyst,$38k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"Big Huge Games is looking for a qualified Data Analyst to help provide data insights to our games teams and upcoming BHG titles to assist them in making successful strategic and game direction decisions. This role works closely with our Product and Design teams to structure quantitative questions, gather player data, employ statistical methodology in analysis of the data, and construct insightful reporting and visualizations to communicate those results to the wider team.

Responsibilities
Provide reports and monitoring tools to assist team in daily game health assessment
Perform in-depth analysis of game metrics to inform and support both short and long-term product direction decisions
Communicate the results of analyses to the product team, game studio, and outside partners through data visualization and presentations
Qualifications
3-5 years experience with querying large complex data sets with SQL on relational databases
Several years experience performing quantitative analysis preferably with a games, web, or technology focus
High level of proficiency in data visualization tools such as Tableau, Excel, or equivalent
Passion for problem solving, from generating insightful questions to research, through presentation of results and follow-on steps
Track record of success working in fast-paced environments with shifting priorities and deadlines
Ability to work in both individual and team settings
Excellent organizational, communication, presentation, and interpersonal skills
Bachelor's degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Computer Science, or another quantitative field
About Big Huge Games:

Big Huge Games is a small, passionate team led by experienced game development veterans, proudly located just north of Baltimore, MD, who are excited about the rise of touchscreen platforms. We believe in hiring talented team members who enjoy working in a fun and positive environment.

The company was founded in March of 2013 by Brian Reynolds (Civilization II, Rise of Nations, FrontierVille) and a group of longtime collaborators. Big Huge Games is dedicated to ""Finding The Fun"" through rapid prototyping and a focus on great user experience.

In July 2015 we launched our first game, DomiNations, which was awarded “Editors Choice” in the app store and continues to be successful with audiences across the globe. In 2016 we were acquired by our publisher, Nexon, and now operate as a wholly-owned subsidiary, allowing us the stability of a larger studio but the feel of a smaller, indie game team.

Our goals are simple: Make great games, strive to always be improving, and live up to the motto you gotta have fun to make fun.

This a full-time position onsite at our studio in Timonium, MD.
Due to the circumstances surrounding COVID19 positions will begin remote before transitioning to onsite.

Applicants should download DomiNations on iOS or Android and be prepared to discuss the game.",4.9,"Big Huge Games
4.9","Timonium, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Video Games,Media,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
2,Data Quality Analyst,$28k-$35k (Glassdoor Est.),"The role of Data Quality Analyst is an integral role in our rapidly growing company. This is an excellent opportunity for intelligent, outgoing, and self-motivated persons seeking rapid professional development and acquisition of new business skills. Your primary responsibilities will be working closely with internal and external users to maintain the quality of VIP’s master retailer database and aligning customer sales data to that retailer universe. As this data is central to the operation of our clients’ businesses, you will need to bring a high level of attention to detail and willingness to find solutions to problems in a systematic and efficient way. Ideal candidates for this entry level position will understand the importance of building and maintaining relationships with our customers. Successful candidates must also work well both individually as well as part of a team to accomplish shared goals.

Requirements:
History of solid employment
Strong analytical and reasoning skills to assess and implement information from multiple resources
Clear communication skills
Self-organization to meet daily, weekly and monthly responsibilities, both to the company and the customer
Strong computer skills and knowledge of working with spreadsheets (Excel)
College preferred but not required

All full time job offers are contingent upon passing a pre-employment drug screening and background check.
LOCAL APPLICANTS ONLY",3.7,"Vermont Information Processing
3.7","Colchester, VT",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1972,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
3,Data Analyst,$50k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"Rational is growing, and we need amazing talent to join our team. If you have an entrepreneurial attitude with a deep spirit of service and killer subject expertise, we want to talk to you. We are always looking for the next great consultant to raise the bar and push Rational to be better than we were yesterday. Staying hungry, curious, and looking forward to what’s next is part of our DNA.

This Data Analyst will be part of Rational's Technology & Data Practice and supporting one of our large biotech projects. This individual will provide strategic and tactical consultation, leadership in delivering solutions, and oversight of processes and systems.  The position requires solid technical foundation, domain knowledge, as well as strong verbal and written communication skills with a proven ability to clearly communicate technical information to a non-technical audience.

This is a full time position within Rational's Technology Practice. This position is not available for Visa sponsorship or C2C work.

What you will do:
Serve as the Business Analyst subject matter expert supporting, but not limited to Commercial portfolio
Network with a new and evolving IT environment, business team, and vendors to foster strong relationships and build partnerships
Understand strategy and how it translates to executable programs, projects, and efforts that align with strategic goals while taking the environmental constraints and opportunities into account
Collaborate with cross-functional professionals to deliver high-quality and innovative solutions that meet the business needs and create new opportunities
Provide analytic support of various levels of complexity including large, multi-year, cross-functional efforts with internal and external influencing factors
Negotiate conflicts and complex issues to an expeditious and satisfactory resolution
What you will bring:
3+ years of exposure to the orchestrating technology solutions for technical and/or Biotechnology or Pharmaceutical organizations
3+ years of experience in the Business Analysis or equivalent role with solution delivery and process improvement supporting cross-functional implementation of IT solutions in the Biotechnology or Pharmaceutical industry
3+ years of experience in organization financials, financial reporting
Familiarity with applications used in the business area such as Salesforce and Veeva
Working experience in SQL Server and Snowflake (preferred, but not required)
Proven knowledge of IT solutions and application management through various product cycles and evolving work environments
Demonstrated technical understanding of application architecture to include application servers, web servers, configuration files, relational databases, and reporting applications
Ability to proactively plan, organize, deliver with limited oversight, prioritize, and quickly adapt to changing situations
Excellent communication skills, including the ability to interface and influence internal and external partners at multiple organization levels
Strong interpersonal and negotiation skills, with a high degree of self-motivation and ability to work independently
Proficient in essential tools such as Power BI, Smartsheets, PowerPoint, Visio, etc.
Who you are:
Data Lover. You know your numbers and value the metrics behind the buyer story.
Collaborative to the Core. Demonstrated ability to work in a team environment, as a leader and member.
Well-rounded Professional. You have amazing communication and organizational skills along with high EQ.
Proactive. You are always thinking ahead about what is best for the Client.
Adaptable. Change happens at lightning speed; you are flexible, enjoy challenge, and get behind new ideas
Rational is a customer experience (CX) solutions firm that pairs the capabilities of a strategic consultancy with the creativity of a full-service digital agency. We design and activate compelling experiences that create strong connections between people and brands. We put humans at the center of business and partner with our clients to deliver meaningful experiences that help their customers while driving business success. Customer satisfaction at every level is our ultimate metric, and it's what drives our mindset, skillset, and company culture.

Incredible people are our non-negotiable. Our experienced team of consultants spans the globe. We love what we do, and who we do it with – let’s begin our next chapter together.

Rational is committed to ensuring all candidates have an equal opportunity to be considered for employment. Please let us know if you need any reasonable accommodation to participate in the job application or interview process.",2.7,"Rational
2.7","Redmond, WA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
4,Senior Data Analyst,$83k-$141k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you want to innovate customer experiences and make business decisions smarter through data? Are you ready to join a collaborative and motivated team diving into cutting edge big data technology? As an Senior Data Analyst on the Single View of the Customer (SVOC) team, you’ll thrive in a fast-paced innovative culture that turns data into information, and uses that information to drive action. You will have the opportunity to interact with all our SVOC scrum teams, ensuring that we are incorporating new technologies seamlessly, all while providing value to our customers. This opportunity also allows you to dive in to complex technologies, and work with a very forward-thinking group of peers!

Familiar, but never leveraged big data technologies? No worries! When you first join our SVOC team, you will have the opportunity to come up to speed on the cutting-edge technologies we use to develop SVOC!

Basic Qualifications:

o Significant experience in facilitating the discovery process with functional stakeholders to identify requirements and expected outcomes.
o Experience in developing test plans and scenarios to ensure the highest quality deliverables
o Strong SQL, data mapping, and data profiling skills
o Working knowledge of Big Data and the Hadoop Ecosystem
o Outstanding time management skills and attention to detail
o Excellent verbal/written communication skills, including communicating technical issues to non-technical audiences
o Strong presentation skills. Should be comfortable with presenting to all levels of management
o A Bachelor's degree in Information Technology, related field (business, finance, mathematics, computer science), or equivalent professional experience is required

Preferred Qualifications:

o Understanding and experience with Web Services and APIs
o Experience in querying NoSQL databases
o Knowledge and experience working in an Agile environment
o Exposure to QLIK or other data visualization tools
o Experience with providing Production Support

Note: The safety of our associates, both current and future, is GEICO’s highest priority. At this time, most of our associates are working remotely due to the current COVID-19 pandemic. Candidates who are selected for this position will be trained remotely and must be able to work from home in a designated work area. Once GEICO determines it is safe for associates to return to the office, candidates may be required to work in our Chevy Chase, MD office.

Qualifications

About GEICO:

For more than 75 years, GEICO has stood out from the rest of the insurance industry! We are one of the nation's largest and fastest-growing auto insurers thanks to our low rates, outstanding service and clever marketing. We're an industry leader employing thousands of dedicated and hard-working associates. As a wholly owned subsidiary of Berkshire Hathaway, we offer associates training and career advancement in a financially stable and rewarding workplace.

As a full-time Senior Data Analyst, you’ll enjoy our Total Rewards Program* to help secure your financial future and preserve your health and well-being, including:

• Premier Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance with no waiting period**
• Paid Vacation, Sick and Parental Leave
• 401(k) Plan with Profit Sharing
• Tuition Reimbursement
• Paid Training and Licensures
Benefits may be different by location. Benefit eligibility requirements vary and may include length of service.
*Coverage begins with the pay period after hire date. Must enroll in New Hire Benefits within 30 days of the date of hire for coverage to take effect.",3.4,"GEICO
3.4","Chevy Chase, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1936,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
5,Marketing Data Analyst,$34k-$62k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:
Can you work in a relationship with other people where it requires ongoing flexibility?
Do you have an upbeat, positive attitude?
Do you take pride in knowing you are helping to make things happen?

If you can answer yes to these questions, Idaho Central Credit Union may have an opportunity ideally suited for you.

As a Marketing Data Analyst, your primary function is to interpret credit union data, analyze results and implement decisions based on the data. You will be responsible for turning data into information and insight that aids in campaign and business decisions. Also you will be responsible for performing a range of functions in support of market research, market assessment and campaign implementation.

Responsibilities:

Assist in managing technical aspects of key marketing systems (marketing automation, CRM, data warehouse) used to generate, distribute, and report.
Establish and maintain scalable processes that ensure best practices in campaign and lead management.
Create and maintain metrics reports on marketing and sales activities, effectiveness, and business impact.
Analyze marketing and sales data to develop insights and make recommendations on areas for optimization
Monitor and maintain data quality within the marketing database.
Evaluate new technologies and add-on applications to improve and optimize marketing team performance.
Manage membership targeting to strengthen relationships, prevent attrition, and increase profitability.
Leverage web and email engagement to create member insight and data to help improve individual experiences with our digital channels.
Generate and govern segmentation efforts by developing queries and custom reports, target groups, and campaigns for product and service performance.
Track all marketing campaigns and provide meaningful analysis and insight for future efforts.
Analyze consumer segments and other demographic information from the membership database to provide insight for product development, usage, and cross-sell opportunities.
Manage third-party vendor integration with marketing systems including Salesforce Marketing Cloud, Salesforce Advertising Studio, Salesforce CRM, Adobe Analytics, Integrator MCIF, Encompass CRM and Microsoft Power BI.
Represent the Credit Union at community events as needed.

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s Degree in Marketing, Mass Communication, Advertising or related field. 5-9 years of experience with database marketing required. Preferable experience with: Raddon Integrator MCIF, Salesforce Marketing Cloud, Salesforce Advertising Studio, Salesforce CRM, Adobe Analytics, Microsoft Power BI, SQL, and data warehouse experience. Strong analytical skills. Proficiency in marketing automation systems and integrating those systems with other technologies. Technically capable, excellent communicator and a desire to improve processes. Math skills, Secondary-level computer knowledge including Microsoft Office, especially Excel and pivot tables, etc. Ability to maintain the confidentiality of Credit Union and member records at all times. A demonstrated cooperative and positive attitude toward members and other Credit Union staff. Professional in appearance, attendance, quality, and quantity of work performed. Ability to analyze member needs, develop, and coordinate marketing activities to fit member needs with Credit Union products and services. Must be willing to comply with the Bank Secrecy Act and USA Patriot Act as implemented by Idaho Central Credit Union. Team member will be asked to work extended/unique hours.

Perform tasks requiring manual dexterity (processing paperwork, filing, stapling, sorting, collating, typing, counting cash, etc.) Sit for extended periods of time. Lift 20-40 pounds of office supplies (copy paper, computer paper, mail, etc). Some heavy lifting may be required in order to execute proper event logistics. Repetitive motion using wrists, hands, and fingers. Reach keyboards. Ability to operate basic office machines (calculator, computer, telephone, copy machine, fax machine, etc).

Must be eligible for membership at Idaho Central Credit Union to obtain employment.

EOE/Minorities/Females/Vet/Disability

Idaho Central Credit Union is a dynamic financial institution that is focused on helping our members achieve financial success. Established in 1940 we have become the largest and fastest growing financial institution in the state of Idaho. ICCU was voted for large companies the Best Place to work in Idaho. We have also been named by S&P Global Market Intelligence as the top performing credit union in the nation. We are a talent based organization looking for talented individuals to help our members achieve financial success.",4.2,"Idaho Central Credit Union
4.2","Chubbuck, ID",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1940,Nonprofit Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
6,Quality Assurance Analyst - Data Warehouse ETL,$41k-$87k (Glassdoor Est.),"Quality Assurance Analyst - Data Warehouse ETL
Corporate Headquarters
12575 Uline Drive, Pleasant Prairie, WI 53158

Uncover your full potential in a collaborative environment where you'll design, develop and deliver custom solutions to big challenges. And you'll be doing it for a proven industry leader that runs one of the largest e-commerce sites in the U.S.

Better together than apart. This position is on-site, and we are looking for good people who share our passion.

Uline is proud to operate as a drug-free workplace. All new hires must complete a pre-employment drug screening.

Position Responsibilities
Plan and execute testing activities for data warehouse project.
Create and execute tests of ETL processes.
Validate data quality.
Test downstream consumption of reports and calculations.
Develop, execute and maintain test plans, test scenarios, test suites and test cases.

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor's degree in information technology, computer science or related discipline.
Proficient at independently writing complex SQL queries.
Fundamental knowledge of data warehouse concepts.
4+ years of QA (quality assurance) experience in an IT environment.
4 years experience in data warehouse testing.

Benefits
Complete insurance coverage that includes medical, dental, vision and life insurance, Flexible Spending Accounts and wellness programs.
401(k) with 5% employer match.
Paid holidays and generous paid time off.
Bonus programs that include annual performance, sales goals and profit sharing.
Scholarship program for children of employees.

Employee Perks
On-site café with executive chefs and seasonal dinner-to-go options.
First-class fitness center with complimentary personal trainers.
Over four miles of beautifully maintained walking trails.
Numerous employee appreciation events throughout the year.
Professional development classes and monthly in-house speakers.

About Uline

Uline is the leading distributor of shipping, industrial and packaging materials to businesses throughout North America. We're a family-owned company whose incredible service, huge inventory and quality products fuel our ongoing expansion and growth. We offer same-day shipping on over 37,500 products in our 812-page catalog and on our state-of-the-art e-commerce website.

Uline provides the essential supplies needed to keep organizations operational and productive. To protect the health and safety of our employees, we have modified our normal operating policies in response to COVID-19.

Each resume submitted gets individually reviewed by our team and retained for 24 months in case a great opportunity opens for you to join our Uline family.

EEO/AA Employer/Vet/Disabled

#LI-SR1
#CORP",3.5,"Uline
3.5","Northbrook, IL",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
7,Data Analyst,$47k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"This position is responsible for analyzing, reporting and maintaining information within iCare’s enterprise data warehouse and associated databases based on business unit priorities. Additionally, this position may be responsible for assisting with system configuration and support.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES and RESPONSIBILITIES:

Conducts business analysis, data modeling, logical and physical database design, database optimization, load strategy design and implementation, security and change management.
Create, manage and maintain reports using standard reporting technologies.
Develop strong working relationship with the business units to determine needs and solutions that monitor trends.
Maintain and manage a centralized data dictionary.
Ensure best practices are utilized in defining business processes, including identifying and reporting on trends and deviation.
Ensure adherence to company data architectural guidelines, principles and standards in all project milestones and deliverables.
Work with team to optimize system performance
Create appropriate documentation to support effective requirements definition including charts, graphs, and logic model diagrams as necessary.
Fully participate in iCare’s Compliance Program, including compliance with iCare’s Code of Conduct, policies and procedures, and all applicable Privacy and Security laws

An individual in this position must be able to successfully perform the essential duties and responsibilities listed above. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions of this position.

The above list reflects the general details necessary to describe the principle and essential functions of the position and shall not be construed as the only duties that may be assigned for the position.

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Management Information Systems, Engineering or related field, or equivalent experience
2+ years proven design/development experience in methodologies related to ad hoc reporting, dimensional modeling and Enterprise Data Warehousing.
2+ years of experience with relational database systems.
Proficiency in database design concepts and techniques for OLAP
Experience with enterprise-level DBMS systems and tools.
Extensive experience in Microsoft SQL Server Reporting Services and Microsoft BI Tool set.
Strong problem-solving skills, logical process thinking, and end-to-end system concepts.
Strong verbal and written communication skills which can clearly articulate complex concepts and ideas to all levels of the organization in both technical and non-technical terms.
Strong knowledge of data mapping and data modeling processes.
Strong knowledge and experience creating reports that allow business users to drill into details.
Analytical skills which effectively deal with conceptual and tangible ideas along with attention to detail.
Working knowledge of the IT development process and life cycle, i.e. roles/responsibilities, tasks, milestones, deliverables.
Team oriented with ability to work effectively with many different people across many diverse organizations.
Ability to work on multiple, concurrent projects in a dynamic environment and manage time appropriately.
Management skills with the ability to plan, organize, and orchestrate activities such as Joint Application Development and review sessions.
Ability to identify and manage risks and issues, providing appropriate escalation when needed.
Data Analyst I (1-4 years of experience in data analysis and/or ETL design & development)
Data Analyst II (4-10 years of experience in data analysis and ETL design & development)
Data Analyst III (10+ years of experience in data analysis, ETL, and/or EDW design & development

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:

Understanding of Medicaid/Medicare
Understanding of healthcare insurance industry

PHYSICAL AND MENTAL DEMANDS:

Physical and mental stamina to handle heavy workloads.
Ability to operate a computer and typical office equipment.

The mental and physical requirements described here are representative of those that must be met by an individual to successfully perform the essential functions of this position.

WORKING ENVIRONMENT:

iCare is a multi-cultural environment committed to diversity and service to people with disabilities.
Independent Care Health Plan is a professional, performance-oriented organization. Additional time and effort beyond a normal workweek may be required to accomplish company and individual objectives and to provide a high level of service to our members.
Most of work is performed in an office environment.
Periodic business-related travel may be required.
Work conditions may involve stress producing activities and/or timelines.

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an individual encounters while performing the essential functions of this position.

Experience
Required
1 year(s): experience in data analysis and/or ETL design & development
2 year(s): experience with relational database systems
2 year(s): design/development experience in methodologies related to ad hoc reporting, dimensional modeling and Enterprise Data Warehousing.
Education
Required
Bachelors or better in Engineering or related field
Bachelors or better in Management Information Systems or related field
Bachelors or better in Computer Science or related field
Behaviors
Preferred
Innovative: Consistently introduces new ideas and demonstrates original thinking
Functional Expert: Considered a thought leader on a subject
Detail Oriented: Capable of carrying out a given task with all details necessary to get the task done well
Motivations
Preferred
Growth Opportunities: Inspired to perform well by the chance to take on more responsibility
Self-Starter: Inspired to perform without outside help
Goal Completion: Inspired to perform well by the completion of tasks",2.9,"Independent Care Health Plan
2.9","Milwaukee, WI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
8,Business Data Analyst (Mortgage Operations),$41k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"First Midwest, with assets over $20 billion, is the premier relationship-based banking franchise in the dynamic Chicagoland banking market. As one of the Chicago metropolitan area's largest independent bank holding companies, First Midwest provides the full range of commercial, retail banking, and wealth management services through some 120+ offices located in communities in metropolitan Chicago, Northwest Indiana, Central and Western Illinois, Eastern Iowa, and Southeast Wisconsin.

POSITION SUMMARY:

Working collaboratively with the management team, this position is responsible for creating and managing key periodic reports and ad hoc analyses in support of defined business objectives. This role will also champion the development and implementation of key initiatives within the line of business.

REQUIRED EDUCATION, EXPERIENCE AND SKILLS:
Bachelor’s degree preferred in some business discipline
5 years banking or related experience preferred
Advanced analysis and reporting experience required
In-depth knowledge of industry operating rules preferred
Ability to implement new procedures in response to, and in anticipation of, changes in the business environment desired
Possesses and applies comprehensive problem solving abilities for complex issues
High proficiency and analytical skills using Microsoft Office Suite of products required. Access Database and Excel graphing skills a plus.
Experience with financial reports and Falcon risk analytics a plus
Client focus and project management skills are required with an aptitude for creating operational efficiencies and positive client experiences
Demonstrated written and oral communication skills
Strong interpersonal skills
DUTIES/RESPONSIBILITIES:
Work collaboratively with the leadership team on the identification, development and ongoing refinement of periodic reports.
Proactively identify opportunities in support of defined business objectives by developing in-depth analyses.
Support the line of business data collection and distribution needs by working collaboratively with internal and external partners as needed.
Support the development and implementation of key initiatives within the line of business and maintain analytics related to impacts.
Assists in monthly planning, loss analysis, forecasting and variance reporting.

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.
Please view Equal Employment Opportunity Posters provided by OFCCP here and Supplement here.",3.6,"First Midwest Bank
3.6","Gurnee, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1940,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
9,"Senior, Measurement Data Analyst",$65k-$112k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Summary

Performs data analysis to ensure a consistent, timely flow of accurate measurement data in compliance with contractual requirements, industry standards and company policy. Reviews measurement data for accuracy and makes necessary edits of data. Resolves questions and problems using principles for measurement in accordance with standardized processes, Enable Measurement Standards Procedures and AGA/API standards. Develops recommendations to improve measurement processes based on analysis.

This position requires comprehensive knowledge within a functional area. Work is performed under general direction and is reviewed upon completion for adequacy in meeting objectives and to ensure compliance with processes, standards and policies of the organization. Provides technical solutions to a wide range of difficult and complex problems. Solutions are imaginative, thorough, practical, and consistent with the objective of the organization. May train and mentor less experienced professionals.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities

• Analyze, process and edit data used in the determination of measurement volume and energy quantities.
• Develop, maintain and analyze queries, databases and spreadsheets to provide accurate measurement data.
• Identify volume discrepancies at major delivery and receipt measurement points and resolve problems for internal and external customers.
• Analyze and process prior period adjustments.
• Implement and monitor quality measurement data methodologies, processes and procedures.
• Partner with other team members, management, Measurement Engineers, Field Operations Technicians and SCADA team to resolve data and balance discrepancies.
• Apply skills and concepts to ensure data integrity, data reliability and data accessibility throughout department/company.
• Collect, organize and review measurement data from diverse data sources. Take corrective action to resolve data discrepancies. Prepare reports and summaries.
• Produce and maintain data specific to measurement.
• Produce procedures to document data sources and analysis methods relevant to measurement.
• Serve as a source of expertise on reporting systems and data sources.
• Analyze department data and reports.
• Analyze large data sets to ensure reliable, accurate and timely measurement data.
• Provide feedback to field operations on technical data gathering processes and accuracy.
• Conduct compliance reviews of technical documents and processes.
• Compile, track and report on department performance metrics.
• Provide input to system and/or process design.
• Write and review technical documents.
• Act as a resource for less experience analysts.

Minimum Education & Experience

• Bachelor's degree. In lieu of a degree, six (6) years' relevant experience will be considered.
• Five (5) years' relevant experience (2 years must be directly related to Measurement).

Knowledge, Skills, Abilities

• Comprehensive knowledge of gas measurement principles.
• Ability to distill data into concise and easily understood concepts and recommendations.
• Comprehensive data management skills; ability to format, model and analyze large data sets.
• Knowledge of federal, state and local regulations (i.e. AGA, GPA, API, FERC, SOX).
• Comprehensive knowledge of natural gas and liquid operations.
• Ability to effectively handle pressures and demands of deadlines and competing priorities.
• Ability to handle confidential information and material with the highest degree of professional responsibility.
• Comprehensive skills in computer applications, databases and reporting software: FlowCal, Business Objects, Crystal Reports, Microsoft Office suite (Excel, Word, PowerPoint, Outlook, SharePoint).
• Strong collaboration skills in order to partner effectively across various levels of the organization.
• Strong knowledge of the organization, processes and customers.
• Work independently; with guidance in only the most complex situations.
• Ability to discern data inaccuracies through technical experience and knowledge.
• Strong interpersonal and presentation skills.
• Strong organization and process improvement skills.
• Strong analytical skills; ability to recognize, analyze and solve complex problems.
• Demonstrate commitment to compliance with applicable laws and regulations, company’s ethics code of conduct and other company policies and procedures.
• Respect and follow safety policies and regulations; scan the environment for objects or people who may pose a safety risk; encourage others to utilize safe and healthy work practices.

Physical Requirements

• Sedentary to light work exerting up to 10 pounds of force occasionally, and/or negligible amount of force frequently to lift, carry, push, pull or otherwise move objects.
• Ability to view computer screen, sit, stand or walk for long periods of time.
• Ability to operate a computer, copy machine, fax machine, calculator, telephone and other miscellaneous office equipment.
• Ability to work in a constant state of alertness and in a safe manner.

Working Conditions

• Ability to produce quality work in fast paced environment with high daily pressure to meet deadlines.
• Ability to work non-standard work hours as needed or required to meet established deadlines.
• Ability to work indoors, in an office environment, regardless of whether cubicle, open office or private office.
• Ability to travel occasionally to work or field locations, and/or to attend meetings or training, including overnight stays.
• Subject to normal office noise levels.",3.5,"Enable Midstream Partners
3.5","Oklahoma City, OK",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Oil & Gas Exploration & Production,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
10,Data Analyst,$42k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"DEPARTMENT: Analytics
POSITION SUMMARY
NewDay USA is a leading nationwide lender focusing on providing financial solutions to American families. Our analytics team is currently seeking a data analyst to join our team on a full-time basis.
POSITION DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Analyzing business data
Summarizing different analysis results and presenting findings
Conducting business studies on demand
Managing existing reporting services as well as creating and automating ad-hoc reports
Operating enterprise-specific software
Troubleshooting regular dataflow functions
Running and optimizing day-to-day business functions
Managing projects and business accounts
POSITION QUALIFICATIONS
Education/Certification:
Bachelor’s Degree in mathematics, statistics, or related fields
Experience:
Strong analytical, business and problem solving skills
Experience with MS Office products
Expertise in MS Excel
Attention to detail
Efficient organizational skills and demonstrated follow-through on deliverables
Strong interpersonal, verbal and written communication skills
Prior operations experience within a financial firm is a plus
Experience with MS SQL Server database and/or the SQL language is a plus

Our Values:
Ship, Shipmate, Self
Training for a Career
World-Class Service
Providing Opportunity
Integrity
Resilience
Giving Back
Our Diversity:
We aim to foster a culture where individuals of all backgrounds feel confident in bringing their whole selves to work, feel included and their talents are nurtured, empowering them to contribute fully to our vision and goals. It is the policy of NewDay USA to ensure equal employment opportunity without discrimination on the basis of race, color, creed, religion, national origin, alienage or citizenship status, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital or domestic/civil partnership status, disability, veteran status, genetic information, or any other basis protected by law.
Benefits:
Health Insurance
401K
Competitive Salary
Uncapped Bonuses
Profit Sharing",3.8,"NewDay USA
3.8","Fulton, MD",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
11,Senior Data Systems Analyst,-1,"Revised Application Deadline

Senior Data Systems Analyst
Information Technology - Enterprise, Resource & Planning

Exempt, Pay Grade 19

The Senior Data Systems Analyst will support the Enterprise Resource Planning group as the lead in the development, design and implementation of automated reports and dashboards across their internal and external reporting and data insights platforms. This role is foundationally responsible for providing internal and external user access to their various data assets via appealing and effective reports, extracts, dashboards, and analysis solutions primarily with Microsoft Power BI. This person will also play a critical role 1) helping the organization with the new ERP system implementation, and 2) helping to spearhead data governance methodologies and practices. This position will work as Project Manager for organizational data initiatives. Works as project leader over other staff on complex projects. Provides leadership for implementing both in house and vendor applications. Essential functions include, and are not limited to the following:

Leads implementation of current data governance methodologies and practices;
Project manager for organizational data initiatives and works as project leader for complex projects;
Provides assistance and recommendations in leading the new ERP system implementation;
Synthesizes and translates internal and external business data needs into the development and implementation of creative, enticing, clear and effective solutions with BI tools such as Tableau and Microsoft Power BI;
Works and partners with internal stakeholders to develop reports or address data access and visualization needs;
Acts as liaison between vendors, user departments, boards, and outside agencies;
Creates and maintain project plans and visualizations for explanation of progress reporting;
Liaise with other departments and teams to define and implement necessary data sets to fuel data access and visualization requirements;
Leads development, maintain, and manage advanced reporting, analytics, dashboards and other BI solutions;
Performs data analysis, data profiling, SQL coding/query tuning, data modeling, and data validation;
Performs and document data analysis, data validation, and data mapping/design, by accessing multiple data resources residing in data warehouses and transactional data environments/sources;
Performs all tasks of a Systems Analyst but at a high level of efficiency and on more complex assignments;
All other duties as assigned;
Demonstrates and follows the Albemarle County Pillars of High Performance as we are all stakeholders, who share leadership, ownership, and responsibility for the County's vision, mission, core values, and strategic goals;
Will follow the Leadership Philosophy, demonstrate the Core Values, and use the Business Operating Principles as a guide for operating process and how the work is accomplished;
Will provide every customer with an experience that is professional, empathetic, and responsive;
Promotes cultural understanding and competency and an organizational climate of equity and inclusion.

Qualifications: Five or more years combined experience as a systems analyst, programmer/analyst, or related position in a similar hardware and software environment. Prefer a Bachelor's degree in a quantitative field of study (Business, Math, Economics, Financial, Statistics, Science, Engineering); at least 1 year of experience working with SQL; at least 1 year of experience in a project-centric environment or cross-department teams; at least 1 year of experience in data analysis; 1+ year experience with Microsoft Power BI or similar business intelligence platform.

Familiar with modern data architecture and design. Familiar with working in cloud environments such as Azure and AWS. Passion for empowering internal and external peers/clients with their data access needs. Proven track record of designing creative and appealing visuals, reports, and dashboards. Ability to work effectively on multiple priorities with strict deliverable timelines. Experience working with relational databases and data warehousing environments. Strong in Microsoft SQL query creation and tuning (table joins, calculations, aggregations, etc). Experience in data modeling with strong and demonstratable data management skills. Strong troubleshooting and performance tuning with a high proficiency in optimization. Advanced computer skills in typical corporate software applications (Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook). Excellent written and communication skills. Ability to foster a cooperative work environment with multiple internal stakeholders (e.g. other divisions and departments).

Physical Conditions & Nature of Work Contacts: Work is typically performed in an office, computer room, computer classroom laboratory, and/or conference rooms. Continuous ability to communicate by phone is necessary. Regular use of keyboards, computers, laser printers, etc. is necessary. Work requires occasional handling of small fragile computer components and large components weighing in excess of 50 pounds. Occasional operation of county vehicles to travel to locations throughout the county is required. Regular contact is made with internal departments and senior persons at all levels of County government and the school division. Contacts are usually cooperative, however, require tact and diplomacy. External contacts with vendor companies and other information services agencies are necessary. Occasional need to perform urgent tasks to meet organizational deadlines. Frequent work activity after normal duty hours and occasional weekend duties are necessary.

Hiring Salary Range: $60,260 - $72,312 annual equivalent based on qualifications, and equity.

Application Deadline: 10/23/2020",-1,Albemarle County Public Schools and Local Government,Virginia,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
12,Web Data Analyst,$65k-$79k (Employer Est.),"Web Data Analyst
Corporate Headquarters
12575 Uline Drive, Pleasant Prairie, WI 53158

Our customer promise is worth bragging about. Use your marketing and advertising expertise to spread the word and grow our business.

Better together than apart. This position is on-site, and we are looking for good people who share our passion.

Uline is proud to operate as a drug-free workplace. All new hires must complete a pre-employment drug screening.

Position Responsibilities
Collect web data and statistics for Uline’s various eCommerce websites (Uline.com, Uline.ca and Uline.mx).
Analyze data and provide weekly and monthly reports to management.
Make recommendations to improve website and reduce return rates.
Translate complex and analytical work into easy to understand data points.
Respond to ad hoc reporting requests and maintain relationships with various departments.

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor's degree.
Experience using Google Analytics or Adobe Analytics.
Experience using a data visualization tool such as Power BI or Tableau.
2+ years experience in website analysis.
Proficient in Microsoft Excel with some knowledge of SQL and / or Google BigQuery.
Well organized and detail-oriented with an ability to multitask.
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills.

Benefits
Complete insurance coverage that includes medical, dental, vision and life insurance, Flexible Spending Accounts and wellness programs.
401(k) with 5% employer match.
Paid holidays and generous paid time off.
Bonus programs that include annual performance, sales goals and profit sharing.
Scholarship program for children of employees.

Employee Perks
On-site café with executive chefs and seasonal dinner-to-go options.
First-class fitness center with complimentary personal trainers.
Over four miles of beautifully maintained walking trails.
Numerous employee appreciation events throughout the year.
Professional development classes and monthly in-house speakers.

About Uline

Uline is the leading distributor of shipping, industrial and packaging materials to businesses throughout North America. We're a family-owned company whose incredible service, huge inventory and quality products fuel our ongoing expansion and growth. We offer same-day shipping on over 37,500 products in our 812-page catalog and on our state-of-the-art e-commerce website.

Uline provides the essential supplies needed to keep organizations operational and productive. To protect the health and safety of our employees, we have modified our normal operating policies in response to COVID-19.

Each resume submitted gets individually reviewed by our team and retained for 24 months in case a great opportunity opens for you to join our Uline family.

EEO/AA Employer/Vet/Disabled

#LI-SR1
#CORP",3.5,"Uline
3.5","Milwaukee, WI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
13,Data Insights Analyst,$36k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Data Insights Analyst will analyze large data sets, identify trends, and build visuals that tell the Life.Church story hidden within the data.

Did you ever think God could use your talent at a church? We might not see how that’s possible, but God doesn’t work within our parameters. He creates opportunities we never could have imagined, but it’s up to us to embrace His plan. Your God-given skills and passion to serve Him could intersect right here, right now. When you bring your skills to Life.Church, there’s no telling where God could take your future.

The Life.Church Analytics team is passionate about giving data a seat at the table and providing the organization with the information it needs in clear and concise visuals to help make better decisions and drive the mission forward. We’re looking for a Data Insights Analyst who loves pulling useful nuggets of information out of a sea of data. Do you have a knack for numbers and love problem solving? Do you see patterns and connections everywhere you look? If so, continue reading for more details.
The basics:
SQL is your second language
Even though you appreciate a good spreadsheet, you know most people would rather look at a picture, so you are able to turn large data sets into easy-to-read visuals using data visualization software
You have exceptional analytical skills and your curiosity leads you to ask “Why?”
You understand statistics and data analysis techniques
You know how to get non-analytical people fired up about a p-value
The works:
You have a drive to deliver and an openness to new ideas and approaches
You’re flexible and adaptable with strong relationship-building skills
You’re a prioritization wizard who can complete multiple tasks with little to no supervision
You get energized by solving problems that have others stumped
You’re able to work independently while maintaining focus on achieving optimal outcomes as part of a collaborative team effort
The cherry on top:
Your resume is a visualization that tells your story
You are Tableau Certified
In your mind, R is more than just a letter and Python is not just a snake
To view the expectations and responsibilities of this role, please view the job description HERE.",5.0,"Life.Church
5.0","Edmond, OK",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1996,Nonprofit Organization,Religious Organizations,Non-Profit,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
14,Data Analyst,$34k-$60k (Glassdoor Est.),"We currently have a new opportunity for a Data Analyst to join our Accounting/Finance/Business Intelligence team. This position will work with data generated by a variety of credit union systems to create, validate, and generate business reports that management will use in decision making. This position will coordinate with various business areas to envision and develop report specifications, track the request pipeline and delivery metrics, suggest system enhancements, and create documentation.

Essential Functions and Responsibilities:

Build and maintain queries, dashboards, and reports.
Respond to day to day custom requests for data and reports.
Perform ad hoc data requests and analysis as needed.
Extract data from various systems.
Analyze results of data reports for anomalies, accuracy, and applicability to business unit requests.
Maintain and develop data dictionaries and documentation of deliverables. Actively participate in data quality related tasks.
Identify patterns and trends in data sets.
Provide recommendations and interpretations of data and information.
Assist with application used for workflow and cross sales program.

Desired Skills and Experience:

Bachelor’s degree in a business, computer, or data science preferred. MBA a plus.
Four years of experience working in database environments designing reports and working with extracts.
Excellent analytical skills with experience managing large amounts of data from various sources.
Experience combining, analyzing and presenting data in a clear manner.
Working knowledge of SQL preferred. Experience with Oracle databases a plus.
Proficient use of Microsoft Office, including Word, Excel and SQL databases.
Exposure to core banking systems a plus.
Strong written and verbal communication skills with the ability to interact with all levels of end users and technical resources.
Self-motivated with the ability to react to change, feedback and critique quickly and positively.
Strong attention to detail.
Open and collaborative style, comfortable working in an environment where ideas are shared and challenged.
Ability to conceptualize and implement items in a changing environment.

Fox Communities Credit Union is a $2 billion in assets community-based credit union servicing over 104,000 members at 23 locations. We take pride in being a progressive, member-owned, full service financial institution dedicated to serving the community.

Fox Communities Credit Union believes our employees are our most important asset. We offer a great team environment, competitive salary and an excellent benefit package which includes, medical, dental, vision, life, short-term and long-term disability insurance, 401k (Roth and Traditional), which includes company contributions including match, and paid time off! As part of our commitment to the communities we serve we also offer all employee’s Paid Volunteer Time Off! If you are enthusiastic about a rewarding career with a successful & growing credit union, apply now!

Equal Opportunity Employer of Minorities, Females, Protected Veterans, and Individuals with Disabilities.",3.9,"Fox Communities Credit Union
3.9","Appleton, WI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1953,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
15,Lead IT Analyst - Data Governance,$46k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"About JLG, an Oshkosh company

JLG began in 1969, when our founder, John L. Grove set out to resolve growing safety concerns in the construction industry. Since then we have been committed to understanding the challenges and delivering innovative solutions to the access market. We partner with customers to provide quality equipment, training opportunities and trusted support within the access industry. We are a global company, and our products—including mobile elevating work platforms, telehandlers, utility vehicles and accessories—can be found all over the world.

JOB SUMMARY:

The Lead IT Analyst - Data Governance will lead the full life-cycle of data governance solutions including, creation of data governance policies and procedures, engaging and training data stewards, creation of quality metrics, and working with users to identify and track personally identifiable and other regulated information. This role will work on simple to complex projects and lead and facilitate governance efforts, including coordinating activities with internal and external resources. These activities will contribute to an environment of reliable, quality data to drive better decisions through analytics and reporting within the business.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:

These duties are not meant to be all-inclusive and other duties may be assigned.

Collaborate with business and information technology partners, and subject matter experts to understand data challenges to put the required processes in place to address those challenges.
Work with the Project Management Office to continuously improve testing methodologies related to projects and other activities.
Work with other Digital Technology teams to implement and update on-going production quality process and validations.
Ensure timely corrective actions taken to resolve identified data quality issues, including future mitigation.
Develop and maintain data governance and data quality strategies and oversight of the activities to enact those strategies.
Provide project updates and report on progress of data governance, data quality and control remediation activities
Perform extensive data profiling across the data portfolio to assess current state data quality.
Work with Data Architecture to implement data standards in response to data quality issues, needs and findings.
Evaluate tools including prototyping new capabilities to stay abreast of the Data Management industry.
Lead continuous improvement activities and promote adherence of current department standards.
Guide, mentor, and assist less experienced team members.

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Information Systems or equivalent.
Seven (7) or more years of experience in Data Analysis, Information Technology, or in a related area.

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:

Experience using data governance, data quality, data catalog and data privacy solutions.
Relevant industry training or certifications with data governance tools and other related data management tools.
Ability to translate business and technical requirements into data solutions.
Knowledge of key data management processes.
Experience in project life-cycle management.
Excellent organizational skills and ability to communicate with internal/external entities.
Experience and proficiency with various web-based software applications including Microsoft Office Word, Excel, PowerPoint, SharePoint, etc.

WORKING CONDITIONS:

Physical Demands: Frequent Sitting, Hearing, Talking, Visual, Typing, Manual Dexterity; Seldom Standing, Walking/Running, Reaching, Driving, Bending/Kneeling, Fine Dexterity, Upper Extremity Repetitive Motion, and Lifting/Carrying and Pushing/Pulling up to 40lbs.

#LI-KP1
USA100
Oshkosh is committed to working with and offering reasonable accommodation to job applicants with disabilities. If you need assistance or an accommodation due to disability for any part of the employment process, please contact us at: 920-502-3009 or corporatetalentacquisition@oshkoshcorp.com.

Oshkosh Corporation is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. This company will provide equal opportunity to all individuals without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status. Information collected regarding categories as provided by law will in no way affect the decision regarding an employment application.

Oshkosh Corporation will not discharge or in any manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with Oshkosh Corporation's legal duty to furnish information.

Certain positions with Oshkosh Corporation require access to controlled goods and technologies subject to the International Traffic in Arms Regulations or the Export Administration Regulations. Applicants for these positions may need to be ""U.S. Persons,"" as defined in these regulations. Generally, a ""U.S. Person"" is a U.S. citizen, lawful permanent resident, or an individual who has been admitted as a refugee or granted asylum.",4.2,"Oshkosh Corporation
4.2","Hagerstown, MD",-1,10000+ Employees,1917,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
16,Sr Data Analyst,$49k-$89k (Glassdoor Est.),"Do you love data? Do you thrive on digging for info to answer complex questions and solve head-scratching problems? If you say yes, you might be part of the next generation of data scientists we’re looking for! This Sr level position will assist in prepping raw data for analysis, running and monitoring statistical models, and preparing findings for internal and external use.

The role

No two days at Suds Creative are the same, but in general you can expect to:
Establish and Manage SQL and API connections
Use statistical methods to analyze data and generate useful business reports
Work with management team to create a prioritized list of needs for each business segment
Identify and recommend new ways to gain revenue by streamlining analytic processes
Use data to create models that depict trends in the customer base and the consumer population as a whole
Work with departmental managers to outline the specific data needs for each business method analysis projects
You’re most likely to succeed in this role if you:
3-5 years in data management
Strong background in mathematics, finance and statistics
Proven track record of communicating complex findings in a digestible format
Experience with R-Studio, Rattle, Alteryx, Tableau, SPSS, or Python.
Nice to haves:
High degree of comfortability in Excel, SQL and API management
Functional knowledge of various statistical tools (Regression, ANOVA, ARIMA, Clustering, and PCA)
Create and Manage API data connections
Pull and manage SQL data
Natural curiosity, and the ability to adapt models to the available data
Benefits& pay

We will invest in your professional development and create an environment where you will be given an opportunity to grow and develop your career. We offer a competitive compensation and a wide range of benefits, including paid time off, health insurance with company HSA contribution, dental, vision, 401(k) with company match, life insurance, and disability insurance. Plus, your favorite beverage will be stocked in our refrigerator!

Work environment
At Suds Creative, we strive to foster a relaxed, friendly work environment that encourages creativity and collaboration. We are a quickly expanding company seeking someone who wants to grow alongside us as we take on new and exciting projects.
If you are a qualified individual with a disability or a disabled veteran, you may request a reasonable accommodation if you are unable or limited in your ability to access job openings or apply for a job on this site as a result of your disability. You can request reasonable accommodations by calling 1-330-645-4200.
DRB Systems, LLC is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status.",3.3,"DRB
3.3","Meridian, ID",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1984,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
17,Transportation Data Analyst III,$55k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the Opportunity
The Transportation Data Analyst III is responsible to develop and maintain data analytics to measure and drive outstanding service and financial performance of the transportation and customs compliance network, across the United States, Mexico and Canada. Ability to work in a fast pace environment; partnering with management and team members to develop dynamic analytics within transportation and customs compliance that will guide continuous business improvement decisions to optimize service and financial performance.
Responsibilities
Engage with leadership and team members within transportation, customs compliance, and cross functionally, to create data analytics around key performance and financial metrics to identify data driven business decisions.
Create, develop and manage analytics using Excel, SQL and Tableau.
Analyze, model, mine, and interpret data generate new ideas through a deep understanding of the data, supply chain, customers and business.
Manage large databases that include data from various sources.
Translate data into actionable insights.
Manage report data quality, stability, scalability and trustworthiness over time.
Conduct exploratory analysis for improvement opportunities in business areas not actively monitored by stakeholders.
Present business insights, data, and KPI’s to team members and leadership.
Oversee the process to pay carriers weekly, and perform month end reporting.
Develop and implement SOP’s to effectively manage data and reporting.
Candidate Profile


Bachelor’s degree in Supply Chain/ Logistics / Business Analytics with 3+yrs years’ experience in supply chain, logistics and/or transportation / customs compliance.
Excellent oral and written communications skills with the ability to communicate professionally and effectively at multiple levels both inside and outside of the organization.
Highly proficient with Tableau, SQL, and Microsoft Office applications, including Excel, Word, Power Point and Outlook.
Strong track record of performing high impact business analysis and building useful data tools with tangible business results.
Strong storytelling – interpreting insights into a concise and compelling story others can embrace.
Possess a thorough understanding of transportation finance, operations, internal systems and network functions.
Complete tasks and projects in an accurate, timely, and efficient manner.
Ability to thrive in a fast paced, and collaborative environment with a diverse group of individuals.
Bilingual – English/Spanish preferred.
Perform other duties as assigned by Driscoll’s management.
Driscoll's",4.3,"Driscoll's
4.3","Watsonville, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1900,Company - Private,Food Production,Agriculture & Forestry,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
18,Data Analyst,$42k-$81k (Glassdoor Est.),"Sapphire Digital seeks a dynamic and driven mid-level Data Analyst/QA to join our growing New Jersey team with experience in the healthcare domain. This role will perform in-depth analysis of our internal data management systems to identify, analyze, and interpret trends and/or patterns in order to provide actionable recommendations for data integrity. The Data Analyst/QA will work closely with multiple internal teams to collaborate on different stages of the data lifecycle and assist in developing data quality processes.
In this position, you'll be responsible for:
Preparing and conducting analyses and studies, needs assessment, and requirements analysis to align systems and solutions
Overseing data QA functions to ensure data integrity and accuracy
Monitoring all production data processes and validation systems
Performing data investigations, root cause analysis, data profiling, and data lineage activities
Performing research and provides recommendations for data processes and updates
Reviewing and analyzes specific data elements for accuracy and quality assurance
Driving the resolution of the identified data quality problems
Maintaining documentation as required
Partnering with BI in the development of reports and presentations
Maintaining data quality rules, data standards and data governance policies
Supporting special project work as assigned by the data managers
Collaborating effectively with cross functional teams including Data, Business Intelligence, Business Applications, and Engineering

You might be a good fit if you have:
Bachelor's degree (B. A. / B. S.) from four-year college or university; 4+ years related experience and/or training; or equivalent combination of education and experience
5+ years of experience as a data analyst or in a related field
Expertise with query languages (SQL) required
Experience working with large complex datasets including healthcare data such as medical claims, clinical information, demographic data and program activity results
Exposure with one or more of the following programming languages: SAS, Python, R
Prior experience working with Healthcare data, or in the Healthcare field preferred
Experience with data visualization tools and methodologies (Excel and PowerBI)
Demonstrated experience in analyzing large data sets and relational databases
Ability to manage time and priorities of multiple projects/tasks
Displays professionalism and ability to learn quickly
Extremely detail oriented
Strong oral and written communication skills
Ability to collaborate closely with multiple teams across with a wide range of technical backgrounds",3.4,"Sapphire Digital
3.4","Lyndhurst, NJ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
19,Data Analyst/Lead Collateral Analyst,$69k-$116k (Glassdoor Est.),"At FHLB Des Moines, we work each day to develop an inclusive culture that supports and leverages the complexity of a diverse workforce. This enables us to effectively serve the needs of our members and help them succeed.

Responsibilities/Duties/Function/Tasks:
Extract data from Bank systems and validate for accuracy.
Analyze collateral data received from members in order to create spreadsheets, reports, and perform research.
Maintain a controlled operating environment, perform first line of defense data analysis, process reviews, ensuring compliance with Bank policy, regulation and procedures.
Manage and report on Member and Financial Operations End User Computing Applications (EUCs), ensuring compliance with necessary controls as outlined in the Bank’s policies and procedures
Analyze and develop processes to ensure compliance with all regulations, policies, and procedures
Identify and implement efficiencies within processes to aide in prompt, accurate delivery of products and services to our members
Ensure written procedures align with Bank policies and controls
Support management in preparation and validation of reports and presentations for the Board of Directors, Management, Internal Audit, FHFA examinations and members as well as other information as needed
Provide excellent service to internal and external customers by responding to requests for service and choosing the appropriate method for communicating with members and co-workers
Manage departmental internal controls and regulatory issues
Ensure business activities are in line with Strategic Business Plans
Provide backup to the other Member and Financial Operations Collateral Analysts as needed
Perform other duties and projects as assigned
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in an accounting, finance, business or math-related fields or equivalent experience in a financial services field.
Experience with mortgage lending documentation (residential, commercial, and/or agricultural) a plus
Experience working with securities a plus
High attention to detail; inquisitive mind-set.
Strong verbal and written communications skills that promote effective working relationships in a team-oriented environment.
Strong organization and presentation skills.
Strong interpersonal skills and ability to interact effectively with customers, vendors and employees at all levels of the Bank
Strong computer skills, including proficiency using Microsoft Windows, Word, Excel and Visio.
Experience with business intelligence & visualization software such QlikView, Qlik Sense or similar is preferred
Solid understanding of business process flows, data sources and controls
Must be analytical and team-oriented, enthusiastic and able to work in a fast-paced environment
Excellent project management and multi-tasking skills
Ability to work independently.
Demonstrated ability to partner and build strong collaborative, trusting relationships.
Ability to positively engage, self-motivate and possess a strong desire to learn.
Manage, analyze, and recommend changes to processes and procedures within the Bank’s control framework, perform comprehensive mapping of business processes, while encompassing requirements of SOX controls, general controls, End User Computing Applications and Qliksense reports to ensure compliance with Bank policies, procedures and applicable regulations. Further improve the quality and strength of collaborative risk assessment initiatives for all controlled operating environments focusing on the reporting of numerous processes including, but not limited to member collateral, Muni Evaluations and pricing thus enabling a more synchronized approach for internal audits, external audits and regulatory exams.",3.4,"FHLB Des Moines
3.4","Des Moines, IA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1932,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
20,Data Analyst,$38k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the role:

Dodge Data & Analytics is searching for a Data Analyst who will responsible for the production, support, and maintenance of custom Dodge Research and Analytics products and services. The Analyst will work closely with the Dodge sales force and will serve as part of a team for the Analytics group customers in the support and use of their products.

What you'll do:
Work in a group of 4-6 analysts to provide regular data analysis and delivery of ongoing services to a set of clients.
Support clients by providing an understanding of our proprietary data and its application to their business and industry.
Work in a PC based environment using a variety of software and database packages to provide data analysis and production of numerous client-specific deliveries.
Work directly with specific customers as the key contact for certain information services.
Build strong relationships with the internal sales team to enhance existing services and to support new business opportunities.
Maintain quality standards in all client deliveries.
Develop a thorough knowledge of Dodge Analytics databases and products.
Work with the Analytics sales specialists in supporting our products with customers and supporting any efforts to maintain or enhance our current client relationships. This will eventually include some direct client contact by telephone and email.
What you'll bring:
Strong analytical and problem-solving ability, self-motivated team player, and capable of working in an independent atmosphere with minimal supervision.
Technical proficiency with database (Microsoft Access) and spreadsheet (Excel) applications beneficial.
Strong written, oral, and interpersonal communication skills, including the ability to effectively interact with both customers and team members. The Data Analyst will be a direct point of contact for customers whose services are assigned to him/her.
Familiarity with basic business analysis.
BA/BS or more required
0-3 years of professional experience required.
Dodge Data & Analytics is committed to leveraging the talent of a diverse workforce to create great opportunities for our business and our people. EOE/AA. Minority/Female/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/Disability/Veteran",2.6,"Dodge Data & Analytics
2.6","Bedford, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2014,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
21,Consumer Lending Data Analyst,$44k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are searching for a Consumer Lending Data Analyst to research and analyze data in order to make strategic business recommendations. In this role, you will perform competitor research to enhance our product strategy and direction. Having 3 years' experience in a complex analyst role will help you succeed in this role. Additionally, having an understating of lending principals and risk metrics will help the candidate be successful.
Here's what you can expect from the job and what you need to be successful:

Job Duties:
In partnership with key stakeholders, analyze, test and launch new initiatives to increase productivity
Provide data driven insights and recommendations to various departments within the credit union
Perform key competitor research and analysis to better inform product strategy and direction
Creating advanced reports, dashboards and deep dive analyses that inform and drive the
credit union’s product and business strategy
Create and refine predictive models on product, marketing, and risk initiatives
Uncover actionable insights for increased product performance
Partnering with marketing, finance and digital teams to enable business and systems synergy
Essential Skills:
Minimum 3 years’ previous experience in a complex analyst role; financial institution strongly preferred
Minimum 3 years’ previous experience with data collection methodologies
Experience with relational databases, e.g., SQL, Alteryx, and Tableau will help you succeed in this role
Familiarity with coding languages, e.g., R, Python
Strong understanding of statistical overlays and models for predictive analytics
Ability to analyze data from a strategic point of view and contribute to and influence discussions that drive the business
Ability to use key performance metrics and data to provide insights and make strategic business recommendations
Proficiency to organize, analyze and interpret data to explain complex irregularities or trends
Form strong relationships with cross-functional teams where support, resources and synergy is needed
Basic understanding of lending principals and risk metrics
Project Management experience; familiarity with Six Sigma/DMAIC methodologies
Expert knowledge of Excel
Education: Bachelor’s degree in Business Administration, other related fields of study or equivalent experience
Location: Hillsboro, OR 97124

First Tech is not currently offering Visa sponsorship for this position

FT123

#LI-EK",3.2,"First Tech Federal Credit Union
3.2","Hillsboro, OR",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1952,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
22,Contract Data Analyst,$54k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

Amyx is seeking to hire a Contract Data Analyst located in Rosslyn, VA. The successful candidate must have A 4-year course of study leading to a bachelor's degree with a major in any field, that includes or is supplemented by at least 24 semester hours in any combination of the following fields: accounting, business, finance, law, contracts, purchasing, economics, industrial management, marketing, quantitative methods or organization. Also, a minimum of 2 years of experience serving as a Federal government and/or contractor employee in the GS-1102 series or equivalent capacity as a contract specialist/administrator or procurement analyst

Responsibilities:

Responsibilities and Skills:

Knowledge of WAWF eBusiness processes.
Knowledge of the federal acquisition process.
Knowledge of contracting principles, laws regulation and procedures.
Knowledge of methods and techniques of fact-finding, analysis, and resolution of complex problems, and the ability to develop concrete action plans to solve problems.
Knowledge and Experience of the WAWF eBusienss Suite, to include: iRAPT, EDA, IUID, CDR, MyInvoice, and Contract Closeout.
Good verbal, analytical and written communication skills.
Good organizational skills in tracking data and actions.
Knowledge and Experience writing professional documents.
Knowledge and Experience in Customer Service.
Skilled in Business Intelligence Reporting.
Proficient in the use of the Microsoft suite of applications including Word, SharePoint, Excel, PowerPoint, Outlook, and Project as well as with Adobe Acrobat.

Supported Technologies:
Integrative Acquisition Environment
DOD acquisition system

Qualifications:

Required Skills and Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree and preferred majors are accounting, business, finance, law, contracts, purchasing, economics, industrial management, marketing, quantitative methods or organization.
2 years of experience required in serving as a Federal government and/or contractor employee in the GS-1102 series or equivalent capacity as a contract specialist/administrator or procurement analyst.

Desired Skills and Qualifications:
Knowledge of Federal and DOD acquisition procedures

Amyx is an Equal Opportunity employer. Amyx is committed to providing equal employment opportunity to all job seekers. Every qualified applicant receives focused consideration for employment and no one is discriminated against on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability or protected veteran status. In addition to federal law requirements, Amyx complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. This applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training. Equal Opportunity Employer- Minorities/Females/Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity. Amyx is an E-Verify employer.
Amyx proudly and proactively takes affirmative action to advance employment of individuals who are minorities, women, protected veterans and individuals with disabilities.
Physical Demands
Employee needs to be able to sit at a workstation for extended periods; use hand(s) to handle or feel objects, tools, or controls; reach with hands and arms; talk and hear. Most positions require ability to work on desktop or laptop computer for extended periods of time reading, reviewing/analyzing information, and providing recommendations, summaries and/or reports in written format. Must be able to effectively communicate with others verbally and in writing. Employee may be required to occasionally lift and/or move moderate amounts of weight, typically less than 20 pounds. Regular and predictable attendance is essential.",4.1,"Amyx, Inc.
4.1","Arlington, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1999,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
23,Data Analyst,$37k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Under general direction from the Data Analytics Supervisor, the Data Analyst I is responsible for developing, communicating, publishing, understanding, reconciling and maintaining reports, data cubes, and data tables for various business units, as well as managing the volume forecasting process from inputs to outputs. The role is also responsible for producing ad hoc analysis on a wide variety of insurance topics as necessary.
Responsibilities:
Assists with the development and maintenance of data sets to be used by other members of the department, including marketing, actuarial, modeling and product teams.
Modifies and maintains a model that forecasts volume and related components. This model requires complex programming as well as interfacing with the business
Updates volume forecast model and communicates results to the business on a timely basis. Analyzes process workflows and proposes improvements.
Creates and updates documentation
Publishes results within deadlines.
Reviews existing weekly, monthly, quarterly and annual reporting for accuracy, calls attention to problems
Helps to further align our metrics and data so these can be consumed across the enterprise
Answers data-related inquires and provides data to internal customers as requested.
Other job-related responsibilities as required.
Requirements and Skills:
Demonstrated expertise performing data analysis.
Proficiency manipulating data in Excel.
Understanding of insurance products and reserving.
Ability to research company raw data and use that data to build analytical data stores.
Ability to use relational database products to write data queries in SQL, build, update and maintain data cubes in SQL.
Demonstrated ability to communicate with internal customers about technical concepts and expected deliverables
Ability to reconcile data in a transparent way
Experience in assembling code into SSIS packages
Experience designing and modifying dashboards using Tableau
Education/Experience/Degree Requirements:
Demonstrated problem solving experience gained through related coursework and work experience.
1 or more years of experience with relational database tools and concepts.
BA/BS degree in quantitative field of study.
Property and Casualty Insurance experience preferred.",3.6,"Plymouth Rock Assurance
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
24,Data Analyst II,$53k-$91k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who is Cenlar?

You are.

Employee-owners have made Cenlar one of the nation’s largest mortgage subservicers. We have achieved success by empowering people with company ownership, real programs that provide avenues for advancement, and a great atmosphere that makes everyone look forward to the workday. Get your share of our success by considering the opportunity to join our team as a Data Analyst II.

Job Summary:

Responsible for working with large and complex data sets (both internal and external data) to evaluate, recommend, and support the implementation of business strategies. Identifies and compiles data sets using a variety of tools (e.g. SQL, Access) to help predict, improve, and measure the success of key business to business outcomes. Responsible for documenting data requirements, data collection/processing/cleaning, and exploratory data analysis; which may include utilizing statistical models/algorithms and data visualization techniques. Incumbents in this role may often be referred to as Data Scientists.

Responsibilities:
Day-to-day actions are focused on administering defined procedures, analysis and report preparation.
Commands knowledge of data elements across the enterprise and industry – definitions, lineage and usage
Executes creation of tabular operational reports and aggregation reports with medium to high complexity.
Commands intermediate to expert level t-SQL coding proficiency
Performs data mapping for systems integration, data provisioning, and data consumption
Responsible for documenting metadata, data lineage, data definitions and business glossary entries.
Handles basic data transformation tasks such as date and decimal formatting, rounding of numeric values, and conversion of numeric values to percentages.
Has intermediate to expert level SSIS ETL build proficiency
Works with Data stewards to enforce adherence to standards for enhancements and new repositories.
Handles more complicated report requests, data visualizations, forecasting, regression modeling, sequencing (e.g. Fibonacci or similar) and trend analysis.
Can deduce portfolio or market trends from reports or chart analysis.
Understands business logic for aggregation and analysis services.
Can perform data transformation and can produce dimensional reports
Can perform basic data profiling activities, understands cardinality
Helps to define guidelines for data management, governance and reporting
May direct day-to-day work of employees, but will not typically have formal management role.
Individual at this level is expected to use some independence of thought but to refer more complex problems to supervisors or other experts.
Individual would be expected to contribute to work flow or process change and redesign and to form a strong basic understanding of the specific product or process.
Qualifications:
Typically exhibits strong executional capabilities and is beginning to take on more responsibility.
Primary focus is on execution within defined parameters, with some expansion based on developing capabilities and or experiences. In partnership with more experienced staff.
Minimum of 5 years of experience.
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, finance, mathematics, statistics (or similar) or equivalent work experience
Total Rewards:

Cenlar FSB offers outstanding benefits which may include paid medical/dental/life insurance, 401k, employee ownership, tuition assistance, a supportive work environment, and genuine opportunities for advancement. Cenlar is a Drug Free Workplace and an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer -- M/F/D/V/SO.

Visit www.cenlar.com for more details.

Please apply online.",2.5,"Cenlar
2.5","Ewing, NJ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1958,Company - Private,-1,-1,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
25,Data Analyst,$47k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst
Location: Washington, DC
Education Required: Bachelor’s degree required, preferably in math, engineering, business, or the sciences.
Skills Required:

We are seeking highly motivated individuals to support a range of critical and exciting Department of Defense (DoD) and Naval Acquisition projects. Ideal candidates will possess a Bachelor’s degree in business, engineering, or related fields and 3+ years of experience, or a Master’s degree in a related field and at least one year of experience.

Successful candidates will also possess the following qualifications:
24 semester hours of quantitative course work (mathematics, statistics, engineering, physics, chemistry, etc.)
Experience obtaining, integrating, analyzing, and reporting client data, esp. acquisition data
Ability to apply analytic techniques to define project objectives and strategic direction, resolving complex problems using an in-depth knowledge of analytic methodologies and principles
Strong researching, data gathering, and technical reviews needed to produce written deliverables to include reports, spreadsheets, databases, formal process mapping, and technical designs
Microsoft Access experience
Ability to obtain and maintain a security clearance
U.S. Citizenship required
Responsibilities:
Assess requirements, determine necessary resources to accomplish task, hypothesize solutions, develop solution, and report findings to various levels of government leadership
Develop algorithms for data analysis
Plan and conducts work requiring judgment in the evaluation, selection, and adaptation and/or modification of methodologies and tools
Consult with senior consultants or functional specialists on unusual or complex problems
Assess requirements, determine necessary resources to accomplish task, hypothesize solutions, develop solution, and report findings
Benefits:
We offer competitive salaries commensurate with education and experience. We have an excellent benefits package that includes:
Comprehensive health, dental, life, long and short term disability insurance
100% Company funded Retirement Plans
Generous vacation, holiday and sick pay plans
Tuition assistance

Benefits are provided to employees regularly working a minimum of 30 hours per week.

Tecolote Research is a private, employee-owned corporation where people are our primary resource. Our investments in technology and training give our employees the tools to ensure our clients are provided the solutions they need, and our very high employee retention rate and stable workforce is an added value to our customers. Apply now to connect with a company that invests in you.",3.8,"Tecolote Research
3.8","Washington, DC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1973,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
26,"Senior Analyst, Data Analytics & Reporting",$91k-$153k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Overview

Outset is a medical technology company pioneering a first-of-its-kind technology to reduce the cost and complexity of dialysis. The Tablo Hemodialysis System, FDA cleared for use from the hospital to the home, represents a significant technological advancement that transforms the dialysis experience for patients and operationally simplifies it for providers. Tablo serves as a single enterprise solution that can be utilized across the continuum of care, allowing dialysis to be delivered anytime, anywhere and by anyone. The integration of water purification and on-demand dialysate production enables Tablo to serve as a dialysis clinic on wheels, with 2-way wireless data transmission and a proprietary data analytics platform powering a new holistic approach to dialysis care.

Position Overview

The Sr Analyst, Data Analytics & Reporting will address needs related to strategic & ad hoc analysis requests, standard reporting & presentations as well as assigned projects that many span multiple functional areas. Analytics reports will be ad hoc as well as strategic based and will focus on such areas as: sales productivity & strategies, territory utilization & design, customer activation and marketing campaign measurement. Standard reports & presentations are analytically driven and are to be produced in an accurate, timely and reliable manner. Assigned projects and associated role will vary based on needs of the organization,

Essential Job Functions and Responsibilities
Perform strategic and ad hoc analysis:
Leverages data analytics tools to create new dashboards, reports, and any additional ad-hoc requests.
Executes existing reporting and analytical responsibilities.
Ensures the quality of work output by displaying a keen attention to detail.
Presents findings in easily understood ways, focuses on how the data analytics fits into the bigger picture.
Develop and execute on standard management reports and presentations
Design, prepare, analyze and distribute standard management reports & presentations that are facilitate business discussions via insightful, accurate, comprehensive and timely presentation of relevant data.
Enhance and streamline management reporting process by adopting best-in-class modern intelligence tools and improving data quality in partnership with stakeholders in risk management, technology and business teams.
Proactively identify areas of improvement and make recommendations for new programs and process improvements.
Provide project management and develop business requirements for assigned projects.
Lead or coordinate on projects that encompass cross-functional teams and disciplines.
Build relationships across the organization such that skills & experience can be applied in new ways to further success of the organization.
Develop business requirements that can be used by other teams to perform necessary development activities.
Requirements/Qualifications
Education and Experience (List degree requirements, years of experience, certifications, etc.).
S. in Computer Science, Math, Engineering, Finance, or related quantitative field
5+ years work experience with MS Excel, MS Access, SQL Server, Tableau or comparable database systems.
Proven ability to work across all levels of the organization.
Skills and Abilities - (List required skills and abilities).
Strategic entrepreneurial thinker, able to translate business strategy to support function
Deadline-driven, organized, detailed and able to multi-task with the willingness to adapt to the rapid business and organizational demands
Good analytical, communication (both verbal and written) and presentation skills
Desire to understand the ""why"" behind the numbers",4.5,"Outset Medical
4.5","San Jose, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
27,Program and Data Analyst,$40k-$72k (Glassdoor Est.),"Program and Data Analyst

Role Overview:

The Program and Data Analyst is the data analytics expert serving the Recruitment, Admissions, and Digital Marketing teams at Urban Teachers. The Program and Data Analyst is responsible for building and maintaining all our data management systems, conducting analysis on trends in the data, providing partner teams within the organization access to critical recruitment and admissions data, and maintaining the knowledge management system for the recruitment and admissions teams.

The Program and Data Analyst is a strategic member of the Recruitment and Admissions team and is a key part of the leadership team. This position reports to the Vice President of Recruitment and Admissions.

Location:

Due to the impact of COVID-19, our regional offices are closed and staff members will work virtually until further notice. Otherwise, location is flexible for the right candidate, though a strong preference will be given to candidates in the Baltimore/Washington metro areas.

Key Areas of Responsibility

Data Management and Analysis
Conduct data analysis to identify the impact of recruitment and engagement efforts. Monitor progress towards recruitment goals. Loft challenges and opportunities present in the data to help guide the recruitment, admissions, and digital marketing teams to capitalize on opportunities and address concerns
Support the customization of Salesforce to better support Recruitment and Admissions. Manage Salesforce infrastructure updates
Develop and maintain Salesforce reports and dashboards
Establish rules for data management and structure including campaign hierarchy, recruiter event tracking, lead source, affiliations, etc.
Knowledge Management, Training and Support
Train and support recruitment, marketing, and admissions staff members on utilization of Salesforce, Power BI, and other data management and reporting platforms
Ensure strong data quality across the recruitment and admissions team and support with data quality management
Develop a strong reporting knowledge management process to ensure long-term data management
Determine the technology needs to evolve recruitment, admissions, and marketing reporting
Participate in teacher selection and interview days
Relationship Management
Serve as a liaison between IT and the Recruitment and Admissions teams
Design presentations for the Urban Teachers’ board meetings to highlight recruitment and admissions work
Provide ad hoc reporting on recruitment to other teams within the organization including The Black Educators Initiative, Development Team, Performance & Evaluation, and regional site teams
Requirements
Bachelor's degree from an accredited institution
Proficiency in Microsoft Office products. Advanced proficiency in Microsoft Excel and PowerPoint
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Experience using and customizing Salesforce. Experience creating reports, dashboards in Salesforce is a must. Salesforce Administrator certification highly preferred.
Experience building reports and visualizations in Power BI or similar data business intelligence software is a must
Advanced ability to analyze data and use analysis to inform strategies and efforts
Results-oriented, self-directed and a self-starter who is comfortable operating in grey space
Ability to work as a part of a remote team
A deep commitment to ending educational inequity
How You Operate
Operate with a strong internal locus of control—proactively problem-solving, voicing questions/concerns, and taking ownership of your team
Lead with and project sense of possibility, imagining and thinking boldly about what we will accomplish
Contribute to the collective, pitching in to support teammates when needed and feasible
Always strive to have a growth mindset and a learning orientation
About Urban Teachers

The mission of Urban Teachers is to improve educational and life outcomes of children in urban schools by preparing culturally competent, effective career teachers who accelerate student achievement and disrupt systems of racial and socioeconomic inequity. Urban Teachers accomplishes this by recruiting outstanding candidates, equipping them with state-of-the-art training, and linking their certification to their demonstration of effective teaching practices and skills. Participants in the Urban Teachers program also receive a Master’s of Science in Education from the Johns Hopkins School of Education – a top 15 graduate school of education according to U.S. News and World Report. Founded in 2009, Urban Teachers is on the cutting edge of teacher preparation. Learn more about Urban Teachers on our website: urbanteachers.org

As an Employer of National Service, Urban Teachers recognizes the unique skills of national service alumni. Accordingly, AmeriCorps alumni, returned Peace Corps volunteers, and other national service participants are encouraged to apply to our job openings.

Urban Teachers does not discriminate on the basis of race, color, religion, gender, sexual orientation, age, or national and ethnic origin in hiring and employment, nor in the administration of its educational policies, admissions policies, scholarship and other programs.

Our VALUES:

WE SERVE CHILDREN: Children are the center of our work. We rely on the communities we serve to guide and inform the decisions we make about our curriculum, program and practice.

WE ARE AN ANTI-RACIST ORGANIZATION: We are committed to ongoing knowledge seeking, reflection, and action to deliberately oppose racism. We are an inclusive organization that values the diversity of people, backgrounds and perspectives. We are active allies who pursue justice in the communities in which we live and work.

WE ARE LIFE-LONG LEARNERS: We are dedicated to continuous improvement, innovation and excellence. We strive to be on the forefront of what is best for teacher education and students based on research and practice.

WE VALUE EACH OTHER: We value each other as whole people. We are servant leaders who foster a supportive working environment that is empathetic and caring, and values direct, constructive feedback. It is our VISION that every student in the United States is taught by committed, well-prepared, culturally competent teachers.

Qualified individuals who are fully invested in Urban Teachers’ mission and vision and who thrive in a fast-paced, results-oriented setting are encouraged to apply.",4.2,"Urban Teachers
4.2","Baltimore, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2009,Nonprofit Organization,Education Training Services,Education,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
28,Data Management Analyst,$30k-$61k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Management Analyst
Duty Site


Redstone Arsenal, AL

FLSA Status


Exempt

Emp. Status

RT

Apply Now


Job Code:
3377

S3, Inc. is a woman owned small business founded in 1991, headquartered in Huntsville, AL, that provides technical, programmatic, and logistics services to US Department of Defense, other US Government Agencies, and Partner Nation militaries, co-located with Government requirements. S3 has a wholly owned subsidiary, KBFS, that provides aviation pilot training, heavy lift, aircraft maintenance, and related aircraft services to Government and commercial requirements IAW multiple FAA certifications.

S3 Inc. is seeking a Data Management Analyst to support projects on Redstone Arsenal. AL.

Position Description: The Data Management Analyst is responsible for managing the PMO Data Management System to include: reviewing of all submitted contractor technical data for correctness ( format, topic relevance, completeness, and data rights markings); distribution of the contractor data to the appropriate government and contractor personnel; consolidating and preparing Contract Data Requirements Lists (CDRLs-DD1423s) and Document Summary List (DSL) packages for Contract Requirements Packages (CRP) to be submitted through government contracting channels; forecasting and tracking CDRL deliveries to ensure compliance with DD 1423s; support, administer, and maintain the document repository containing all CDRLs; create and manage multiple SharePoint sites and manage SharePoint user accounts; and prepare weekly metric reports for PMO leadership regarding CDRL submissions, CDRLs in-work, and CDRLs needing signature. Will review Assertions List from prime and subcontractors to determine compliance with DFARS and support the challenge procedures and complete Defense Logistics Agency (DLA) Post Award and Intercept Database (PAID) and Procurement Aging and Staging System (PASS) actions assuring proper administrative lead times. Also will search the electronic data management systems (EDMS) such as SharePoint, PFRMS networks, and MEARS to support user's request for information.

Experience/Skills Required:

• 2 years of experience reviewing contractor technical data for correctness and distributing data.

• 2 years of experience consolidating and preparing CDRLs and DSL for contract requirements packages.

• 2 years of experience forecasting and tracking CDRL deliveries in compliance with requirements lists.

• 1 year of experience in maintaining a document repository.

• 1 year of experience with managing SharePoint site and SharePoint user accounts or similar.

• 1 year of experience with preparation of reports on technical data submissions.

• 2 years of experience searching databases for information needed by users.

• 1 year of experience working with DLA, PAID, and PASS actions or similar.

Education Required: Bachelors’ Degree and 8 years of relevant experience or HS and 11 years overall experience.

Security Clearance Required: Secret Clearance.

Certifications/Licenses: None.

Other: N/A

Systems Studies and Simulation, Inc. provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.
If you are a qualified individual with a disability or a disabled veteran, you have the right to request a reasonable accommodation. If you are unable or limited in your ability to use or access the S3 Inc. Careers Page as a result of your disability, you can request reasonable accommodations by calling (256) 539-1700 Ext 1127 or by sending an email to: recruiter@s3inc.com . Thank you for your interest in S3 Inc.",4.0,"S3, Inc
4.0","Huntsville, AL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1991,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
29,Data Analyst,$59k-$73k (Employer Est.),"Who is Comprehensive Healthcare?
Comprehensive Healthcare provides innovative behavioral health and integrated healthcare services to clients of all ages. We take pride in our creative and collaborative work environment and in delivering clinically excellent, trauma-informed, recovery-oriented services.

What are we looking for in a Data Analyst?
As a member of the Information Services department, the Data Analyst supports Comprehensive’s technology and business initiatives by coordinating the collection, storage, and utilization of essential data. This position will work closely with leadership and other staff to determine data needs for specific projects or ad hoc requests, and then gather, interpret, and present the information to the team. The work of the Data Analyst will impact day-to-day clinic operations as well as business decisions, so a high degree of accuracy, thoroughness, and timeliness are essential. Previous experience performing data analytics in the healthcare field is required. The Data Analyst will work on-site in our Yakima office.

Data Analyst duties may include:

integrating data from internal & external sources and performing extract, transform, and load operations to data in various applications
analyzing data to identify and interpret patterns or trends in data sets
performing data audits to identify problem areas & implementing strategies to optimize data integrity and process improvements
assisting with the design & implementation of database warehouse structure and developing standards for the design of data elements
supporting the implementation, testing, and validation of data & software systems
assisting with ongoing data architecture processes & governance
providing Tier II technical support to employees
documenting all work as it is completed

Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree in computer science, data analytics, or related field
Three years of experience with data analysis within the healthcare industry

What Comprehensive Healthcare Can Offer You
Training and Development

A variety of career opportunities in a wide range of settings with room for mobility and promotion
Regular training opportunities including support, supervision, and consultation in implementing evidence-based services and programs

Innovative Program & Services

A strong reputation for providing quality, evidence-based services within a collaborative multi-disciplinary team environment
Innovative, forward-looking leadership that seeks to thrive in an ever-changing healthcare environment
Joint Commission-accredited organization committed to continuous quality improvement
Established partnerships with major research universities and other community and healthcare providers to implement cutting-edge treatment programs and services

Excellent Benefits

Competitive salaries within our communities and industry
Healthcare coverage for employee and qualified family members
Generous vacation, paid holiday and sick leave policies
Access to Employee Assistance Program services
Agency-funded retirement plan with contributions equal to 5% of compensation
Additional retirement investment opportunities with a 50% investment match of up to 4% of compensation
Agency-funded life and disability insurance program

Comprehensive Healthcare is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We do not discriminate based on race, sex, age, color, religion, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, veteran status, disability status, or any other basis prohibited by federal, state, or local law. We value the diverse perspectives and strengths that our employees bring to the workplace and we encourage individuals from underrepresented groups to apply for our positions. The Human Resources department offers accommodations and assistance for the application and interview process; please contact us at (509) 575-4084 to make arrangements.",3.6,"Comprehensive Healthcare
3.6","Yakima, WA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1971,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
30,Data Analyst,$60k-$87k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

A Data Analyst designs, executes and interprets past and real time data to identify trends, reconcile inconsistencies, and make recommendations to improved IT Service Delivery This includes active analysis of the traditional ITSM Event, Incident, Request, Problem, Knowledge, Change, Configuration and Release processes.

What Youll Get to Do:
Monitors and queries the IT Service Delivery platform to analyze demand, usage, and performance
Uses data analytics to provide actionable, timely and accurate reporting to improve service delivery, infrastructure management, and conduct proactive problem and incident management.
Works with the ITSM Process Leads and Customer Engagement teams to identify and monitor process performance and service provider performance
Analyze, define, and report on trends identified in the data
Facilitate Technical Exchange Meeting related to data structure, quality assurance, and reporting
Leverage the various reporting and presentation tools to provide analysis and recommendations
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports
Develop and implement data collection solutions, data analytics, and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality of information
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs
Locate and define new process improvement and Continual Service Improvement (CSI) opportunities
Youll Bring These Qualifications:
Active TS/SCI with Poly required
A bachelor's degree OR equivalent experience/4+ years of IT experience AND 1+ year of data analyst, performance management, and service delivery reporting
ITIL Foundations certification
A good understanding of IT Service Management delivery
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining, and segmentation techniques
Knowledge of statistics and experience with statistical tools to analyze data sets (Excel, SPSS, or SAS)
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
These Qualifications Would be Nice to Have:
Experience with the ServiceNow toolset
Experience with Tableau
Degree in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics
ITIL Intermediate Certifications
What We Can Offer You:
Weve been named a Best Place to Work by the Washington Post.
Our employees value the flexibility at CACI that allows them to balance quality work and their personal lives.
We offer competitive benefits and learning and development opportunities.
We are mission-oriented and ever vigilant in aligning our solutions with the nations highest priorities.
For over 55 years, the principles of CACIs unique, character-based culture have been the driving force behind our success.
allspark

BITS3

Job Location

US-Chantilly-VA-VIRGINIA SUBURBAN

CACI employs a diverse range of talent to create an environment that fuels innovation and fosters continuous improvement and success. At CACI, you will have the opportunity to make an immediate impact by providing information solutions and services in support of national security missions and government transformation for Intelligence, Defense, and Federal Civilian customers. CACI is proud to provide dynamic careers for employees worldwide. CACI is an Equal Opportunity Employer - Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.",3.8,"CACI International
3.8","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1962,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
31,Data Analyst,$47k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Nolij Consulting LLC is a certified Women-Owned Small Business (WOSB) that provides information technology services in test and evaluation (T&E), enterprise architecture (EA), electronic health record (EHR) modernization, infrastructure operations and maintenance (O&M), data analytics and visualization, and agile transformation. Our mission is to understand the challenges and goals of our clients, address them with innovative solutions, and work together to achieve project success. Were eager to hear from candidates like you that can join and contribute to our team.

Nolij Consulting has an opening for a Data Analyst to join our team based in Falls Church

Requirements:
Must have good interpersonal and communication skills both verbal and written.
Must have strong time management and organizational skills, attention to detail and ability to multitask.
Must have a good understanding of data structure and management.
Must be organized, self-motivated, and self-directed.
Note: Since this position is for a Federal Project, a candidate must possess US Citizenship to obtain Clearance.
Desired Skills:
A fair understanding of SQL, Python and R is a plus.
Experience in developing Pivot Tables/Charts as well as complicated formula is desirable.
BI Dashboards
QLIK OR Tableau
Excel:
V lookup
Data Validation
Data Clean up
Education:
Must have a bachelors degree (in a similar discipline preferred) in any related field.
Do you like the idea of being a driver on a team of distinction? If so, we want to hear from you. To apply, go tohttps://www.nolijconsulting.com/careers/

Nolij is an EEO/Affirmative Action employer and encourages all qualified applicants to apply.",4.1,"Nolij Consulting
4.1","Falls Church, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
32,Data Analyst,-1,"Veteran Owned Firm Seeking a Senior Data Analyst for Role in Washington, DC

My name is Stephen Hrutka and I am the owner of a Veteran Owned firm in Washington, DC focused on Supply Chain, Strategic Sourcing, and Technical/Cleared Recruiting.

HRUCKUS helps other Veteran Owned businesses recruit for positions across the VA, SBA, HHS, DARPA, and other cutting-edge R&D related defense agencies.

One of my Veteran-owned clients is looking for a Senior Data Analyst to support a Federal Client in Washington, DC. The ideal candidate has Veterans Affairs experience and experience within the financial management office.

If this role is not a fit for you but you may know someone, I am glad to offer a referral bonus for any successful placements.

Thanks,

Stephen M Hrutka
Principal Consultant
HRUCKUS LLC

Executive Summary: HRUCKUS is seeking a Senior Data Analyst with 8 years of experience to support a Federal Client in Washington, DC.

Overall Job Description: This position will provide support services to a Federal Client in their initiative to provide fraud prevention services for the Veterans Benefits Administration in addressing its improper payment and fraud prevention/investigation needs.

Position Responsibilities:
Performs tasks which may include obtaining data through advanced computerized models
Extrapolating data patterns through advanced algorithms
Developing simple graphs and charts to explain how the mathematical information will influence the specific project or business
Presenting to managers how to best alter their business models to generate profitable future trends
Education Requirement: BA/BS degree",5.0,"HRUCKUS
5.0","Washington, DC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
33,Data Scientist Risk Analyst,$50k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

Oasis Systems has an exciting opportunity for a Data Analyst to support the Commodity Futures Trading Commission (CFTC) in Washington, DC.
The successful candidate shall provide support in data analytics, Python, data visualization, dashboards and use of data analytic tools. Activities which the contractor may be tasked to perform include gathering requirements from stakeholders, conducting financial data analysis and risk analysis in a Big Data environment, and creating interactive dashboard reports and documentations.

LOCATION: Washington, DC

JOB STATUS: Full-Time

REQUIRED QUALIFICATIONS (Education, Certifications, Experience, Skills)

SECURITY CLEARANCE: Ability to pass a Special Agreement Check (SAC) and a National Agency Check and Inquires (NACI) Background Investigation

EDUCATION: Bachelor’s degree

CERTIFICATIONS AND TOOLS: Certifications in Data Analytics program languages such as Python and R preferred but not required. Experience with Global Risk product a plus, but not required.

EXPERIENCE LEVEL: A minimum of 8 years of relevant experience in the data analysis field and a minimum of 5 years of industrial analytics experience using Python (recent use during the past 3 years) as well as extensive experience with SQL.
Specific experience with financial or market risk analysis is a Must.

DESCRIPTION: Functionally, the candidate will be responsible for:

Work closely with the customer to gather and document project requirements.
Perform data manipulation and advanced data analysis including financial modeling, data mining, and Machine Learning techniques.
Perform risk analysis which may include a broad range of financial risk measures, (such as Value at Risk (VaR): computation and evaluation, VaR tracking (VaR evolution over time), Incremental (and marginal) VaR calculation for individual asset classes /positions, conditional VaR, stress testing).
Test each project thoroughly before presenting it to the task order project manager for quality control. Document test results as part of the project closeout documentation.
Create documentation as required under the PMLC and the Configuration Change Board (CCB) in order to move projects to the production environment.
Coordinate with internal and external organizations providing data to understand and resolve improper data formatting and other integration issues.
Participate in facilitated meetings between stakeholders at CFTC which may include regular status meetings, user acceptance testing meetings and ad hoc development discussions.
Data analysis tasks may be varied. They will include complex data requests that require data mining, extraction, and query optimization services from Divisions throughout the CFTC.
Assist business users, economists, statisticians, and others, as required, to support effective use of analytic techniques and CFTC-approved tools to meet the customers various analytic needs.

Who We Are

Oasis Systems is a premier provider of customer-driven, cost-effective and quality Engineering Services; Enterprise Systems and Applications; Human Factors Engineering; Information Technology and Cyber Security; Professional Services; and Specialized Engineering Solutions to the Department of Defense, FAA, NRC and other federal agencies.

We strive to be an exciting and welcoming company that attracts, develops, motivates and retains the most talented, skilled and dedicated people in the industry; where they are encouraged to achieve personal excellence, purpose, and their full potential and career aspirations; while supporting mission-critical national security technologies and programs.

Oasis Systems is an equal opportunity employer and does not discriminate in hiring or employment on the basis of any legally protected characteristic including, but not limited to, race, color, religion, national origin, marital status, gender, sexual orientation, ancestry, age, medical condition, military veteran status or on the basis of physical handicap which, with reasonable accommodation, render the application to satisfactorily perform the job available.",3.8,"Oasis Systems LLC
3.8","Washington, DC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1997,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
34,Data Analyst,$60k-$87k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

A Data Analyst designs, executes and interprets past and real time data to identify trends, reconcile inconsistencies, and make recommendations to improved IT Service Delivery This includes active analysis of the traditional ITSM Event, Incident, Request, Problem, Knowledge, Change, Configuration and Release processes.

What Youll Get to Do:
Monitors and queries the IT Service Delivery platform to analyze demand, usage, and performance
Uses data analytics to provide actionable, timely and accurate reporting to improve service delivery, infrastructure management, and conduct proactive problem and incident management.
Works with the ITSM Process Leads and Customer Engagement teams to identify and monitor process performance and service provider performance
Analyze, define, and report on trends identified in the data
Facilitate Technical Exchange Meeting related to data structure, quality assurance, and reporting
Leverage the various reporting and presentation tools to provide analysis and recommendations
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports
Develop and implement data collection solutions, data analytics, and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality of information
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs
Locate and define new process improvement and Continual Service Improvement (CSI) opportunities
Youll Bring These Qualifications:
Active TS/SCI with Poly required
A bachelor's degree OR equivalent experience/4+ years of IT experience AND 1+ year of data analyst, performance management, and service delivery reporting
ITIL Foundations certification
A good understanding of IT Service Management delivery
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining, and segmentation techniques
Knowledge of statistics and experience with statistical tools to analyze data sets (Excel, SPSS, or SAS)
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
These Qualifications Would be Nice to Have:
Experience with the ServiceNow toolset
Experience with Tableau
Degree in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics
ITIL Intermediate Certifications
What We Can Offer You:
Weve been named a Best Place to Work by the Washington Post.
Our employees value the flexibility at CACI that allows them to balance quality work and their personal lives.
We offer competitive benefits and learning and development opportunities.
We are mission-oriented and ever vigilant in aligning our solutions with the nations highest priorities.
For over 55 years, the principles of CACIs unique, character-based culture have been the driving force behind our success.
allspark

BITS3

Job Location

US-Chantilly-VA-VIRGINIA SUBURBAN

CACI employs a diverse range of talent to create an environment that fuels innovation and fosters continuous improvement and success. At CACI, you will have the opportunity to make an immediate impact by providing information solutions and services in support of national security missions and government transformation for Intelligence, Defense, and Federal Civilian customers. CACI is proud to provide dynamic careers for employees worldwide. CACI is an Equal Opportunity Employer - Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities.",3.8,"CACI International
3.8","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1962,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
35,Data Analyst,$43k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary:

Develop, implement, and maintain leading-edge analytic systems, taking complicated problems and building simple frameworks
Identify trends and opportunities for growth through analysis of complex data sets
Evaluate organizational methods and provide source-to-target mappings and information-model specification documents for data sets
Create best-practice reports based on data mining, analysis, and visualization
Evaluate internal systems for efficiency, problems, and inaccuracies, developing and maintaining protocols for handling, processing, and cleaning data
Work directly with management and users to gather requirements, provide status updates, and build relationships
Work closely with project managers to understand and maintain focus on their analytical needs, including identifying critical metrics and KPIs, and deliver actionable insights to relevant decision-makers
Proactively analyze data to answer key questions from stakeholders or out of self-initiated curiosity with an eye for what drives business performance, investigating and communicating areas for improvement in efficiency and productivity
Create and maintain rich interactive visualizations through data interpretation and analysis integrating various reporting components from multiple data sources
Define and implement data and integration logic, selecting appropriate combination of methods and tools within defined technology stack to ensure optimal scalability and performance of the solution
Develop and maintain databases by acquiring data from primary and secondary sources, and build scripts that will make our data evaluation process more flexible or scalable across data sets (1.) Suggest design solutions (2.) To participate and facilitate the walkthrough’ to brief the Functional Specification mapping to Business Requirements. (3.) To prepare the functional specification document and ensure for completeness and storage. (4.) To prepare and / or aid the preparation of test cases in line with functional requirements (5.) To understand the business requirements and map it to functional specifications.

Required Education and Experience:

Bachelor's degree in a related field and 2 years’ experience in Business Intelligence (BI) or Data Warehouses and 2 years’ experience working with SQL and Access. Four additional years of related experience will be considered in lieu of a Bachelor's degree.
5 years experience in quantitative analysis and statistical modeling (regression, correlation, clustering, etc.).
4 year of experience consulting or experience in a similar field requiring client collaboration, presentation, and delivery.
3 years experience using analytics tools and languages R, Python, SAS, Oracle and SQL etc.
3 years experience combining data sets, extracting key variables, and creating new variables to enhance modeling.
3 years experience performing basic ETL functions and understanding of data quality steps/measures.
US Citizen; no dual citizenship.
Minimum of a Secret Interim clearance to start (Day 1 requirement).
CompTIA Security+ certification required to start (Day 1 requirement).
Adept at using Access, Excel, Power Point and Word.
General Data Warehouse / Business Intelligence knowledge including data modeling and Key Performance Indicators (PKIs) preferably in the SAP Business Objects environment.
AWS experience highly desired

#ind#

CDO is an Equal Opportunity Employer",3.4,"CDO Technologies Inc
3.4","San Antonio, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1995,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
36,Data Analyst,$34k-$63k (Glassdoor Est.),"Onsite work only - Franklin, Tennessee

Are you looking for a career with a purpose? Do you want the opportunity to be part of a company that’s changing millions of lives for the better? Well, you’ve come to the right place. Ramsey Solutions exists to provide biblically based, commonsense education and empowerment that give HOPE to everyone in every walk of life. Our mission to change the world isn’t easy. We face resistance every day because what we believe is absolutely countercultural. We’re weird. We hate debt. And we actually cut up our credit cards . . . like, for real. We don’t use them in our entire business. Bottom line: We don’t use debt—period. Some of us are still fighting our way out of it, but we aren’t going back in.

Our Analytics and Insights Team has been one of the fastest-growing technology teams at Ramsey Solutions—they’re rocking it! They partner with our 15 digital product areas to help create data-driven solutions for our business problems so we can keep doing work that matters to change more lives. Performing mathematical analysis and using technology to put it into action, this team helps all of us at Ramsey perform at our highest level.

This is where you come in. We need your help to generate data-driven solutions to our business problems. We need a hardcore math nerd—someone who understands mathematical analysis and knows how to use technology to implement it. You’re someone who’s always itching to solve the problem, complete the puzzle, and answer the question. You’re never satisfied with a fluffy answer. You want the facts. You always back up your position with data.

Our data tells a story, and we need you to help us read it. You’ll help us pull back the curtain, notice trends, and apply data to drive change in our business models so we can help more people. If that sounds exciting to you, keep reading.

Skills Needed to Win:
3+ years of experience driving analytics initiatives to impact a business
Solid mathematical or statistics background
Experience with SQL (you’ll use it every day to get the data you need)
Experience with scripting languages like Python and R
Experience building and maintaining dashboards and reporting systems
Ability to translate data into actionable insights
Supporting business decisions through ad hoc analysis
Extraordinary passion to solve problems (you’re not satisfied until it’s solved and backed by data)
Nice-to-Haves:
Experience with data visualization tools like Tableau
Experience utilizing web analytics and Google Analytics tool set
Experience with optimization testing
About Ramsey Solutions:
We’re a debt-free company that was founded in 1992 by Dave Ramsey.
We have over 900 team members who are 100% dedicated to our mission.
We believe collaboration, innovation and a shared sense of mission come from being present with each other. That’s why all of our team members work together under one roof at our headquarters in Franklin, Tennessee.
Ramsey Solutions was recognized by Inc. Magazine as a Best Workplace in the nation for 2020.
And by the way, we're not stuffy or corporate around here. Here are some of the perks and benefits at Ramsey Solutions:
A 401(k) match of 4% after one year as a team member (you can still contribute in the first year)
Health insurance on day one with a $500 HSA match every year
One fully paid workweek of ministry time after one year to volunteer for your favorite charity or nonprofit
Generous PTO and paid sick time off
We prioritize work-life balance and rarely exceed a 40-hour work week
Weekly devotionals with world-renowned speakers, pastors and authors
$300/year to put toward achieving your fitness goals
Casual dress and work environment
It’s a calling, and we’re on a mission to change lives. Join the crusade! Apply now.

EEO/M/F/Veteran/Disabled",3.2,"Ramsey Solutions
3.2","Franklin, TN",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1991,Company - Private,Publishing,Media,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
37,Data Analyst,$32k-$59k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are looking for a Data Analyst to work with product and business teams to find key metrics, monitor data quality/consistency, help identify problems, and propose data driven solutions. The analyst should have in-depth experience with SQL reporting and building dashboards, as well as be a self-starter who is curious and detailed in their problem-solving approach. This job will require heavy reporting in SQL Server.

Requirements
Create and maintain complex SQL reporting for product and business teams as well as external clients.
Create Health Check metrics for monitoring data quality and consistency.
Design and build automated reporting dashboards on our FoundryBI platform.
Use statistical analysis to generate clear and effective recommendations.
Proactively analyze data for key insights and metrics.
Ability to understand business operations as a whole and translate questions into effective analysis based on the goals behind the specified task.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree with a minimum GPA of 3.5 in Computer Science or a related field of study.
1-4 years of experience writing optimized and reusable SQL code.
Knowledgeable in either R or Python preferred.
Experience with performance tuning and query optimization.
Benefits

When you join Softheon, you will:
Have an opportunity to add value to a diverse team of innovative professionals
Rise to new challenges everyday
Receive competitive salary and career growth opportunities",4.4,"Softheon
4.4","Stony Brook, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
38,Director of Data Integration (Analyst),-1,"The BRICK Education Network’s (BEN) mission is to relentlessly knock down all barriers to students’ academic success. Our innovative model aligns an individualized excellent education with the necessary family supports to make sure each and every child can succeed. It’s our vision that each and every child will have an unimpeded path to unlocking their limitless potential.

To learn more about BRICK Education Network, please visit http://www.brickeducation.org

Benefits
Joining the BRICK Education Network is a great opportunity to be part of an exciting entrepreneurial organization. BEN’s unique approach to transforming public education puts successful students and world-class schools at the center of vibrant communities. Powered by diverse leaders and a commitment to fighting the status quo, the BRICK Education Network is building resilient, intelligent, creative kids by equipping them with a high-quality, nurturing education and thriving, engaged families to support their success from cradle to career.

OVERVIEW

Role: The Director of Data Integration (Analyst) is responsible for ensuring the integration of all key organizational data systems, maintenance of seamless integration, and informed analyses of data sets for multiple stakeholders

The ideal candidate is:

Process-Oriented: We need a Director of Data Integration who can grow and manage a multi-tiered organization and who can think strategically and build business processes and structures that support the growth of our network to multiple regions and over a dozen schools

Entrepreneurial: BRICK is a growing organization and we need people who are going to proactively see problems and develop solutions.

Collaborative: BRICK thrives on cross functional collaboration in order to meet outcomes. An individual must be able to meet the data system needs of multiple stakeholders

Attentive to Detail: Data integration is essential to shaping the narrative or BEN’s impact and guiding the future of organizational processes and systems. The data behind the narratives must be accurate and seamlessly integrated.

Success in this role will be measured by seamless data integration across organizational systems, and analysis of big data sets to inform organizational advancement
Essential Functions
Responsibilities include, but are not limited to:

Systems Implementation & Maintenance
Partner with our stakeholders and engineers to continue to build on our data integration platform and expand the data sets, use case and infrastructure capabilities of our big data stack
Direct, hands on, management of Salesforce platform - including building applications and maintaining the Salesforce ECM application
Designs and maintains processes and databases for the collection, analysis and dissemination of student/instructional/program data and progress to organizational staff and stakeholders as required for the educational needs of children
Organizes and analyzes data; suggests relationships between data trends across the program continuum, preparing reports for use by various stakeholders and suggesting possible organizational action steps
Prepares reports for boards, regulators, partners, and school leaders PK-12;

Data Analysis
Oversee the analysis of all network data. This includes BRICK schools (Achieve and MPTCS), the South Ward Promise Neighborhood, and additional programs. Analysis systems should be annual, quarterly, and monthly.
Oversee the creation and management of data dashboards that keeps data in front of stakeholders.

State Reporting & State Accountability
Support the timely submission of state reports. This includes but is not limited to SID, SMID, course rosters, SPED, and the annual charter report.
Oversee the analysis of student assessment data and monitor all state accountability systems. This will require both looking at data in the aggregate and disaggregated to student groups.

User Support
Participates in training to remain current on data sources, data analysis techniques, and strategies for developing and conducting presentations;
Serve as the escalation point for internal and external escalation for all things data integration
Serve as a thought leader within the organization and in the industry for education data integration
Lead stakeholders in technical data integration discussions and strategy sessions during systems implementation

Team Leadership
Teach, mentor and build the industry knowledge and technical skill set of the members of your organization to be top talent within the education space
Work with an internal cross functional team to organize, prioritize and manage the implementation of multiple data feeds annually across all stakeholders
Qualifications
Bachelor's Degree
3+ years of experience with data integration in a K-12 education setting
Experience managing integration teams
Proficiency in at least two of the following: Pandas (Python), R, or SQL
Mastery in at least two of the following: QuickBase, Tableau, Salesforce
Graduation from an accredited college or university with a Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Business Information Systems, or related field of study.
Mastery in Microsoft Office, especially Microsoft Excel
Able to manage multiple data sets with strong attention to detail
Able to manage multiple tasks against urgent deadlines
Current authorization to work in the United States – A candidate must have such authorization by his or her first day of employment.
Able to work successfully with colleagues, including school-based personnel, community members, and external customers
Able to communicate effectively both in written and oral communication
Able to work well independently and within a team
Able to thrive in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial environment and a capacity to remain calm and focused when faced with unexpected challenges
Reliable transportation
Salary, Goals & Employment Period
Salary Range: Based Upon Experience / Performance Contract
Employment Period: Twelve Months
Fringe Benefits: Health, Dental, Vision, 401K",1.0,"BRICK Education Network
1.0","Newark, NJ",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,K-12 Education,Education,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
39,Marketing Data Analyst,-1,"Overview


As a key member of the Analytics team, the Marketing DataAnalyst will be responsible for data-driven insights that enable eFinancial and Fidelity Life Association to optimize business processes and grow rapidly. The Marketing Data Analyst will gather, organize and aggregate large sets of data in order to produce meaningful business insight in areas such as lead management, call center effectiveness, marketing spend effectiveness, and revenue generation. If you would love being an owner-operator of a fast-growing complex online business with modern technology stacks, building analytical and infrastructure solutions, and driving profitability via analytics, the Senior Marketing Analyst role is for you!

Responsibilities
Own the end-to-end lead performance management analytics to maximize risk-adjusted lifetime value generated by converting marketing spend into revenue
Develop lead / traffic forecasts by marketing channel, interpret sales conversion data, analyze and monitor results and recommend adjustments to keep marketing spend efficiency on track
Develop point solutions such as dynamic bidding models to guide lead and media buy
Work effectively with cross-functional partners in Business Intelligence, Marketing, and Finance to keep data initiatives on track, and provide periodic sales lead performance reporting to management team
Extract/extrapolate trends from competitor, user behavior, and market positioning analyses and recommend tangible opportunities for Business Development teams to maximize value of marketing relationships
Qualifications
Proven analytical and quantitative skills and an ability to use hard data and metrics to back up assumptions, develop business cases, and complete root cause/ analyses
Strong verbal and written communications skills that enable you to explain complex insights with clarity and precision to executive management
Experience developing insights across various areas of customer related data: financial, product and marketing
Proficiency in MS SQL/MySQL, Tableau/PowerBI and mastery of Microsoft Suite (Excel)
Knowledge of cloud-based data structures including Redshift, and programming languages such as Python a huge plus
An analytical mindset with relevant education such as a Bachelor’s degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, Economics, Finance or any related field
2-5 years of experience as a Data/Business/Financial Analyst with large, complex data sources
EEOC/Other


eFinancial is an equal opportunity employer and supports a diverse workplace. As an eFinancial employee, you will be eligible for Medical and Dental Insurance, Health Savings Accounts, Flexible Spending Accounts (Health, Dependent Care & Transit), Vision Care, 401(K), Short-term and Long-term Disability, Life and AD&D coverages.",3.6,"Efinancial
3.6",United States,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Insurance Agencies & Brokerages,Insurance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
40,Data Integration & Reporting Analyst,$52k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"Credible Behavioral Health Software is a leading Behavioral Health Enterprise Software company based in Rockville, MD and providing an Electronic Health Record (EHR) to the growing US Behavioral Health market. With several years of double-digit growth, Credible is expanding our team in our Rockville, MD office and nationally. Credible’s Mission is paramount and central to our success: Improving the quality of care and lives in behavioral health for clients, families and providers. If you are interested in combining a mission driven position with a fast paced, results oriented culture, please apply today.

Credible is looking for qualified candidates with experience delivering high quality reporting and data integration products to Partners. The Data Analyst will have the responsibility of converting business requirements into technical specifications and ensuring that all configuration, software, and data needs are met to deliver high quality reporting and data integration projects on time. This position is under the leadership of the Senior Manager of Data Integration and Analytics.

Join the Credible Team!

Overall Responsibility for the Data Analyst:
Converting business requirements into technical specification for data integration and reports
Establishing and maintaining professional relationships with various stakeholders (e.g., Partners, technical resources, state officials, etc.)
Configuring the front-end and data-related back-end of Credible interfaces for Partners
Working with software developers and partners to troubleshoot issues
Developing application and data workflow diagrams
Communicating priorities and status to internal stakeholders
Interacting with our partners to understand requirements and issues
Working with technical team to help clarify requirements and ensure that product delivery adheres to requirements
Working with QA on test plans and test cases
Delivering quality work while operating as a team player while valuing Credible’s mission and culture.
Identifying areas for improvement in team processes and contributing to solutions
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree or equivalent work experience.
Industry knowledge of the healthcare space, especially behavioral health
2+ years working knowledge and experience with data, databases, reporting, or similar
1+ years of experience with industry standard codes and file formats like HL7, ADT, CDA, CCD, CCR, LOINC, SNOMED, ICD 9/10, etc
Agile and Scrum methodology experience
Candidate must have excellent written and verbal communication skills
Excellent interpersonal skills including the ability to work with both internal and external customers
Excellent organizational skills with the ability to handle multiple projects and timelines with minimal supervision
Someone who can drive processes independently
Analytical and problem-solving skills
Knowledge and understanding of Healthcare Informatics
Must be authorized to work lawfully in the United States
Credible will not sponsor any applicants for any type of work visa
The following skills and experience are a plus:
SQL & SSRS experience
Business Intelligence software experience
Data integration with HIEs
Credible is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, disability, military status, national origin or any other characteristic protected under federal, state, or applicable local law.",3.9,"Credible Behavioral Health, Inc.
3.9","Rockville, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
41,iFit Content Data Analyst,$33k-$60k (Glassdoor Est.),"Founded in 1979, ICON Health & Fitness is the world’s largest fitness manufacturer. We are known for our best-in-class consumer fitness brands (NordicTrack, ProForm, FreeMotion, Weslo, Weider, and iFit) that are distributed through hundreds of the world’s best retailers.

We create the tools, technology, and equipment to help everyone from elite athletes focused on their next big day, to beginners getting ready for day one, to move more, move better and move forward.

At Icon Health and Fitness, we are proud to offer competitive compensation as well as the following benefits:
Paid Training
Competitive compensation package with growth based on performance
Full benefits package (Medical, Dental, Vision and Life insurance)
401(k) with company match
Paid time off
Discounts on Icon products
Discounts at local retail stores
The chance to test the fitness products we create in our state-of-the-art gym on location
Onsite massage therapist
Working in beautiful Cache Valley, Utah, with access to an exceptional outdoor lifestyle, a university campus nearby
Happy work-life balance
Collaborative work space and environment
A free beverage center and snack bar to keep you hydrated and fueled throughout the day
SUMMARY

Icon Health & Fitness is seeking a gifted individual who will serve as a trusted business advisor for a rapidly growing global fitness brand called iFit. This person’s focus will be to support decision-making by completing a variety of strategic and tactical data tasks and initiatives.

iFit produces world-class fitness content in video format, which is made available via streaming on high-end workout equipment with built-in tablets. The content is accessed on a subscription basis. Your purpose will be to support the production and development of this content by working with the Director of Content, SVP of Marketing, President of iFit, iFit Studio film producers, and other analysts at the company to provide insight into what content is being accessed, what subscribers want most, and what is contributing to business growth, user engagement, and subscriber retention.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Data gathering: get the data you need, on your own, whenever it is needed
Data mining: finding the “gems” of the data which may be overlooked in high-level reports
Data explaining: explain what you find out--potentially complex issues--in layman’s terms
What you’ll actually be doing:
Developing and maintaining business intelligence infrastructure and analytical framework for iFit
Work with backend database developers to develop new data sources which will provide insight to the business
Integrating primary and secondary data sources into an enterprise data warehouse
Acquiring data from sources to interpret and analyze results
Use statistical techniques to understand and interpret trends
Implement data analyses to optimize operational efficiency
Identify, analyze and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Filter and clean data by reviewing data sources
Correcting data issues at the source if they are discovered
Locating and defining new process improvement opportunities
Maintain data integrity across multiple data sources
Manage recurring or automated reporting using BI tools
Complete analyses projects or inquiries on short time frames
Fulfill ad-hoc requests for data to stakeholders across the company
Being proactive about delving into data, with a goal to gain new insights into customer behavior, preferences, wants, dislikes, etc
Be willing to learn new skills to enhance the value of your analyst role
Using all means at your disposal to complete analysis projects
Sitting down with iFit stakeholders regularly to relay insights they need to have
If there is new data we need, you will be working with iFit software developers to find ways to collect what we need in new ways
Writing SQL day-in, day-out to get the data you need
Building automated reports using BI software (Tableau)
Providing ad-hoc data to requestors across the company
Identifying and resolving data issues as they are discovered
Other duties may be assigned.
QUALIFICATIONS

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Ideal Candidates will have:
Three to five years demonstrated experience with statistical analysis software/languages (SAS, R, Python)
Three to five years demonstrated experience in deep dive analytics with
The fitness industry, or
Analytical experience crafting strategies for new content with well known streaming companies (Netflix, Hulu, D+, Prime, etc.).
Required skills for this position:
Exposure to RDBMS (MS SQL Server, Amazon Redshift, Oracle, or others)
Proficiency in any SQL development software (SSMS, DBeaver, DBVisualizer, etc)
Working knowledge of SQL (3+ years)--SQL test to be administered
Intermediate to Advanced expertise in MS Excel or Google Sheets
Experience in BI tools (Power BI, Qlik, Tableau, MicroStrategy, Domo, etc)
EDUCATION and/or EXPERIENCE
Master’s Degree in statistical discipline preferred.
Must have a B.A. or B.S. in related field or equivalent experience.
REASONING ABILITY

Must have great people skills. Able to handle stressful situations. Must have a positive attitude.

CERTIFICATES, LICENSES, REGISTRATIONS

As needed for position. May require a valid driver’s license.

PHYSICAL DEMANDS

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job. While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to sit and talk or hear. The employee frequently is required to use hands to finger, handle, or feel. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. Specific vision abilities required by this job include close vision, color vision, depth perception, and ability to adjust focus.

WORK ENVIRONMENT

The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. The noise level in the work environment is usually moderate. Typical office environment

DISCLAIMER

Your employment at ICON is ""at will"". You and the company each have the right to terminate the employment relationship at any time for any cause or for no cause at all. Nothing but an express written contract signed by you and a Vice President of this Company can modify this ""employment at will"" arrangement.

""We do not discriminate in employment opportunities or practices on the basis of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, age, ancestry, mental or physical disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, medical condition, genetic information, marital status, Veteran status or any other characteristic protected by law.""",3.8,"Icon Health and Fitness
3.8","Logan, UT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1977,Company - Private,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
42,Data Science Support Analyst,$72k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


JM&A Group is one of the largest independent providers of finance and insurance (F&I) products in the automotive industry. For nearly 40 years, the company has helped automobile dealers achieve unsurpassed levels of performance. JM&A Group provides more than 3,800 dealerships with a variety of products and services, such as new and used vehicle protection plans, pre-paid maintenance plans and GAP protection programs. Among JM&A Group’s competitive advantages is its robust training and consulting services for F&I professionals, and the company is actively evolving to meet consumer preferences to remain a market leader and a partner of choice.

Job Description


JM&A, a division of JM Family Enterprises, Inc., is looking for an experienced Data Science Support Analyst to join its Customer Services Admin team. The Support Analyst will partner with the Data Scientists to: support production deployment of models and web applications related to technologies developed by the Data Science team; participates in new development of web applications and restful api’s; gain exposure to production machine learning model pipelines and the design and creation of new models using statistical techniques.

Responsibilities:
Continually check metrics and validate models, compute model performance metrics.
Access, analyze, cleanse, pre-process data.
Retrieve data from multiple stores CSV/Teradata/Oracle/API/.
Train new models per specifications from Data Scientist.
Deploy new models and determine when to replace existing.
Configure Linux server web sites and update code base as needed.
Monitor web application performance and fix issues accordingly.
Configure SQLite/SQL/Mongo databases and stored queries, updating as needed.
Participate in meetings and offer ideas and solutions to present problems.
#LI-JD1

Job Requirements
Python (numpy/pandas/matplotlib/sklearn/flask)
Version control (git)
SQL and database APIs (cx_oracle, pymysql, sqlalchemy)
Cloud deployment experience (AWS, containerization) and familiarity with AWS services
Experience working in an Agile/Scrum environment
Machine Learning algorithm development experience.
Ability to learn new technologies rapidly and turn around implementations.
Excellent communication skills (both written and verbal) with ability to effectively communicate to all levels with varying degrees of technical knowledge
Critical thinking Independent problem resolution
Ability to work in a team and collaborate with others
Bachelor's Degree (Data Science, Analytics, Business, Finance, Computer Science, Engineering or related field)
2-4 years experience (candidates with a relevant Masters degree and less experience will also be considered).",3.8,"JM&A Group
3.8","Deerfield Beach, FL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1978,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
43,Data Analyst,-1,"This position is responsible for collecting and cleansing data, conducting data analysis and performing software support including the testing of software as well as building software documentation for multiple internal and hosted applications at the ELCHC. These applications and data sets support families, assists in evaluating program performance and drives other key process improvement functions to support contractual obligations. The Data Analyst collaborates with key business users to ensure requirements are met and report specifications are delivered accurately and completely.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES*
· Evaluate business requirements to build data sets from multiple sources for business reporting purposes

· Create daily, weekly and monthly reports on children, providers, assessors, enrollments and terminations

· Ensure the accuracy of reporting

· Manage and update provider changes on multiple systems as needed

· Migrate data between multiple database applications

· Develop and maintain internal and external business applications and corresponding reports

· Perform software testing and document errors and processes for improvement

· Provide departmental support in developing and standardizing processes for coalition operations using data sets

· Perform first-line user support, technical assistance and troubleshooting for business applications and reporting, both for internal and external users.

· Create and manage user accounts and permissions for all applications

· Perform additional responsibilities as required

· Support other special projects as needed
SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES*
None
QUALIFICATIONS*
Associates degree from an accredited institution in business administration, Information Technology or other closely related field; a combination of education and previous experience may be considered
Minimum 2 years experience in data management and/or data analytics; Early Learning Coalition database experience preferred
2+ years of experience using Tableau
1+ years of experience using or reporting from MIP Fund Accounting Software
2+ years of experience with SQL Server Reporting Services or other relational database reporting tool
Experience using and managing service desk software such as Zendesk
Ability to interpret and draw conclusions from data sets
Intermediate skills in Microsoft Office and Teams is essential
Experience with Agile, SDLC, project management and/or process improvement (Six Sigma) will be given preference
This position requires successful completion of the level 2 background screening standards as set forth in s. 435.04, F.S.
Physical Activity/ Work Conditions*
· *Work Environment: *This job operates in a general office setting. This role routinely uses standard office equipment such as computers, phones, copiers/fax machines. While performing the duties of this job, the employee frequently interacts with staff, vendors, and the general public in person and via telephone and email.

· *Physical Demands: *While performing the duties of this job, the employee will be required to sit for prolonged periods of time, at a desk, utilizing a computer and reviewing online and paper documents. The employee will also be required to lift and move up to 25 pounds and occasionally lift and move up to 50 pounds.

· *Position Type and Expected Hours of Work: *This is a full time position. Standard hours are Monday through Friday, 8:30 a.m. to 4:30 p.m. Evening and weekend hours may be required.

_The statements in this Job Description are intended to describe the general nature and minimum level of work required. The content should not be construed as a complete list of all duties, responsibilities and skills required to meet the criteria for this position. Upon request, reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. __Early Learning Coalition of Hillsborough County does not discriminate against employees or clients based on race, color, religion, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, marital status, familial status or any other characteristic protected by Federal and State law. The coalition will make reasonable accommodations in compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, as Amended (ADAAA). We recruit, employ, train, compensate, and promote without regard to race, religion, creed, color, national origin, age, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, disability, veteran status, or any other basis protected by applicable federal, state or local law._

Job Types: Full-time, Commission

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
data management or data analytics: 2 years (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.elchc.org
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.0,"EARLY LEARNING COALITION OF HILLSBOROUGH COUNTY
4.0","Tampa, FL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
44,Data Analyst - Online Education,$32k-$59k (Glassdoor Est.),"THIS IS NOT A REMOTE POSITION


THIS POSITION WILL BE BASED OUT OF THE

TUCSON CORPORATE OFFICE

ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS
Utilize advanced statistical abilities and tools to interpret data sets, paying particular attention to trends and patterns that could be valuable for diagnostic and predictive efforts.
Prepare reports and visualizations that effectively communicate trends, patterns, and predictions.
Assist with preparing, collecting, and analyzing quantitative (surveys, etc.) and qualitative (focus groups, etc.) data from students, faculty and staff.
Partner with stakeholders to gain a thorough understanding of needs.
Mine data from primary and secondary sources and reorganizes into a format that can be easily read by human or machine.
Work closely with IT in establishing data systems protocols for data needs.
Coach team members on how to use tools to their greatest benefit.
The list of essential functions is not exhaustive and may be supplemented.

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS
Bachelor’s Degree or higher, preferably in a computational field such as computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics, Physics, Engineering.
Three (3) years of experience working with large data sets or relational databases.
Three (3) years of experience with forecasting, trend analysis, and predictive modeling.
Demonstrated experience using SQL, Excel, R or Python, and visualization platforms such as Tableau or Power BI.
Experience working in higher education preferred.
Take initiative and ownership of projects.
Problem solving and analytical skills.
Business acumen.
Time management skills and able to prioritize and deliver projects and deliverables on time.
Comfortable working in a fast-paced, entrepreneurial environment.
Collaborative and team focused.",4.6,"Pima Medical Institute
4.6","Tucson, AZ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1972,College / University,Colleges & Universities,Education,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
45,SQL Developer/Data Analyst,$46k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Corbins Electric, we believe people are first! Our teammates, our partners, and our customers can expect that we genuinely care to serve them and look out for their best interests. Our culture is built on the cornerstone of our Core Values – Passion, Relationships, Innovation, Development and Excellence! They set our expectation of each and every employee and are integrated in everything we do. As one of the largest electrical contractors in the Southwest and an industry leader in virtual construction, fabrication, electrical construction, and electrical service, we continually look for people who share in our Core Values to better themselves and contribute to our mission of changing the construction industry as empowered thought leaders.
As the SQL Developer/Data Analyst you will be providing cutting edge analysis of financial and construction data. You will work with key stakeholders to design processes and present data in a meaningful way to help drive business decisions. You will design the database structure and basic workflows for reimagined processes while ensuring data integrity. You will get the opportunity to drive the entire process from start to finish: inception to finished product that we put in our users hands.

Build databases and write database transactions
Develop database structures to accurately and efficiently store data from new or existing processes
Develop the front end for basic CRUD apps to map these in a platform called Xalt (rapid app development platform) using the database structures created
Build Basic UI components to display data and processes in Xalt
Develop SQL stored procedures that produce and manipulate data in a useful way
Utilize different data sources to provide connected data analysis
Develop SQL analysis queries to produce insights about the company
Continuously work with key stakeholders to clean up data and streamline data analysis

Advanced skill in T-SQL, stored procedures, and common table expressions (CTE)
Ability to develop appropriate relational database structures given requirements
Ability to work with different data sources and consolidate the information
Understanding of object oriented design concepts
Understanding of programming paradigms and best practices
Basic UX/UI understanding
Passionate to understand business environments and translate business needs into technical requirements to provide technical solutions for the business.
Enjoys working with key stakeholders and business leaders to develop requirements and adept at communicating technical ideas to non-technical audiences”
Ability to handle multiple tasks in a detailed efficient manner
Enjoys working in a team environment
PowerBI or other data visualization experience is preferred, but not required
Education/Certifications
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or related field",3.8,"Corbins Electric
3.8","Phoenix, AZ",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1975,Company - Private,Construction,"Construction, Repair & Maintenance",$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
46,Healthcare Provider Data Analyst,$42k-$74k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Us:

NYSTEC is a non-profit technology consulting company, advising agencies, organizations, institutions, and businesses since 1996. Were independent and vendor-neutral so we have our clients best interests at heart. At NYSTEC, we know that we succeed when individuals and teams flourish personally and professionally, so our benefits and perks support this mindset. Are you ready to contribute to our engaged workforce and deliver the NYSTEC Experience?

About the Role:

As a Healthcare Data Analyst in the Population Health Strategy practice, you will collaborate with team members to conceptualize, deliver, and support our clients through todays ever-changing healthcare landscape. NYSTEC is considered a trusted program advisor, providing subject matter expertise, and connecting the dots for our clients. Over the last five years, NYSTEC has consulted on some of the largest Medicaid initiatives and served in various roles across a multitude of New York State healthcare technology systems.

Serving as a Healthcare ProviderData Analyst, you will be supporting healthcare technology initiatives for our clients, partners and stakeholders by providing analytical expertise to evaluate provider data across New York State.

About You:

Required Qualifications
Experience in health informatics
Experience writing ad hoc queries in SQL
Strong critical thinking, problem solving, and analytical skills
Proficiency with translating complex analytic ideas into actionable insights for varied levels of audience.
Ability to develop relationships with stakeholders and understand their needs through excellent listening and effective written and verbal communication.
Proficient with Microsoft Office Suite, with strong skills in Excel
Preferred/Desired Qualifications
Experience using SAS
Experience using provider data and/or payer data to inform decision making
Experience with data quality analysis
Masters degree in health informatics, public health, statistics, computer science, or a related discipline
Education and Experience
A minimum of a Bachelor's degree with at least 3 years of related experience is required. An equivalent combination of advanced education, training, and experience will be considered.
If youre an effective communicator who enjoys working in complex and collaborative environments, utilizing your critical thinking and research skills to develop solutions for clients, providing support to customers, and have the required education, experience and skills, we want to hear from you.

It is NYSTEC's policy to provide equal employment opportunity (EEO) to all individuals, regardless of actual or perceived race, color, creed, religion, sex or gender (including pregnancy, childbirth and related medical conditions), gender identity or gender expression (including transgender status), age, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, physical or mental disability, protected medical condition as defined by applicable state or local law, genetic information, military service and veteran status, sexual orientation, marital status, , or any other characteristic protected by local, state, or federal law and ordinances. NYSTEC is strongly committed to this policy and believes in the concept and spirit of the law.

Applicants must be currently authorized to work in the United States without the need for visa sponsorship now or in the future.",3.9,"NYSTEC
3.9","Albany, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1996,Nonprofit Organization,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
47,Development Data Analyst,$38k-$68k (Glassdoor Est.),"Link Logistics Real Estate (“Link”) is an industrial real estate operating platform owned by The Blackstone Group Inc. Link currently manages a national portfolio of high-quality, well-located industrial assets totaling over 400 million square feet throughout the U.S.
The Development Team is responsible for overseeing Link Logistics $1.5b development pipeline that includes ground up construction, build to suits and major redevelopments of existing assets. The Development Data Analyst will be responsible for supporting the Development Team with the administrative oversight of all development-related reporting, data management, and project monitoring. This position will be exposed to all facets of commercial real estate.

Establish and monitor project budgets and schedules in Yardi for all developments through the project life cycle
Project future revenue by entering and maintaining market lease assumption for speculative buildings in Forecast Manager
Manage project documentation in Yardi and confirm proper records are maintained for all developments
Work with the Development teams on accurate cashflow projections and update as budget and schedules evolve
Coordinate the “Close Out” process of completed developments and ensure all documentation is received and financial records are finalized
Work with Yardi consultants to improve reporting capabilities and data management
Ensure timely payments of development expenses and accurate coding
Assist in ad-hoc reporting and new development initiatives
Support all phases of the Development from acquisition through lease-up
Assist in preparation of the monthly Development Executive reporting and quarterly Board Book

BA or BS in relevant field of study (Finance, Accounting, Real Estate, Business Management or similar)
Must be a team player
1-2 years’ experience in the development or real estate industry preferred
Strong proficiency with Microsoft Outlook, Excel, Word, PowerPoint; familiarity with Yardi also a plus
Detail-oriented
Ability to multi-task effectively in a fast-paced work environment
Excellent oral and written communication skills
EEO Statement
Our company is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees. Our employment decisions are based on individual qualifications, job requirements and business needs without regard to race, color, marital status, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity and/or expression, age, religion, disability, citizenship status, national origin, pregnancy, veteran status and or any other legally protected characteristics. We are committed to providing reasonable accommodations, if you need an accommodation to complete the application process, please email employment@liprop.com
#LI=MB1",3.4,"Revantage Corporate Services
3.4","Fort Washington, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2017,Company - Private,Real Estate,Real Estate,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
48,Data Analyst,$33k-$59k (Glassdoor Est.),"divvyDOSE is a new kind of home-delivery pharmacy in a hyper-growth phase focused on adherence packaging.

Our company is professional but fun, dedicated yet quirky. We are fast-paced, highly-motivated doctors, pharmacists, pharmacy technicians, and support staff who focus on health and wellness (and if we’re being honest, sometimes pizza) and most of us have slight obsessions with our pets. We want to make a difference in the lives of our customers by treating them like friends and family. We offer a work-hard, play-hard environment with competitive pay and a comprehensive benefit plan.

Vision/Mission

Our vision is to fix and reimagine healthcare for everyone. Our mission is to engage customers by fixing all the problems around getting and taking their medications. We've taken the first step by simplifying adherence.

We’re now part of Optum and the UnitedHealth Group family of businesses, backed by the resources of a global health organization working to help people live healthier lives and to help make the health system work better for everyone. Are you looking for a way to create next-level results with a human-level approach? Then look at opportunities with divvyDOSE, where changing the world is just one result of doing your life’s best work.SM

About the job:

Our data operations team is the pharmacy support system for our customers - we help them transition to divvyDOSE, manage their prescriptions, answer their questions, and coordinate care with their health team. This work is coordinated across pharmacists, technicians, and customer support staff to ensure we provide the best care for our customers. Among other things, we transfer prescriptions to and from other pharmacies, contact medical care providers to understand treatments and request prescription refills and answer inbound questions from our customers.

You will:


Your goal is to help the operation run more effectively and efficiently through data analysis, reporting, dash-boarding, and special projects. You will help us build context through better reporting and drive the business forward by providing data-driven recommendations on ways to improve efficiency and optimize our operation. On any given day you might be presenting to our executive team, doing a deep dive on call analytics, or working with a small team to prototype and test new processes.
Become an expert and go-to resource for our process flows and our operational data
Work with operations management to develop actionable operations performance dashboards across all areas of the organization
Perform ad-hoc data analysis to identify measurable improvements to our operation, and advocate for those improvements via presentations and reports
Maintain and improve operations forecasting models
Collaborate with Finance and Technology teams to ensure we are able to continue to effectively measure our operation as technology improves
Communicate effectively and efficiently across multiple teams and work groups
Requirements
You have strong analytical and problem-solving skills
You are used to tackling very loosely defined problems and still deliver high-quality output
Advanced proficiency in Excel, PowerPoint, and strong written and oral communication
Ability to adapt quickly to a changing environment
3-5 years of analyst experience
Bachelor's degree, with major in analytical or technical field strongly preferred
Experience with BI tools such as Looker or Tableau is a plus
Job Title: Data Analyst

Job Type: Full-time

FLSA Status: Exempt

Benefits

In addition to competitive salary and a unique opportunity to thrive at a growing company, divvyDOSE offers various formal benefits as well.

INSURANCE, PAID TIME OFF, & RETIREMENT

Full-time employees receive Sick days, Vacation days, and Holiday Bonuses as well as employer-paid Medical (including a Health Savings Account with an employer contribution), Dental, Vision, and Life insurance. In addition, we're proud to offer Voluntary Life & AD&D, Short Term Disability, and Long Term Disability coverage. A 401k plan with employer contribution is available, too.

SOCIAL EVENTS

In our company description, you can tell the divvyTEAM likes to have fun. Regular potlucks, company events, pizza days, wellness challenges, and divvyNEWS You Can Use updates maintain our work-hard play-hard culture.

Diversity creates a healthier atmosphere: All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, age, national origin, protected veteran status, disability status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information, or any other characteristic protected by law.

UnitedHealth Group is a drug-free workplace. Candidates are required to pass a drug test before beginning employment. In addition, employees in certain positions are subject to random drug testing.

Employment with divvyDOSE is AT WILL, and can be terminated at any time, for any reason, by either party.",3.4,"divvyDOSE
3.4","Moline, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
49,"Analyst, Data Science, Solaria Labs",$53k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"Advance your career at Liberty Mutual - A Fortune 100 Company! The economy is transforming, and to adapt, Liberty Mutual has established Solaria Labs (https://www.solarialabs.com): a global team that builds disruptive new products around emerging consumer trends like micro-mobility and the sharing economy. We have already launched a few products and one company since we started — for examples, see https://www.getcertainly.com, https://www.trydwellbeing.com/, and https://www.totalhomescore.com.

THE ROLE

As a Data Scientist/Machine Learning Engineer in Solaria Labs, you will be part of a team working on most challenging Data Science and Machine Learning problems from computer vision to natural language understanding

Responsibilities Include

Translate product ideas into well-posed data science challenges, and solve them
Design, develop, and deploy Machine Learning (ML) systems backing our products, including computer vision, NLP, and others
Translate and champion our ML capabilities for non-technical audiences
Participate in the broader ML community to stay current with the latest techniques and software

The actual internal level/grade for this role will depend on the candidate’s overall experience and skill level.

Qualifications:
Competencies typically acquired through a Master’s degree (in Engineering, Computer Science, Mathematics, or other scientific field of study) and 0-1 years of experience, or may be acquired through a Bachelor’s degree (scientific field of study) and 3+ years of relevant experience

Experience analyzing data and a broad understanding of core statistical and ML techniques

Expertise with Python, along with standard machine learning libraries

Proven track record of rapid prototyping and development, leveraging open source or commercial frameworks (e.g., TensorFlow, Hadoop, AWS) is a plus

Ability to thrive in a fast-paced environment with significant uncertainty

Possession of strong analytical, decision-making and problem-solving skills

Benefits:

We value your hard work, integrity and commitment to positive change. In return for your service, it’s our privilege to offer you benefits and rewards that support your life and well-being. To learn more about our benefit offerings please visit: https://LMI.co/BenefitsOverview:At Liberty Mutual, we give motivated, accomplished professionals the opportunity to help us redefine what insurance means; to work for a global leader with a deep sense of humanity and a focus on improving and protecting everyday lives. We create an inspired, collaborative environment, where people can take ownership of their work; push breakthrough ideas; and feel confident that their contributions will be valued and their growth championed.We’re dedicated to doing the right thing for our employees, because we know that their fulfillment and success leads us to great places. Life. Happiness. Innovation. Impact. Advancement. Whatever their pursuit, talented people find their path at Liberty Mutual.",3.5,"Liberty Mutual Insurance
3.5","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1912,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
50,Member Experience Data Analyst,$48k-$87k (Glassdoor Est.),"Start a Rewarding Career with Alliant


What will your day look like?

You will be responsible for breaking down complex data sets into structured analysis and offering “Insights as a Service” to key stakeholders across the organization. This individual will create recurring and ad-hoc reports/dashboards and deliver findings that result in actionable recommendations that positively impact and influence operational efficiencies and the member experience. You will have a passion for problem solving, an intellectual curiosity to dig deep into root causes, along with the ability to think conceptually, analytically and creatively.

Responsibilities


Do you see yourself doing this?
Extract data from multiple complex data sets including internal and external sources.
Build, update and maintain databases.
Verify information integrity, and make recommendations to remediate potential gaps/errors in data.
Understand key stakeholder objectives and the metrics that impact their area of the business.
Prepare and distribute recurring and ad-hoc reports/dashboards comprised of key metrics from across the organization.
Derive actionable insights through critical analysis and data visualizations.
Create innovative visuals using Tableau (or other supported visualization tools) to enable more effective consumption of data.
Apply business analysis skills to complicated business wants/needs and make recommendations for optimal solutions.
Adhere to the enterprise responsibilities and standards of a Business Intelligence lead and support the Enterprise BI Community.
All other duties as assigned by Sr. Mgr. Member Experience Design & Insights.
Qualifications


What makes you a great fit?

You’ll be a great fit if in addition to the completion of a Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Information Systems, Data Analytics/Data Science, or a related major, required, and you have:
4+ years of experience in data analysis, interpretation, report preparation and presentation of results, required.
Experience presenting findings to all levels of leadership.
Strong proficiency in Microsoft Excel/PowerPoint/Access, Tableau, SQL and extracting data from various sources.
Experience with relational databases and data warehouses.
Excellent written and verbal communication skills.
Strong proficiency in time management and organizational skills.
High level of detail orientation and analysis.
Experience in customer/member experience analytics.
When you’re happy, we’re happy!

As a thank you for joining our team, you’ll benefit from:

Competitive medical, dental, and free vision benefits
Competitive compensation plan
Contributions towards gym memberships
Generous PTO and banking holidays off
Still not convinced?

We’re on the list of 100 Best Medium Companies to work for, check it out here. For more details you can also visit our Glassdoor and LinkedIn profiles.",3.6,"Alliant Credit Union
3.6","Rolling Meadows, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1935,Nonprofit Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
51,Big Data Analyst BSLEP7,$44k-$80k (Glassdoor Est.),"E3/Sentinel’s Homeland Security Enterprise (HSE) division is an integrated organizational entity fostering increased collaboration and synergies across the Homeland domain. HSE combines the skills and talents of over 245 (and growing) E3S employees and subcontractor staff supporting multiple components across DHS, including but not limited to: U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP), Transportation Security Administration (TSA), U.S. Immigration and Customs Enforcement (ICE), Federal Emergency Management Agency (FEMA), U.S. Coast Guard (USCG), Science and Technology Directorate (S&T), Countering Weapons of Mass Destruction Office (CWMD), Federal Protective Services (FPS), and the DHS Headquarters Management Directorate. Our team provides rapid, innovative and specialized solutions that enable our HSE clients to success at meeting dynamic mission objectives.

Each day U.S. Customs and Border Protection (CBP) oversees the massive flow of people, capital, and products that enter and depart the United States via air, land, sea, and cyberspace. The volume and complexity of both physical and virtual border crossings requires the application of “big data” solutions to promote efficient trade and travel.
Through the use of effective “big data” technologies and solutions, CBP ensures that the movement of people, capital, and products is legal, safe, and secure. In response to this challenge, ManTech, as a trusted mission partner of CBP, seeks capable, qualified and versatile data analysts to facilitate data-driven decision making in response to national security threats.
The primary objective of the data analysis team is three-fold: 1) Support the development of predictive models via the identification of behaviors and attributes that inform illicit activities; 2) Provide on-demand analysis to support emergent operational needs; and, 3) Develop performance dashboards and artifacts to inform resource allocation, justify requirements, and support statutory reporting mandates.
In all three areas, data analysts must be capable of transforming large volumes of raw data, both structured and unstructured forms, into mission-focused insights that enhance understanding of mission performance, workload, and/or behavioral trends (i.e., strategic, tactical, and operational insights). Analysts may be called upon to support a diverse array of initiatives involving complex queries in support of network analysis, entity resolution, threat research, visualization, and impact assessments.

The strongest applicants will engage in highly dynamic, threat/risk driven operating environments. They will bring a proven track record of working with decision support tools and applications operationally employed by mission-support entities. Within three to six months of joining the project, we expect analysts will:
Master relevant data schemas, reference data, joining conditions, and relationships of existing databases, as well as associated warehouses and data marts, involving trade, travel, national security, and law enforcement data.
Conduct exploratory analysis demonstrating: a refined understanding of the strengths and weaknesses of the underlying data; a willingness to explore non-traditional data sources and evaluation methods; and a clear link to mission need.
Construct query code as well as run, save, edit, optimize, and document queries using SQL and other languages including Spark to extract mission-critical insights.
Design, develop and deliver analytic artifacts such as dashboards, scorecards, and structured Excel reports that: support executive-level, at-a-glance findings; empower non-technical users to explore user-specific equities (e.g. PowerBI); and/or provide detailed information informing operational outcomes.
Assess validity, accuracy, completeness, consistency, and uniformity of data as well as develop mitigation steps and processes to address data quality issues in support of clean data.
Translate findings (e.g. mission impacts, limitations of findings/ analytical confidence, analytical methods and techniques employed) to clearly articulate the “so what” within the context of mission performance to technical and non-technical audiences in the form of written reports and in-person briefings.
Engage internal and external stakeholders in a professional and informed manner to collect analysis requirements and ensure alignment of expected outcomes.
Integrate with, and materially contribute to, portfolio teams as a matrixed resource to provide data analytics expertise in support of modeling, ad hoc query support, or performance assessment initiatives in collaboration with data scientists, intelligence analysts, developers, and other participants under the direction of a project manager.
Applicants should note that while some formal training exists to support building knowledge of missions and the implementation of data-driven solutions, but much of the knowledge must be gained through on-the-job training and individual initiative. Technical knowledge is insufficient to achieve effectiveness in this operating environment; expertise must be enhanced with rapid acquisition of mission knowledge and demonstrated commitment positive mission outcomes. Therefore, we seek self-starters who are capable of independent exploration and knowledge acquisition, willing to develop informal support networks, and with an appreciation for the immense challenge of safeguarding the Nation’s borders.

BS Degree in a related technical fields (Computer Science, Math, Statistics, etc.)
Hands on experience working with data-mining, analysis or statistical software such as R, Matlab, SAS Enterprise Miner, SPSS Modeler, or SQL Developer for data analysis
Hands on experience with at least one of the following technologies: Hadoop eco system, including HDFS, YARN, Cassandra, Hive, Pig, and Spark
Hands on experience with Batch-oriented and streaming distributed processing methods such as Nifi, Spark, Kafka, or Storm
Hands on experience with distributed search engines like Elasticsearch or Solr
Conceptual understanding of – and/or prior experiences related to – data profiling, fuzzy matching, entity resolution, and signal detection theory (specifically with respect to SD theory: designing and improving upon systems that monitor, minimize, and balance false positive and false negative outcomes)
Completed CBP Background Investigation clearance (active or re-instate-able)

Experience with programming languages such as Java, Python, and SQL
Unix / Linux experience
Experience working in field of entity resolution, analytics, data mining or name matching.
Delivering solutions using Amazon Web Services (e.g., AWS EC2, RDS, S3)
Experience with Javascript frameworks like Angular, React and JQuery is a plus
Experience with visualization tools and techniques (e.g., Periscope, Business Objects, D3, ggplot, Tableau, SAS Visual Analytics, PowerBI)

E3/Sentinel is an equal opportunity employer and Vietnam Era Veterans Readjustment Assistance Act (VEVRAA) federal contractor. All qualified applicants receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, sexual orientation, gender identity, protected veteran status, or status as a qualified individual with a disability. E3/Sentinel hires and promotes individuals solely on the basis of their qualifications for the job to be filled.",4.4,"E3 Federal Solutions
4.4","Alexandria, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
52,Market Data Analyst,$31k-$57k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are seeking a creative, data driven Marketing Analyst to join our fast paced, growing organization. Candidate is responsible for researching product and manufacturing trends, evaluating campaign results and making recommendations for growth and operating efficiency improvements to our management team. The ideal candidate will have experience with complex data mining/analysis and implementation. This is a growth position with upward mobility. Complete benefit package includes medical, dental, vision life insurance, student loan repayment assistance and a 401(k) company matched contribution.

Responsibilities:
Evaluate market trends and patterns to suggest new & complementary products
Manage Distribution Price List and analyze market data to identify cause and effect relationships
Evaluate product, pricing, placement (distribution channels) and promotion (advertisements/marketing campaigns) and present recommendations to management
Work closely with Distribution Channel Partners to grow market share in under-represented markets
Examine return on investment of marketing campaigns
Travel to customers and industry events to gather market intelligence
Visit other Amphenol Business Units domestically and internationally to learn best-practices and facilitate implementation internally
Work closely with Sales and Marketing to track competitive landscape and market trends
Requirements:
Undergraduate or Masters degree in Marketing, Business, Engineering or related field
Demonstrated aptitude for analytics
Proven record of leadership in a work setting and/or through extracurricular activities
Exceptional analytical and quantitative problem-solving skills
Ability to work collaboratively in a team environment
Ability to work effectively with people at all levels in an organization
Preferred:
1-3 years of experience in a fast-paced global manufacturing environment
“An Equal Opportunity Employer” Minority/Female/Disabled/Vet/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity or National Origin"" Drug free workplance.

ITAR - The candidate must be able to legally work in the United States; we are unable to provide sponsorship. Position requires candidate to be a US Person as defined in ITAR, 22 CFR 120.15 (US Citizenship or Resident Alien Status) and defined by 8 USC 1101(a) (20).

Apply for This Position",3.5,"SV Microwave
3.5","West Palm Beach, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1991,Company - Public,Telecommunications Manufacturing,Telecommunications,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
53,Insight & Analytics Data Analyst,$36k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Insight & Analytics Data Analyst will support our Sr. Analysts and Directors who are managing clients and project work. The position entails measuring business objectives against client KPIs and requires strong technical skills with data analysis and visualization, as well as the ability to craft key insights and findings and present work when required. The Data Analyst will also play a role in various research projects that require an understanding of earned media analysis, and social and web analytics, with a tool-agnostic approach. Multi-tasking and working on several projects at once will be part of the job experience.

Job Functions:
Develops strategy insights that are compelling, actionable, and statistically rigorous, identifying trends and anomalies, and triangulating data gaps
Understanding of project management elements and what role they play, meet deadlines and apply critical thinking to ask questions and help problem solve when needed.
Data visualization expertise and the ability to translate data from multiple data sources into a compelling story.
Has a collaborative mindset, is willing to work with others and take direction.
Applies sophisticated analysis to datasets to discern and identify patterns and recommend relatable actions.
Ability to multi-task and manage competing priorities in a time-sensitive environment.
Ability to ask the right questions to understand business problems and identify measurement or research objectives.
Other duties as assigned.

Minimum/Preferred Requirements:
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative discipline (Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Data Science) or marking/communications (Strategic Communications, Marketing Communications, Market Research), or the equivalent combination of education and experience
2-3 years of data analysis, data visualization, and/or market research experience is required.
Proficient with Word, Excel, PowerPoint and Power BI
Has passion and ability to learn new technologies, tools and platforms. Experience with social analytics platforms such as Talkwalker, Audiense, Netbase, Sprinklr or similar platforms is a plus.
Additional Requirements:
Strong interpersonal skills and ability to collaborate actively and work in a team environment.
Solid organizational and project management skills.
Self-motivated and able to adapt quickly to changing priorities and tight deadlines.
Strong presentation and consulting skills along with the ability to read, write and speak English
Experience working remotely or with colleagues in multiple locations
Must be able to work more than 40 hours per week on occasion
Travel: may on occasion need to travel, up to 10%

Equal Opportunity: WE provides equal employment opportunity and does not discriminate against an employee or applicant because of age, race, color, religion, gender, national origin, veteran status, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, or other legally protected class status.
Diversity and Inclusion: WE values a diverse and inclusive workforce and is committed to creating a workplace where everyone thrives. We promote an atmosphere in which diversity of people and ideas are welcomed and valued. Diversity includes differences in race, religion, gender, age, lifestyle, ethnic background and sexual orientation as well as differences in experiences and ideas.
*LI-TQ1
WAG123",3.7,"WE Communications
3.7","Portland, OR",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
54,Sr. Electric Utility Business Intelligence and Data Analyst,$62k-$111k (Glassdoor Est.),"Sr. Electric Utility Business Intelligence and Data Analyst

Join a member-driven leader in a fast-paced, challenging and collaborative environment with the shared mission of supporting America’s network of rural electric cooperatives. Since its formation in 1969, National Rural Utilities Cooperative Finance Corporation, or CFC, located in Dulles, Virginia, has provided capital and industry-leading financial products to more than 900 not-for-profit, consumer-controlled utility systems across the United States. Our exceptional team delivers the “CFC Difference” that encompasses our values of service, integrity and excellence in all our interactions.

CFC has a need for a Sr. Electric Utility Business Intelligence and Data Analyst in the BID - Industry Research & Analysis group. In this position you will maintain a high-degree of industry expertise and awareness of current developments in markets, regulations and technologies by conducting research and data analysis on emerging industry trends in the energy and utility sectors. This role contributes to CFC’s thought leadership through expertise and knowledge that is used to support management decision-making and identify areas where CFC can provide value to its utility member-owners with innovative financing products and services and business support tools.

As a Sr. Electric Utility Business Intelligence and Data Analyst, you will:

• Monitor and conduct analysis of evolving industry, regulatory and technology short and long term trends and developments and their impacts on the electric utility industry and electric cooperatives.
• Utilize data mining and various data analytics techniques including visualization, statistical modeling, regression and probabilistic analyses (e.g. Monte Carlo simulations) to create models that inform risk and opportunity based decision-making.
• Develop economic and financial analytical models and tools capable of forecasting financial performance for use in budgeting, scenario planning and strategic planning.
• Serve as a leader and resource for industry data, market intelligence and modeling expertise to internal and external stakeholders through industry meetings, conferences, membership meetings and other venues.
• Conduct financial and economic analysis of utility investment scenarios through pro forma analysis.
• Work collaboratively across all functions while building strong relationships and credibility through joint research and analysis.

To be successful, you will need:

• Bachelor’s degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Economics, Finance, Engineering or other related field.
• Master’s degree in one of the above preferred.
• 8 years of experience in any combination of the following electric utility industry, consulting, finance, or economic forecast modeling and data analytics.
• Strong data mining, data analysis and modeling skills.
• Advanced knowledge of various database and analysis tools (e.g. Visual Basic, SQL, Qlikview, Monte Carlo, artificial intelligence techniques and statistical programming languages) and ability to build forecast models.
• Proficiency in regression analysis techniques and in extracting value from big data sets by leveraging business intelligence tools (e.g. Power BI, Tableau).
• Proven ability to work collaboratively and effectively in a matrixed and team environment and across the organization at all levels.
• Strong and effective verbal, written and presentation communication skills.
• Ability to work effectively in a consultative role.
• Highly organized, with ability to prioritize and manage multiple assignments in a dynamic work environment while maintaining high quality and error free work with minimal supervision.

We offer a comprehensive benefits package that includes short-term and long-term incentive opportunities; an employer-paid pension plan; 401(k); medical, dental and vision insurance; a generous leave policy; onsite gym; and more—all in a friendly, professional work environment. For additional information, please visit our website at www.nrucfc.coop.

CFC is an Equal Opportunity Employer committed to workforce diversity.",3.4,"National Rural Utilities Cooperative Finance Corporation
3.4","Dulles, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1969,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
55,Tactical Data Link Analyst,-1,"Job Responsibilities

Provide Tactical Data Link (TDL) expertise, as well as logistical and training support to weapon system testing and integration as follows:

Certify international partner defense systems as interoperable with US defense systems
Perform test planning for interoperability testing including standards conformance testing
Collect test data from defense systems using government-furnished network and test tools
Analyze TDL data using government-furnished network and test tools
Prepare briefings/reports on TDL test findings to government customer
Provide implementation and improvement recommendations
Investigate and solve Tactical Communication system performance issues
Design, develop, and deliver leading edge TDL functionality for intelligence dissemination to theater operational forces for tactical execution
Support the performance, verification, and sustainment of fielded TDL systems and components

QUALIFICATIONS:

Required Education & Experience

Bachelor's degree in a technical field with ten (10) years relevant experience, or have a master's degree in a technical field with eight (8) years relevant experience, or an equivalent combination of education and experience.
Experience with building and analyzing Data Link (e.g. Link11, Link16, JREAP,TDL, etc.) architectures
Experience with MIL-STD-1553B interfaces as well as familiarity with common Tactical Datalink radios/terminals, to include MIDS, LVT, MIDS JTRS, BU1 and BU2.
Experience with common TDL equipment to include JRE Gateway and Air Defense System Integrator (ADSI)
Experience presenting design and project information at periodic reviews as well as recommending improvements to existing designs

Required Knowledge & Skills

Working knowledge of Mil-Standards 6018, 6016, 3011, and 6020
Able to read, interpret, create, and maintain spreadsheets, charts, reports, investigation and test plans, and procedures
Ability to communicate clearly (written and verbal) to technical and non-technical personnel
Ability to work both independently and within a team environment
Proficiency in Microsoft Office products (Word, Excel, et al) is required

Desired Qualifications

Experience as a military JICO

Other Requirements

Active DoD Confidential/Secret clearance
Up to 25% travel required",4.3,"Delta Research Inc
4.3","Huntsville, AL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Accounting,Accounting & Legal,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
56,DATA ANALYST/PROVISIONING,$40k-$72k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Oshkosh Defense, an Oshkosh company

Oshkosh Defense stands behind those who dedicate their lives to protecting others. As an industry-leading tactical vehicle manufacturer, every day we strive to meet or exceed our customers' ever-changing needs with next generation defense technologies and advanced systems. We operate with unparalleled commitment to those who depend on our products and services worldwide to perform their missions.

JOB SUMMARY

Develop or supervise logistics support subcontractor development of all ILS contract deliverables for provisioning, associated parts lists, associated support documentation, computer programs and parts catalogs. Interface with the customer to deliver, review, and sell these contract deliverables.

JOB RESPONSIBILITIES
Completely understand and use ILS military specifications and associated computer programs.
Understand and implement all contract variations to the basic provisioning and parts catalog specifications and associated computer programs.
Obtain a complex set of source materials required for the development of all ILS deliverables from all vendors, Oshkosh engineering, and Oshkosh purchasing to include supplier cost information.
Supervise or computer load and process all materials developed and maintain complex customer based computer program through Oshkosh-based ILS computer programs, meeting with the customer to resolve problems.
Maintain all data current with changes and record all change in program configuration control document.
Review data against repair and overhaul manuals, drawing packages, and hardware to assure consistency of all ILS contract deliverables.
Identify and cost ILS impact for all changes affecting provisioning, computer program outputs, and parts catalogs.
Maintain JDE 7.3 item master, bills of materials, cross reference and branch plants.
Basic Qualifications:
Bachelors degree in mathematics, statistics or like field.

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS

· Proficient with Microsoft Excel

· Advanced database software knowledge (ie: Access, Maple)

· Numeric Data Entry Experience

· FEDLOG, Logicom and Logistic Information Warehouse (LIW) a plus
OSK100
LI-TLD1
Oshkosh is committed to working with and offering reasonable accommodation to job applicants with disabilities. If you need assistance or an accommodation due to disability for any part of the employment process, please contact us at: 920-502-3009 or corporatetalentacquisition@oshkoshcorp.com.

Oshkosh Corporation is an Equal Opportunity and Affirmative Action Employer. This company will provide equal opportunity to all individuals without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status. Information collected regarding categories as provided by law will in no way affect the decision regarding an employment application.

Oshkosh Corporation will not discharge or in any manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with Oshkosh Corporation's legal duty to furnish information.

Certain positions with Oshkosh Corporation require access to controlled goods and technologies subject to the International Traffic in Arms Regulations or the Export Administration Regulations. Applicants for these positions may need to be ""U.S. Persons,"" as defined in these regulations. Generally, a ""U.S. Person"" is a U.S. citizen, lawful permanent resident, or an individual who has been admitted as a refugee or granted asylum.",4.2,"Oshkosh Corporation
4.2","Oshkosh, WI",-1,10000+ Employees,1917,Company - Public,Transportation Equipment Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
57,Data Analyst,-1,"\*\*This position requires an active Secret Security clearance\*\**
Must have at least one (1) year of recent GCSS-Army operator level experience with USAR STAMIS business processes, to include operation on the ARNET. *
_Position Description_*
The Service Technician (Data Analyst) will provide support to the US Army Reserve Medical Command. They will analyze maintenance data information in the Global Combat Support System (GCSS-Army) and analyze data processing requirements to plan data processing system that will provide system capabilities required for projected workloads, and plans layout and installation of new system or modification of existing system by performing the following duties.
_Responsibilities_*
Confers with data processing and project managers to obtain information on limitations and capabilities of existing system and capabilities required for data processing projects and projected workload
Enters data into computer terminal to store, retrieve, and manipulate data for analysis of system capabilities and requirements
Trains users to use new or modified equipment.
_Education/Experience_*
Bachelor’s degree preferred but additional experience may be accepted in lieu of a degree. Must have good oral and written communication skills and be familiar with word processing, spreadsheets and able to provide written After-Action Reports. Previous Military experience desired.

Ability to respond to common inquiries or complaints from customers, regulatory agencies, or members of the business community.

Ability to write, review, and edit proposals, reports, policies, speeches and articles for publication that conform to prescribed style and format. This requires the ability to read, understand, analyze, and respond to policies, procedures and other forms of written correspondence at the professional level and includes correspondence that is submitted and reviewed at the Director, VP, and President/CEO levels.

Basic math skills in addition, subtraction, division and multiplication.

Ability to define problems, collect data, establish facts, and draw valid conclusions. Ability to interpret an extensive variety of technical instructions in mathematical or diagram form and deal with several abstract and concrete variables.

To perform this job successfully, an individual must some knowledge with the list of following concepts and tools: Basic computer skills, Automated Logistics/Data Analyst\_2017\_Version 2
_Travel Requirements_*
Travel is estimated to be 50% within the Continental United States.
_Benefits & Compensation_*
Medical Insurance – 60% Employer Paid
Vision & Dental Insurance, Long Term & Short-Term Disability, Group Life and AD&D Insurance – 100% Employer Paid
401(k) Savings Plan – 100% match for the first 3% contributed; 50% match up to 5% contributed (no vesting period)
Paid holidays - Ten (10) per year
Personal Leave - One hundred-twenty (120) accrued hours per year
Professional Development Program
Salary will be determined based on the individual’s education and experience level
_Overview_*
LTE is a Lumbee Tribe of North Carolina owned small business established in May of 2011 to provide products and services to Industry and Government partners. We are a Native American, 8(a), Disadvantaged Small Business with a primary NAICS code of 541611. After receiving 8(a) certification from the SBA, LTE has developed a platform to seek Federal Contracts and has maintained a proven track record exceeding expectations in support of our clients’ missions.

To learn more about LTE visit our website: https://www.ltellc.com/
_Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities_*
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status.

Job Types: Full-time, Contract

Pay: $50,000.00 - $63,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Location:
Salt Lake City, UT 84101 (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Security Clearance Required:
Secret (Required)
Contract Length:
1 year
Contract Renewal:
Possible
Full Time Opportunity:
Yes
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"Lumbee Tribe Enterprises, LLC (LTE)","Salt Lake City, UT",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
58,Senior Scientific Data Analyst (CDC COVID-19 Response Support),$67k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"Travel Required: None
Requisition Type: Regular

GDIT is hiring Senior Scientific Data Analysts to provide support to the Epidemiology Task Force: Ongoing COVID-19 Response Support. Due to the recent events caused by the COVID-19 pandemic, the CDC Epidemiology Task Force is responsible for identifying and tracking COVID-19 cases, spread and containment. The COVID-19 Epidemiology Task Force Response is critical to accomplishing the CDC’s mission and goals during the COVID-19 pandemic. This position will give support across several teams within the task force.

A scientific data analyst has the necessary education and work experiences to effectively provide data analysis, data management, and data visualization support to the task force. These roles are supporting enhanced COVID-19 surveillance efforts and epidemiological studies. Successful candidates will be at an intermediate to advanced coding level in SAS or R (both is preferred).

RESPONSIBILITIES (vary with years of relevant experience and education):

Monitor data submissions from research study partners
Provide data cleaning and management support for research studies and surveillance platforms
Ensure the security and confidentiality of analytical data files and provide data file documentation describing the scientific data source.
Manage epidemiological and laboratory data by using SAS or equivalent statistical package (e.g. R)
Familiarity with data management software packages (e.g. R, REDCap, Microsoft Access, Excel, EpiInfo, STATA, etc.)
Conduct analyses including frequencies, longitudinal data analysis, and univariate and multivariate modeling techniques (linear regression, logistic regression, generalized linear models, and survival analysis)
Perform data quality assurance activities, including identifying and resolving any inconsistencies in data flow, data outside legitimate ranges, and illogical data responses
Manage data stored in a variety of file formats such as SAS datasets, Microsoft Access, Microsoft Excel, SQL, and ASCII files
Manipulate and transform data that are stored in a variety of file formats
Explore the use of data visualization platforms (e.g. R, Power BI, mapping software) to quickly summarize study findings
Support data visualization activities (both for hypothesis generation and to share data with the response) in order to develop communication materials such as data sets, slide sets and summary reports
Work on ongoing basis to improve and automate code
Conducts weekly data cleaning and generate weekly error reports
Database management and upkeep as well as complete ad hoc data requests
Determine sampling methodologies to implement if case counts exceed certain thresholds, characterize surveillance back-fill to help with real-time interpretation of data
Compile individual-level data submitted from multiple external partners in diverse data formats and merge with laboratory testing results from CDC or contract laboratories
Track completeness and quality of data over time
Prepare summary tables and descriptive analyses of results on a regular basis
Create and modify SAS (or other) programs used for data management and create documentation for programs describing their functions and associated processes and output
Support the design, development, and implementation of surveillance tools to collect epidemiologic data
Communicate analytic results to internal CDC staff and external partners in a clear, concise and timely manner
Assist researchers in developing analytical programs in SAS or R and assist researchers in determining the appropriate statistical techniques to apply to their analyses

QUALIFICATIONS:

Required Skills and Experience

Bachelor’s degree with 4+ years relevant experience; or Masters degree and 2+ years (preferably a M.S. in statistics or mathematics,, or MPH with a concentration in Epidemiology or Biostatistics)
Capable of high level programming in SAS and/or R for data analysis, data visualizations, and data management

Desired Skills and Experience:

Recent CDC experience
Experience on an outbreak response in any capacity

#GDITpriority

We are GDIT. The people supporting some of the most complex government, defense, and intelligence projects across the country. We deliver. Bringing the expertise needed to understand and advance critical missions. We transform. Shifting the ways clients invest in, integrate, and innovate technology solutions. We ensure today is safe and tomorrow is smarter. We are there. On the ground, beside our clients, in the lab, and everywhere in between. Offering the technology transformations, strategy, and mission services needed to get the job done.

GDIT is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status, or any other protected class.",3.6,"General Dynamics Information Technology
3.6","Atlanta, GA",-1,10000+ Employees,1996,Subsidiary or Business Segment,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
59,"Advertising Data Analyst, Business Intelligence",$52k-$99k (Glassdoor Est.),"Curious about what it's like to work at the world's number 1 discovery platform as a Data Analyst? We're glad you asked!

What is the key purpose of an Advertising Data Analyst, Business Intelligence?

As an Advertising Data Analyst on our Business Intelligence Team in our New York Office, you will work closely with our Media Sales and Account Management teams to create data driven solutions, extract and visualize actionable insights from large volumes of data and analyze our clients' performance to ensure they are hitting/exceeding their KPIs. You're a strong communicator, who thrives in a fast-paced environment and can expertly manage multiple projects at a time.

What skills and qualifications do I need?

For this role, it is essential that you have:
4+ years of experience as a Data Analyst / BI position in a data-rich environment
Deep knowledge and proven work experience in the adtech, advertising, or media space
Experience working with SQL (plus the aptitude and willingness to master it), & BI tools (Qlik Sense, Tableau, Looker, etc.)
BA/BS or higher. Major in industrial engineering, finance, statistics, quantitative economics or another degree emphasizing data analysis preferred
Coding/Scripting experience (Python \ R) – a plus
Exceptional ability to understand data and to transform it into insights
What will I be doing on a day to day basis?

As a fast-moving technology company, no 2 days will ever be the same at Taboola. As an Advertising Data Analyst, you will:
Analyze business data and generate actionable recommendations (discover root causes for performance and data anomalies, cost-benefit analysis, impact analysis, etc)
Devise new approaches of data analytics while dealing with issues never dealt with before
Own and manage multiple data initiatives and projects on an on-going and an ad-hoc basis
Develop and automate reports, iteratively build and prototype dashboards to provide insights at scale, solving for business priorities
Collaborate with cross-functional stakeholders to formulate and complete full cycle analysis that includes data gathering, analysis, ongoing scaled deliverables and presentations
Deliver effective presentations of findings and recommendations to multiple levels of stakeholders, creating visual displays of quantitative information
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases
Why Tabooola?
If you ask our employees what they love about Taboola they will tell you that here they are able to discover their best professional self, explore where they can grow to, and learn from and together with smart and talented people
We work with some of the biggest names in the business. Our clients include Business Insider, Bloomberg, NBC, and Wells Fargo, just to name a few
Taboola NYC offers generous health, medical and dental coverage, 401k matching, a fully-stocked kitchen, and various gym partnerships
Sounds good, how do I apply?

It's easy, submit your CV by clicking the ""Apply"" button below.

Taboola is an equal opportunity employer and we value diversity in all forms. We are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees and believe such an environment is critical for success. Employment is decided on the basis of qualifications, merit, and business need.

#LI-EL1",3.6,"Taboola
3.6","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
60,SAP Data Analyst,$70k-$121k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Description:
The SAP Data Analyst is responsible for analyzing data and the ERP architecture to support business intelligence. In collaboration with subject matter experts and data stewards, defines and implements data strategy, policies and controls to ensure enterprise data is accurate, complete, secure and reliable. The SAP Data Analyst will oversee data structures, design the ERP reporting strategy and provide system training. The SAP Data Analyst will ensure master data integrity in key systems as well as maintaining the process to support the data quality. The analyst must be proficient with SAP reporting tools and willing to keep up with industry trends for continuous improvement.

Position Requirements:
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
• Define reporting requirements and analyze data for business intelligence and systems integration.
• Establish enterprise master data requirements and troubleshoot issues with cross-functional teams.
• Consults with users to develop an understanding of business needs and support those needs using application and tools.
• Manage production support activities for all user requests using Exelixis’ ticketing system.
• Utilizes Exelixis IT department policies, methodologies, standards and guidelines with regard to systems development and/or software package selection.
• Manages business and technical subject matter experts to implement and maintain systems.
• Conducts research and analysis into the nature, effect and results of system problems.
• Maintain current and create new system documentation as needed; coordinates with Finance Systems Analyst to perform testing of system modifications.
• Develops or coordinates system training including educational tools and materials.
• Maintains regulated systems and audit IT general controls for compliance (SOX, 21 CFR Part 11).
• Generates and maintains computer system’s validation documentation, if required.
• Project management of system upgrades and implementations.

SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES:
• None

EDUCATION/EXPERIENCE/SKILLS:
Education:
• BS/BA degree in Computer Science and/or business-related discipline and seven years of related experience;
• MA/MS degree in Computer Science and/or business-related discipline and five years of related experience;
• Equivalent combination of education ad SAP reporting experience in an active support role.

Experience:
• Financial background is strongly encouraged as this position will need to have a good understanding of financial concepts and reporting requirements.
• Seven years working experience with SAP Analytics Cloud and SAP BW. Experience in report design and analyzing data structures is required.
• S/4 HANA, SAP Analytics for Office and other add-in reporting experience, such as Tableau, is strongly desired.
• Experience authoring and/or executing functional specification documents.
• Experience participating in audits for GxP or SOX compliance preferred
• Experience with GxP Validated Computer Systems is preferred.
• Experience in drug discovery, pharmaceutical or related industry is preferred.

Knowledge/Skills/Abilities:
• Applies solid analytical and business communication skills.
• Strong financial reporting background and knowledge of other related disciplines.
• Identifies and implements methods and procedures to achieve results.
• Ability to lead the work of other by providing guidance to teams based on organizational goals and company policy, with responsibility for results, including costs and methods.
• Complete understanding and wide application of technical principles (SDLC), theories, concepts and techniques.
• Performs a variety of complicated tasks with a wide degree of creativity and latitude.

JOB COMPLEXITY:
• Works on complex problems where analysis of situations or data requires an in-depth evaluation of various factors.
• Exercises judgment within broadly defined practices and policies in selecting methods, techniques and evaluation of criteria for obtaining results.
• Uses professional concepts and company policies and procedures to solve a wide range of difficult problems in imaginative and practical ways.
• Networks with key contacts outside own area of expertise.

DISCLAIMER
The preceding job description has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities and qualifications required of employees assigned to the job.

We are an Equal Opportunity Employer and do not discriminate against any employee or applicant for employment because of race, color, sex, age, national origin, religion, sexual orientation, gender identity, status as a veteran, and basis of disability or any other federal, state or local protected class.",3.2,"Exelixis
3.2","Alameda, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1994,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
61,Data Analyst II,$41k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"We know why you are reading about this opportunity. You are driven to achieve goals. You are looking to make a direct impact. You want to work in a culture where your co-workers work as part of a diverse team, communicate across departments, and have a positive attitude. If we had to guess, you are innovative with great ideas, want to bring efficiencies to processes, and are looking to grow your career. Are we right? If so, let’s talk about who we are.

Who We Are

Greenphire is a leading provider of clinical payment and communication solutions. We provide software as a service (SaaS) to reduce costs, increase participant retention, and produce quantifiable results for our clients in the clinical trial industry. Our vibrant culture focuses on four key values: All In, As a Team, For a Purpose, Solving Problems.

We are a multi-year recipient of the Philadelphia Business Journal’s Best Places to Work award, and love to give shout-outs and awards to our employees. Our For A Purpose committee champions philanthropic activities throughout the year so employees can give back to our community. We have a diversity committee that focuses on breaking down barriers, recognizing that our uniqueness is what makes us so successful!

To Join Our Team

You must love numbers and manipulating large sets of data. You also must be analytical with experience extracting and uploading data into a system - paying special attention to detail and taking pride in accuracy. At the same time, you have to be able to excel in a fast-paced environment and love ever-changing and advancing work. If automating and making things efficient is your thing, look no further!

How You Will Contribute
Build internal relationships and deliver data science solutions to meet their needs
Extract and manipulate large amounts of data using SQL, Excel and visualization analytics software
Present analytics and data visualizations for stakeholders, with actionable insights
Provide ad hoc queries, and develop reports that provide insights and access to key performance metrics
Integrate data from multiple sources into reports for internal and external sources
Conduct quality control and auditing to ensure accuracy and appropriateness of data and configurations
Work cross-functionally with Operations and Technology to improve data quality and reporting
For Consideration You Will Have
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, data science, finance or equivalent work experience
SQL and advanced Excel experience
Prior coding experience (a plus)
Proficiency with visual analytics software; MS Power BI, MS SQL Server Analysis is a plus!
Proven analytical, evaluative, and problem-solving abilities
Passion for sharing your skills and data knowledge with others
Demonstration of high degree of productivity while handling multiple tasks simultaneously, and easily adaptable to urgent matters when required
Strong written and verbal communication, and research skills
Strong relationship building skills for collaboration",3.6,"Greenphire
3.6","King of Prussia, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
62,Data Analyst - E-Commerce Specialist,$41k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

Lakeshore Learning Materials is one of the most innovative manufacturers of educational materials in the country. Specializing in top-quality products for the home and classroom, we are a thriving multichannel organization with a robust web business, multiple catalogs for early learning and elementary programs, 60 store locations, plus a sales force that is second to none. Thanks to the daily contributions of the amazing people who make up our team, Lakeshore has experienced continuous growth since the day it was founded in 1954.

Job Description

In a year unlike any other, Lakeshore continues to grow! (Don’t be too surprised. Our people are really good at what they do.) To support our ongoing development, we are looking for a highly motivated and experienced Data Analyst specializing in E-Commerce Analytics to join our Analytics team. Reporting to the Analytics Manager, the selected candidate will be responsible for helping Lakeshore meet its objectives to drive the growth and profitability of our business. The selected candidate will also work closely with our E-Commerce and Marketing departments, as well as other strategic business partners, to provide insights and analysis that support both B2B and B2C areas of the business. Successful candidates will have a proven track record of extracting, interpreting, analyzing, and presenting data with a high focus on accuracy and data integrity. They must possess a passion for problem solving and story building to be able to answer business questions and explain what is being told through data. The ideal candidate will be a self-starter with outstanding communication skills, can work autonomously and take initiative to multitask in a fast-paced, highly collaborative environment , and will possess the skills to quickly adapt to evolving priorities. Reach out to us and learn more! This position is based at our Corporate Office located in Carson, CA.

A day in the office looks like this.
• Developing reporting and analysis related to website engagement and behavior, e-mail and other digital marketing strategies, and seasonal campaigns to identify strategic sales and marketing opportunities
• Providing detailed and accurate reporting (weekly, monthly, quarterly, and annually) to E-Commerce and Marketing teams and all other related stakeholders
• Reviewing data sets and reports for accuracy, validity, and data integrity (assisting with the data QA process)
• Extracting, manipulating, loading, analyzing, and presenting data to complete ad hoc reporting requests for E-Commerce, Marketing, and other divisions as needed in a timely manner
• Communicating effectively across all levels of management throughout various departments within the company with excellent interpersonal, verbal, and written communication skills
• Displaying a positive, open-minded attitude and can-do outlook in all circumstances while being highly receptive to feedback
• Working independently and as part of a team in a fast-paced environment while handling multiple projects and meeting deadlines, and performing other duties and responsibilities as assigned with exceptional follow-through
• Working flexible hours as needed

Qualifications

Got the skills and experience? Here’s what we’re looking for.
• 2+ years of e-commerce analytics experience
• Strong background with data, analytics, reporting, and marketing with a track record of success
• BA/BS in computer science, math, economics, business or related field a plus
• Expertise with Adobe Analytics (Workspace) and a working knowledge of SQL
• Experience with additional web analytics and business intelligence tools (Salesforce, Adobe Target, QlikView, and Google Analytics) preferred
• Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Excel
• Strong understanding of Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, Publisher, PowerPoint, and Outlook)
• Experience utilizing tools like Microsoft Power Query (programming experience a plus)
• Technical capacity and the ability to learn new systems and absorb information quickly
• Ability to set priorities, think critically, and make important decisions independently
• Ability to suggest ways to streamline and improve processes while keeping focus on long-term goals
*Applicants are strongly encouraged to include a cover letter along with their resume and application**
Additional Information

And here’s our end of the bargain!
• Competitive compensation based on skills and experience
• Excellent medical/dental and vision coverage—EPO, PPO and HSA
• 401(k) retirement plan with company contribution (because you will retire someday)
• Flexible benefits—choose what you like, ignore the rest
• Exceptional training and support, and all the resources you need to be successful
• Super-awesome annual profit bonus plan
• On-site preschool for our employees’ children
• On-site employee gym for all levels/fitness needs
• Generous employee discount
• Casual dress…and we really mean it

We know we couldn’t do the extraordinary things we’re doing without the people on our team. Thanks to their passion and enthusiasm, Lakeshore is more than a great place to work—it’s a great experience to be part of. So if you’re a down-to-earth professional who shares our desire for making a difference in the world, we’d love to hear from you.

To learn more about Lakeshore, visit www.lakeshorelearning.com/careers

Equal Employment Opportunity Policy
People are selected to become members of the Lakeshore family based on skill, merit and mind-boggling talent—not based on race, color, creed, sexual orientation, gender or gender identity, marital status, domestic partnership status, military status, religion, age, national origin, ancestry, alienage, AIDS or AIDS-related complex status, genetic information, predisposition or carrier status, status as a victim of domestic violence, physical or mental disability, or any other characteristic protected by applicable law. If things aren’t equal, we all lose. INDRLL2

To learn more about how we collect and use Applicant information, please visit our Employee/Applicant Privacy Policy.",4.2,"Lakeshore Learning Materials
4.2","Carson, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1954,Company - Private,Other Retail Stores,Retail,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
63,Data Analyst,$34k-$60k (Glassdoor Est.),"We currently have a new opportunity for a Data Analyst to join our Accounting/Finance/Business Intelligence team. This position will work with data generated by a variety of credit union systems to create, validate, and generate business reports that management will use in decision making. This position will coordinate with various business areas to envision and develop report specifications, track the request pipeline and delivery metrics, suggest system enhancements, and create documentation.

Essential Functions and Responsibilities:

Build and maintain queries, dashboards, and reports.
Respond to day to day custom requests for data and reports.
Perform ad hoc data requests and analysis as needed.
Extract data from various systems.
Analyze results of data reports for anomalies, accuracy, and applicability to business unit requests.
Maintain and develop data dictionaries and documentation of deliverables. Actively participate in data quality related tasks.
Identify patterns and trends in data sets.
Provide recommendations and interpretations of data and information.
Assist with application used for workflow and cross sales program.

Desired Skills and Experience:

Bachelor’s degree in a business, computer, or data science preferred. MBA a plus.
Four years of experience working in database environments designing reports and working with extracts.
Excellent analytical skills with experience managing large amounts of data from various sources.
Experience combining, analyzing and presenting data in a clear manner.
Working knowledge of SQL preferred. Experience with Oracle databases a plus.
Proficient use of Microsoft Office, including Word, Excel and SQL databases.
Exposure to core banking systems a plus.
Strong written and verbal communication skills with the ability to interact with all levels of end users and technical resources.
Self-motivated with the ability to react to change, feedback and critique quickly and positively.
Strong attention to detail.
Open and collaborative style, comfortable working in an environment where ideas are shared and challenged.
Ability to conceptualize and implement items in a changing environment.

Fox Communities Credit Union is a $2 billion in assets community-based credit union servicing over 104,000 members at 23 locations. We take pride in being a progressive, member-owned, full service financial institution dedicated to serving the community.

Fox Communities Credit Union believes our employees are our most important asset. We offer a great team environment, competitive salary and an excellent benefit package which includes, medical, dental, vision, life, short-term and long-term disability insurance, 401k (Roth and Traditional), which includes company contributions including match, and paid time off! As part of our commitment to the communities we serve we also offer all employee’s Paid Volunteer Time Off! If you are enthusiastic about a rewarding career with a successful & growing credit union, apply now!

Equal Opportunity Employer of Minorities, Females, Protected Veterans, and Individuals with Disabilities.",3.9,"Fox Communities Credit Union
3.9","Appleton, WI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1953,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
64,Quality Data Management Analyst (Corporate Quality),$34k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Quality Data Management Analyst for Corporate Quality will be responsible for conducting various data management responsibilities and help establish a new Data Management organization for the Quality department. This role will collaborate cross functionally with various areas of the organizations to develop a deep understanding of how our Quality Data is managed and governed across the Edwards Quality Management Systems globally. The successful individual must have a combination of analytical skills, data management understanding, and business acumen with an ability to think enterprise-wide. The Analyst would be comfortable with interacting with upper management and enforcing standards.

Key Responsibilities:
Data Management and Preparation: Identify, evaluate, cleanse, and organize disparate data sources. Identify data sources available and collect primary data where necessary. - Understand and assess the value of data sources based on our organizational need. Prepare and structure data within our systems.
Collaboration: Work across functions to understand the nuances of our data from across the organization and external sources. Seek to understand the data and analytical needs of our stakeholders. Work closely with the Quality Data Analytics, business process owners, and IT organizations to manage and maintain data within our systems.
Required Qualifications:
Bachelor's Degree with 2 years of experience with data analytics; OR Master’s degree in Data/Business Analytics field.
Ability to capture and document Entity Relationship Diagrams for Enterprise Quality Systems across all Quality areas
Be able to develop data dictionaries for Enterprise Quality Systems across all Quality areas
Be able to contribute to data source identification, data mapping, functional design and detail design.
Be able to draft Data Management Plans for Enterprise Quality Systems across all Quality areas
Experience with data visualization/modeling related tools such as: Power BI, Tableau, QlikView.
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience in the medical device, pharma, biotech, or healthcare related industries
Using reporting tools and querying languages such as: SQL
Utilizing programming languages such as: Python, R
Experience with electronic Quality Management Systems (ETQ Reliance, Pilgrim)
Knowledge and experience with Quality Systems (e.g. CAPAs, NCRs, Complaints)
Good written and verbal communication skills
Results-oriented, positive “can-do” attitude with demonstration of appropriate urgency and initiative
Detail-oriented, producing high quality work
Strong ability to manage and work with different cultures and nationalities
Ability to manage competing and evolving priorities in a fast-paced environment
Ability to adapt to new technologies and rapidly changing environment
Participate in project communications, training materials, and business procedures/documentation
Edwards is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer including protected Veterans and individuals with disabilities.",3.6,"Edwards Lifesciences
3.6","Irvine, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1958,Company - Public,Health Care Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
65,Data Analyst/ Senior Data Analyst,-1,"You will be a crucial member of the team tasked with capturing data workflows and use cases across EQRx and turn them into reproducible, democratizable tools on a modern data tech stack, enabling faster and more successful drug development. You will map how data is used to understand the complex web of interrelationships in taking drugs from a pharmaceutical company to a patient. You will translate and harden these workflows to a modern data tech stack in collaboration with data scientists and engineers.
You will understand how clinical scientists and staff capture, maintain, and use data and use these insights to organize data across EHR (Electronic Health Record), clinical trial, and other data sources. You will integrate data across sources and use cases (e.g. pricing, claims, and clinical) to enable end users to see across EQRx’s data asset to improve our program design, operations, opportunity targeting, pricing, and access. You will assist in building a digital-native life sciences company, identifying and prioritizing areas to pursue, where data tools could inform decision making throughout EQRx.
The Impact You'll Have
You will enable experts across EQRx to look across datasets to identify key opportunities to dramatically reduce prices and expand access to novel drugs, connecting information across market data, patient claims and adherence, and clinical datasets to enable experts to pinpoint the most salient opportunities for developing novel, more accessible medicines. This person will speed the development and trialing of novel medicines by bringing a digital and data native technology stack to drug development, powering a modern, and radically new paradigm in drug development.
Your Superpowers
You have a Bachelors or Masters degree in a quantitative scientific, or social scientific field, e.g. biology, engineering, economics, etc.
You have 3+ years of experience in industry (Life sciences/healthcare background a major plus).
You are skilled at building insightful visualizations in a modern dashboarding tool (e.g. Mode, Looker, Spotfire); experience with D3.js a plus.
You are fluent in SQL and comfortable in a scripting language such as python.
You have worked with modern cloud data warehousing tools (e.g. BigQuery, Snowflake) and ETL tools (e.g. Stitch, Fivetran, DBT).
You are an excellent communicator, empathetic with end users and internal customers. You can translate a problem from a description of a business process to organization of data and pipelines.
You have a quick, flexible mind; always looking for clever ways to connect data and transform processes to a modern, digital and data native architecture.
You possess strong communication, organizational and presentation skills.
You can participate and work effectively on multiple cross-functional teams.
You play well in the sandbox. You understand relationships are key and have strong interpersonal skills.
Teams love working with you and learning from you.
You can thrive in a smaller company environment and love the pace of a true startup.
You’re a team player who is willing to roll-up your sleeves and get the job done.
Job Code: #LI-JR1
EQRx is an equal opportunity employer and all qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability status, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",5.0,"EQRx
5.0","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2019,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
66,Data Analyst,-1,"Who We Are

Strata.ai is a consulting and venture building firm focused on the exponential potential of Decision Science, Artificial Intelligence, and Extended Reality. We partner with the world’s largest organizations to solve, develop, and scale robust solutions through meaningful innovation and a hyper-focus on measurable impact.

We believe that to build successful relationships, technologies, or companies - we need to invest in people. We aim to attract like-minded individuals who see problems as challenges, are obsessed with solving them, who can think creatively and drive their ideas with data, can be depended on to deliver results, and is always willing to help those around them succeed. We believe in integrity, transparency, accountability, and trust.

If it seems that we are describing you, then we would love for you to apply.

Overview

We’re looking for aspiring Data & Decision Scientists, Data Architects, and Machine Learning Engineers to be part of Strata.ai’s Consulting Base. You’ll be working in either team or individual capacities to design, develop, and deliver objective focused business projects for our clients and partners.

Your quality communication, documentation, and organization skills will be instrumental in your success for this role. You’re hungry, constantly researching the latest methods, techniques, and technologies and have an affinity for details and accuracy. When a business decision is made, you're confident that the data behind that decision is correct and complete.

Requirements

Responsibilities
Research, Gather, Organize, and Analyze information from multiple sources and mediums.
Ensures completeness and integrity of data as well as their sources.
Coordinates requests for more or complete information as needed.
Keeps track of information sources, purpose, time of consumption, and destinations.
Research information ownership and privacy concerns, ensures security compliance.
Filter, sort, sanitize, and “clean” data to be programmatically utilized.
Prepare operational datasets with only necessary or relevant data points.
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports.
Collaborate with management to prioritize and information needs.
Provides reporting, project summaries, ongoing status updates, and maintains all records of processing activities.
Become a source and advocate within and outside the organization(s) for data science, decision science, and artificial intelligence.
Supports ad hoc needs and performs other duties as assigned.
Requirements
High School Diploma or GED, Undergraduate degree preferred.
Strong Organization and Prioritization Skills
Experience with G-Suite Tooling (Gmail, Docs, Sheets, Slides)
Excellent communication skills in both oral and written.
Attention to detail, ability to execute on directions accurately and timely.
Ability to work in a team environment and maintain a professional disposition.
Commitment and competence to provide excellent customer service; positive, flexible, and empathetically.
Must have your own computer and a fast and stable internet connection.
Benefits

Pay and benefits are competitive and based on industry standards and individual experience and skill sets. We offer salary and contract engagements. Salaries includes Healthcare and 401(k) as well as Unlimited PTO after 90 days.

]]>",-1,Strata.ai,"Miami, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
67,Data Governance Analyst,$54k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Ocean Spray believes that our employees are our best asset and we offer an environment where you can work with exceptionally smart, innovative, passionate teams that are motivated to deliver Ocean Spray products around the world. If you are looking for a rewarding career where you can Grow, Own, Live and Drive your career every day, Ocean Spray is for you!

Who We are Looking For:

We are looking for a challenge seeker with a passion for data to help us grow our Data Governance program at Ocean Spray. If you have a deep appreciation for efficiency and for getting things right up-front, this is the role for you! The ideal candidate will possess solid business acumen and the ability to evaluate processes and drive improvements. Self-motivation, strong organizational and prioritization skills, an ability to multi-task and attention to detail are just a few of the competencies that will lead to success in this role.

What You Will Do:

In this role you will help drive forward data governance improvements by developing a deep understanding of business processes, identifying opportunities for fixing broken processes and ensuring quality data capture and maintenance. You will partner with business process subject matter experts across departments to create, document and maintain validation rules for automation. You will also work hand in hand with the Data Architecture team and other members of the Tech team as you gain knowledge of our end-to-end system design and build understanding of data elements and their lineage.

Responsibilities:
Support development of data governance framework and enterprise data governance policies, processes, standards and roles across systems and projects
Own, understand and govern the master data management process (own the rules of the data)
Improve data capture processes to enhance business analysis and decision-making
Improve data accuracy and “tie-out” between systems
Provide clarity to filed values, calculations and reporting to improve internal understanding
Configure attribute workflow management using Ocean Spray’s master data management toolset
Identify opportunities for system automation and reduction of manual data capture
Collaborate with business process SMEs across departments to develop mechanisms and rule sets to validate the accuracy of data
Contribute to Ocean Spray’s Data Governance Policies & Procedures and share with the cooperative to ensure best practices are followed
Audit master and transactional data for SLA compliance
Qualifications:
B.S. or M.S. in either Business or an Analytical discipline – a combination of the two major/minor would be ideal (for example Data Science and Business)
3-5 years of related CPG experience
Knowledge of industry data standards
Experience with Tibco EBX preferred
Strong project management skills
Intermediate understanding of data architecture concepts
Experience with SQL preferred
Excellent verbal and written communications skills
Ability to work independently when needed
Strong “executive presence”
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status.",3.0,"Ocean Spray
3.0","Lakeville, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1930,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
68,Member Data Analyst,$43k-$77k (Glassdoor Est.),"Blue Federal Credit Union employees work hard, have fun, and win for our members and each other! Our Member Data Analyst performs quantitative and qualitative research using statistics to analyze programs, products and services offered, market potential, competitive intelligence and industry standards to recommend and guide market efforts. Recommends marketing activity based on research and technical analysis. Independently drives data analysis and develops insights for use by management.
Directs central market research function, anticipates and evaluates useful market information, establishes standards for research methodology, and identifies opportunities to expand the scope of business.
Identifies, analyzes and interprets trends and patterns in complex data sets to develop recommendations to be used in promoting the organization and improving positioning, image and support within the target market.
Maintain appropriate databases and data systems for the department. Implements data collection systems and updates. Acquires and abstracts primary and secondary data from existing internal or external data sources.
Develops graphs, reports and presentations. Performs statistical analysis upon request. Creates and presents quality dashboards. 3-4 bullets on education and experience
Assists in development and production of direct marketing initiatives through analysis of target market universe, list development, design and production.
Must comply with applicable laws and regulations, including but not limited to, the Bank Secrecy Act, the Patriot Act, and the Office of Foreign Assets Control.
Experience: Three years to five years of similar or related experience, including preparatory experience.

Education/Certifications/Licenses: A college degree.

Interpersonal Skills: A significant level of trust, credibility and diplomacy is required. In-depth dialogues, conversations and explanations with customers, direct and indirect reports and outside vendors can be of a sensitive and/or highly confidential nature. Communications may involve motivating, influencing, educating and/or advising others on matters of significance.

Other Skills: Strong analytical spreadsheet and communication skills, demonstrated ability to handle multiple project simultaneously, new product development, packaging design, competitive analysis, consumer promotion, advertising media and copy, scan data analysis. Familiarity with MCIF systems, CD-ROM directories and market data on disc, survey research and statistical analysis software, mapping software, market research directories and online data services.",4.1,"Blue Federal Credit Union
4.1","Cheyenne, WY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Other Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
69,Data Analytics Engineer-Business Intelligence Analyst,$43k-$84k (Glassdoor Est.),"Analytics Engineer-Clinical Services
Summa Health System
Full-time, w/benefits

Summa Health System is recognized as one of the region’s top employers by a number of third party organizations, including NorthCoast 99. Exceptional candidates gravitate to Summa because of its culture, passion for delivering excellent service to our patients and families commitment to our philosophy of servant leadership, collegial working relationships at every level of the organization and competitive pay and benefits.
Summary:
Works with a team of technologists (Data Engineers and Visualization Engineers) to deliver insights across various aspects of Summa Health’s operational, financial, and clinical activities with the goal of leveraging data to drive and realize the full potential of the organization’s programs.

Minimum Qualifications:
Formal Education Required:
-Bachelor’s degree in computer science, applied mathematics, statistics, or related discipline
Experience & Training Required:
-Five (5) years of experience in a previous analytics role in healthcare domain involving healthcare data analysis to optimize business operations
-Knowledgeable about the workings of integrated healthcare systems, health plan, research, and community programs
-Experience in analyzing healthcare data using statistical methods to optimize business operations and communicating their findings using data visualization and detailed reports

Other Skills, Competencies and Qualifications:
-Analytical mindset with good problem-solving skills
-Excellent written and verbal communication skills
-Acumen for analytics needs of an integrated health system how to use data to achieve those needs.
-Ability to effectively interact with populations of patients/customers with an understanding of their needs for self-respect and dignity
-Ability to summarize results and develop effective business presentations.
-Ability to interact with populations both technical and non-technical, with an understanding of their needs for self-respect and dignity
-Strong, critical thinker with ability to extend knowledge of information systems and applications to business processes and to cross team collaboration. Ability to explain complex, technical concepts to lay audiences and non-IT staff.
-Basic knowledge of data warehousing, data marts
-Experience with one or more Summa application platforms is desirable including Soarian Financials, DSS, HQ/HI, Epic/CarePATH and tools (RWB, Clarity, Caboodle, Radar, SlicerDicer, Registries), CostFlex, e-ClinicalWorks, GE Centricity, Lawson, Pentaho, SAS, Tableau.

1. Work with senior leaders within a line of business and across the enterprise to establish a measurement plan focused on outcomes
2. Work as a data strategist to identify and integrate datasets, data components, and attributes from various information systems to leverage information for business programs and objectives
3. Communicate, advise senior leaders about utilizing all relevant data, including clinical, operational, exposome, social determinate, economic and financial, to drive programmatic growth and achieve strategic outcomes
4. Gather baseline data information to understand current state and improvement opportunity
5. Identify data requirements based on analytical processes to measure the outcomes
6. Conduct descriptive/statistical analysis of the data set to validate hypothesis
7. Define the business requirements / specifications and user interface (Wireframes and Mockups)
8. Work with other members of CoE to develop mission control dashboards that measures the timely performance to outcome
9. Validate, deploy mission control dashboards
10. Educate Mission end users and advocate adoption of analytical tools
11. Support rolling out new insights, which are a result of discovery and exploratory exercises conducted, by citizen data analysts / scientists.
12. Ensuring that mission control insights remain relevant to achieving the desired outcome
13. Confirming that stakeholders are utilizing mission control in pursuit of that outcome
14. Surfacing new insights to drive continuous improvement
15. Communicate findings to stakeholders; implement improvement efforts as needed.

Level of Physical Demands:
Light: Exerts up to 20 pounds of force occasionally and/or up to ten pounds of force frequently, and/or a negligible amount of force continuously.
#LI-AV1",3.7,"Summa Health System
3.7","Akron, OH",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1926,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
70,Data Analyst,$30k-$55k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who we are...

Connecting people in a more meaningful way is not just what BombBombs software delivers - its what drives our teams every day. Through simple, personal video, we aim to Rehumanize communication. Our team is resourceful and intelligent. Competitive and collaborative. Fun-loving and tenacious. Were close-knit and love adding new talent to the mix. If you are seeking a dynamic workplace and new challenges, we want to hear from you!

Who we're looking for...

A Data Analyst eager to learn and and collaborate with those around them to derive powerful data insights from large data sets. An Analyst who thrives on getting into the details and developing high quality reporting capabilities. An analyst who is committed to analyzing, organizing and gathering large amounts of data to discover new patterns and assisted in identify what data is important to the business.

What you will do...
Provide quality assurance of data in the data warehouse, by studying, cleaning, organizing, and resolving data weaknesses
Works with data engineers and business analysts to develop clarity, consistency, and unity in dimension and fact tables.
Create, organize, and maintain metadata. Make data assets understandable and usable for data consumers.
Collaborate with data engineers and organizational leaders to identify opportunities for process improvements and recommend opportunities for data source improvement.
Develop, manage, and monitor reports and dashboards in Tableau to ensure data quality and assistant is data validation
Presents data insights and recommendations to key stakeholders.
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
How you'll do it...

Embody BombBombs core values: Relationships, Fun, Humility, Flexibility and Service
Analytical: Able to structure and process qualitative or quantitative data and draw conclusions from it.
Commitment to quality: Dedicated to ensuring accuracy and precision in daily tasks and projects.
Persistent: Tenacity and willingness to go the distance to get something done.
Teamwork: Reaches out to peers & supervisors to create a collaborative work environment.
Self-Starter: Motivated to take initiative on projects or tasks, assembling the resources required to complete the objective.
Communication: Communicate clearly, concisely, and courteously with the ability to give a detailed explanation if necessary.
Flexibility: Must be able to multitask in a fast-paced environment and adapt to new challenges as they arise.
Our ideal candidate will be or have...
Degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, Economics, or equivalent experience
1+ years of experience in data analytics, business intelligence, or other data and reporting environments
Strong SQL skills and experience in querying common databases like Oracle, Redshift (PostgreSQL), big data.
Experience with data visualization tools (Tableau, PowerBi, or Excel)
AWS familiarity (S3, DynamoDB, Athena, Redshift)
Data modeling, understanding of basic data warehouse concepts
BombBomb Benefits Package Includes...
Excellent Medical, Dental and Vision Benefits for you and your family (2 PPO + HSA option)
Flexible Paid Time Off program
7 paid holidays
401k Plan with employer match
Monthly company-catered lunch
Fun workplace: happy hour every Friday and company game room
Annual Education / Development for your career growth
Powered by JazzHR",4.1,"BombBomb
4.1","Colorado Springs, CO",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
71,Data Analyst,-1,"This position is responsible for collecting and cleansing data, conducting data analysis and performing software support including the testing of software as well as building software documentation for multiple internal and hosted applications at the ELCHC. These applications and data sets support families, assists in evaluating program performance and drives other key process improvement functions to support contractual obligations. The Data Analyst collaborates with key business users to ensure requirements are met and report specifications are delivered accurately and completely.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES*
· Evaluate business requirements to build data sets from multiple sources for business reporting purposes

· Create daily, weekly and monthly reports on children, providers, assessors, enrollments and terminations

· Ensure the accuracy of reporting

· Manage and update provider changes on multiple systems as needed

· Migrate data between multiple database applications

· Develop and maintain internal and external business applications and corresponding reports

· Perform software testing and document errors and processes for improvement

· Provide departmental support in developing and standardizing processes for coalition operations using data sets

· Perform first-line user support, technical assistance and troubleshooting for business applications and reporting, both for internal and external users.

· Create and manage user accounts and permissions for all applications

· Perform additional responsibilities as required

· Support other special projects as needed
SUPERVISORY RESPONSIBILITIES*
None
QUALIFICATIONS*
Associates degree from an accredited institution in business administration, Information Technology or other closely related field; a combination of education and previous experience may be considered
Minimum 2 years experience in data management and/or data analytics; Early Learning Coalition database experience preferred
2+ years of experience using Tableau
1+ years of experience using or reporting from MIP Fund Accounting Software
2+ years of experience with SQL Server Reporting Services or other relational database reporting tool
Experience using and managing service desk software such as Zendesk
Ability to interpret and draw conclusions from data sets
Intermediate skills in Microsoft Office and Teams is essential
Experience with Agile, SDLC, project management and/or process improvement (Six Sigma) will be given preference
This position requires successful completion of the level 2 background screening standards as set forth in s. 435.04, F.S.
Physical Activity/ Work Conditions*
· *Work Environment: *This job operates in a general office setting. This role routinely uses standard office equipment such as computers, phones, copiers/fax machines. While performing the duties of this job, the employee frequently interacts with staff, vendors, and the general public in person and via telephone and email.

· *Physical Demands: *While performing the duties of this job, the employee will be required to sit for prolonged periods of time, at a desk, utilizing a computer and reviewing online and paper documents. The employee will also be required to lift and move up to 25 pounds and occasionally lift and move up to 50 pounds.

· *Position Type and Expected Hours of Work: *This is a full time position. Standard hours are Monday through Friday, 8:30 a.m. to 4:30 p.m. Evening and weekend hours may be required.

_The statements in this Job Description are intended to describe the general nature and minimum level of work required. The content should not be construed as a complete list of all duties, responsibilities and skills required to meet the criteria for this position. Upon request, reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. __Early Learning Coalition of Hillsborough County does not discriminate against employees or clients based on race, color, religion, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, marital status, familial status or any other characteristic protected by Federal and State law. The coalition will make reasonable accommodations in compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990, as Amended (ADAAA). We recruit, employ, train, compensate, and promote without regard to race, religion, creed, color, national origin, age, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, disability, veteran status, or any other basis protected by applicable federal, state or local law._

Job Types: Full-time, Commission

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
data management or data analytics: 2 years (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.elchc.org
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.0,"EARLY LEARNING COALITION OF HILLSBOROUGH COUNTY
4.0","Tampa, FL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
72,Data Analyst,-1,"As a Data Analyst we expect you to maintain the database and other back-end components for the client portal and web application initiatives. We expect you to have an in-depth understanding of data management, data integrity, and database systems. You will work closely with our external developers and SKG project lead to manage the technical side of the project. You will be responsible for gathering, organizing, and uploading new information via various upload methods, as well as updating and/or removing existing information within the application. You will be expected to meet with many departments across the organization including Sales, Business Development, Supply Chain, Marketing, and the Executive Team to discuss application improvements, changes, updates, etc.
Responsibilities *
· Gather and organize all information that will be uploaded into the application database. Ensure all data is standardized and accurate to maintain the integrity of the application(s)

· Develop solutions and recommendations for improving data integrity issues. Analyze data issues and works with development teams for problem resolutions

· Identify any areas for application improvement or integrations to improve the client and SKG experience. Be knowledgeable about upcoming technologies that could benefit the application

· Create ad-hoc reporting and analysis by querying the database to audit the information

· Use statistical tools to interpret data while paying attention to patterns that could be valuable for diagnostic and predictive analytic efforts

· Create and prepare reports for executive leadership that effectively communicate trends, patterns, and predictions using relevant data

· Develop polices and documentation for data governance

· Work closely with any external developers for the project in a professional and timely manner. Roll up issues and questions to the project and/or department lead

· Work with the Sales, Business Development, Supply Chain, Marketing, and Executive Team to discuss application improvements, changes, updates, etc.
Job Requirements and Skills *
· Excellent interpersonal and verbal/written communication skills

· Must be comfortable meeting and interacting with people at all levels of the organization, including the Executive Team

· Strong attention to detail to provide high-quality deliverables

· Has a passion for data integrity and accuracy

· Ability to handle large and complex datasets

· Proficiency in Excel; including Power Query, Power Pivot, ODBC or other external connections, Pivot Tables, DAX

· Experience with non-SQL databases; Mongo DB preferred

· Experience with SQL databases and queries is a plus

· Experience in structured data format modeling and tools (XML, JSON)

· Possess a bachelor’s degree in Computer Information Systems/IT, Software Development, Business or related fields. 5-7 years of progressive experience in a similar role may be substituted for education.

\* Must reside in Austin, TX

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $60,000.00 - $65,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Company's website:
www.skgtexas.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.0,"SKG
4.0","Austin, TX",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
73,HCM Data Analyst,$55k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"Any qualified individual with a disability who is having difficulty in completing an application because of incompatible technology or other disability-related application issues may contact us at the following phone number for assistance: 251-445-1932.

Austal shall abide by the requirements of 41 CFR §§ 60-1.4(a), 60-300.5(a) and 60-741.5(a). These regulations prohibit discrimination against qualified individuals based on their status as protected veterans or individuals with disabilities, and prohibit discrimination against all individuals based on their race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, or national origin. Moreover, these regulations require that covered prime contractors and subcontractors take affirmative action to employ and advance in employment individuals without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, protected veteran status or disability. Austal’s commitment to equal employment opportunity applies at all levels of employment, in all job titles, including the executive level, and to all employment actions, including but not limited to decisions concerning recruitment, hiring, training, and promotion.

REPORTS TO: HCM Coordinator

SUPERVISES: N/A

AUTHORITIES / RESPONSIBILITIES:

The HCM data analyst plays a crucial role in collecting, structuring, analyzing, and reporting on HR processes and data. Supports business with key HR insights reporting (manning levels, hires; retention, turnover), talent metrics (promotion reporting; learning and development tracking; performance management insights), benefits reporting (billing invoices, participation census) as well as ad hoc reporting and data analysis as needed.

Job Description

Utilizes Workday systems and analytical tools to develop, analyze and interpret HR workforce data.
Partners with stakeholders across business units to build and implement reporting and analytic solutions that provide leaders with information necessary to achieve business goals and objectives.
Develop and maintain standardized dashboards and other related metrics reports for organization-wide and HR department evaluation.
Maintains common HR data repository
Monitors effectiveness of reporting and analytics products to ensure optimal value to the business, modifying or operationalizing new metrics and dashboard products as needed.
Creates scheduled reports and respond to ad-hoc queries from senior management and other areas of the company.
Leverages data extraction tools and approaches to perform complex data analysis and formulate new meaningful insights.
Reviews new reporting requests to be sure the request is consistent with HR systems and data strategies.
Creates, maintains, and ensures quality assurance of human resources data sets, reports, and metrics.
Recommends process and system improvements, follow up on recommendations.
Assist in the identification of data integrity problems and recommend solutions.
Other special projects, as needed.
Other duties as assigned;

QUALIFICATIONS / KNOWLEDGE / EXPERIENCE:

Bachelors degree or equivalent.
3-5 Business Analyst experience documenting Business Requirements and conducting data analysis.
Workday experience preferred in one or more modules: HCM, Benefits, Talent/Performance, Security, or Advanced Compensation.
Strong written and verbal communication skills to effectively communicate processes and procedures with managers and employees.
Highly developed ability to provide clear, concise verbal and written explanations for complex concepts so that others see the value add in recommendations and solutions.
Strong computer proficiency and technical aptitude to utilize MSOffice. Expert-level proficiency in Microsoft Excel (PowerPoint a plus).
Strong process orientation, analytical and problem-solving skills
Excellent service orientation skill set, ability to build strong relationships with fellow HR team members.
Must work with a sense of urgency and have the ability to handle confidential information in a professional manner. Can handle demands from multiple customers and has the ability to prioritize.
Ability to work collaboratively with multiple teams/organizations with attention to detail and strong organizational skills.
Flexible and has the capability to deliver results in a fast-paced, and high volume environment.

TOOLS: Not applicable

DIRECTION EXERCISED: Works within established guidelines. Works autonomously and escalates issues to HCM Coordinator as appropriate.

DISCRETION EXERCISED: A degree of creativity and latitude is expected. Relies on experience and judgment to plan and accomplish goals.

LIAISES WITH:

Employees, Department Managers, HR / Benefit Staff, Finance staff and external consultants as assigned.

ADDITIONAL GUIDELINES:

The ability to obtain and maintain a DoD clearance may be required if deemed necessary in the scope of your position responsibilities.
Candidates must meet the following employment eligibility guidelines to be eligible for employment with Austal USA:
18 years or older at time of application
Able to provide proof of US Person status (permanent resident or citizen)
No felony convictions of theft/deception or violent crimes within seven years from disposition date
No felony convictions of drug crimes within three years from disposition date
Willing to submit to a drug screen
Willing to submit to a background check",3.1,"Austal USA
3.1","Mobile, AL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1988,Company - Public,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
74,Data Analyst - Client Success,-1,"Data Analyst (Client Success)*
Are you looking to contribute your skill in data analysis to optimize business outcomes for a top performing account management team at a growing, successful company in an exciting, technology-driven industry?

Welcome to ALOM. We are an award-winning global supply chain leader that develops and implements highly optimized product delivery strategies for our customers representing leading brands in the automotive, energy, technology, and medical industries. Every minute of every day ALOM staff and systems affect manufacturing, eCommerce, fulfillment, and logistics operations all over the world. Sound exciting? It is!

See your career grow in an environment where innovative problem solving and professional development are encouraged and the company culture is based upon respect for diversity and operational excellence.

We are currently onboarding new customer programs and hiring to fill a Data Analyst position supporting our Client Success team at our Fremont, CA headquarters.
POSITION OVERVIEW*
The Data Analyst fills a critical life-cycle data generation and business optimization function within our Client Success team. You will support client requirements including data collection, reporting, modeling, research and data analysis to identify useful trends and provide relevant information that will facilitate informed decisions and improve business processes. We are looking for a solution-oriented data analyst with 5 years of job experience and a Bachelor’s degree in information management, computer science or mathematical statistics. We require a candidate that is an effective communicator and organized multi-tasker who can work effectively in both a team oriented environment, and independently in a fast-paced and changing environment. Of course you will be a master of Microsoft Excel including the ability to write macros and do pivot tables. You must also be proficient in Microsoft Office tools, MRP and ERP system operation, and think objectively when interpreting raw data or challenged to identify patterns and project outcomes.

This position is an excellent opportunity to work with a high-performing, world-class team. You will experience the thrill and satisfaction of seeing your research and data analysis in action and positively affecting supply chain operations for many of the world’s leading brands.

Does this sound like the opportunity and challenge you have been looking for to advance your career? If so, we would like to hear from you.

Reports to: Director of Client Success

Key Responsibilities and Job Duties

· Examine and evaluate existing business practices, systems and data, to offer suggestions aimed at creating efficiencies and streamlining operations

· Compile Excel spreadsheets with data, macros, formulas and create visualizations, including dashboards, flowcharts, graphs and reports

· Conduct research into data anomalies or other relevant information related to individual queries or systemic issues

· Apply predictive analysis and tools to forecast and employ business analytics (including an enhanced ability to quantify and qualify data)

· Present findings and relay business concepts clearly via reports, presentations, and verbal communication to colleagues

· Create and design specifications as requested by account management

· Be highly organized and dedicated to quality, safety, and customer satisfaction

ALOM offers competitive salaries and benefits including; medical, dental, vision, life insurance, long term disability, flexible spending, employer HSA contribution, 401(k) with match, vacation, sick leave and PTO. Bottom line; ALOM is a great place to work! If you want to be a part of a growing, firmly established, and success-driven company that values and invests in the development of its staff we encourage you to submit your resume. ALOM was selected as one of The Bay Area News Group's Top 100 Workplaces for the past seven years.

Equal Opportunity Employer

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Data Analysis: 5 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
alom.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",-1,ALOM Technologies,"Fremont, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
75,Data Analyst,$53k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"Nexon, a world leader in online games, is building a workplace based on mutual respect, good humor, and the pursuit of excellence because we believe that great games can only be built by amazing people. Our vision is to create high quality, innovative online games that create unforgettable experiences for players around the world.

Nexon has an ever-expanding worldwide team of over 6,000 employees and boasts a diverse global portfolio that includes titles like MapleStory, Dungeon Fighter Online, KartRider and many more. If you want to be part of building an exciting game company and help chart the course of online gaming, let's talk!

Job Description

The Data Analyst is responsible for providing in-depth data mining and data analyses to multiple departments, with a focus on understanding our customers and identifying ways to improve the user experience within our games.

JOB RESPONSIBILITIES:
Identify, design, prioritize and develop data analyses to create unique business insights; perform detailed data exploration and validation to understand customers
Identify key analytic metrics; build reports and present key insights to ensure that data drives actions to improve the business; examine and analyze available information to determine patterns and gaps at a strategic level and recommend a course of action to support internal and external users
Research and analyze web and game usage data and recommend solutions; analyze user experience and business processes in order to identify opportunities for improvement
Document business needs, prioritize requested functionality, and validate requirements against strategic goals and project objectives
Provide reporting and performance monitoring by using data drawn from diverse sources
Other duties as assigned
Type of Decisions made by this position?
Analyze game data and make recommendations for improvement
Prioritize data requests
Documentation of the department's business needs
Work Experience
3+ years of experience in data analytics or a related field
2+ years of experience with analytics software such as Google Analytics
2+ years' experience with Marketing Intelligence Platforms such as Singular
Experience with data extraction and manipulation tools and Data Mining tools
Online gaming experience preferred
Education, Professional Training, Technical Training or Certification
Master's Degree preferred or Bachelor's degree with equivalent experience
Knowledge/Skills
Excellent knowledge of statistical analysis
Ability to extract data by writing your own SQL queries
Experience using Tableau or similar BI tools
Programming for data analysis (R or Python) preferred
Strong interpersonal and communication skills
Able to manage shifting priorities in a fast-paced environment
Exceptional Excel and PowerPoint skills
Excellent time and project management skills
Management has the right to add or change duties and job requirements at any time.

Nexon's benefits and perks:

We offer medical, dental and vision plans for you, your spouse or domestic partner, and your children. Employees who enroll in the high deductible health plan receive an annual employer contribution to a health savings account and company paid hospital indemnity benefits. We also provide company-paid life, AD&D, short-term and long-term disability benefits as well as access to voluntary life and AD&D for yourself and your dependents, flexible spending accounts, a 401(k) savings plan with a company match, and pet insurance. Nexies are encouraged to take advantage of our monthly wellness credit, participate in lunchtime yoga, and enroll in language classes. We host bi-monthly catered lunches, monthly happy hours, and maintain a well-stocked snack bar. To help you maintain a good work-life balance, we offer paid time off, sick days, company holidays, and a year-end break.

Nexon is an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, gender expression, national origin, protected veteran status, or any other basis protected by applicable law and will not be discriminated against on the basis of disability.

]]>",2.6,"Nexon America Inc
2.6","El Segundo, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Public,Video Games,Media,$10+ billion (USD),-1
76,Data Analyst - Catalog Research,$38k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who We Are

At True Fit, we believe when it comes to fashion, its all about the details.

True Fits personalization platform is strategically leveraged by 250 global retail sites, representing 17,000 brands and 175 million registered users. Since 2010, we have built the worlds largest data collective connecting consumers with apparel and footwear they will love and keep.

As our data collective continues to grow, so does our team! Lets disrupt this $3 trillion industry together.

True Fit, named a Top Place to Work, is looking for a Data Analyst.

What We Do

True Fit is building a comprehensive taxonomy of clothing products powered by text, image, user interactions, and manually derived data. The Data Science team at True Fit is leveraging this information to power the next generation of fashion recommender systems and help shoppers navigate the fashion world.

We are looking for a Data Analyst to help us expand what we can do with our fashion catalog.

COVID-19 and True Fit

While this role is based out of our Boston HQ, due to the ongoing response to COVID-19 all True Fit employees are working on a remote basis, with a return date TBD. Once our offices are reopened, we can remain flexible and work together on a schedule that best suits your needs at the time.

Responsibilities
Contribute to ongoing efforts to expand the features of clothing we model.
Collaborate with Data Scientists to measure performance of recommender systems and devise improvements.
Develop a holistic, data-driven perspective on the accuracy, coverage, and consistency of product features.
Own the Science code base for product-specific analytics. Build centralized reporting mechanisms.
Work with Scientists, Engineers, and Product Managers to communicate important results.
Develop techniques for increasing stakeholder awareness across the organization.
Required Skills
Experience solving data problems using quantitative tools. For example, experience acquired with a Bachelors in a quantitative field (computer science, math, physics, computational biology; economics, psychology, or other quantitative social science; or related fields) and 1-2 years of work experience.
Experience applying analytical tools such as statistics to real world problems.
Experience querying large complex datasets with SQL
Experience writing data analysis scripts with Python.
Excellent communication skills.
Willingness to learn new tools as they become needed.
Nice to Have
Experience with analytics dashboards.
Experience or interest in machine learning and/or mathematical modeling.
Experience with big data tools and frameworks, such as Spark.
Previous experience working with clickstream data and/or transaction data.
Why True Fit?

One size does not fit all in what you wear or your True Fit career. Everyone at True Fit has the opportunity to push their professional boundaries, while balancing personal ambitions.

Together weve built a tight-knit culture thats reflected in our Glassdoor reviews; Great people, cool product refreshing place to work everyone actually works together like a team, employees are all pro-active and genuinely take pride in their work growth potential plus culture management is approachable, mindful of their people opportunity to learn/work on new technology you are an integral part of the success of the company the work you are doing everyday really matters and makes a difference managers provide autonomy and trust you really innovative company, open to share ideas to make a better product great culture with the right vision.

We believe that how we dress is an expression of who we are and the confidence we feel. As an EEO employer, we work to help all team members experience an inclusive, diverse and accepting work environment, so you can be True To You.

Powered by JazzHR",3.6,"True Fit
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
77,Clinical Data Analyst,$52k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Overview:
The Clinical Data Analyst is responsible for assisting in the development and execution of the clinical strategy for new indications. The Clinical Data Analyst will analyze data from clinical publications and TrakStar and develop statistical models to support new indication submissions. The Clinical Data Analyst will also work with Marketing, Sales Operations and other cross-functional teams to provide TrakStar data analytics to support cross-functional department needs.

Essential Duties/Responsibilities:
• Use enterprise level analysis tools to gather and sort through data from TrakStar.
• Provide data tables and reports as requested by various departments.
• Perform a wide range of technical analysis on various data sets.
• Work with marketing to gather patient demographic data.
• Work with Sales Operations to gather MT, utilization and other data.
• Gather post market surveillance data to support regulatory filing requirements.

Education and Experience:
• Technical/Science or related Degree.
• Strong analysis skills; able to sort large amounts of information for significant data.
• Self-directed, resourceful, and able to get work done without significant input.
• Good organizational skills, attentive to details, and able to multitask.
• Strong problem-solving skills and ability to deal with changing priorities.

Preferred Skills:
• Experience with statistical methods used for clinical trials.
• Experience in medical research and/or development.

Physical Requirements
• Must be able to remain in a stationary position 50%-75%
• Walking/Bending/Stooping 50%-75% to access file cabinets, office equipment, etc.
• Light to moderate lifting (up to 50lbs)
• Some light travel maybe required by air, rail or auto within the United States",3.1,"Neuronetics
3.1","Malvern, PA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
78,"Intern - Agile Transformation Analyst, Data & Analytics",-1,"Agile Transformation Analyst, Data & Analytics Intern
2021 Paid Summer Internship

As an intern for the data portfolio strategy group, you will be a servant leader and coach to help agile teams deliver value to their customers and adopt Agile principles. You will help agile teams communicate with stakeholders, manage risk, drive process improvements, and facilitate agile events and processes. You will also need to embrace the concepts of technology business management and support departmental operational activities including budget management, risk management, and compliance tracking.
What you would be involved in:

Evangelize Lean process excellence principles and kaizen within Enterprise Data and Analytics to define, measure, analyze and improve organizational effectiveness in delivering value.
Assist/Facilitate Program Increment Planning readiness (using Backlogs, and Pre- and Post-PI Planning meetings) and the quarterly PI planning event
Assist tracking the execution of features and capabilities by establishing PI measurement and metrics
Attend periodic synchronization meetings, facilitate feature and capability estimation with agile product teams and assist in rolling-up work items to Epics
Coach leaders, teams, and Scrum Masters in Lean-Agile practices and mindsets
Help manage risks and dependencies, escalating, tracking, and assisting in the resolution of impediments
Work with the Data Portfolio Strategy group on program execution and operational excellence
Qualifications
Working toward a Bachelor’s degree in Business
Administration, Computer Science, MIS or related degree

Knowledge or interest in
the following:
Scrum Master and understanding of common Agile practices,
service-oriented environments, and iterative development practices
IT full development life cycle
Scrum and Kanban Methodologies
Agile product and portfolio management
Scaled Agile Framework
Ability to establish credibility with clients, build
consensus, and achieve goals through influence
Ability to help teams write user stories/epics, identify
dependencies, and design optimal solutions
Flexibility to work with teams, individuals and executives
and willingness to help with a wide variety of work products and people
Excellent interpersonal/communication skills",3.3,"Zions Bancorporation
3.3","Salt Lake City, UT",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
79,Project Coordinator - Data Analyst,$35k-$69k (Glassdoor Est.),"Project Coordinator - Data Analyst
Location


Hauppauge, NY

Company Order Number

2123

# of openings

1

Apply Now

Custom Computer Specialists, Inc. is one of the largest Technical Consultants on Long Island, celebrating over 40 years in business! We continue to successfully provide network integration, support services, products solutions, and applications services to our valued clients in the northeast. Our focus is simple...our goal is to make technology easy and to help our clients use it as effectively as possible.

Position Title: Project Coordinator

Division: MSP

Reports to: James Szwed, Manager

OVERVIEW

This individual will provide project support and coordination for our healthcare sector. We are looking for a person who wants to challenge him/herself that will take ownership and assist with daily project production. Requirements include having technical and analytical capabilities, knowledge of office suite, an understanding of technical concepts, ability to plan and manage multiple tasks, outstanding written and verbal communication skills.

RESPONSIBILITIES

Responsibilities of this position include:
Creating and closing request tickets for each device
Communicating with teams to ensure timely completion of tasks
Responsible for managing inbound support tickets
Updating assets in the database with corresponding tickets
Assisting other coordinators with scheduling work to technicians
Updating assignment of new assets with client’s ITAM system
Providing operational support of physical inventory in Custom’s warehouse for old and new assets
Covering for other team members when on leave
QUALIFICATIONS

The right candidate will have:
Minimum of 6 months’ experience working as an administrative assistant or project coordinator
Capable of working with Microsoft word, excel, and power point
Professional verbal communication, customer service, organizational skills and professional manner required
Candidates must be customer oriented, self-motivated, ambitious and dedicated team players
Custom Computer Specialists Offers:


Competitive salaries
Comprehensive benefits including:
Medical and dental plans
Company Paid Vision and Short and long term disability plans
Flexible spending programs including Healthcare, Dependent Care, Transit and Parking
401K with employer match
Tuition reimbursement
Onsite Fitness Center (or gym membership reimbursement for client or satellite based employees)
Company paid life Insurance
Paid holidays and vacation
Technical certification gift card rewards program
Come experience our unique culture and see how our “right people, right results” philosophy has led to our outstanding success! We are great place to start your IT career!

EEO Statement:


Custom Computer Specialists is an Equal Opportunity Employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status or any other protected characteristic.",2.5,"Custom Computer Specialists
2.5","Hauppauge, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1979,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
80,Data Analyst and Billing Coordinator,$34k-$59k (Glassdoor Est.),"Title: *
Data Analyst and Billing Coordinator *
Reports to: *
Controller
Status: *
Exempt
Position Summary: *
The Data Analyst and Billing Coordinator handles a wide range of duties relating to the operations of billing, encompassing medical billing and coding to ensure maximization of cash flow while improving patient, physician and other customer relations. Under the direction of the Controller, the Data Analyst and Billing Coordinator serves as the liaison with the Revenue Cycle Management service provider.
Responsibilities: *
Committed to the Mission of Camillus Health Concern.
Aggregates data and prepares reports including variances and trends on utilization statistics and medical costs with a high level of accuracy and process consistency.
Responsible for timely distribution of reports and other intelligence essential to the Controller for strategic planning of health center activities.
Monitor, resolve and respond to Revenue Cycle Management tasks.
Review denials and rejections generated by Revenue Cycle management team.
Monitor upcoming patient appointments to identify opportunities to update household income and insurance information.
Perform audits on registered account to confirm UDS data being collect accurately.
Identify issues with Hedis coding and communicate with the Clinical Outcomes Manager.
Participate in Revenue Cycle management conference calls as touchpoints to identify opportunities for staff workflow optimization.
Identify issues with patient care gaps and failing measures that result in no or lower reimbursements and advises the Controller and Medical Director.
Keeps current with payer contracts to ensure registration staff has resources to optimize scheduling.
Keeps current with CPT, ICD10 updates to ensure staff has resources to optimize scheduling.
Execute journal balancing to generate deposits for finance and all end of day processes.
Collaborate with the Patient Access Manger on revenue cycle policies on policies and procedures including workflow processes and compliance.
Reviews Vivitrol injections on a monthly basis. Prepares and sends invoices to FADAA for uninsured Vivitrol patients.
Sends monthly statements to patients who have an outstanding balance.
Completes billing for the dental department.
Ensures that all departments follow the protocols for billing operations.
Works with the Patient Access Manager on a monthly basis to review the Providers Meaningful Use Objectives to ensure that they are completed. This includes Patient Electronic Access (MUOBJ8) and Secured Patient Messaging via Intergy (MUOBJ9).
Coordinate internal audits to reduce errors in coding, documentation, registration, billing, and refunds.
Perform any other department or agency related duties or special projects as directed by Supervisor.
Requirements: *
Bachelor Degree in Computer Science, Mathematics, Finance or Economics.
Knowledge of Microsoft Office applications including Word, Excel, and Outlook.
Knowledge of billing and accounts receivable systems.
Sound Data Analytical skills, time management, written & verbal skills.
Preferred Qualifications*
Experience working as a Data Analyst or similar experience in a related field.
Knowledge of healthcare contract terms, preferably for primary care, dental and/or behavioral health.
Knowledge of CPT & ICD9/10, HCPCS, CDT coding and medical terminology and compliance
Knowledge of FQHC operations
Culturally sensitive to the needs of underserved populations
Previous experience with electronic medical records
Work effectively and productively in a team environment
Bilingual (English/Spanish), Creole a plus
Primary Address*
Camillus Health Concern

336 N.W. 5th Street

Miami, FL 33128

Mon/Tues/Thurs/Fri – 8:00 AM to 5:00 PM

Wed 8:00 AM to 7:00 PM
CAMILLUS HEALTH CONCERN IS AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER *
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $47,000.00 - $50,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Analysis Skills: 2 years (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Working Days:
Monday (Required)
Tuesday (Required)
Wednesday (Required)
Thursday (Required)
Friday (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"CAMILLUS HEALTH CONCERN
4.0","Miami, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1960,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
81,HR Data Analyst II,$52k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are you ready to use your critical thinking and love of data to scale new heights, creating platforms and integrating information that support large-scale, data-driven decision making at ENGIE North America?

The HR Data Analyst II supports the HR department by processing the organization's human resource information using cost-effective computer systems and applications. In this role, you will partner with HR, IT, Payroll and their customers to analyze work process design and flow, improve processes and leverage the return on existing and new systems. You will also provide support for HR information needs and design new or modify existing systems to meet changing requirements.

What you’ll do:
Analyze HR data and provide recommendations to leadership based on key performance indicators including turnover and engagement.
Maintain, develop, and administer HR dashboard to aid HR Business Partners and Leaders in decision making.
BU Leader for Group Social Reporting, ensuring BU’s report is timely and accurate. Coordinates with contacts for each entity not on the ADP Vantage platform. Manage the quarterly Group Social Reporting process for the North America BU tracking employee headcount, movement, and key performance indicators. Work with auditors during GSR Audit to ensure reporting meets Group’s requirements.
Support system maintenance including reviews, testing and implementation of HRIS system changes and enhancements in conjunction with the Applications Management Advisor.
Maintain HRMS system data and tables within ADP Vantage HCM ensuring the highest possible quality of data.
Maintain job, department, and functional reporting changes within the system.
Responsible for producing existing and custom reports including EEO-1, AAP, and other compliance related reports in support of Human Resources reporting requirements. Escalating complex issues to the Applications Management Advisor to bring issues to resolution.
Takes lead on mass data load/update projects such as mergers and acquisitions and employee data change load, which includes data bridges, analysis of data, ensuring templates complete, and communicating with various contacts to obtain necessary data.
Assist the Benefits staff with maintenance and creation of vendor electronic eligibility files.
Troubleshoot HRIS system related issues working with internal departments and third parties, recommends solutions in conjunction with ADP and implements at the direction of leadership.
Provisions access to ADP Vantage upon approval from leadership.

Qualifications

What you bring:
Bachelor’s Degree in Human Resources, Information Technology, Business or related discipline required
3-5 years’ experience in Human Resources Information Systems.
Professional in Human Resources (PHR), or SHRM Certified Professional (SHRM-C credential preferred.
Self-starter with excellent time and task management skills.
Team oriented individual willing to adapt to a fast paced and continuously improving organization.
Customer focused individual who leverages new and existing system capabilities to deliver on customer requirements.
Ability to communicate openly and effectively with internal and external customers managing expectations and timelines related to responsibilities.
Ability to develop and maintain relationships both within and outside of Human Resources.
Intermediate to expert level proficiency with HCM software; ADP Vantage HCM strongly preferred.
3-5 years’ experience building custom reports in ADP Vantage HCM or similar HCM.
Proficiency with Microsoft Office suite of products including Word, Excel, and PowerPoint.

Why ENGIE?

ENGIE North America isn’t just participating in the Zero-Carbon transition, we’re leading it! Join us as we develop energy that is more renewable, more efficient and more accessible to everyone.

Unite with us in leading the transformation of the world of energy! ENGIE is looking for talented and motivated individuals to create the future of energy and customer solutions. Join a rewarding and flexible work environment that encourages innovation and creativity to help customers meet their energy challenges today and in the future. Are you up for the challenge?

At ENGIE, our goal is to support, encourage, promote, and thrive on diversity, equity, and inclusion. We do so for the benefit of our employees, customers, products and services, and community. So ENGIE is proud to be an equal opportunity workplace, and is also an affirmative action employer. We are firmly committed to creating an equitable and inclusive environment for all employees.

We are committed to providing employees with a work environment free of discrimination and harassment. All employment decisions at ENGIE are based on business needs, job requirements and individual qualifications. ENGIE is committed to providing equal employment opportunity regardless of actual or perceived race, color, creed, religion, national origin, ancestry, citizenship, age, sex or gender (including pregnancy, childbirth, and related medical conditions), gender identity or gender expression (including transgender status), sexual orientation, marital status, civil union, or domestic partnership status, military service or veteran status, physical or mental disability, protected medical condition, genetic information, or any other legally protected category (referred to as “protected characteristics”) as defined by applicable federal, state or local law in the locations where we operate.

If you need assistance with this application or a reasonable accommodation due to a disability, you may contact us at ENGIENA-ENGIEHR@engie.com . Please note: This email address is reserved for individuals with disabilities in need of assistance, and is not a means of inquiry regarding positions or application status.

Job
: Human resources
Primary Location
: North America-United States-Texas-Houston
Organization
: ENA Business Functions
Schedule
: Full-time
Nature of Responsibility
: Professional / First Line team leader

Job Posting
: Oct 9, 2020, 11:55:10 PM",3.7,"ENGIE North America Inc.
3.7","Houston, TX",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1995,Company - Public,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
82,Finance Data Analyst Internship - Paid,$65k-$79k (Employer Est.),"Finance Data Analyst Internship
Paid Internship - Summer 2021
Corporate Headquarters
12575 Uline Drive, Pleasant Prairie, WI 53158

Uline seeks summer 2021 Finance Data Analyst Interns at its Corporate Headquarters in Pleasant Prairie, WI.

Better together than apart. This position is on-site, and we are looking for good people who share our passion.

Uline is proud to operate as a drug-free workplace. All new hires must complete a pre-employment drug screening.

Position Responsibilities
Design, develop, implement and maintain various dashboards and tools.
Utilize SQL and VBA to create tools to increase efficiency in financial processes.
Support the finance department with SQL queries (querying data) and ad hoc analytical tasks.
Gain exposure to multiple business units including Corporate Finance, Accounting, Credit Research / Analysis, Tax, Operations and Corporate Audit.
Enhance technical and financial skills through on-the-job experience and training.

Minimum Requirements
Candidates must be pursuing a Bachelor's degree related to Finance, IT, or Analytics.
SQL or relevant programming experience preferred.
Demonstrate strong problem solving, analytical, leadership and communication skills.
Ability to work on tasks independently.
Microsoft Excel skills required, Access skills a plus.

Benefits of a Uline Internship
Gain professional work experience in an area related to your degree.
Work in a positive, well-balanced environment.
Learn about the industry from all levels of Uline management.
Potential opportunity, upon graduation, for full-time employment with a successful, fast-growing company!
Housing available for those who live more than 50 miles away.

Intern Perks
On-site café with meals and dinner-to-go options prepared by executive chefs.
First-class fitness center with sauna and complimentary personal trainers.
Over four miles of beautifully maintained walking trails.
Outings throughout the summer with interns across all departments.
Intern specific Lunch and Learns.

About Uline

Uline is the leading distributor of shipping, industrial and packaging materials to businesses throughout North America. We're a privately held, family-owned company known for incredible service and quality products. We offer same-day shipping on over 37,500 products found in our 812-page catalog and on our state-of-the-art e-commerce website.

Uline provides the essential supplies needed to keep organizations operational and productive. To protect the health and safety of our employees, we have modified our normal operating policies in response to COVID-19.

Our quality products, huge inventory and ongoing expansion fuel our incredible growth. This is a great time to join Uline!

Apply online today to join us in 2021!",3.5,"Uline
3.5","Pleasant Prairie, WI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
83,Data Warehouse Technical Analyst,$45k-$130k (Glassdoor Est.),"IMT Insurance is hiring a Data Warehouse Technical Analyst in our Research and Development department to design, maintain, and provide support for data warehouse systems and other related data marts. This individual will also implement and enforce standards and procedures to ensure data is managed consistently and properly integrated within the warehouse. If you have strong time management and excellent communication skills, this position is for you!

A DAY IN THE LIFE:

Responsible for data warehouse design and configuration.
Ensures the accuracy and quality of warehouse data.
Map data between source systems, data warehouses, and data marts.
Develop data warehouse process models, including sourcing, loading, transformation, and extraction.
Defines user requirements and database design specifications.
Develop diagrams or flow charts of system operation.
Acts as a liaison between users, developers, DBAs and network administrators on data warehouse issues.
Interface with DBAs and security team on security and data masking needs.
Provides technical support and coordination during warehouse design, testing and movement to production.
Develop procedures for data management.
Responsible for coding and documenting procedures, and programming, testing and debugging data warehouses.

WHAT YOU’LL NEED:

Actively listens with strong oral and written communication skills
Ability to effectively manage multiple projects at once and prioritize
Maintain technical expertise and knowledge of current trends and techniques
Experienced with cloud-based solutions
Experienced with a programming or scripting language
Data base user interface and query software including SQL
Experienced with database infrastructure
Must possess the ability to work well with others
A college degree or equivalent needed to perform normal functions plus 5+ years of experience needed to perform the essential functions of the job.

Are you still wondering, ‘Why IMT?’ Well let me tell you more. We’ve been named a top workplace for seven years in a row because of the great people who work here. We also pride ourselves in being a family-orientated company, living true to the work/life balance lifestyle. Our employees benefit from a fun, but professional environment taking part in activities and events throughout the year that provides the perfect blend of social opportunities, personal and career development, and community involvement.

If want to learn more, I suggest you apply today!",4.4,"IMT Insurance
4.4","West Des Moines, IA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1884,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
84,Senior Data Analyst,-1,"Please do not apply through Glassdoor; the application form needs to be completed in order to be considered. TO APPLY, VISIT: https://grnh.se/eb8d01633us.

About Us: At Emendata, we help bridge the gap between data and the real world. We partner with organizations that have a social mission and help them tackle their problems using analytics. Our role in these partnerships goes end to end—we handle everything from wrangling the data to analyzing the problem to turning the results into something actionable. Importantly, we understand that this analytics pipeline does not live in a vacuum. Getting to meaningful numbers requires more than just the right methods; it calls for understanding the people, policies, data, and systems involved. With this approach, our small but fast-growing team is having a big impact, taking on challenges like using analytics to combat fraud, waste, and abuse in Medicare.
About the Role: This role leads the way in producing analytics that reflect a deep level of understanding and a high degree of quality. We are looking for you to:
Take analyses from end to end: Understand the client’s problem, identify the right research question, plan the methodology, corral the data, code the analysis, interpret the results, craft the deliverable, and communicate the story
Apply a research mentality: Use all tools at our disposal (documentation, policy regulations, data investigations, etc.) to make sound analytic decisions
Help the team deliver its best work: Turn direction from clients/senior staff into tactical plans and work closely with data analysts to help them implement (conducting code reviews, teaching/reinforcing analytic strategies, etc.)
This role will be a good fit for people who naturally push towards progress and are undeterred when that requires a lot of effort or stepping into unfamiliar territory. Emendata is growing rapidly, and we are looking for people who are excited to march forward together.
Qualifications: If you do not meet all the criteria below but still think you would be a good fit for this role, please apply so we can see if we can find the right spot for you on the team. We value experience but also welcome aptitude and enthusiasm.
Education: Bachelor’s or master’s degree in a quantitative field or equivalent technical training
Programming: Experience with SAS is a must (comfortable with SAS macro language, advanced DATA step techniques such as hashes, and PROC SQL); experience with Python, Stata, R, or SQL is a plus
Technical Mentorship: Demonstrated experience with reviewing code and providing feedback
Data Management: Comfortable with the process of importing, cleaning, and preparing data for analysis in a reproducible way
Analysis: Exceptional problem-solving skills with a good understanding of statistical/social science research methods; 4+ years hands-on experience in an analytics role (e.g., economic consulting)
Working Style: Intellectually curious (keep pulling on threads until finding an answer), enterprising (eager to tackle the unknown and find a way to make things happen), and collaborative (work with others to explore, build, tear down, and build again)
To be considered for this position, applicants must have the ability to work in the U.S. without a need for current or future visa sponsorship.
About the Interview Process: We want both sides to learn what it would be like to work together. Part way through the interview process, we incorporate a lightweight at-home exercise that serves as the basis for a technical interview. The exercise gives us an outlet to show you what kind of problems this role would tackle and offers you an opportunity to show us how you would approach the work.",-1,Emendata,"Burlingame, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
85,Senior Product Data Analyst,$49k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"About us:

Kiva (kiva.org) is an international nonprofit with a mission to expand financial access to help underserved communities thrive. We run a global marketplace platform to crowdfund microloans for financially excluded entrepreneurs, farmers and students around the world. Our organization combines the culture and technological passion of an internet start-up with the compassion and empathy of a non-profit to create impact and opportunity at global scale. Since 2005, we have raised more than $1.4 billion in loan capital for 3.6 million borrowers in 95 countries. Our lenders fund over $13 million in loans every month. With offices in San Francisco, Portland, New York, Nairobi, and Bangkok, Kiva's team includes 100+ employees and 400+ volunteers worldwide. Our team is growing as we pursue exciting new opportunities to create a financially inclusive world.

Role overview:

As a Senior Product Data Analyst at Kiva, you'll be responsible for leading analytics initiatives that affect lenders, borrowers and Kiva staff around the world. We are seeking someone who is passionate about the Kiva mission and has a track record of developing actionable product insights, driving data self-service, and providing analytics thought leadership. This role will be responsible for delivering customer-focused data insights that inform the product roadmap and broader Kiva strategy, delivering ongoing trend analysis into drivers of Kiva's key product metrics, and leading Kiva's analytics roadmap.

At this time, we can only consider applicants with authorization to work in the United States on a permanent, full-time basis; unfortunately we cannot provide visa sponsorship.

Key responsibilities include:
Be a senior voice in the organization, discovering customer-focused data insights that inform and lead the direction of Kiva's product
Conduct exploratory analysis to understand the drivers of Kiva's current product performance and to identify new opportunities for product features and experiments (e.g., customer segmentation, pathing analysis)
Design and measure the impact of product experiments, synthesize learnings, and inform and update Kiva's strategic hypotheses
Perform ongoing trend analysis to inform day-to-day decisions by defining metrics, building critical company dashboards, and sharing out ad hoc analysis
Disseminate learnings across the business, to product managers, engineers, marketers, and up through senior and executive leadership
Contribute, alongside data science, to the development of our shared data layer
Provide leadership on a range of analytics work occurring across the company, including mentoring data users in support of self-service
Preferred qualifications:
5+ years experience in data analytics, business analytics, data science, economics, statistics or related field
Consistent record of conducting proactive data analysis, distilling actionable takeaways, making recommendations, and helping the business act on those recommendations
Experience designing and evaluating statistical tests, including multivariate tests with non-binary outcome variables
Well-versed in SQL and facile with Python, R or other statistical packages
Strong presentation and communication skills, with experience working with cross-functional stakeholders and executives
Comfortable extensively using BI tools (e.g., Looker, Tableau)
Experience mentoring others strongly preferred
Ability to thrive in a fast-paced, dynamic environment and drive change.
Passionate about Kiva and its long term potential.
What we offer:
An opportunity to improve real lives, solve hard problems, and change the world
Friendly, supportive, and adventurous environment with a team of engaged colleagues
A comprehensive, industry-leading benefits package
Opportunities to connect with and learn from colleagues and partners around the world
A diverse and inclusive workplace where we learn from each other is an integral part of Kiva's culture. We actively welcome people of different backgrounds, experiences, abilities and perspectives. We are an equal opportunity employer and a great place to work. Join us and help us achieve our mission!

We will only accept applications directly from candidates. Kiva will not be responsible for any recruiting agency fees, absent a formal agreement.

#LI-CY1",4.2,"Kiva.org
4.2","Portland, OR",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Nonprofit Organization,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
86,Data Analyst,-1,"Please do not apply through Indeed.*
The only way you will be considered is if you follow the link at the bottom of the page and take a very short quiz.*
What are we looking for?*
We are looking for an Analyst seeking to work with our clients to shape business and data strategy. You are highly analytical and excited about applying a quantitative framework to business problems through performing complex analysis, data mining, predictive modeling, business forecasting, applied statistics, and more. You are comfortable with presenting your approach to Product Manager, Engineers, Marketing, Sales, Finance and working with them to execute a data-driven business process. At Raybeam, we pride ourselves on our pragmatic, engineering approach to making data work for the business.
The ideal candidate will possess: *
Build scalable data-driven processes to achieve business outcomes
A vision for ingraining analytics into an organization’s decision making process
Experience in design-and-build innovative data solutions, from discovery to delivery for clients and external stakeholders
Ability to manage a data ecosystem including ETL, data governance, reporting and insights
Ability to take a project from RFP/SOW/BRD to delivery: project management, requirements gathering, data architecture, workflow management, quality assurance, reporting and visualization, presentation
Requirements: *
4+ years of applied analytics in sales, finance, marketing, product, engineering; track record of success
4+ years of discovery and assessment of a client’s data portfolio, data tools, and data applications
2+ years of data management and consulting experience
Familiarity with cloud platforms such as AWS, GCP, Azure to use/deploy analytics solutions
Strong working knowledge of SQL. NoSQL is a plus
Proficient in at least one or other language for applied to statistics, data analysis, and machine learning - Python, R, Matlab, SPSS
Strong written communication and presentation
Who are we?*
Raybeam, Inc. is a software engineering and consulting company focused on strategic consulting, business intelligence, and online/database marketing for the past fifteen years. We have offices near Boston and San Francisco and support a strong list of clients including Google, Facebook, Microsoft, eBay, Disney, One Kings Lane, Beachbody and Hilton Worldwide.
What do we do?*
We provide technology solutions by architecting and developing enterprise systems using a variety of programming languages, tools and platforms. This can range from building data warehouses, to web applications to implementing reporting platforms. We work in small teams, own the projects that we work on, and have direct input into the business decisions of our clients.
If you are interested in applying for the position please click on the link below to take a short quiz.*
http://careerseval.raybeam.com/sign\_in

Please note that Raybeam, Inc. is currently unable to provide sponsorship and we will only consider local candidates.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Referral program
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
COVID-19 considerations:
Due to COVID, all employees are currently working remotely. When it is safe to do so, we will return to the office.

Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
anayst: 3 years (Preferred)
Company's website:
www.raybeam.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/RaybeamInc/
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.7,"Raybeam, Inc.
4.7","Austin, TX",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
87,Cost Analyst (data mining) with a Secret Clearance,$44k-$84k (Glassdoor Est.),"Location: Arlington, VA*
Must have an Active Secret Clearance*
INTRODUCTION*
The Program Development, Coordination, and Support Directorate is responsible for the design, coordination, and management of OBO's construction and renovation programs.

The Department of State (DOS), Bureau of Overseas Buildings Operations, Directorate of Project Development, Coordination and Support, Office of Cost Management (OBO/PDCS/COST), requires data analytical services to complete the task requirements stated below.

The Data Analyst assists with Excel, SharePoint, Power Bi and other software applications and their integration into office operations to support more effective operations.
DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES*
The ideal candidate is adept at using large data sets to find opportunities for product and process optimization and using models to test the effectiveness of different courses of action. They must have strong experience using a variety of data mining/data analysis methods, using a variety of data tools, building and implementing models, using/creating algorithms and creating/running simulations. They must have a proven ability to drive business results with their data-based insights. They must be comfortable working with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams. The right candidate will have a passion for discovering solutions hidden in large data sets and working with stakeholders to improve business outcomes. In furtherance of these skills and responsibilities, the contractor performs tasks and assignments that include the following:
Work with stakeholders throughout the organization to identify opportunities for leveraging data to drive business solutions.
Mine and analyze data from databases to drive optimization and improvement of business process.
Coordinate with different functional teams to gather data, conduct analysis, provide recommendations, and monitor outcomes.
Use cost estimating tools specifically Sage / Navigator / Cortex to generate representational solutions, trends, and forecasting costs.
Develop Excel models and algorithms to apply to data sets.
Assess the effectiveness and accuracy of new data sources and data gathering techniques.
Develop processes and tools to monitor and analyze Sage model performance and data accuracy.
And other duties as assigned.
KNOWLEDGE/SKILLS: *
· Bachelor's Degree in business or in a technology discipline.
Minimum of 3 years of experience manipulating data sets and building Excel models.
Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using advanced Excel and Power Bi.
Knowledge of building industry preferable
Ability to understand construction cost estimating
Strong problem solving skills
Experience working with and creating data architectures.
Experience querying databases
Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers e.g. A/E contractors
A drive to learn and master new technologies and techniques.
MicroSystems Automation Group (MSAG) is a Service-Disabled Veteran-Owned Business (SDVOB) providing subject matter expertise and technology solutions for government and commercial clients since 1988. We have a rich history of working with clients to understand their business problems and leverage our technical expertise and knowledge to deliver solutions that improve their business performance.

Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
cost estimation: 3 years (Required)
Tableau/Power BI: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative",4.4,"MSAG
4.4","Arlington, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1989,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
88,Business Intelligence & Data Analyst,-1,"CIRMA

Connecticut Interlocal Risk Management Agency
BUSINESS INTELLIGENCE & DATA ANALYST *
_Is your ordinary extraordinary? Then you belong at CIRMA_* _. _We are looking for a Data Management Analyst who lives and breathes data management, business intelligence and database technologies to help implement Guidewire InfoCenter and DataHub technology solutions.
_Diversity in thought and opportunity. Collaborative Culture. Camaraderie and shared responsibility. That’s CIRMA._* For nearly four decades we have empowered our members through financial stability and success. Our delivery of innovative, industry- leading products and services has made CIRMA Connecticut’s number one choice for Municipalities, Public School and Local Public
Entities. CIRMA provides an unmatched alternative to the commercial insurance market by focusing on our members’ satisfaction and loss reduction through deep experience in claim and risk management.
SOUND GOOD? HERE’S WHAT WE’RE LOOKING FOR: *
 Work in a hands-on capacity to customize and deliver Guidewire’s InfoCenter and DataHub solutions using ETL and BI tools for Business Intelligence, Data Migration and Data Integration

 Perform Data Profiling, Data Analytics and Data Mapping

 Develop ETL logic to integrate and/or migrate data from legacy system and Guidewire applications

 Design and develop ETL logic to extend and publish data marts in enterprise data warehouse

 Design and develop BI to create new and update existing Business Intelligence

 Cognos 11.x reporting and administration experience would be ideal, other reporting systems knowledge preferred

 Test and execute initial and delta loads of persistent operational data store and enterprise data warehouse

 Fine-tune all ETL processes to maximize performance
TO BE SUCCESSFUL IN THIS ROLE, YOU’LL NEED TO BRING THE FOLLOWING SKILLS TO THE TABLE: *
 Experience in or knowledge of relational database theory

 Knowledge of data-warehousing, Data Marts (including star and snowflake schemas) and BI

 Design best practices and techniques

 Experience in or knowledge of Data Mapping and Data Modeling

 SQL scripting skills including query optimization

 Experience using ETL tools

 Experience using BI tools (e.g. Cognos – preferred, SSRS, etc.)
YOU’LL ALSO NEED THE FOLLOWING ATTRIBUTES: *
 Strong communication skills and the drive to meet problem solving challenges with a high degree of ownership and delivery

 Innovative thinking

 Keen writing skills – ability to produce clear, concise and high quality technical and business documents

 A desire to work collaboratively in cross functional teams

 A strong sense of accountability and self-motivation

 Strong ability to think critically and aptitude for problem solving

 Experience in property and casualty insurance

 Familiarity in agile project delivery practices

 Bachelor’s degree preferably in Computer Science or a related field
CIRMA’S PHILOSOPHY IS TO PROVIDE EXEMPLARY COMPENSATION PACKAGES TO ITS EMPLOYEES. WE *
OFFER COMPETITIVE SALARIES AND COMPREHENSIVE BENEFIT PACKAGES, INCLUDING: *
 Paid health, dental, life, vision and long-term disability insurance plans— *some of the most competitive plans out there. *

 Flexible schedules and healthy work/life balance— *these are not just trendy buzz words at CIRMA. *

 Generous 401 pension plan without employee contributions— *we invest in you _and _your future. *

 Paid vacation and holiday time / Tuition Reimbursement / Employer-paid staff develop & training programs— *again, we care *
for and invest in one of our most valuable assets. You!*
545 Long Wharf Drive, 8th Floor
New Haven, Connecticut 06511
Please send your resume and cover letter. EOE*. Phone 203-946-7000 www.CIRMA.org
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $50,000.00 - $70,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Employee Assistance Program
Employee Discount
Flexible Schedule
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Professional Development Assistance
Referral Program
Retirement Plan
Tuition Reimbursement
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
www.ccm-ct.org
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.1,"Connecticut Conference of Municipalities (CCM)
4.1","New Haven, CT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1966,Company - Private,Municipal Governments,Government,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
89,Data Analyst,$41k-$74k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst

Envision is seeking a Data Analyst for our 6 + month project in Phoenix, AZ. Below is a brief outline for this role.

Only local Arizona candidates considered – No C2C or 3rd parties allowed for this project

Role / Responsibilities

The Bureau of Public Health Statistics has an immediate need for an experienced, knowledgeable epidemiologist or data analyst to take the lead in data submissions and analysis for two major projects.
The first is the Health Professionals Registry, for which data submission, and the design and construction of an integrated database will begin in December and January.
Second, the candidate will pursue a detailed medical marijuana data analysis using Behavioral Risk Factor Surveillance Survey (BRFSS) 2019 data.
Working knowledge of SAS and complex data systems is critical.",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Phoenix, AZ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
90,"Data Analyst, Sales Operations",-1,"About Us

Today's economy requires business owners to adapt quickly and think on their feet. ShopKeep's software-first commerce solutions make that possible.

Our cloud-based point of sale, payment processing, flexible hardware, and business-friendly financing let owners start, run, and grow their businesses in person and online. They can manage inventory, optimize staffing, streamline their operations, and market to their customers from one intuitive dashboard.

We understand what it's like to run a business, because we've been helping business owners succeed for over a decade, and we share their mindset. ShopKeep, after all, is also a small business, born to give our peers the tools they need to dream big, fight smart, and succeed on their own terms.

Today that mission is more relevant than ever, driven by team members around the world. ShopKeep is headquartered in New York City, with offices in Portland, Chicago, and Belfast. We're innovators, technologists, and customer advocates who are obsessed with helping independent businesses survive and thrive.

Job Description

The Sales Operations Specialist at ShopKeep will be responsible for working across teams to develop reports, implement process changes, and support our Sales Team with scheduling and training. This role requires flexibility to manage multiple priorities and proficiency in data modeling with big data. We want someone who embraces aggressive goals, works hard to achieve them, thrives in uncertainty and brings passion to their work.

In this role you will
Work closely with sales and company leadership to develop and maintain the operational infrastructure supporting goal setting, reporting, and automation of manual processes
Automate manual processes in order to increase efficiency and provide more time for analysis
Develop reporting for business leaders using Looker, Salesforce, and Excel
Work with company leadership to implement new technology and process changes
Develop intel on competitors and developments in the payments space
Work with finance on tracking and processing commission
Assist Marketing in developing tracking for campaigns and strategies to drive sales
What you'll need
Bachelor's Degree or relevant work experience in lieu of degree
1 - 2 years of experience working with large amounts of data, including building, managing and working with databases (SQL, redshift, etc) and using analytical tools (Looker, Tableau, OLAP tools, excel, etc)
Demonstrated problem solving skills
Strong attention to detail and able to effectively prioritize and manage multiple priorities
Advanced excel skills
Strong drive to succeed and ability to navigate ambiguity
Ability to learn quickly and thrive in a fast-paced changing environment
Experience working with APIs is a plus
Benefits

We provide the essentials…
Medical, Dental, and Vision Insurance
Flexible PTO Policy
Commuter Benefits
401k Matching
...and the fun-damentals:
Catered Meals
Happy Hours
Beer Fridge
Stocked Snack Shelf
Hackathons
Still have energy to burn?
Meditation Sessions
Massage Therapy
Standing Desks
ShopKeep is an Equal Opportunity Employer

We are an Equal Opportunities Employer. We don't discriminate based on gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, nationality, or any other individual characteristics. We practice equality of opportunity in employment and select the best person for the job.

#zr",3.5,"ShopKeep
3.5",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
91,Product Data Analyst,$55k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"OVERVIEW:

As the Company expands its product offerings, there are rapidly growing needs to use both external and internal data sources to ensure optimal financial and operational performance. The Product Data Analyst is a highly skilled and proficient in their discipline which adds value to the organization. The role will focus on internal data sources, ensuring we have access to the required data and are using effective reports to monitor and interpret this data.

TEAM OVERVIEW:

The Product Strategy Group works to ensure the Company offers competitive products that provide growth and profitability. The group performs a wide range of analytics and uses both internal and external data sources to achieve these ends. We interact and provide guidance primarily to Product, Marketing & Finance.

COMPANY PERKS:

Competitive pay, 401k with company match, Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance, Employee Stock Purchase Plan, Educational Reimbursement, Commuter benefits, Discount programs, Inventor patent bonuses

COMPANY OVERVIEW:

Stamps.com (NASDAQ: STMP) is the leading provider of postage online and shipping software solutions to customers including consumers, small businesses, e-commerce shippers, enterprises, and high volume shippers. Stamps.com offers solutions that help businesses run their shipping operations more smoothly and function more successfully under the brand names Stamps.com, Endicia®, ShipStation®, ShipEngine®, ShippingEasy®, ShipWorks®, GlobalPost and MetaPack™. Stamps.com’s family of brands provides seamless access to mailing and shipping services through integrations with more than 500 unique partner applications.

RESPONSIBILITIES:

Primary Objectives:
Ensure Product, Operations and Product Strategy groups have timely access to reliable data to make critical, real-time business decisions
Develop a strong working relationship with the Company’s Business Intelligence group; serve as the primarily liaison between the above-mentioned groups and BI
Drive the data reporting strategy for these groups; develop reports to the specifications of these teams; and evaluate appropriate software tools to most efficiently meet team needs
Essential Position Duties:
Acquire, clean, and structure data from multiple sources; analyze data to discover and interpret trends, patterns, and relationships. Working across departments, help us ensure data quality and present data in a way that makes it easy to communicate among different groups.
Master large data sets with SQL and Tableau
Build dashboards and reports, presenting key insights and ensuring data driven actions to improve the business
Seek out improvements in current internal reporting and performance monitoring to drive more accuracy, better insights, and more streamlined processes
Perform other duties as assigned
Additional Job Duties:
Sit for prolonged periods of time
Utilize wrist and hands for a prolonged period of time
Walk short distances
Stand for short periods
Speaking and conversing with others
Lift up to 25 lbs without assistance up to chest height
QUALIFICATIONS:

Education and/or Experience:
Bachelor degree, preferably in a quantitative/analytical field.
Four or more (4+) years of relevant experience.
Skills and Knowledge:
Excellent analytical and fact-based problem solving skills, including ability to analyze large amounts of data and be able to make recommendations based on identification of trend and gaps along with creating forecasts based on historical data.
Excellent analytical and fact-based problem solving skills, with strong attention to detail.
Must be a self-starter and ready to work in an intense but fun environment with our existing team of marketing professionals.
Strong communication and relationship-building skills.
Self-motivated individual who is able to prioritize and multi-task.
Works well under pressure and able to meet tight deadlines.
Ability to conduct complex work under minimal supervision and with wide latitude for independent judgement.
Computer/Software/Application Proficiency:
Advanced Excel user, with strong SQL knowledge
Experience with visualization software such as Tableau required
Travel Requirements:
None anticipated
Equal Opportunity Employer/Veterans/Disabled

If you are based in California, we encourage you to read this important information about the Stamps.com Privacy Policy for California residents linked here.

#LI-KD1",3.9,"Stamps.com
3.9","El Segundo, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1996,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
92,Senior Data Analyst,$85k-$115k (Employer Est.),"About Sysco Labs

Sysco LABS is a technology-focused division within Sysco, dedicated to reimagining foodservice through innovation. An extension of Sysco’s commitment to deliver exceptional products and services to the foodservice industry, Sysco LABS uses customer and market intelligence, data-driven insights and agile technology development to rethink the entire foodservice ecosystem.
Our innovation will improve everything from the ordering process, inventory, pricing and automation to the in-restaurant customer experience. Operating with the mindset of a startup and backed by the authoritative expertise of an industry leader, Sysco LABS’ mission is to improve the Sysco customer experience and consistently deliver cost savings and new innovations through technology.

About the Role

As a Senior Data Analyst at Sysco Labs, you will be responsible for driving strategies and tactics to optimize Sysco products using quantitative data, find answers to broad questions, identify patterns and trends, and make informed decisions to influence product strategy and direction.

Responsibilities
Utilize a combination of exploratory and descriptive analytics to inform product strategy and roadmap, and provide ad-hoc analyses that uncover root cause of recent business trends.
Understand data infrastructure and coordinate with Data Engineering to deliver data models and structures to meet business demands.
Design relevant data models, including outlining dimensions and measures needed, for answering business questions.
Establish and implement product data standards and best practices in order to optimize the data collection, fidelity and accuracy. Develop product measurement plans and dashboards to monitor metrics and KPIs.
Ensure optimization and validations initiatives are implemented, tracked and reviewed postproduction.
Shape, explore and publish data for business analysis or stakeholder initiatives using core Business Intelligence (BI) tools.
Maintain a presence in the broader data and analytics community.
Shape, explore and publish data for business analysis or stakeholder initiatives using core Business Intelligence (BI) tools, such as Tableau and Redash.
Other duties as assigned.
About You

Minimum Qualifications:
6 years’ experience in using data and analytics to drive decisions and insights.
Experience with SQL.
Experience with MixPanel or Google Analytics.
Experience with digital marketing tools such as Google Search Console, Adwords, Marin, Google DoubleClick stack, Tealium, or similar.
Experience with Tableau
Experience with JavaScript tag management.
Experience with Python Analytics/Viz packages.
Experience with R-Studio.
Experience with Data Mining tools such as RapidMiner, Opera, ProM, or similar.
Preferred Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in mathematics, statistics, computer science or related field.
Experience with programmatic media.
Experience with structured and semi-structured data.
Perks at Sysco LABS:
Competitive base & bonus packages
Fun, casual, fast-paced work environment filled with talented colleagues
Brand-new high-tech office space located in the heart of East 6th St, (walking distance to the MetroRail)
Generous PTO policy
Flexible work environment that encourages work/life balance
Fully stocked break room & weekly catered lunch
Excellent medical, dental and vision benefits and company 401(k) program
At Sysco LABS you will be part of a team that values trust, learning, and working together to solve problems. Your efforts will help to build groundbreaking experiences for our customers. Come join us!
We embrace diversity and equal opportunity in a serious way. We are committed to building a team that represents a variety of backgrounds, perspectives, and skills. The more inclusive we are, the better our work will be.",4.1,"Sysco Labs
4.1","Austin, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
93,Data Analyst,$51k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst
10744
Menlo Park, CA
6/2/2020 2:54:00 PM

Learning
Contractor - W2

Job Description
Responsibilities

Primary
Query data and provide reports/query results to stakeholders
Manage requests and priorities independently
Provide documentation of queries/inbound requests for future use in improving GBM’s data infrastructure
Create new or improve existing dashboards by adding new metrics to support Business Education and other teams within the company

Secondary
Communicate with internal stakeholders about dashboards, and provide support about which metrics are available and from where
Understand existing data policy restrictions and determine if queries are possible to run/share
Skills

Minimum Qualifications

· 4+ years of experience in analytics or similar field

· Advanced proficiency in SQL

· Experience problem solving and providing business insights and recommendations from data

· Ability to manage multiple concurrent projects and drive initiatives in a cross-functional environment

· Ability to communicate complex data issues to audiences of different levels of technical expertise

Preferred Qualifications

· Experience building out large data sets and pipelines

· Python or similar scripting experience

Education

Minimum Qualifications

· Bachelor’s degree in a technical focus area

Preferred Qualifications

· MBA or graduate degree in a quantitative field

Job Requirements",3.8,"IntraEdge
3.8","Menlo Park, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
94,"Data Analyst SQL, R Python",-1,"Job Title: Data Analyst SQL, R Python
Location: San Francisco, CA
Duration: 10 months

Summary:
Independently query internal data using SQL, R, or Python and provide ongoing reporting/analyses about public figure performance for new product launches or company priorities
Inform, influence, and support decisions and product launches via analytics for large public figures in conjunction with cross-functional teams
Analyze and segment Instagram partners to better understand our ecosystem and allocate resources using advanced regression techniques and data modeling
Understand ecosystems, behaviors, and long-term trends of public figures, especially related to video
Manage requests and priorities while creating presentations for internal use with cross-functional teams or external use with partners
Identify areas of our day-to-day work that should be automated, and create solutions to make those more efficient
Collaborate with data scientists, product managers, and other product team counterparts to understand the value that we are driving for partners in new launches
(Potentially) Manage an individual contributor analyst in the same product area

Skills:

Pulling data and creating analyses independently
Experience using SQL to pull data directly from internal databases
Experience using Tableau or other data visualization software
Experience communicating to all levels of an organization and to technical/non-technical counterparts, including executive communication
Ability to work independently and foresee problems before they happen
Advanced predictive modeling skills (using Python, R, or another language)
Previous management experience of other analysts

Education:
BA or BS degree
8+ years of quantitative data experience, including pulling data and
8+ creating analyses independently

Required Skills:
BIG DATA ANALYTICS
DATA ANALYST
LEADERSHIP COMMUNICATION
EXCELLENT COMMUNICATION SKILLS
SQL

Additional Skills:
PREDICTIVE MODELING
PYTHON
QUANTITATIVE
DATA MODELING
DATA VISUALIZATION
DATABASE
DATABASES
TABLEAU
TABLEAU SOFTWARE
VISUALIZATION

IND123",4.5,"Ursus
4.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2015,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
95,HR Data Analyst,$35k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Details
Level
Experienced
Job Location
Oklahoma City Office - Oklahoma City, OK
Position Type
Full Time
Education Level
Bachelor's Degree
Travel Percentage
None
Job Category
General Business
Description

This position works with HR and the business to develop reports and provides analysis to inform and support decision-making. This role will utilize data analysis methodologies, reporting and data visualization tools, and requires an understanding of data mining/mashing, analytical mindset, data visualization, and the ability to frequently interface with executive and senior leaders.

RESPONSIBILITIES

Conducts analysis of HR and/or business data to identify actionable insights. Merges data from multiple sources/systems and provides ad-hoc reporting when needed
Leverages internal HR and/or business data using internal tools, systems, and data sources
Collaborates with cross-functional teams (HR, IT, Product Management and Development) to develop progressive analytics use cases for Product Management.
Proactively partners with key stakeholders to address business gaps or opportunities identified through analytics.
Develops reports, dashboards, and models to explore data and explain opportunities
Merges structured, semi-structured and unstructured data from several systems to highlight company trends related to recruiting and other business areas
Performs moderately complex data analysis and generates insights to support the HR workforce analytics needs of the business to drive informed business decisions
Delivers high quality analysis, reports, presentations using simple and effective visualizations that can be scaled for consumption by a larger audience
Creates and maintains monthly and quarterly workforce metrics and analysis
Builds strong relationships and collaborates with teammates, business leaders, and other internal clients
Automates data and analytics solutions, builds and prototypes dashboards to provide insights
Continuously monitors data quality and integrity
Manipulates and analyzes large data sets to gain insights and provide recommendations
Documents and maintains procedures for reports and records of information management and storage protocols
Develops and delivers weekly, monthly and quarterly client group metrics
Leverages advanced technical knowledge of excel and other data visualization tools
Qualifications

MINIMUM BASIC QUALIFICATIONS

Education/Certification:

Bachelor's degree in Business, Human Resources

Experience:

2-4 years of experience in Data Analytics
Experience with data visualization and advanced analytics tools
Human Resources experience

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS

Education/Certification:

Bachelor's degree in Business, Human Resources or Quantitative Analytics preferred

Experience:

4 years of experience in HR Data Analytics
Human Resources/Workforce Analytics experience strongly preferred
Experience with Power BI, Tableau

Skills/Abilities:

Critical, analytical thinker with strong communication skills
Strong analytical skills and the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques
Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings
Self-starter who thrives in a fast paced environment
Strong understanding of HR processes and procedures
Collaborative partner, builds and maintains professional relationships

Paycom is an equal opportunity employer and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any kind. Paycom makes employment decisions on the basis of business needs, job requirements, individual qualifications and merit. Paycom wants to have the best available people in every job. Therefore, Paycom does not permit its employees to harass, discriminate or retaliate against other employees or applicants because of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, pregnancy, national origin, military and veteran status, age, physical or mental disability, genetic characteristic, reproductive health decisions, family or parental status or any other consideration made unlawful by applicable laws. Equal employment opportunity will be extended to all persons in all aspects of the employer-employee relationship. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including, but not limited to, hiring, training, promotion, discipline, compensation benefits, and separation of employment. The Human Resources Department has overall responsibility for this policy and maintains reporting and monitoring procedures. Any questions or concerns should be referred to the Human Resources Department.",4.4,"Paycom
4.4","Oklahoma City, OK",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1998,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
96,SAP Materials Master Data Analyst - Temp,$58k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"This is a 6 month temporary assignment.

The Mizuho OSI Way

In 1978, we set out to change the way patients undergo surgery. As a Mizuho OSI customer, you can expect our commitment to the following…

We commit to your satisfaction. If you are dissatisfied, we will strive to make it right.

We do things the right way. We commit to hire people with competence, generosity and a caring attitude. We motivate our employees to use their individual strengths to provide creative solutions, changes, and innovations. We anticipate your needs through customer experiences, thus nurturing our relationships.

Collectively, this creates an environment that enables and inspires healthcare professionals to improve the lives of patients.

Dare to go further. Care to do more.

TOP REASONS TO JOIN THE MIZUHO OSI TEAM
Privately held company with a tradition of market leadership and best-in-class innovation
Fast-paced entrepreneurial culture focused on dramatically improving patient outcomes through personal empowerment
Emphasis on continuous improvement and celebration of our values of R.E.S.P.E.C.T. and the Mizuho Way.
Create innovative solutions designed and manufactured at our HQ in Northern California
POSITION OVERVIEW
The ideal candidate will have a minimum of 1 to 2 full life cycle SAP implementations and have participated or have led roles in blueprint activities, creating SOP, work instructions and training users to maintenance and sustain the master data. In addition be a savvy self-directed and capable individual who’s accustomed to delivering time critical work products.
Bachelor's degree in business, and or in systems applications such as SAP Modules or equivalent work experience
Experience with full life cycle SAP implementations
Formal training or experience with ASAP implementation methodology
Excellent written and oral communication skills
We are looking for you, if you have the ability to:
Hold meetings on Material Master and Item Master Data Management.
Assist with refining Business Process Design for Item Material Master including tactical MDM process.
Coordinate with functional disciplines in OPS/SCM and their IT counterparts.
Identify MDM Classifications of data and assist with identifying local data attributes.
Assist with the MDM governance model, including documenting processes with identified data owners, master process owners and SAP module owners.
Assist with identifying KPIs to improve quality and productivity.
Assist with workflows within MDM tool.
Here is what you will do day-to-day
Analyze business process requirements, design a solution approach in close collaboration with business teams
Write functional specifications and advise business teams of feasible solution designs
Work with IT in unit test efforts and with business in regression test efforts
Deliver BPP and solution documentation for implemented solutions
Work with functional teams (SD, MM, PP, FICO, QM)
Application Configuration and Support
Support SAP modules to meet business needs.
Unit test SAP software applications, including customizations and interfaces
Application Analysis and Design
Assist SAP users analyze and identify business process requirements.
Develop SAP functional application designs and specifications, individually or collaboratively.
Work as a member of cross-functional teams and add value by providing a technical perspective.
Guide Application Developers by recommending ways to design and unit-test applications. (SAP - PLM)
Change Management and Support
Provide QA function by reviewing/testing developer’s work.
Guide users in integrated testing, conference room pilot activities and applications startup activities.
Facilitate the process of change by clarifying new procedures and training system users.
Project Management and Control
Manage small projects, with responsibility for the quality and timeliness of project deliverables
Direct project resources and/or recommend and create internal development procedures and methodologies.
Understand scope and planned estimates of undertaken activities and manage actual time relative to the planned estimates.
Problem Solving:
Plays a key role in the Order to Cash team in the full project lifecycle, from the business blueprint of the project to post support.
Works with business analysts, business SMEs and various process owners to analyze their requirements: prepare and participate in workshops, requirement documentation, functional specifications and configuration documentation.
Provides support for Data extraction, data cleansing and loading
Works closely with IT resources for non-standard SAP objects.
Supports the development of test scripts and provide process expertise during test execution.
Assists and supports training document creation.
Finalizes the MDM configuration element s and triggers and support the solution after implementation.
Understand, follow and support Mizuho OSI’s internal Quality System policies, procedures and work instructions including but not limited to applicable external regulations (21 Code of Federal Regulations Part 820 Quality System Regulations and applicable International Standards).
What you will need to be successful in this role:
A minimum of 5 years of SAP process and configuration experience in Sales & Distribution, Materials Management, Production Planning and Quality Management modules and MDM.
Experience in at least 2 full life cycle implementations of SAP.
Experience in supporting all phases of SAP project life cycle including blueprint, design, build, test, deployment and support.
Experience in developing blueprint documentation, functional designs, test plans and scenarios as well as executing the tests.
Experience in and data validations during testing and implementation
Strong knowledge/experience in 1 additional SAP module is a must.
Experience with integration testing and implementation.
Thorough business understanding of Supply Chain processes.
Familiarity with SAP architecture.
Strong verbal and written communications skills, with an ability to express complex business concepts in technical terms.
Strong analytical, problem solving, and conceptual skills.
Strong interpersonal skills; ability to work well on cross functional project teams.
Experience in the construction and distribution industry.
What you need to be prepared for:

The physical demands are representative of those needed to perform the essential functions of the job in an office environment. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

NOTE: This job description in no way states or implies that these are the only duties or functions to be performed by the incumbent. Employees will be required to follow any other job-related instructions and to perform any other job-related duties/functions requested by their supervisor.",3.7,"Mizuho OSI
3.7","Union City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1978,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
97,Data Analyst Quality - Quality Outcomes Managment,$36k-$63k (Glassdoor Est.),"Our quality data analyst will be responsible to perform high level analyses in support of institution-wide clinical quality improvement activities. The analyst will facilitate the development and maintenance of data collection, leveraging existing data to identify gaps in care and recommend areas of focus for quality improvement activities.

An integral role to ensure that the organization exceeds its goals, the quality analyst will work collaboratively with Decision Support & Quality Services to determine resources needed to improve identified gaps in care and to develop recommendations for quality improvement based on findings.

The individual selected for this role will be engaging with a strong ability to present complex information to stakeholders in a compelling and accessible manner. This is an excellent opportunity for an experienced analyst who understands common quality benchmarks and thrives in a high-autonomy environment.

A creative role with strong flexibility, the analyst will be exposed to, and lead high-impact projects as a partner to executive and clinical leaders.

Penn State Health offers exceptional benefits including healthcare starting day one. Our employees enjoy a robust paid time off program that enables them to realize strong life/work balance.

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelor’s degree in Business Administration, Computer Science or a related field required.

3 years data analysis experience in either finance, clinical, or research required.

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:

Project management skills preferred.

Experience with statistics preferred.

Experience with Vizient, Cerner or Midas would be helpful.

If chosen for this position, you may be required to pass a Post Offer Employment Physical Exam in accordance with the measurements listed in the Work Task Analysis (WTA) report. This job description is a general outline of duties performed and is not to be misconstrued as encompassing all duties performed within the position. All individuals (including current employees) selected for a position will undergo a background check appropriate for the position's responsibilities.

Penn State Health is an equal opportunity, affirmative action employer, and is committed to providing employment opportunities to all qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, disability or protected veteran status. If you are unable to use our online application process due to an impairment or disability, please call 717-531-8440 between the hours of 8:30 AM and 4:30 PM, Eastern Standard Time, Monday – Friday, email hrsolutions@pennstatehealth.psu.edu or download our Accommodation Instructions for Job Applicants PDF for more detailed steps for assistance.

Union: Non Bargained

IND123

#LI-TB1",3.7,"Penn State Health Milton S. Hershey Medical Center
3.7","Hershey, PA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,-1,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
98,Data Analyst,-1,"Title: *Data Analyst
Location: *Columbus, OH
Solu Technology Partners has been working successfully for over 20 years to provide quality talent for a multitude of clients within the IT industry across the country. Throughout the years we have always made strides to ensure each individual is placed within a role both challenging and rewarding. We are always working to make you part of the solution.

One of the largest insurance and financial service companies worldwide has been focusing on customers and valuing people for over 85 years. With an A+ rating and a team invested in their employees and customers, there couldn’t be an easier decision to make. Come join a team that cares.

The ideal candidate for this position will be able to deliver on standards-driven, economically-sound cloud migrations. Facilitation of app teams through the diagnostic process, working alongside cloud technology “domain leads” to evaluate each application team’s plans against enterprise standards to quickly deliver a migration recommendation “business case” for each application is a must.
Responsibilities: *
Accountable for delivering a well-supported recommendation (“business case”) for a set of assigned applications, with each diagnostic completed in a two-week sprint and four application diagnostics running concurrently.
Reports to a program-level Technology Analysis Lead, who is accountable and provides oversight for all technology analysis work across the tier-1 Cloud Enablement program Interfacing Roles and Bands.
Work directly with APMs, Architects, and related team members, from across the enterprise.
Primarily face off with associates at the F, G, and H levels – and perhaps occasionally at the AVP level.
Connect the dots and identify gaps in (cloud domain-related) information and drive conversations to achieve clarity and closure.
Synthesize information into executive-summary-level findings to define and support an application-level migrate/do-not-migrate recommendation.
Understanding of cloud infrastructure, common architectural components, CI/CO pipeline, and related tools.
Required Qualifications: *
6+ years’ experience with Data Analysis
Expert Level Facilitation Skills
Excellent experience with Business Case Definition
Experience with O365 Power-User – Teams, Planner, Forms
Must have a Lean/Continuous Improvement Mindset
Cloud/DevOps experience
Preferred Qualifications: *
AWS Cloud Practitioner Certification
PowerAutomate experience
\*Solü Technology Partners provides equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability or genetics.

Job Type: Full-time

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
Data analysis skills: 6 years (Preferred)
Company's website:
www.solutechnology.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.2,"Solu Technology Partners
4.2","Columbus, OH",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1995,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
99,Financial Data Analyst (4am Shift),$26k-$44k (Glassdoor Est.),"The work schedule could be 4am or 5am start time and Monday through Friday with half day shifts Friday and Saturday.

Do you like order and continuity in your work? Does sifting through financial data and hunting for process efficiencies interest you? We are looking for someone wanting an entry level role within the financial industry. Orion is a Fintech company that is growing fast and we get to make a recognizable difference in the lives of millions of people each day!

Ready to see if you have what we are looking for?
Do you love reconciling and identifying inconsistencies in multiple data sets to make sure it’s correct? (Got to scrub data to clean it up!)
Does problem solving and meeting deadlines excite you and are you hungry for a challenge?
Do you have microscopic attention to detail that will ensure timely and accurate reconciliation of data?
Do you like to explore options to improve processes and drive efficiency?
Do you enjoy troubleshooting and providing data related solutions directly to clients?
What experience and education is needed?
Minimum of 1-2 years in a role with accounting, problem solving or analytical-related experience
Experience in financial services industry preferred
Equivalent education and experience will be considered
Ability to obtain the Orion Industry Certification within first 90 days of employment
Check off all the qualities above?

If so, then you should talk to us – Orion Advisor Solutions. We build technology that empowers financial professionals and advisory firms to improve the way they run their business and enhance the experience for the investors they serve. Delivering best-in-breed portfolio management, performance, and back-office capabilities, it’s our mission to help our clients enjoy their businesses again—and that starts by growing our team with smart, driven, and well-rounded individuals, like you.

Lastly, we offer Day ONE Benefits, Paid Parental Leave, Sabbatical time, Tuition Reimbursement, Flexibility to WFH, and Access to Financial Planning Technology and Identity Theft Protection!

#LI-AH1",4.6,"Orion Advisor Technology
4.6","Hebron, KY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
100,Business Systems Analyst (Data Analyst),$41k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Business Systems Analyst (BSA) is an individual contributor role that provides senior-level healthcare analysis for Medicare and Commercial lines of business. The BSA will manage various sources of information and large data sets, including member, pharmacy, claims and encounter data to support Reporting and Analytics projects. The BSA will provide a strong link between the business customers and development team, gather and document requirements, create SQL queries to pull and perform analysis of data, and conduct impact assessments and recommend solutions while staying current with industry regulations and trends.

This role will be Remote / Work From Home.

Key Responsibilities:

Will perform data analysis, data mining, identify the root cause of issues and handle ad-hoc analysis requests
Analyze raw data and disseminate results, think logically and process sequentially with a high level of detailed accuracy
Assist the Reporting & Analytics team with new business requirements and assist with functional specifications and perform quality checks on data and processes
Support the report development team to build a proof of concept. Present them to stakeholders to get their feedback and provide recommendations back to the team to improve the user experience

Requirements:

Bachelor’s degree required in Health Science, Computer Science, or related field of study
5+ years’ experience with data analysis. Strong data manipulation skills using database or spreadsheet applications. Ability to use SQL and other data tools to analyze diverse data sets
4+ years’ experience within the Healthcare or Insurance space
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, with the ability to multitask and prioritize projects to meet scheduled deadlines
Strong interpersonal skills required. Understands that the clients’ best interests are served through smooth, seamless service delivery
Ability to analyze raw data and disseminate results, with ability to think logically and process sequentially with a high level of detailed accuracy
Ability to work well independently or in a team environment
Must be self-motivated and passionate about delivering creative and value-driven reporting solutions in a fast-paced, time-sensitive environment with competing priorities and ongoing deliverables
2-3 years working in an Agile environment (SCRUM or SAFE), preferred

Job Demands

This is a work at home position. Access to high speed internet is required (all other equipment will be provided).
Must be able to sit and use a computer keyboard for extended periods of time
Very limited travel required
Must have flexibility and willingness to participate in the work processes of an international organization, including conference calls scheduled to accommodate global time zones.
After hours and/or weekend work required where necessary for major deliverables/deadlines (not consistent)

For the safety of our employees and those considering employment with Cotiviti, we are currently conducting all interviews virtually. In addition, the majority of the Cotiviti team is currently working remotely, and we are onboarding new hires remotely as well. As we monitor the pandemic, these arrangements may change and we will update accordingly.

#LI-JB1

Equal Opportunity Employer/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c)",2.8,"Cotiviti, Inc.
2.8","Richmond, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1979,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
101,Data Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst:

Healthcare Retroactive Audits, Inc. is looking for a skilled data analyst to join our team. The data analyst will be responsible for identifying and recovering underpaid hospital claims received from Commercial (Third Party) insurance companies. We would like for someone that lives within the area and able to commute to our location within reasonable time.

Duties:

· Ability to understand Managed Care contracts and all types of fees schedules a plus.

· Ability to understand UB 04 and physician billing 1500 as well as revenue codes, bill types, CPT and HCPS a plus.

· Ability to analyze large sets of data.

· Monitor account status and follow-up, as needed, until payments are processed and recovered.

· Ability to compile data and report.

Requirements:

· AA Degree Minimum; BA Preferred.

· Adherence to all federal and state Patient Health Information (PHI) guidelines.

· Proficiency in Microsoft Office and SQL a must.

· Strong verbal and written communication skills.

· Ability to sit and review Medical claims for long period of time.

· Analytical and strong thinker.

· Adherence to ‘Standard’ office hours: Monday - Friday

· HIPPA compliance oriented.

. Health Care Experience a plus.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
We take all the necessary precautions to keep our employees safe.

Location:
Doral, FL (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",1.5,"Healthcare Retroactive Audits, Inc
1.5","Doral, FL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
102,Sr. HR Data Analyst,$59k-$100k (Glassdoor Est.),"Who is Cenlar? You are.

Employee-owners have made Cenlar one of the nation’s largest mortgage subservicers. We have achieved success by empowering people with company ownership, real programs that provide avenues for advancement, and a great atmosphere that makes everyone look forward to the workday. Get your share of our success by considering the opportunity to join our team as a Sr. HR Data Analyst.

Job Summary:

The Sr. HR Data Analyst is responsible for working with large and complex data sets (both internal and external) to evaluate, recommend, and support the implementation of business strategies related to Human Resources. This role identifies and aggregates complex dataset using a combination of tools, such as, SQL, VBA, PowerShell, and MS Access. This role should have knowledge of statistical models/algorithms using Python as the primary programming language.

Responsibilities:
Identifies, analyzes, and interprets trends or patterns with HR data sets and makes recommendations for business and process improvement
Analyzes processes and data by extracting data from various data warehouse environments
Develops reports and dashboards using various reporting and visualization tools to meet business needs
Understands ongoing requests and translates them into reports for team members and other stakeholders
Ability to design, develop, and execute ETL pipelines to automate ingestion of structured and unstructured data sources using a combination of PowerShell, SQL, Python, VBA, and other programming languages
Solid understanding of REST API architecture to implement interfaces that allow for the seamless data integration between our vendor systems and our internal databases
Performs data mapping for systems integration, data provisioning, and data consumption
Handles complex requests, data visualizations, forecasting, regression modeling, sequencing and trend analysis
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, mathematics, statistical analysis, Human Resources, or related field, Master’s degree preferred with 5+ years of relevant and/or data engineering analytics experience
Working knowledge of SQL skills to perform complex data manipulation using multiple tables, queries, and subqueries in a database environment (i.e., SQL Server, Oracle, MySQL, DB2, MS Access, et al).
Strong background with at least an object-oriented/functional/scripting language (Python, Java, etc.)
Familiarity with CLI (CMD, bash, PowerShell, etc.)
Expertise with various ETL technologies and tools
Strong understanding of business logic for aggregation and analysis services
Experience with HRMS, such as ADP, ETime, Taleo, and Cornerstone, preferred
Ability to develop capabilities and/ or experiences in partnership with more experienced staff
Exceptional organization and time management skills, with the initiative and the desire to own problems from start to finish
Ability to flex and adapt to changing business needs, and use discretion when dealing with confidential information
Excellent interpersonal and communication skills with ability to work on several projects simultaneously
Passion to have an impact; Pro-active self-starter; Demonstrates a strong sense of urgency and responsiveness; Strong organizational and project management skills
Demonstrated track record of developing and successfully driving new initiatives through an organization to achieve business results
Total Rewards :

Cenlar FSB offers outstanding benefits which may include paid medical/dental/life insurance, 401k, employee ownership, tuition assistance, a supportive work environment, and genuine opportunities for advancement. Cenlar is a Drug Free Workplace and an Equal Employment Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer -- M/F/D/V/SO.

Visit www.cenlar.com for more details.

Please apply online .",2.5,"Cenlar
2.5","Yardley, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1958,Company - Private,-1,-1,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
103,"Data Analyst, Wish X",$65k-$120k (Glassdoor Est.),"Company Description

Wish is a mobile e-commerce platform that flips traditional shopping on its head. We connect hundreds of millions of people with the widest selection of delightful, surprising, and—most importantly—affordable products delivered directly to their doors. Each day on Wish, millions of customers in more than 160 countries around the world discover new products. For our over 1 million merchant partners, anyone with a good idea and a mobile phone can instantly tap into a global market.

We're fueled by creating unique products and experiences that give people access to a new type of commerce, where all are welcome. If you’ve been searching for a supportive environment to chase your curiosity and use data to investigate the questions that matter most to you, this is the place.

Job Description

Wish is looking for an experienced Data Analyst to support our Wish X Team in San Francisco. The role entails driving analytics insights and enable senior leadership to make effective, analytically driven decisions, in particular area of logistics and customer support. The ideal candidate should be passionate about Wish and e-commerce, has a strong analytical and consultative mindset, deep understanding of databases and data visualization, the ability to thrive in a dynamic, fast-paced environment delivering against tight deadlines, and a passion for scaling operations through automation.

What you'll be doing:
Work cross-functionally with technical team and business teams (specifically WishX)
Work on high priority & new programs to help expand Wish’s product offerings including B2B initiatives & Wish Local (brick & mortar stores partnered with Wish)
Conduct insightful analysis to gain insights that will help drive business decisions
Provide concrete recommendations to help ramp up/down new experiments
Prioritize & manage business stakeholders’ adhoc requests related to new programs
Conceptualize and build centralized tools (including pipelines) that can extract data/insights for daily business management in an automated manner
Develop dashboards and visualizations for the business stakeholders and maintain the integrity of the reports.
Investigate monetary impact on new programs and assist with ad-hoc requests
Process a large amount of data and do deep dives to understand certain trends/patterns, carry out correlation analysis to identify causes and relatedness.
Qualifications
Bachelor's or Master’s degree in an analytical field or similar.
2+ years of work experience in doing finance/business data analysis.
Proficiency in SQL or other query languages, deep experience and strengths to develop complex queries.
Development experience in at least one scripting language (Python, PHP, Perl, etc.).
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills; ability to transform data into business insights and actionable recommendations.
Experience working with large data sets that are structured and partially structured.
Working knowledge of data visualization tools (Looker, Tableau etc.).
Additional Information

Wish values diversity and is committed to creating an inclusive work environment. We provide equal employment opportunity for all applicants and employees. We do not discriminate based on any legally-protected class or characteristic. Employment decisions are made based on qualifications, merit, and business needs. If you need assistance or accommodation due to a disability, please let your recruiter know. For job positions in San Francisco, CA, and other locations where required, we will consider for employment qualified applicants with arrest and conviction records.

Individuals applying for positions at Wish, including California residents, can see our privacy policy here.",3.5,"Wish
3.5","San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Other Retail Stores,Retail,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
104,Senior Data Analyst,-1,"Senior Data Analyst*
ABOUT US*
For more than 20 years, WINFertility has been managing family-building benefits that are delivered with care and support by the highest quality providers. WIN is the largest, most experienced fertility benefit management company in the country. It offers inclusive family-building solutions to employers, health plans and individual patients. From integrated fertility management, including medical treatment, pharmacy and reproductive genetics, to surrogacy and adoption, WIN’s mission is to help build families by providing access to the best network doctors, technology and emotional support at the lowest cost.

WIN’s managed fertility programs include an integrated medical and pharmaceutical model that is unique to the industry. Its dedicated nurse care managers, all with experience in reproductive endocrinology clinics, guide employees through every step of their fertility journey, and are available 24/7.
POSITION SUMMARY*
This analytical position will develop data solutions to assist in the advancement of initiatives needed to support our business growth and operations across key customer segments. It includes the creation of analytical solutions used to manage operational programs and mentoring other data analytics resources on how to best provide value to the organization. The position will require building dashboards and visualizations through BI software to support business analytics and reporting.

The position will also serve as a proactive change agent within the business by understanding the long-term functions of the Data and Analytics Team and developing systems, databases, and other critical analytic tools needed to support the growing and complex nature of customer relationships.

The position is responsible for working closely with various internal teams to understand, define, and produce program related reports and analysis. Responsibilities include interpreting data, creating ad hoc reports, modifying and updating standard reports when applicable, perform statistical analysis, analyze data to forecast trends and conduct predictability outcomes. They will also participate in operations meetings, strategy sessions, and business reviews. He/she must possess knowledge and experience necessary to offer recommendations and propose solutions for complex business problems and/or systems enhancements.
KEY RESPONSIBILITIES*
Responsible for creating business value for company by understanding data environment, designing data strategies, performing extract, transform, and load activities, and operationalizing models. Work closely with the team members and business partners to interpret the data and develop implement solutions that create visibility for internal management and operations across all customer programs. This position will require collaboration across the business to develop and implement data-driven solutions.
Support the development of customer-level metrics needed to manage operations with Clients. Manage the compilation, analysis, and reporting of data to forecast trends, apply various analytical techniques to support operational efficiency and productivity.
5+ years RDBMS experience (MySQL, PostgreSQL, SQL Server, Oracle, etc.); must have the ability to write complex, optimized queries across large volumes of data
5+ years of experience analyzing and manipulating data from a variety of production systems and data platforms required
Experience in query tuning and database engine optimization
Knowledge of ETL and data warehouse concepts and processes
Demonstrated ability to identify data quality issues and recommend the best course of action to address them
Experience translating data extractions and analyses into formats and outputs that other departments and clients can understand
Experience in Data Visualization tools like (e.g. Tableau, Business Objects, Cognos, Power BI, etc…) or other related tools
Problem solver with high attention to detail and superior organization and documentation skills
Design, create and implement reports to analyze and display data for all assigned projects and requests utilizing Business Objects, and other data visualization tools.
Document and understand project requirements, reporting data mapping and data warehouse repositories for assigned programs.
Complete full documentation of reports developed utilizing Business Requirement Documents
Receive and respond to data requests to ensure projects in queue are accurately prioritized, designed, estimated and delivered to all shareholders
Ensure reports are scheduled, audited and delivered according to agreed upon expectations and established Service Level Agreements (SLAs).
Develop and execute acceptance test plans (UAT) to ensure data warehouse structures, universes, and associated data accurately meet business requirements.
Other responsibilities and projects, as directed.
QUALIFICATIONS*
Minimum Requirements*
5+ years of healthcare data management experience or 2+ years of advanced healthcare analytics experience
Critical Skills*
3+ years' experience in analytics or data related fields.
Strong knowledge of SQL and statistical packages (SAS, SPSS, STATA etc.).
Ability to design, create and implement reports to analyze and display data for all assigned projects and delivered according to client expectations and established SLAs.
Knowledge of healthcare industry with the ability to review all program data, perform analysis, notice trends, research and suggest solutions.
Significant data mining, analysis, and reporting experience, and demonstrated experience with IT and/or operations project management.
Experience in predictive modeling and machine learning.
Ability to lead and conduct customer meetings and understand business needs.
Advanced Microsoft Office experience (Outlook, Word, Excel, PowerPoint, MS Project), Visio, SharePoint, and Business Objects.
Additional Knowledge & Skills*
Healthcare reporting experience, highly desired
Excellent written and verbal communication, and presentation skills
Exercise excellent judgment within defined standards and guidelines to manage conflict resolution and/or ambiguous situations
Experience developing partnerships with the technical, business, teams, and Clients utilizing strong communication and team building skills
Track record of strategic thinking and independent problem solving
Attention to detail and a high level of understanding of how to produce accurate and meaningful metrics to deliver high quality, actionable, efficient, and interactive reporting and insights to drive business and financial KPIs.
EDUCATION*
BA or BS degree or equivalent experience required.
WIN BENEFITS AND PERKS*
WIN *offers our employees competitive and comprehensive benefits to include but not limited to:
Paid vacation, sick and holiday time
Medical
Dental
Vision
Life Insurance (company paid and supplemental)
Disability Insurance
Health Savings Account (HSA) with a per month company contribution
Flexible Spending Account (FSA)
Transit Account
401k plus company match
Pet Insurance
WIN Perks and Plum Benefits*
Employee Assistance Program
Free access to Fitness Center at our main office location
Free indoor parking at our main office location
Transit Account
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
SQL and Statistical Packages: 3 years (Required)
Design, create and implement Reports: 3 years (Required)
Healthcare Data Management: 5 years (Required)
Advanced Healthcare Analytics: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Greenwich, CT (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.3,"WINFertility
3.3","Greenwich, CT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
105,Senior Healthcare Data Analyst - Cost and Utilization Analysis,$53k-$70k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Summary:

The Senior Healthcare Data Analyst is responsible for providing analysis and recommendations regarding the Utilization and Cost of Behavioral Health Services at Community Behavioral Health.This position will provide analysis of based on Budget to Actual utilization and PMPM of services as well as coordinate with various departments including Finance, Data Informatics, Clinical and Provider Network Management in the determination of recommendations regarding Utilization and Cost findings.

Essential Functions:

·Coordinate with various CBH teams and departments through effective communication, report generation, solution development and team building.

·Provide or work with various departments to provide, and present various complex financial analyses and reports to Utilization Management Committee, the Clinical, Finance and Network Operations Departments.

·Maintain, modify and create SQL code used for financial analysis and reports.

·Identify, research and bring to resolution any issues with the financial data and reports.

·Develop detailed financial projections.

·Review monthly Quality Assurance Reports prior to issuance to Finance Executive Staff.

·Coordinate the processing of compliance claims adjustments and reporting results to the Compliance Department.

·Development of Value Based Contracting Models and Evaluation of Value Based Contracting.

Position Requirements:

·Education: Bachelor’s degree in Finance, Accounting, Economics or Mathematics

·License/Certification: N/A

·Relevant Work Experience: Minimum of 5 years of experience in financial forecasting and analysis

·Skills:

·Extensive knowledge of Microsoft Office applications

·Proficient in using SQL, including querying and troubleshooting

·Thorough understanding of data manipulations and reconciliation

·Excellent analytical skills

·Excellent interpersonal and verbal and written communication skills

·Able to work independently",3.2,"Community Behavioral Health
3.2","Philadelphia, PA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
106,Data Analyst (Data Mining/Oracle/Cloud),$77k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOIN THE CYBERCORE TECHNOLOGIES TEAM.

We are GROWING ! Bring your Technical Capabilities, Enthusiasm, and Team Focus.

CyberCore Technologies has a New Opportunity for a Data Analyst (Oracle/Cloud) – Top Secret – Quantico, VA.

CyberCore Technologies provides Services for Government and Commercial Clients. We have procured, integrated, and delivered over $2.6B in Information Technology products. CyberCore provides a wide range of professional services and solutions with specific strengths in Cyber Security, Networking, Engineering/Operations, and Software Development.

At CyberCore, Our Goal is to Maintain a Healthy Work-Life Balance and Provide Interesting Work Supporting Our Nation’s Security. CyberCore is Proud to Offer: Competitive Salaries; Corporate PTO Plan; Education Reimbursement and Bonuses for Completing Certifications; Medical, Dental, and Vision Insurance for Team Members and Families; Social and Philanthropic Events Celebrating Our Team and Giving Back to Our Community. For more information on CyberCore Technologies, go to www.cybercoretech.com

Job Responsibilities:

Supports DoD Cyber Crime Center and Air Force Office of Special Investigations. The Data Analyst will work with the Enterprise Resource Directorate and be part of the new Data Analytics Team. The incumbent will be responsible for the analysis of current data holdings, document data systems related to capabilities and gaps, and will provide analytical products based on that data.

Responsibilities:

Mining data from primary and secondary sources, then reorganizing data in a format easily read by human or machine.

Use statistical tools to interpret data sets, paying particular attention to trends and patterns that may be valuable for Mission Managers. Demonstrate the significance of the analysis in the context of local, national, and global law enforcement trends that impact OSI. Prepare reports for executive leadership that communicate trends, patterns, and predictions using relevant data. Collaborate with programmers, engineers, and organizational leaders to identify opportunities for process improvements, recommend system modifications, and develop policies for data governance. Create appropriate documentation for stakeholders to understand steps of data analysis process and duplicate/replicate analysis if required.

Required Candidate Qualifications:
Active Top Secret Clearance
Bachelor’s Degree from an accredited college in a related discipline and 5 years of professional experience; Masters Degree and 3 years of professional experience; or related PhD and no experience. 13 years of professional experience without a Degree.
Demonstrated Experience with Data Science, performing design/engineering/mining/visualization.
Demonstrated Experience with descriptive and predictive analysis.
Demonstrated experience with data analysis/visualization tools.
Demonstrated experience developing, standardizing, and documenting processes and policies.
Demonstrated experience developing and standardizing processes, tools, templates, graphics/illustrations, and metrics.
Ability to learn Local, National and Global law enforcement trends and impact to OSI.
Desired:
Experience collaborating with programmers and engineers.
Experience supporting a LE/CI Mission.
Experience creating process and standards on a new team and/or initiative.
Law Enforcement Investigation Experience and Understanding of Search and Seizure.
CyberCore Technologies is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.",3.9,"CyberCore Technologies
3.9","Quantico, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2000,Company - Public,Security Services,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
107,Data Analyst,$45k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"We have an opportunity for a Data Analyst to join our talented Data Analytics team. The successful candidate will work with customers and the engagement team to support the project management, project data analysis, process improvement, data conversion, and integration needs of our federal customer.

Duties & Responsibilities
Filter and “clean” data by reviewing computer reports, printouts, and performance indicators to locate and correct code problems
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities
Candidate will be reviewing and analyzing non-standard format data and transforming it to a standardized format for ingestion into a Big Data and a Structured data environment.
Conducting full lifecycle analysis to include requirements, activities and design.
Monitor performance and quality control plans to identify improvements.
Requirements
Knowledge and experience in programming languages (Python)
Proven working experience as a data analyst or business data analyst
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques
Strong knowledge of and experience with reporting packages (Business Objects etc.), databases (SQL etc.), programming (XML, JavaScript, or ETL frameworks)
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (Excel, SPSS, SAS etc.)
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings
BS in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics
Active Secret clearance required
Benefits

Perks of working at NetImpact Strategies:
Your health comes first – we offer comprehensive medical, dental, & vision insurance that starts the first of the month after you join the team
Invest in your future – 401(k) Plan – Immediately vested employer contributions; no matching required
Work hard, play hard – we offer a generous Paid Time Off (PTO) policy and observe ALL ten (10) federal holidays
Pawsitively pawesome – Pet Insurance (because our little critters are part of our families, too!)
Invest in your education – Tuition reimbursement, internal training programs, & company-sponsored industry certifications
Be part of a dynamic and collaborative work environment recently ranked by The Washington Post as a Top Work Place in 2019!
Have fun and celebrate and give back – Team building activities, community volunteering, quarterly HQ days, & an offsite annual awards banquet
ABOUT US

NetImpact Strategies specializes in Strategy and Business Transformation, IT Modernization, Data-Driven Intelligence, Cloud Services, and Cybersecurity. We are a team of skilled Consultants who listen to our clients’ needs. We design and implement comprehensive, tailored solutions that are both mindful of the client's culture and organizational dynamics. As mission needs change, new priorities emerge, technologies advance, and methodologies evolve; NetImpact stands out as a trusted advisor that can solve the challenges of today while looking for the opportunities of tomorrow. Our professionals stay abreast of these changes to provide agile, outcome-focused results for federal agency strategic and tactical needs. Approaching engagements as a partner, we provide solutions that empower our clients to achieve results that align with their mission and strategic vision.

ACCESSIBILITY NOTE

NetImpact Strategies is committed to complying with all applicable provisions of the Americans with Disabilities Act, as amended (“ADA”), and applicable state and local laws. It is NetImpact’s policy not to discriminate against any qualified person or applicant with regard to any terms or conditions of employment on the basis of such individual’s disability. Consistent with this policy of non-discrimination, NetImpact will provide reasonable accommodations to an individual with a disability, as defined in the ADA or applicable law, who has made NetImpact aware of his/her disability, unless doing so would cause undue hardship to NetImpact. If you are an applicant and need a reasonable accommodation when applying for job opportunities within NetImpact, or request a reasonable accommodation to utilize NetImpact’s online employment application, please contact careers@netimpactstrategies.com.

EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER

NetImpact is committed to the development of a creative, diverse, and inclusive work environment. In order to provide equal employment and advancement opportunities to all individuals, employment decisions at NetImpact will be based on merit, qualifications, and abilities. NetImpact does not discriminate against any person because of race, color, creed, religion, sex (including gender identity, sexual orientation, and pregnancy), marital status, national origin, disability, age, veteran status, genetic information or any other characteristic protected by federal, state, and local laws (referred to as ""protected status"").",4.2,"NetImpact Strategies
4.2","Vienna, VA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
108,Data Analyst (Underwriting & Lending Industry),-1,"Do you find yourself searching for a truly unique working environment? Do you have a go-getter attitude? Well, are you ready to take on a new challenge? We have an exciting opportunity for a Data Analyst (Underwriting & Lending) to join Dot818’s growing team!

We’re looking for a special kind of candidate – someone who appreciates challenging projects, is comfortable working with a supportive team, and hungers for the freedom to think outside of the box. We also want you to care about our core values too. We have a deep commitment to success, we build strong relationships through tenacious effort, and we keep a firm focus on our client’s needs. If this sounds like your dream job, take the first step toward joining our team and apply now with your resume.

The Data Analyst is expected to thoroughly understand the credit/lending risk domain, and frequently use industry specific risk analysis best practices when operating and building predictive models. The ideal candidate would be able to design new models, frameworks, dashboards, and other tools.
Job Requirements*
You should be able to:
Develop and implement underwriting and credit risk assessment data models
Track various data metrics within the lending industry
Close interaction with IT Team to design/improve data architecture
Identify optimization opportunities using predictive modeling
Develop and implement advanced custom models and algorithms
Develop tools to monitor and analyze model performance and data accuracy
Investigate new data sets and identify strategic opportunities for improving servicing for our customers
Build out new data flows as our product changes, and produce high-value, timely analytics relevant to the lending and underwriting industry
Qualifications*
Master’s degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Statistics, Mathematics, or any other quantitative discipline
At least 3 years’ experience in the Fintech industry working with financial underwriting models, variables, and risk assessment models.
Knowledge of R, Python, SQL
Rigorous statistical intuition, deep understanding of core statistical principles, and extensive experience with core methods
Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms
Skills*
You are highly organized with the ability to multi-task and prioritize in a fast-paced culture
You are a critical thinker and able to problem solve
You have strong verbal communication skills
Experience creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms
What We Offer*
Competitive compensation package
Casual Fridays and major holidays off
Flexible work environment with a close-knit family feel
Paid time off, company-sponsored 401k, and employee health and wellness benefits
Company luncheons, outings, after-hour events, and team building festivities
Workplace perks such as healthy snacks, fresh brewed organic coffee, and employee discounts
Company sponsored gym membership
Company provided parking
Last, but not least, you will get to work with an amazing group of people!
If you have the experience, drive to succeed and have a can-do attitude then we are looking for you. Click apply and come join a fast-growing technology company!*
Job Type: Full-time

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
Data Analyst: 3 years (Required)
Underwriting and Lending analysis: 1 year (Required)
Location:
Glendale, CA (Required)",5.0,"Dot818, LLC.
5.0","Glendale, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
109,"Senior Data Analyst, Project Controls",$66k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Under the direction of the Senior Manager of Project Controls, the Senior Data Analyst will develop reporting, analyze, evaluate and forecast project controls data. The analyst will also collaborate across San Manuel Band of Mission Indians (SMBMI) & San Manuel Casino (SMC) business operations to gather requirements for report development and/or in depth analysis. Will share activities with project controls team and grow the Project Controls department analytics/BI and process initiatives. The Senior Data Analyst will be required to use independent judgment, provide report and recommendations to Project Controls leadership team.

Essential Duties & Responsibilities

1. Responsible for project financial planning and forecasting, report development and automation with visualizations software.

2. Develop automated reporting and adhoc reporting for Project Controls team and leadership as needed (SAS Enterprise Guide).

3. Meets with Project Controls team as necessary to provide information and address departmental issues, such as system interruptions or critical data integrity issues.

4. Define and gather information from Financial system of record as needed to enhance the Project Controls Data Structures.

5. Perform duties such as: validating, financial capital planning, cash flow analytics, break even analysis, creating KPIs, and tracking methodologies.

6. Provide guidance and lead information gathering sessions with Project Managers in adherence to approved project controls policy and procedures.

7. Work closely with Project Managers, Procurement Managers, Financial Analysts, Legal, Finance/Accounting, and Data Services to ensure timely approvals.

8. Perform other duties as assigned to support the efficient operation of the department.

Education/Experience/Qualifications
Bachelors degree in finance, accounting, auditing, or related field required.
Minimum of five (5) years of analytical experience is required.
Demonstrated experience working with relational databases and enterprise reporting tools required.
Experience with software programs Tableau and Lawson is preferred.
Equivalent combination of education and progressive, relevant and direct experience may be considered in lieu of minimum educational/experience requirements indicated above.
Advanced proficiency in Microsoft Word, Excel, and Access is required.
Employee must have experience demonstrating the utmost discretion and confidentiality.
Certificates/Licenses/Registrations
At the discretion of the San Manuel Tribal Gaming Commission you may be required to obtain and maintain a gaming license.
A qualified candidate/employee must have a valid drivers license with an acceptable driving record as determined by the companys insurance carrier.
San Manuel Band of Mission Indians and San Manuel Casino will make reasonable accommodations in compliance with the Americans with Disabilities Act of 1990

As one of the largest private employers in the Inland Empire, San Manuel deeply cares about the future, growth and well-being of its employees. Join our team today!",3.3,"San Manuel Band of Mission Indians
3.3","Highland, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,-1,Government,Federal Agencies,Government,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
110,Operations Strategic Data Analyst - Healthcare,$54k-$92k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Operations Strategic Data Analyst embraces complex, disparate data sets and leading technologies – including Amazon Web Services, Redshift, Alteryx, and Tableau – to design data models, craft scoring methodologies and develop algorithms that inform the leaders of our business on our performance. This individual will be working directly on Healthfirst strategic initiatives to identify solutions that have visibility at the highest levels of the company.

Duties & Responsibilities:

Operate with intellectual curiosity and critically assess existing processes and procedures to identify opportunities for improvement
Develop complex analyses requiring the integration of multiple data sources, evaluation of data quality, and standardization of data to consistent format/structure
Create advanced queries and reports that extract data to support business teams’ needs, including working with nesting tables and temp tables and writing multiple conditions against varying data sets)
Summarize and present data outcomes, recommendations, and methodology to analytics leadership, department leadership, and enterprise stakeholders
Learn, adopt and leverage leading analytical tools and technologies to further the maturity of departmental analytics at-large which may include the development of procedures in Amazon Redshift, workflows in Alteryx, or other solutions as required
Hold oneself accountable for the accuracy, completeness, quality, and relevance of deliverables in order to own responsibility for work product and consider these factors in the end-to-end analytical process, from data gathering to analysis to formatting and presentation
Employ best practices in documentation, coding style and comments to facilitate persistence, re-usability, and scalability of your solutions
Document and escalate data issues as appropriate
Exhibit collaborative attitude, willingness to work with others on data projects that included working team(s) made of cross departmental/interdisciplinary users
Additional duties as assigned

Minimum Qualifications:

Bachelor’s degree from an accredited institution or equivalent relevant work experience
Working experience exhibiting strong critical thinking and analytical skills
Advanced MS Excel skills that include creating pivot tables, macros, utilizing v/h lookups and/or VBA
Familiarity with writing SQL (and/or SAS) queries for analyzing data and establishing business rules and requirements
Familiarity with relational database structures, theories, principles and practices
Familiarity with data models and/or data modelling
Ability to understand the data life-cycle within the organization and its impact on the business
Experience working in a team-oriented, collaborative environment
Ability to communicate effectively verbally and in writing while demonstrating good grammar, spelling and punctuation skills
Work experience requiring meticulous attention to detail

Preferred Qualifications:

Degree in Mathematics, Computer Science, Data Sciences, Engineering, Business Analytics, Informatics, or similar concentration
Experience working with SQL in a professional environment
Experience with Alteryx, Tableau, Amazon Redshift, QlikView, or other similar tools/platforms
Familiarity with statistical principles, such as standard deviations, normal distributions, and regressions
Familiarity with Python and/or R
Familiarity with healthcare data
Balances working independently with an understanding of when to escalate with questions/issues
Ability to work effectively with both business and technical stakeholders

Compliance & Regulatory Responsibilities: N/A

License/Certification: N/A

WE ARE AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER. Applicants and employees are considered for positions and are evaluated without regard to mental or physical disability, race, color, religion, gender, national origin, age, genetic information, military or veteran status, sexual orientation, marital status or any other protected Federal, State/Province or Local status unrelated to the performance of the work involved.

If you have a disability under the Americans with Disability Act or a similar law, and want a reasonable accommodation to assist with your job search or application for employment, please contact us by sending an email to careers@Healthfirst.org or calling 212-519-1798 . In your email please include a description of the accommodation you are requesting and a description of the position for which you are applying. Only reasonable accommodation requests related to applying for a position within Healthfirst Management Services will be reviewed at the e-mail address and phone number supplied. Thank you for considering a career with Healthfirst Management Services.

EEO Law Poster and Supplement",3.1,"Healthfirst
3.1","Lake Mary, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1993,Nonprofit Organization,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
111,Data Analyst,$36k-$64k (Glassdoor Est.),"Konica Minolta Business Solutions U.S.A., Inc., a global Fortune 1000 company and one of Forbes 2017 America’s Best Large Employers, is transforming the way we all do business.

From smart office technology and information management to cloud, mobility and IT services, we have a rich history of creating the products and services necessary to drive innovation and make work possible from anywhere at any time. Our award-winning products and solutions help companies around the world move information faster, improve quality and productivity, enhance security and facilitate the sharing of information. We are proud that our portfolio leads the industry while exceeding environmental standards.

At Konica Minolta, you'll work for an amazing technology company with growth opportunities, great benefits and talented, passionate co-workers.

Position Objective

Manages projects and tasks related to the development of business processes and procedures. Creates and utilizes key business metrics and provides recommendations for improvements. Must be able to utilize data analysis tools to create recurring and special reports that are used to manage a large service desk and customer support organization. Develop internal and external reports and dashboards. Utilizes knowledge of systems, database management, programming tools and other platforms to optimize Konica Minolta business functions. Provides business insights based on understanding of workflows and desired business outcomes.

The Business Analyst is able to dig in and understand the business operations, and finds ways to uses data analytics to assess processes, determine requirements and deliver data-driven recommendations and reports to executives and stakeholders.

Essential Job Functions

• Follows prescribed process and procedures including systems and tool utilization – provides insight for continuous business process improvements

• Serves as a key point of contact/lead for advanced projects, provides project and progress reviews to business unit owners

• Develops documentation of business process flows and creates new business procedures

• Collects and organizes data required for project deliverables

• Validates functionality, quality and completion of project deliverables

• Implements management approved initiatives, providing plans, schedules and reports for review

• Demonstrates a high aptitude for learning new concepts and skills

• Actively participates in learning opportunities and completes assigned curriculum in a timely manner: applies knowledge to continuously improve the customer experience

• Completes advanced projects and complex tasks as assigned by management

Competencies (Knowledge, Skills and Abilities)

• Excellent verbal and written communication skills

• Ability to analyze processes and procedures looking for opportunities and gaps

• Knowledge of systems and applications used to support a call center environment (prefered)

• Good customer service and interpersonal skills

• Excellent time management skills

• Ability to problem solve with minimal assistance

• Outstanding computer skills- Microsoft Office, Word, Excel, Access and PowerPoint

• Detail Oriented with the ability to work in a fast paced environment

• Occasional travel may be required

Experience, Educational Reqts and Certifications

• High school or equivalent, BS or BA preferred

• Microsoft technology certifications preferred

• Understands financial systems and P&L accounting preferred

• 5 years experience in project coordination and data analysis

Konica Minolta Offers:

Outstanding benefits package (including medical, dental, vision, life insurance)
401(k) plan with matching company contribution
Generous holiday and paid time off schedules
Tuition Assistance Program
Employee Referral Bonus Program
Ongoing professional development training
Visible, exciting work supporting sales of cutting edge technology and workflow solutions.

Join Konica Minolta and help drive innovation as we transform the Workplace of the Future.™

Konica Minolta is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. We consider all qualified applicants for employment without regard to race, color, religion, creed, national origin, sex, pregnancy, age, sexual orientation, transgender status, gender identity, disability, alienage or citizenship status, marital status or partnership status, genetic information, veteran status or any other characteristic protected under applicable law.",2.9,"Konica Minolta
2.9","Phoenix, AZ",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
112,ERP Data Analyst,-1,"RealWear* is transforming how Real Work gets done. *RealWear* products, the HMT-1 and HMT-1Z1, are the world's first voice-driven, completely hands-free, head-mounted wearable computing devices. Implementing hardware, software, cloud, and AI, *RealWear* is the future of the connected industrial worker.
We are seeking an ERP Analyst who has experience working with NetSuite to develop and maintain our internal accounting and data tools, integrations, processes and reports.
About you: *
You have deep experience maintaining and designing solutions that help keep our business applications and data integrations up to date and working smoothly. You possess the aptitude to understand different systems at a technical level and the ability to connect and integrate those systems. You will also be required to gain an intimate understanding of the organization enabling you to suggest solutions to improve internal processes and gain efficiencies. You possess a strong drive to meet deadlines and have the ability to control a manage busy environments!
As a RealWear Employee, YOU are the key to our success. Come join our dynamic international team and be a part of our rapidly growing, successful business.
What you will own: *
Own the technical understanding, implementation, and maintenance of NetSuite
Work with the entire team to optimize NetSuite and automate manual tasks
Proactively analyze data to answer key questions from clients with an eye for what drives business performance, investigating and communicating areas for improvement in efficiency and productivity
Create, maintain and improve frontend reports based on user feedback while expanding features based on the product roadmap
Validate reports against existing client reporting systems
Document business requirements, organization and flow of data, methods and forms from multiple sources
Articulate high-level objectives provided by management into a viable process or procedure based on function
Lead efforts to ensure data integrity and security
Focus on company goals to drive internal system development
Experience: *
Bachelor’s Degree in BIT, Computer Science, Finance, Economics, Statistics
Must have a deep understanding of NetSuite
Experience with SharePoint for project tracking and reporting
Experience in supporting data integrations
Experience with process improvement and project management
Proven analytic skills, including extraction, evaluation, analysis, and visualization
Ability to communicate and closely work with both technical and non-technical teams.
Scripting experience with PowerBI, JavaScript, SQL, or other relevant technologies
Knowledge of internal risk management controls, and Standards of Conduct (SOC) guidelines and controls
Must have excellent written and verbal communication skills
Ability to multi-task with attention to detail
EEO/Affirmative Action Statement: *
RealWear is an equal opportunity employer. We welcome and encourage diversity in the workplace and strive to recruit, hire, train, and promote employees in job classifications without regard to race, color, gender, religion, age, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, national origin, physical or mental disability, citizenship status, pregnancy, genetic information, or military or veteran's status. Employment decisions, such as compensation, benefits, transfers, layoffs, return from layoffs, training, Company-sponsored education, and social and recreational programs will be administered without discrimination. Employment decisions will be made with the goal of furthering the principle of equal employment opportunity.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Health insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
.

Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.realwear.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible",3.2,"Realwear
3.2","Vancouver, WA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
113,Data Analyst - Predictive Modeler,-1,"Zeta Global is looking for a talented Predictive Modeler to join our Analytics team. Armed with the Advanced Analytics & Data Science skills, this position will be responsible for supporting and improving the quality of our customer acquisition efforts using machine learning, statistics and data wrangling skills.

Key Responsibilities:
Predictive/Prescriptive Modeling & Optimization: Develop state-of-the-art predictive and recommender systems that support business objectives.
Data Visualization: Support and maintain KPI dashboards using Tableau. Collaborate with internal teams to gather requirements and provide reporting solutions.
Support Data Infrastructure: Use scripting languages like Python (Pandas, PySpark and Sci-kit) and MySQL to extract, transform and load data. In addition, support the management of internal data marts.
Ad-hoc reporting: Collaborate with cross-departmental teams to drive analyses and insights that lead to insightful decisions and improved financial performance/ROI for the business.
Requirements:
You love being a change agent! You tangibly add value for decision makers with actionable insights from data.
Proven ability to implement statistical/machine learning techniques in R / SQL and Python. In addition, ability to disseminate insights using data visualization tools like Tableau.
Exceptional attention-to-detail with the ability to meet aggressive deadlines. We move at a fast pace and generally have 3-5 projects going at any one time.
Excellent story-telling skills. The insights gleaned are no good if you can't present it in an effective and organized fashion.
MS degree in Business Analytics, Data Science or similar quantitative disciplines. Bachelor’s degree with minimum 1 years of experience will also be considered.
Strong knowledge of modeling algorithms like randomForest, nnet, svm, and glmnet packages in R and Python.
Desired Skills:
Ability to write complex R, Python and PySpark scripts.
Working knowledge with Python NLP packages like Spacy, NLTK and pycorenlp.
#LI-MC1

About Zeta Global
Zeta Global is a data-powered marketing technology company with a heritage of innovation and industry leadership. Founded in 2007 by entrepreneur David A. Steinberg and John Sculley, former CEO of Apple Inc and Pepsi-Cola, the Company combines the industry’s 3rd largest proprietary data set (2.4B+ identities) with Artificial Intelligence to unlock consumer intent, personalize experiences and help our clients drive business growth.

Our technology runs on the Zeta Marketing Platform, which powers ‘end to end’ marketing programs for some of the world’s leading brands. With expertise encompassing all digital marketing channels – Email, Display, Social, Search and Mobile – Zeta orchestrates acquisition and engagement programs that deliver results that are scalable, repeatable and sustainable.

Zeta Global is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, gender, ancestry, color, religion, sex, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, medical condition, disability, veterans status, or any other basis protected by law.

Zeta Global Recognized in Enterprise Marketing Software and Cross-Channel Campaign Management Reports by Independent Research Firm

https://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/zeta-global-opens-ai--data-labs-in-san-francisco-and-nyc-300945353.html

https://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/zeta-global-recognized-in-enterprise-marketing-software-and-cross-channel-campaign-management-reports-by-independent-research-firm-300938241.html",3.3,"Zeta Global
3.3","South Norwalk, CT",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
114,Gas Operations Control Center Senior Business Systems Analyst (SCADA/Data Analytics),$49k-$93k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

The Senior Business Systems Analyst will support the Gas Operations Control Center (GOCC). Provides informational requirements and system support for the various GOCC technologies in support of system initiatives such as complex system enhancements or new system development utilizing proven project management methodologies. Experience with SCADA, data science/data analytics, IT/OT or other utility control room technologies is preferred.

In this leadership role, the job requires the ability to analyze, develop specifications, implement and support computer systems; apply structured systems development methodology to ensure optimum benefit from computer automation; implementation and operation of computer systems and enhancements; perform systems acceptance testing duties.

The candidate will be required to adhere to SoCalGas safety, regulatory and cyber security requirements.

Job Duties
Manage medium/large system initiatives such as complex system enhancements or new system development utilizing proven project management methodologies.
Lead project team that includes business clients and other analysts.
Work closely in coordinating with IT Project Team Lead
Provide leadership and direction.
Ensures that analysts are following project management methodologies.
Ensures a level of awareness to the evolution of new technologies.
Works closely with Information Technologies in the prioritization of work and resources.
Continuous client interaction to understand business issues and future business needs.
Continuous information technology interaction to understand how the business needs can be answered utilizing technology innovation.
Provide guidance and direction in an effort to troubleshoot existing or potential system modifications and workstation installations and modifications; evaluate and plan for effects on systems; plan and request software changes; administer maintenance contracts.
Identify, develop and present efficient and economical solutions, proactive in identifying business process changes, conduct cost benefit analysis and post implementation analysis; develop and review project reports to ensure control and proper accounting.
Performs other duties as assigned
A bachelor's degree or equivalent in computer science, business administration, finance, project management or a related field is required.

Requires minimum 5+ years of increasingly responsible experience in the areas of business/project management, customer service, finance, or information technology field.

Must have the ability to manage projects and have persuasiveness and negotiations skills.

Must have the ability to lead a team to achieve high levels of performance and be a Team Player.

Proven success on previous system development projects whereby skills have been developed that enable the ability to lead a complex system enhancement or new system project.

Ability to serve as liaison between business unit employees and Information Technologies developers to transform business objectives into information technology solutions.

Must have the ability to gather and analyze complex data, reach conclusions, develop alternatives, make decisions and take action to implement changes.

Ability to Utilize the IT Product Lifecycle methodologies to ensure that projects are delivered on time, on budget, and meet business needs.

Must have strong attention to detail, financial analysis, and timeline/Project skills.

Preferred Qualifications

Knowledge of Business Practices and ability to define system change impacts on business processes.

Proficient writing skills are necessary for routine communications and to prepare documentation such as Requirements, Test Plans, Implementation Plans, Training Materials, etc.

Strong organizational, planning, and communication skills are required.

Strong computer skills are required to demonstrate competency in company supported desktop software (i.e., Microsoft Products including Project, PowerPoint, and Visio). Knowledge of database environments (i.e., Access, SQL).

SCADA/Operations Technology experience

OSISoft PI System experience

Data Science and Analytics

Utility Experience (Gas, Electric or Water)

Knowledge of Cloud and Edge based technology and deployment

SCG2

Equal Opportunity Employer Minorities/Women/Protected Veterans/Disabled",4.3,"SoCalGas
4.3","Pico Rivera, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1929,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Utilities,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
115,Data Governance Analyst 1 - Contract,$41k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"Posting Dates: 09/16/2020 - No Closing Date

Job Family: Information Technology

Department: Information and Communication Services Department

PURPOSES

This is a contract position that facilitates the flow of data throughout the organization by gathering and presenting requirements for data sharing requests to those in authority to approve the requests. This position requires someone with the ability to effectively communicate with both IT and non-IT partners. Keeps pace with data governance trends.

This individual works with divine guidance to provide or support technology that furthers the mission of the Church and reflects the eternal impact of the gospel.

RESPONSIBILITIES

Interviews system owners to understand the flow of data between systems

Documents the flow of data between systems

Presents and explains requests for data to approvers who are normally outside of the IT organization

Fosters understanding between teams and departments

QUALIFICATIONS

Education:

Bachelor's degree in related field or equivalent professional experience

Work Experience:

6+ years of relevant professional experience

Demonstrated Skills & Abilities:

Working knowledge and application of these competencies and expert in at least two:

Business Analysis

Enterprise Analysis

Requirements Elicitation/Analysis

Requirements Management

Proficient in requirements elicitation and requirements-driven process and best practice

Proficient experience and understanding of technical and operational application functionality

Broad business acumen with transferrable skill sets across industries/portfolios

Strong technological/architectural to functional skill sets

Excellent verbal and written communication skills

This job operates in a professional office environment

To successfully perform the essential functions of the job there may be physical requirements which need to be met such as sitting for long periods of time and using computer monitors/equipment

WORTHINESS QUALIFICATION

Must be a member of The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints and currently temple worthy.

POSTING NOTICE/MORE INFO.

Please Note: All positions are subject to close without notice. (tech123)",4.2,"The Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints
4.2","Riverton, UT",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,Religious Organizations,Non-Profit,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
116,Senior Finance Data Analyst,$81k-$142k (Glassdoor Est.),"Qualys is seeking a Senior Finance Data Analyst with a strong experience in data management and financial reporting and systems. Responsibilities include establishing and maintaining Master Data standards and items within the Qualys systems and monitoring and validating the integrity of data as well as supporting corrective actions related to variances to standard. He/she will also help maintain systems and manage information used for financial administration and key financial metrics and reporting and assist in setting up automated reporting and financial analysis.

Responsibilities include:
Implement, optimize, and maintain financial systems and augment it with a separate data warehouse as needed
Create, maintain, monitor, and analyze all master data in ERP & CRM and integrated solutions
Ensure and enhance data quality and train users to ensure continuity of results
Provide creative yet logical approaches to solving data problems
Perform various levels of data validation across multiple systems
Create and manage the data dictionary to support change management efforts
Draft and maintain policies, procedures, and other documentation to ensure uniform, accurate, and consistent data are present
Provide testing support for upgrades and releases, including integration testing from various sources to target systems
Assist in setting up hierarchies and maintain consistency across different systems
Assist with data and analysis requests, providing detailed backups and explanations as needed
Build and support complex planning and forecasting models using the Anaplan platform
Build Anaplan Visualizations
Set up and automate reporting and charting and analyze trends and patterns
Perform other ad hoc responsibilities as necessary
You are:
A strong team player with a positive, service-oriented attitude who drives process improvements to increase effectiveness of the team and minimize room for errors
Hands-on, detail-oriented, and organized; prior experience having gathered, structured, monitored, and validated data to ensure data integrity and detailed documentation; has developed a habit of checking the accuracy of data and analysis several times over before submitting for review
A self-starter and high-achiever with a focus on doing a great job
A superior problem solver, possessing the initiative to look into the details and interpret the impact of key business drivers
Excellent multi-tasker who has strong time and project management skills and understands the importance of planning in advance to meet deadlines that include multiple review points and iterations
Strong communicator, both written & verbal; reliable and responsive to email and phone communications
Highest level of integrity and good judgment with the ability to effectively deal with highly sensitive, confidential information
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science or Accounting/Finance/Business or related field
Minimum of combined 4 years of hands on experience building Anaplan models and/or master data management in an ERP or CRM system
Experience querying data from a native source (ERP, CRM or database). Understanding of backend data and database structures
Experience partnering with FP&A and to deliver insightful information
Hands on experience with NetSuite, Salesforce, and Admin is a plus
High proficiency with Excel is a must, including ability to build automated Excel models from scratch (e.g., vlookup, sumif, iferror, etc.); VBA, SQL and ODBC knowledge preferred
Data organization and management skills. Technical expertise with data models, data import methodologies, database design development, and data mining; preferred experience with a BI tool",3.2,"Qualys
3.2","Foster City, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1999,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
117,Jr. Business Data Analyst (position added 9/10/2020),$37k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Fall 2020 Update from WebFX: We're still actively hiring and conducting interviews via video conferencing

Hi there! We're WebFX, a full-service digital marketing agency based in the US. We've been named the Best Place To Work in Pennsylvania 5 times in a row and we'd love to meet you. We're looking for people to join our mission to provide world-class digital marketing solutions to mid-size businesses around the world. We get super excited about driving business growth for our clients and are looking for people who take pride in their marketing work and enjoy having a little fun at the same time.

We have a multi-step interview process, where we focus on giving both our candidates, and ourselves, opportunities to get to know each other a bit better. While our process may be more thorough and perhaps longer than other interview processes that you've been a part of, our goal is to work together with our candidates to find a mutually beneficial fit, where a candidate is a great addition to the FXFamily, and WebFX is the right fit for their career goals. Interested in joining the FXFamily? More info below!

What We're Looking For

Desired Education
Bachelor's Degree in Marketing, Advertising, Business, Business Information System, Management of Information Systems, or Statistics (GPA above a 3.4)

General Knowledge
Solid understanding of interpreting business analytics
Strong data analysis skills
Solid Understanding of the Internet

Experience
Should have customer service experience in any industry
Part time/summer job/internship experience is a must
Basic HTML or data manipulation software experience (a plus)
Experience with Google Analytics (a plus)

Qualities
Stays up to date on new changes to the web and actively reads several blogs
Professional, dependable, solid work ethic
Solid analytical skills and ability to make decisions based on data
Passion for research and deep-diving into business analytics
Excellent time/project management skills
Approaches problem solving proactively and in a professional manner
Creative problem solving abilities
Detail-Oriented
Self-motivated
Ability to meet deadlines

What You'll Do

Responsibilities
Gather and analyze campaign data
Consult with clients about their business goals and propose solutions and strategies that meet their needs
Analyze competitors’ websites and online marketing initiatives
Perform industry analysis and forecasting of trends
Interpret web analytics, demographic data, market research, and buyer behaviors
Optimizing client websites for search engines (on-page SEO)
Create and manage all aspects of SEO, PPC, and paid search ad campaigns for clients
Manage email marketing, website analysis and online advertising programs
Prepare monthly digital marketing campaign reports
Correct technical issues on the backend of website
Perform A/B, website usability, and website conversion rate testing
Responsible for driving client success on the web

Percentage Breakdown
5% analyzing clients’ competitors
10% writing ad copy, emails, etc.
10% working in the backend of websites/fixing technical issues
10% creating revenue, ROI and traffic reports for client campaigns
10% managing client projects and ad campaigns
15% performing industry, demographic and market research, and trend forecasting
20% client strategy and analytics
20% client interaction- phone calls, emails, in-person meetings
Note: The Jr. Business Data Analyst is a client-facing position

Training
Our “Bootcamp” web marketing training program will be provided for new WebFX “family members”.
On-site, state-of-the-art training amenities to facilitate departmental trainings, trend watch reports, and monthly Lunch-and-Learns

What You'll Get

Opportunities for Growth
WebFX grew 250%+ over the past 3 years, and merit-based promotional opportunities are abundant for new family members who meet or exceed position performance metrics.

Potential Promotional Path for Jr. Business Data Analyst:
Digital Marketing Research Consultant
Director of Digital Marketing
Sr. Digital Marketing Research Consultant

Compensation
$36,500 to $39,500 (potentially higher based on work experience)
Potential additional bonus may be offered for GPA's of 3.8+
Potential additional bonus may be offered for attending an elite college or university & graduate with high honors

Candidates interested in the Jr. Business Data Analyst position may also have interest in:
Digital marketing, online marketing, paid advertising, search marketing, inbound marketing, web marketing, content marketing, PPC, SEO, SEM, blogging, writing, editing, research, communications, entry level positions, etc.
WebFX Perks & Benefits
Flexible Schedule
Pet Friendly Office
Profit Sharing
Little Amps Coffee & Tea Bar
Yoga
On-site Fitness Center
150% Company Match Of Personal Charity Donations
Supplemental Insurance
IRA With Company Matching
Generous Paid Time Off
Employee Wellness Program
FXLearns Library
Activity Groups
Humanitarian Trips
Health/Vision/Dental Coverage
New Parent Support
Casual Dress Code
Home Buyer Program
Personal Desk Fund
Green Commute Benefits
Pawternity Leave",4.6,"webfx.com
4.6","Harrisburg, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
118,Lending and Mortgage Data Analyst,$46k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"Why Provident

Provident Credit Union is member-owned, trusted, financially sound, technologically advanced, and provides ""world class"" value, convenience, products and services to all members. We are headquartered in Redwood Shores, CA and have 21 branches located throughout California, in the San Francisco Bay Area, and Folsom.

Job Summary:
Responsible for maintaining the effective day-to-day operations of all Lending Operating Systems (LOS).
Coordinate the installation of new software releases, system upgrades, patches and resolution of software related problems.
Perform a variety of tasks to assist in the development, integration and implementation of new application software to support Real Estate Lending, Consumer Lending, Accounting and Loan Servicing.
Enable control and maintenance of lending system records to support effective management analysis and safeguarding of information required to service loans.
Develop and maintain a coordinated working relationship with our Information and Technology (IT) department and outside vendors as required.
Coordinate the lending information needs of all departments and assist with training efforts as they relate to LOS.
This position will participate in real estate and consumer lending portfolio analysis, design and implement of budget forecasting models as well as improving process efficiency and system optimization


Specific Job Duties:
Be able to create basic business rules and conditions using Encompass 360 (GUI) and write more complex queries
Support the Lending Department through knowledge of the mortgage process (Encompass expert preferred)
Maintain and test system updates, and provide report writing (Tableau preferred).
Responsible for managing the accomplishment of the Credit Union's long-term objectives, strategies and policies, relevant to all lending systems in the Consumer, Collection, and Real Estate Lending areas.
Ensure compliance with up-time benchmarks as defined by each department.
Manage relationship between all vendors and internal customers, including the Information Technology department, working with all parties to ensure lending systems remain functional, up-to-date, and useful to users throughout the lending division.
Develops, in partnership with users, workflow processes, business rules, controls, reports, and interfaces with vendors, documents, and other tools to maximize efficiency and establish standards for high loan quality.
Ensure that our systems are secure, by providing timely access and restricting access, as instructed by department managers.
Actively participate in the development of the vision of the lending systems and their enhancements.
Create functional specifications for new or modified systems or processes. Recommend system improvements.
Gather and document business requirements, formulate use cases, track requirements, provide status, and ensure quality of solution throughout a project.
Develop test plans and pre-UAT testing, documenting and tracking issues, and ensure timely issue resolution, liaising between users and vendor support on rollout of new releases and enhancements.
Participate in the process of re-engineering systems and work flow in lending operational areas in order to ensure efficiencies whenever and wherever possible.
Make changes to systems as instructed by superiors. This includes the maintenance of documents, workflows, and processes.
Prioritize tasks to ensure that tasks affecting loan production are the top priority.
Participate in the design and implementation of analytical tools that improve the effectiveness of data used for making decisions. Contribute to the design and implementation of budget forecasting tools using statistical modeling and other techniques that result in less variability and higher accuracy in the budgeting process.
Participate in the design and implementation of portfolio management tools that improve pre-payment speed analysis, loss analysis, and credit granting criteria and processes.
Responsible for preparation and compliance with Change Management documentation and protocol.


Job Knowledge/Experience:
Knowledge of commonly used concepts, practices, procedures within Real Estate and Consumer Lending.
2 years of experience as an Analyst/Administrator working with Encompass 360 Loan Origination System preferred
Experience creating and editing custom input and output forms
Well versed in using Microsoft Access, Excel, and Word
Demonstrated project-management skills.
Oral and written communication skills.
Demonstrated research and analytical skills.


Education/Training and Preferred Skills:
Bachelor's degree in Business, Information Systems, or Analytical Techniques preferred or equivalent work experience
Knowledge of Business, Information Systems, or Analytical Techniques preferred or equivalent work experience
Possess thorough knowledge of Real Estate Lending including documentation, compliance, forms and related system configurations and processes.
Complete required BSA & OFAC training annually.
Understand and adhere to BSA & OFAC policies and procedures, including reporting suspicious activity.
Working knowledge of:
Federal Lending Requirements
California Credit Union Law and Rules and Regulations
Provident Board Policies
NCUA Rules and Regulations
Department's policies and procedures
Ability to communicate clearly and with fortitude of purpose.
The position demands maturity, flexibility and someone ready to contribute at a high leveland enjoy the rewards come with it:
Fully paid health insurance premiums
Quality medical, dental and vision care coverage
401(k) retirement plan with matching employer contributions
Strong commitment to investing in your career and educational advancement by offering up to 100% tuition reimbursement for approved
Incentive plan
Generous paid time off and paid holidays
Flexible spending accounts
Short and long-term disability coverage
Life and AD&D insurance
Provident membership
Rate discount on home and auto loans
In-house training
And much more!
Provident is an Equal Opportunity Employer

We are a winner of the Bay Area News Group Top Workplace in 2017, 2018 & 2019. Check us out on Glassdoor",3.9,"Provident Credit Union
3.9","Redwood City, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1950,Nonprofit Organization,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
119,Data Loss Prevention Analyst,-1,"Bloom faces an unprecedented opportunity to change the world and the way companies utilize energy. We have recently launched a “game changing” solution called “Always on” that will help companies power their primary business operations without disruption with cleaner, more reliable electricity generated on-site with no combustion. We are looking for Information Security Analyst to join our team in one of today’s most exciting technologies!

The Data Loss Prevention (DLP) Analyst is a key resource on the Information Security team and will be primarily responsible for the maintenance and daily monitoring of the enterprise Cloud, Endpoint, and Network Data Loss Prevention (DLP) solutions. The main duties of the person in this role will include proper care and administration of the Data Loss Prevention (DLP) environments and monitoring and responding to the alerts that generate from the tool. This person will interface closely with other Security Engineers, Architects, Managers, and internal customers. This individual is responsible for coordination with functional and technical resources to ensure that the solutions are scalable, reliable, and sustainable.

The Data Loss Prevention (DLP) Analyst will advise on data security best practices and configure, review, and maintain the DLP/CASB solutions. As a member of the Information Security team, the role contributes to the development and execution of a secure data security strategy and ensures its alignment with Bloom Energy business strategy and the delivery of capabilities required to achieve business success.

The Data Loss Prevention (DLP) Analyst must be able to build strong relationships with all levels of the company and interface with internal and external contacts in a professional manner as well as interact with business key stack holders to fulfill the responsibilities and obligation

Responsibilities

Work with vendors to support the DLP technology (deployment, troubleshooting, upgrades, etc.)
Administration of the DLP tools which includes configuring policies, upgrading, and patching, etc.
Monitor alerts generated from the DLP systems and other technologies
Understand and follow the incident response process through event escalations
Respond to escalations by the Incident Response Team
Follow processes to maintain the DLP system
Responsible for implementing best security practices at Bloom Energy
Responsible to implement and maintain the best security standards and policies to protect Information systems architecture that includes Data Center, Network, Servers, Storage, databases Applications, and related access control.
Act as a consultant to all teams on information security best practices.
Mentor and provide relevant training to global team members

Skills and Experience Requirements

3- 5 years of experience in Information Security technologies/operations.
2-3 years of experience in Data Loss Prevention (DLP) Technology support and Event Handling
Information Security concepts related to Governance, Risk & Compliance
Supporting Information Security Technology
Ability to independently research and solve technical issues
Work independently in a highly dynamic environment with the ability to collaborate with an inter-functional team.
Experience in incident handling operations and procedures
Demonstrated integrity in a professional environment
Strong communication skills (written, verbal, and listening)

Educational Requirements

Degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, Engineering or a related field.
Professional security certification such as CompTIA Network+, Security+ will be a plus.

About Bloom Energy
Bloom Energy’s mission is to make clean, reliable, and affordable energy for everyone in the world. The Company’s product, the Bloom Energy Server, delivers highly reliable and resilient, ‘Always-On’ electric power that is clean and sustainable. Bloom’s customers include twenty-five of the Fortune 100 companies and leaders in cloud services and data centers, healthcare, retail, financial services, utilities and many other industries. For more information, visit www.bloomenergy.com

Bloom Energy is an equal opportunity employer and makes employment decisions on the basis of merit. We are committed to compliance with all applicable laws providing equal employment opportunities. All qualified applicants, will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, color, religion, national origin, protected veteran status, or on the basis of disability. Bloom Energy makes reasonable accommodations, consistent with applicable laws, for the known physical or mental limitations of an otherwise qualified applicant or employee with a disability, who can perform the essential job functions, unless undue hardship would result.

IND1",3.1,"Bloom Energy
3.1","San Jose, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2001,Company - Public,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
120,Clinical Data Programmer/Analyst,-1,"Clinical Data Programmer/Analyst supports clinical trial data management and programming tasks associated with creating, verifying, and documenting analyses and reporting while adhering to study protocols, analysis plans and industry standards.
GENERAL DUTIES AND ESSENTIAL JOB FUNCTIONS: *
Plan and manage programming activities across multiple trials to deliver all data analysis outputs to agreed timelines and quality, (e.g., analysis datasets, tables, figures and listings for regulatory submissions and publications).
Assist in deploying process changes and user adoption of EDC platform, reporting platforms, CTMS, LIMS, eTMS and other Clinical applications across the enterprise.
Proficiency in developing reports requested by stakeholders using ANSI SQL and other scripting languages
Support data migration activities including data cleaning and adjudication processes.
Implement data standards within a function, or therapeutic area in accordance with industry standards
Experience creating status reports, including building KPIs, dashboards and data visualization capabilities for use in study teams is desirable
Responsible for programming and QC across a trial/asset including submission activities adhering to relevant SOPs / policies.
Participate in the design of other trialdelivery components (e.g. case report forms, trial databases).
Review and input into key study documents (e.g. SAP, CRFs, Data Management Plans etc).
Develop broader technical knowledge and expertise (e.g. UNIX scripting, computing environments).
Provide technical advice, mentoring and training as relevant.
Identify recurring problems and work with colleagues to initiate process improvement
Possesses the analytical ability to define problems and interpret the information
Oversee outsourced tasks to third party vendors to meet the agreed timelines, quality and budget requirements established for the project or study.
Understanding of US regulations and guidelines applicable to clinical trials, inspection readiness and system validation
Skills/Competencies

Required Qualifications:
Bachelor’s Degree in engineering, Biotechnology, Computer Applications or related disciplines
Proficient in writing fine-tuned SQL queries, stored procedures (eg. PL/SQL code) and working with data in relational databases like Postgres, SQL Server, MySQL, Oracle etc.
More than 2 years’ experience in SQL and/or programming for clinical trial databases
Database design/administration experience (Design, implementation, modification) for clinical trial databases
Ability to recognize and resolve system related problems; work independently and make necessary decisions throughout the systems process within department guidelines.
Effective written and verbal communication skills.
Preferred qualifications:
Knowledge of non-SAS programming packages/languages (e.g. Tableau, Spotfire, S-Plus, R)
Familiarity with Object Data Model (ODM) and xpath form development
Working knowledge of CDISC data standards, primarily the creation and use of ADaM datasets
Experience of interacting with clinical study team members
Ability to manage conflicting demands and priorities
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Disability Insurance
Flexible Schedule
Flexible Spending Account
Health Insurance
Life Insurance
Paid Time Off
Retirement Plan
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
relevant: 2 years (Required)
Application Question:
Demonstrated knowledge of FDA and GCP guidelines and regulations covering clinical trials, statistics, and data management
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://www.quantumleaphealth.org/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible",1.7,"Quantum Leap Healthcare
1.7","San Francisco, CA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
121,Data Quality Analyst,$57k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Quality Analyst
10662
Tempe, AZ
3/25/2020 5:47:00 PM

Quality Engineering
Contractor - W2

Job Description
Good data analysis skills
Hands on experience with data profiling, DQ scorecard and profile creation, identifying DQ rules – Informatica Data Quality Analyst experience preferred
Good communication skills – ability to interact with business users to share data profiling results and get feedback
Experience working with Collibra, MDM will be a nice to have
Ability to liaison with IT partners and perform UAT
Financial background is required.
7-8 years of experience is required

Job Requirements",3.8,"IntraEdge
3.8","Tempe, AZ",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2002,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
122,Quantitative Data Analyst,$60k-$63k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Cogo Labs, we build startup companies from scratch. We are looking for entry level analysts to join our team as Quantitative Data Analysts.

We're not venture capitalists we're a collaborative, ambitious, and passionate team of engineers, analysts, and entrepreneurs using innovative tools, big data, and intellectual curiosity to build a platform that spins up successful online businesses, fast.

As a Cogo Labs Quantitative Data Analyst, you'll run and grow business lines within our incubator. You'll design and implement marketing programs, analyze performance metrics, and use the insights you gain to drive growth in audience engagement and revenue. Your expertise, ideas, and hard work will have a direct and immediate impact on the success of your project.

A little bit about us:
Near obsessive use of data to inform business decisions. We believe that efficient growth happens when we make every decision based on a solid, well-directed analysis.
Unmatched opportunity. We believe in mentoring people to grow as quickly as they can. Today's new grad hires are tomorrow's leaders.
Flexibility and novelty. Your role will define itself over time, as you identify the problems that you are uniquely capable of solving.
A fun, inclusive, and supportive culture. Happy employees are the most successful. We are empathetic and take care of each other, and not just because it's good business.

What we expect from you:
A bachelor's degree in a field that requires deep analytical thinking and problem solving. Many of us have Math, Econ, Engineering, or Comp Sci backgrounds, but applications from all quantitative fields are welcome.
0-2 years of experience in an analytics focused role.
Flexibility and self-motivation. We value the willingness and excitement to wear many hats and the commitment to work on a wide variety of analytical and business problems.
The ability and desire to make a strong data-driven case when presenting findings and recommendations, while remaining curious and receptive to feedback.
An effective communicator, articulate in stating project missions, updates, decisions, and rationales verbally and in writing.
Proactive in developing new ideas and initiating growth opportunities.
Demonstrated ability to work effectively as part of a team, and dedication to being supportive in helping your teammates learn.
Familiarity with technical tools such as SQL and Python.
Bonus points if you've previously been responsible for a business unit's bottom line.
If you're reading this and questioning whether you should apply, apply! There's no such thing as a perfect candidate, and we don't expect you to check every box. We're inspired by the uniqueness that people like you bring to the table. The companies that we incubate are only as innovative as the breadth of lived experiences shared by the teams building them. We can't wait to read your application!

Cogo Labs is an equal opportunity employer and individuals seeking employment with us are considered without regards to race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, physical or mental disability, veteran status, gender identity, sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by law.",3.6,"Cogo Labs
3.6","Cambridge, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2005,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
123,Data Analyst,-1,"Come Join A Growing & Exciting Team of Professionals!*
Diversified Transfer & Storage, *a Nationwide Refrigerated LTL Carrier and Family Owned Company with over 32 years of experience in the Transportation and Warehouse industry, has an immediate opening for a Data Analyst position at our Billings MT Terminal. The team member we are looking for must have a strong background in Analytics and Measurements.
We are offering the most qualified candidate* an opportunity to thrive in a unique career and diversify your talents with a fast paced, professional, and growing team.
Your responsibilities will include utilizing market trends, supply and demand capacity balances to determine the competitive requirements to support our services at the best pricing to maximize our return on investment (ROI). You will be gathering information from both industry and internal data to guide decision makers towards profitability and growth. You will be collecting information and data to complete freight market analysis on a daily basis. Other duties will include Identifying trends, establish projections, and support decision makers to maximize profitability. You will need to recognize opportunities and identify potential options to successfully take advantage of them.
Our Benefit Package includes *Paid Time Off, Health Insurance (employer contribution of $450.00), Dental, FLEX, & Life Insurance. DTS also provides a matching 401(k) program.
DTS is an EEOC employer
Check out our website at _www.dtsb.com_ and Come Join a Family Owned Business that has been a pillar in Billings MT for over 32 years!!*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $16.00 - $20.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Data Entry: 1 year (Required)
Analysis Skills: 1 year (Required)
Marketing: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.dtsb.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",3.1,"Diversified Transfer & Storage, Inc
3.1","Billings, MT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1988,Company - Private,Trucking,Transportation & Logistics,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
124,Environmental Data Management Analyst,$35k-$74k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

Job Description:

Leidos is a Fortune 500™ company aimed at embracing and solving some of the world’s most pressing challenges. Through science and technology, Leidos makes the world safer, healthier and more efficient.

Our Civil Group offers an array of exciting career opportunities for the best IT, energy, logistics and engineering professionals. Driven by our talented workforce, the Federal Energy, Environment and Commerce Operation builds trust through an array of energy-related IT, environmental science and engineering solutions to meet our customers’ needs.

Key Capabilities:

Large Infrastructure

Mission Support

Digital Modernization

Command & Control

Mission Applications

Environmental Science

Nuclear Security

Engineering Services

Job Description

Leidos provides support to the U.S. Department of Energy Legacy Management Program. The Civil Group has an opening for an environmental data management analyst with a strong background in information technology related to collection, analysis, storage, and analysis of environmental data. The incumbent must have the ability to work effectively with people from a variety of backgrounds. The position requires interaction and coordination with Defense-Related Uranium Mines (DRUM) program personnel and Environmental Spatial Data Management (ESDM) personnel.

Primary Responsibilities

The incumbent is responsible for the management, including maintenance of current systems and evaluation, design, and upgrade to the system for management of DRUM data. As the primary resource responsible for managing DRUM data and the data management, the incumbent will:

Update the data package creation tool (Visual Basic for Applications [VBA] or other background)

Manage reporting tools and Structured Query Language (SQL) that drives the reports

Trouble shoot data entry problems, identifying issues and notifying field teams

Perform quality assurance (QA) of both geospatial and other data received from field teams

Manage periodic updates to DRUM inventory and geo databases

Manage QA queries including updates and changes to data

Update tracking sheets (macro workbook maintenance)

Evaluate and ensure the quality of laboratory data packages (editing of PDF files including QA of the package)

Respond to ad hoc data requests.

Serve as SharePoint Page Administrator

Support Environmental Data Management Systems QA/QC activities

Assist in automation of ESDM data management work

Basic Qualifications

BS in science, technology, engineering, math, or information technology

3 to 5 years in environmental and geospatial data management

Knowledge and proficiency at the indicated levels for the following:

Structured Query Language (SQL) (intermediate to advanced)

Microsoft SQL Server – specific SQL

Microsoft SQL Server Management Studio (intermediate)

MS Office Power Query (intermediate)

Microsoft Office (intermediate)

Adobe Acrobat (Edit PDFs)

Visual Basic for Applications (VBA) (Intermediate)

Due to the nature of the government contract requirements and/or clearances requirements, US citizenship is required.

Preferred Qualifications

Familiarity with or knowledge of the following is preferred

ArcGIS (beginner)

Microsoft Visio (beginning to intermediate)

Python scripting (beginner to intermediate)

Leidos is growing! Connect with us on LinkedIn and Facebook.

We value and support the well-being and mobility of our employees with competitive benefit packages, complementary e-learning training, work-life flexibility, an exciting External Referral Program, and a diverse, inclusive and ethical work place. In fact, in 2020, Leidos was ranked as one of the “World's Most Ethical Companies” by the Ethisphere Institute for the third consecutive year.

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
Other Clearance

Travel:
Yes, 10% of the time

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Environmental Analysis

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world’s toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company’s 38,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Va., Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $11.09 billion for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2020. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.7,"Leidos
3.7","Grand Junction, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
125,Senior Data Analyst,$81k-$142k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the Company:
Industrious is the largest premium workplace provider in the U.S. with nearly 100 locations in more than 50 U.S. cities. Its Workplace Experience platform, which pairs thoughtfully-designed spaces with hospitality-driven services and amenities, has reshaped the concept of coworking into a scalable solution for companies of all sizes and stages. Since its founding in 2013, Industrious has helped thousands of companies scale their businesses while maintaining the highest NPS scores in the industry. For more information, visit www.industriousoffice.com.
As we shape the future of workplace experience, we're looking for motivated, thoughtful, and collaborative people who are excited to join a high-growth, warm, and welcoming team. For more information, please visit www.industriousoffice.com/careers.

About the Role:
As the Data Analyst at Industrious, you are responsible for building the data-models that underpin our analytics and reporting. You have a flexible skillset: someone who is adept with SQL code, is experienced in ad-hoc data-modeling, and can partner with an engineer to build our data-warehouse.

This is an amazing role for a curious, analytical mind who is excited to touch all elements of the business and lay the foundation for analytics and insights.

You are a great fit for this role if:
You are eager to sit at the intersection of technology and analysis
You are an independent operator who can build from the ground up
Data engineering? Data analysis? Data science? You want to work with all three pieces of the analytics cycle
Responsibilities:
Partner with an engineer to build our data-warehouse
Develop the Redshift/Snowflake models that underpin our analytics and reporting
Serve as the bridge between our Analytics and Technology teams
Requirements:
Very strong SQL skills (preferably Postgresql)
Experience creating ad-hoc databases (e.g., using DBT or equivalent)
Experience transforming and analyzing large datasets
Demonstrated ability to learn new technologies and techniques
Bachelors or Masters degree in Computer Science, Mathematics or similarly quantitative/technical field
Experience in analytics or a technical field
Preferred qualifications:
Experience with Data Lakes (e.g., (Redshift/Snowflake preferred) and proven ability to produce scalable solutions
Experience with connectors (e.g., FiveTran, Stitch)
Experience with visualization tools (e.g., Tableau, Looker)
Experience working in a cloud-based environment (e.g., AWS, Azure, Google-Cloud)

Perks:

In addition to our incredible team, there are lots of other fun reasons to work with us.
Daily breakfast, snacks, coffee, tea, and drinks at all Industrious locations
Health care, including vision and dental
401K plan
Generous vacation time
Paid parental leave
Industrious in the News:
Industrious CEO Sees Company as Less Risky Than WeWork
Industrious' Jamie Hodari on the Return to Work
Coworking Spaces Prepare To Welcome People Back, Expect the Industry To Grow
Industrious is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran status, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable laws, regulations and ordinances. Industrious believes that diversity is critical to our success in delivering great workplace experiences and is committed to creating an inclusive, mutually respectful environment which celebrates diversity of our people. We seek to hire on the basis of merit, competence, performance, and business needs.

#LI-LC1",3.6,"Industrious
3.6","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Membership Organizations,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
126,Feshers- Data Analyst@Redmond,$42k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

Pactera, leading industry in localization and globalization services, is looking for in-house transcribers to work with us in our Redmond, WA office.

These transcribers will work on a project for our well-known worldwide IT client.

Working hours: *29 hours/ week*

Location: *Redmond, in-office*

Job Type: *Part-time*

Salary*: $14.00 /hour*
Role Responsibilities*
· Download existing transcription file and audio file (provided by Pactera)

· Listen to the recording.

· Verify that the transcription represents the recording

· Identify Speaker Name

· Edit Transcription segments

· Insert tags when necessary (background noise or additional voices)

· Submit the task
REQUIREMENTS*
· Native US English Speaker (a must)

· Ability to transcribe English text from audio

· Ability to closely follow guidelines

· Ability to learn new software quickly

· Must type at least 55 words per minute.

· Must be able to proof own work and be at least 98% accurate.

· Impeccable attention to detail

· Must be able to work on-site in Redmond office

Preferred Skills*:

· Past transcription experience preferred.

· Past working experience as content writer, journal editor or other writing experience.

· Good technical and data management skills.

· Good problem-solving and analytical skills.

· Experience in data entry and computer query procedures using a variety of software applications such as Microsoft Office Suite (Excel, Word and Outlook).
Training and guidelines will be provided.*
To be selected you have to pass a screening test.

We are looking forward to meeting you!

Job Type: Part-time

Pay: $14.00 per hour

Job Type: Part-time

Pay: $14.00 per hour",4.5,"Pactera Technologies
4.5","Seattle, WA",-1,10000+ Employees,1995,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
127,Reconciliation Data Operations Analyst,$42k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Global Payment Operations organization is hiring a Recon Ops Data Analyst in Austin TX, who will be responsible for day-to-day reconciliation, data analysis and reporting of payment transactions processed through our system and the related general ledger accounts. You will partner closely with our Controlling, Accounting, Payments product and Payments operations Team etc. The ideal candidate will be self-motivated, process-oriented, works effectively with cross functional teams, in addition to strong written and verbal communication skills.

Job Responsibilities:
Reconciles variances by identifying patterns in complex data sets
Works with accounting and product on key performance metrics, reports and analytics related to reconciliation
Manages daily, weekly and monthly reporting for review with Accounting team
Develops standardized reporting packages, and delivers ad-hoc reporting/analysis required to support reconciliation procedures
Works with large volumes of data for extraction and transformation leveraging eBays massive and rich databases
Analyze current manual process surrounding Operations for optimization opportunities.
Designs optimal data architecture for data management and high performance.
Designs and execute reports to measure success and performance of business initiatives.
Automates data driven system controls for Operational procedures
Performs data modeling, documents and presents analysis
Job Requirements
Advanced SQL knowledge
General Ledger and Payments Industry Experience
Experienced in data mining and analysis
Expertise in deriving and building Metrics to help quantify Business Processes.
Ability to work with various stakeholders to understand and build project requirements.
Understands SOX compliant processes and builds accordingly.
Experienced in Agile environment.
Problem solving approach with great verbal and presentation skills
SAS, Python, Hadoop experience is a plus
Master+ 3 Years or Bachelors+ 5 Years
This website uses cookies to enhance your experience. By continuing to browse the site, you agree to our use of cookies

View our privacy policy

View our accessibility info

eBay Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, and disability, or other legally protected status. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at talent@ebay.com. We will make every effort to respond to your request for disability assistance as soon as possible.

For more information see:

EEO is the Law Poster

EEO is the Law Poster Supplement",3.8,"eBay Inc.
3.8","Dripping Springs, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1995,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
128,Data Analyst,-1,"Celebrating over 30 years in Florida, Maschmeyer Concrete has become one of the leading privately held, family-oriented ready- mix concrete and building materials suppliers in the state of Florida. Maschmeyer takes pride in its people by building strong Customer and Team relationships through the relentless pursuit of our Mission and Core Values. If you are looking for a “Family” environment where our superior work atmosphere is a way of life, then you have found the right Team.

Maschmeyer Concrete Company in our Southeast Region is seeking an experienced, highly-motivated, honest and dedicated Data Analyst for our Lake Park Corporate Office.
Job Specifications include: *
· Interpret data and analyze results using statistical techniques, and provide ongoing reports

· Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality

· Acquire data from primary and secondary data sources, and maintain databases/data systems

· Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets

· Filter and clean data by reviewing computer reports, printouts, and performance indicators to locate and correct problems

· Locate and define new process improvement opportunities
Compensation: *
· Competitive rate of pay based on ability & experience

· Generous Benefits Package: Medical, Dental & Vision options

· Paid Life Insurance, Long-Term Disability, Holidays & Paid Time Off (PTO)

· 401K with company match

· Free Financial Planning

· Free EAP Programs

· Professional Training & Certifications

Please apply online or in person at www.maschmeyer.com/careers . We are an EOE and DFWP company.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: From $45,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
business data mining: 1 year (Preferred)
database maintenance: 1 year (Preferred)
productivity, sales & cost analysis: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Associate (Preferred)
Location:
Lake Park, FL 33403 (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.maschmeyer.com/careers
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"Maschmeyer Concrete Company of Florida
4.0","Lake Park, FL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Mining,Mining & Metals,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
129,DATA MGMT ANALYST RADIOLOGY,$30k-$62k (Glassdoor Est.),"Ensures customers satisfaction through the provision and maintenance of easily accessible, high quality and uninterrupted information services, and systems within the division of Imaging Services. Analyzes, trouble shoots and resolves imaging service network, systems, and related component problems at both northlake and southlake campuses, as well as other offsite facilities.
PRINCIPAL DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES(*Essential Functions)


Ensures the integrity and reliability of all imaging systems by assessing and resolving hardware and software problems, encompassing the hospital infrastructure, client-servers, and stand-alone systems.

Special emphasis to calls arising on evenings, nights, and/or weekends, in order to minimize any system downtime and maintain needed system utilization.

Evaluates and recommends system hardware and software replacements and upgrades, both on an assigned project as well as on ""as observed"" basis.

Maintains accurate and adequate inventory levels of supplies and parts, including all necessary and related record keeping of usage, orders, and replacements.

Maintains an up-to-date understanding of the overall structure, interrelatedness, and operations of the hospital infrastructure, remote users, LANS, stand-alone systems and personal computers.

This is essential in order to provide complete and timely services to customers, especially in critical off-hours.

Maintains complete and accurate records, in accordance with the imaging service's policies and procedures, of all requests for assistance and all other project completions.

Provides emergency, routine, and preventive maintenance to all system hardware components.

Immediate efforts to emergency or unexpected breakdowns that present a system (or key component thereof) slowdown or halt.

Repairs imaging services system hardware including personal computers, printers, data communication equipment, related wiring and peripherals.

Represents imaging services both within and outside the hospital for all system related activities as assigned by the Director.

Assists in establishing continuing education on all system functions for imaging services and other hospital personnel as needed.


JOB SPECIFICATIONS(Minimum Requirements)



KNOWLEDGE, SKILLS, AND ABILITIES

Local area networking experience, specifically, or 4-5 years relevant work experience or equivalent combination of education and relevant work experience.

Experience including Imaging Services operations including reporting schedules, office procedures, processing and reporting workflow.

Excellent computer skills, experience with interfacing and programming preferred.

A high degree of independent action and exercise of correct judgment is a must, along with creativity, initiative and professionalism.

Developed verbal and written communication skills are required.

Strong interpersonal and organizational skills, and a high degree of fine motor skills and visual accuracy required.

Ability to organize and prioritize work in order to complete assignments within designated time frames.

Ability to work with little or no supervision and to professionally handle stressful situations.

Must be professional, courteous, a self-starter, and must have a positive attitude.



EDUCATION


Bachelors Electronics Preferred

Bachelors Computer Science Preferred

Associates Radiology Required

Including reporting schedules, office procedures, processing and reporting workflow.

4 Information Technology Required

5 Healthcare/Medical - Radiology (Imaging and Therapy) Required



STANDARDS OF BEHAVIOR

Meets the Standards of Behavior as outlined in Personnel Policy and Procedure #1, Employee Relations Code.


CONFIDENTIALITY/HIPAA/CORPORATE COMPLIANCE

Demonstrates knowledge of procedures for protecting and maintaining security, confidentiality and integrity of employee, patient, family, organizational and other medical information. Understands and supports the commitment of Methodist Hospitals in adhering to federal, state and local laws, rules and regulations governing ethical business practices for healthcare providers.


DISCLAIMER - The above statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed by people assigned to this job. The statements are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties and skills required.",3.3,"The Methodist Hospitals
3.3","Merrillville, IN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1941,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
130,Data Analyst,$47k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a Data Analyst, you’ll be responsible for accurate reporting and advanced analytics of Patient & Provider data out of enterprise solutions for state and federal government, private healthcare systems, and health information exchanges.

We are a highly motivated small team and need someone who can complement our entrepreneurial spirit. We would need someone who is also a self-starter and can work independently to produce high quality work.
What you’ll do:
Detailed Analysis & Profiling of Patient & Provider data to generate insights, and KPIs
Build SQL tables, metrics, reports, and dashboards that help us understand the health of Patient & Provider data in MDM, and other applications
Identify patterns of data in MDM (like Twins, Recently Married, Father-Son etc.)
Monitor and maintain data quality, stability, and trustworthiness of reports
Conduct exploratory analyses of Patient & Provider data for improvement opportunities in applications, not actively monitored by stakeholders
Communicate the interesting and hard-to-find insights into a compelling, concise data story to engineering, product and executive team
Manage multiple job duties through efficient task management
What you’ll need:
4+ years working experience performing data analysis against multiple data sources
Experience working with Python or R for conducting advanced data analysis
Experience working with analytics tools such as Tableau
Database experience in at least one RDBMS
A track record of conducting high impact analyses and building useful data tools with demonstrable business results
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, engineering, or related field
Excellent analytical and problem-solving skills
Excellent communication skills (written and verbal)
Preferred skills & experience:
Experience in analysis of patient & provider Master/Identity data (False Positives, False Negatives, Probabilistic Matching)
AHIMA RHIA or RHIT certification preferred
Experience in a healthcare preferred
Experience with IBM Infosphere Master Data Management Standard Edition (or Initiate)
Database experience in Oracle, DB2 and Microsoft SQL Server
Experience using Linux
Experience doing data analysis by using AWS services
Familiarity with HL7 messaging standard (version 2.x and CDA) & IHE profiles (PIX, PDQ, & XCPD)
Experience with ETL products
What Makes You a Great Fit for Audacious Inquiry:
You are a lifelong learner and passionate about learning new things, taking on new challenges, and continually improving.
You thrive in a challenging and collaborative environment.
You are solution-driven with an ability to understand the big picture
You have great analytical and problem-solving skills.
You have strong communication skills and an ability to synthesize information.
Highly organized, detail oriented, and able to work autonomously with minimal direction.
What Audacious Inquiry Offers:
Working with and learning from the top talent in the healthcare IT industry in the US – we are thought leaders in health information technology and policy. Our team is passionate about making healthcare more connected and we love to share our knowledge and learn from each other.
Making a real difference in the healthcare industry on a large scale and improving healthcare outcomes for individual patients – you’ll get to work on really cool projects and feel good about the work you’re doing. Check out the case studies on our website for examples!
Performance bonuses – we ask for high performance from our team and we make sure to recognize and reward high performance with competitive compensation and annual bonuses.
Growth and professional development – we’re invested in every Ai team member and we encourage our team to pursue opportunities to grow their skills, and make sure you have a path for growth at Ai that you’re excited about.
Benefits and perks – we cover the full cost of health insurance for employees and most of the cost for dependents, along with a full suite of benefits, including 401k matching, monthly wellness bonuses, cell phone reimbursement, paid time off, and a lot more.
Our culture – this is one of the best things about working with Audacious Inquiry, and one of the things we’re most proud of. We’re inclusive, we’re collaborative, we’re supportive, and it’s fun here! Check out our careers page and our social media for some recent examples.

The Data Analyst position may include access to protected health information (PHI) and confidential information. The successful candidate will be required to complete training and must handle all PHI appropriately according to Ai policies, and all applicable laws and regulations.

Ai is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer.
Audacious Inquiry is deeply committed to the principles of equity, diversity, and inclusiveness. We seek to create a pluralistic community for all team members, and we are proud to be an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity employer. We encourage all people to apply.",4.4,"Audacious Inquiry
4.4","Baltimore, MD",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2004,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
131,Healthcare Data Analyst,$37k-$72k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description
Company: Palm Beach Accountable Care Organization
Job Title: Healthcare Data Analyst
Department: Data
Reports To: Chief Data Officer
FLSA Status: Exempt
Prepared Date: 5/13/2020
DISCLAIMER:
Job descriptions are not meant to be all-inclusive and/or the job itself is subject to change. Nothing in this job description restricts management's right to assign or reassign duties
Summary:
Essential Duties and Responsibilities:
Applies knowledge of data, data structure and analytical tools to research or identify trends, expenditures, and utilization of healthcare providers/practices.
Applies in-depth knowledge of health care operations and systems.
Responds to requests for data by determining user’s needs, collecting, organizing, and analyzing data, and providing accurate and complete reports and information.
Works with other analysts to perform evaluate the performance of facilities, practices, provider services, and utilization.
Works with other analysts to perform a variety of ad-hoc analysis and assessments or initiatives as requested.
Identifies, develops and implements methods for improving reporting efficiency for department.
Performs checks and audits of various data sources to ensure data adheres to data governance and maintenance policies.
Maintains and applies knowledge of current trends, practices and developments in health care.
Educates and assists in problem solving to promote the implementation of the health care initiatives and research.
Suggests ways to both increase healthcare quality and reduce costs.
Applies knowledge of commonly-used concepts, practices, procedures, and programs within healthcare technology field.
Contributes in the data integrity, governance, and data structure standards and policies.
Abides by all HIPAA, Confidentiality and Privacy laws.
Other duties as assigned within the scope of responsibilities and requirements of the job; not limited by this job description.
Supervisory Responsibilities:
This job has no supervisory responsibilities.

Competencies: To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies:
Analytical and advanced problem solving strategies.
Strong knowledge of health care models including ACO’s.
A working knowledge of industry coding (revenue codes, ICD 9/ICD10 classifications, CPT codes, etc.).
Strong knowledge of data, data objects, data structure, and industry standards.
Advanced-level computer skills in a Microsoft Office environment
Strong skills in Microsoft Excel
Strong internet research capabilities
Bi- or Multi- lingual skills (written and verbal): A Plus
Attention to detail
Report Writing
Problem Solving
Systems/Workflows/General IT
People Skills
Assertive / Reliable
Oral Communication - Speaks clearly and persuasively in positive or negative situations; listens and gets clarification; responds well to questions
Safety and Security - Uses equipment and materials properly
Attendance/Punctuality - Is consistently at work and on time
Knowledge of legal and ethical consideration related to patient information.
Qualifications:
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Education and/or Experience:
Required: Bachelor's degree in a related area and 2-4 years of experience in the field or in a related area.
Preferred: Master’s degree in a related area (ex. MHA, MIS, MBA)
Language Skills:
Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, correspondence, and memos. Ability to write simple correspondence. Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one situations to visitors, clients, and other employees of the organization.
Reasoning Ability:
Ability to think critically and objectively and unbiased. Quickly learn/adapt to healthcare industry standards, codes, data, and business practices.
Computer Skills:
MS Office Productivity Tools (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint) Intranet, Internet, SQL & Data Objects, various report writing tools.
Other Skills and Abilities:
High accuracy and extreme confidentiality a MUST. Highly detail-oriented and must possess a very high degree of organization.
Physical Demands:
While performing the duties of this Job, the employee will have a combination of standing, sitting, bending and reaching. May work at a computer monitors for prolonged periods. The employee may lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.",3.8,"Palm Beach ACO, LLC
3.8","West Palm Beach, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
132,Data Warehouse Analyst III,$85k-$142k (Glassdoor Est.),"Rethink what’s possible with SwitchThink! SwitchThink Solutions is an IT Services CUSO from Desert Financial.
As a collaborative partner for innovation, SwitchThink Solutions offers technology solutions that help credit unions achieve their transformational goals. Our knowledgeable development, infrastructure, and IT operations experts work hand-in-hand with our clients to maximize the benefits of their technology and speed their results.
Who you are:
A hardworking analyst with a flair for consulting with and supporting client with their enterprise reporting, data integration, and data analytic needs, including the development of dashboards. You are motivated by the opportunity to work closely with clients to analyze and interpret data in support of identifying market and business trends, conduct root cause analyses of business problems and provide strategic suggestions for improvement. You are a proactive thinker that is focused on identifying services and solutions that can enhance the offering we present to clients.
A typical week might include the following:
Consulting with clients to understand their unique business problems, then with the utilization data recommending solutions that will ultimately assist in solving the business problem by defining data/reporting requirements and goals.
Designing and developing solutions that enable clients to make decisions based on data utilizing dashboards and self-service analytical reports
Providing support with troubleshooting and resolving reporting, data warehouse and ETL related issues
Assisting in establishing best-practices and development of content that improve the efficiency and adoption of the data platform in ways that support strategic initiatives and drive business results.
Planning for future state of the environment to increase functionality, improve efficiencies, support refresh cycles, and/or reduce operational costs
Performing other job-related duties as assigned.
This role might be right for you if you have:
A Bachelor's Degree in computer science, math or related field
8+ years experience in business intelligence role
Strong understanding of relational database structures, theories, principals, and practices
Experience working with Talend or similar ETL tools
Visa Sponsorship:
We are interested in every qualified candidate who is eligible to work in the United States. However, we are not able to sponsor visas, i.e. H-1B or TN Visas.
Bonus Points:
5+ years of experience in a quantitative/analysis/reporting role within the Financial Services industry
5+ years building dashboards and reports in Power BI or similar platform
Experience working in a DB2 environment
Experience working with Python or another scripting language
About Us
We are considered leaders in the local credit union space, and we are growing like crazy. We’ve got a culture focused on smarts, kindness, continuous learning...and our people love it. A full 93% of our employees would recommend us to their friends. Come find out why! Learn more at jobs.desertfinancial.com.
We are proud to be an equal opportunity employer and value diversity at our company. We do not discriminate on the basis of race, religion, color, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, age, marital status, veteran status, or disability status.
#IND456",3.3,"Desert Financial Credit Union
3.3","Phoenix, AZ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1939,Nonprofit Organization,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
133,Marketing Data Analyst,$30k-$56k (Glassdoor Est.),"Would you like to be part of one of the fastest-growing benefits technology companies in the U.S.? Join our mission to help millions of people improve the quality of their daily lives through accessing the world’s largest selection of personally relevant benefits. Help us achieve our goal of becoming the world’s most broadly accessed gateway for group and individual benefits. Already used by thousands of employers and their millions of employees, our platform is disrupting the $1 trillion benefits market. Clients include 5 of the top 10 largest employers in the U.S. and dozens of Fortune 500 companies. Now that we are one of the industry’s fastest-growing companies, we have no plans of slowing down.

Duties and Responsibilities:

Assist the Senior Email Marketing Manager in building and executing quality technical solutions for email marketing campaigns through the email deployment platform Salesforce Marketing Cloud.
Building custom queries, AMPscript based dynamic templates, automation jobs, and build out comprehensive customer journeys to enable BenefitHub to build highly segmented audiences based on preferences, activity, etc.

Conduct analysis to enhance overall email marketing program performance as measured by deliverability, inbox placement, and profitability, while ensuring that BenefitHub remains CAN-SPAM compliant and follows best practices.

Understand the ins and outs of complex technology environments and know how to optimize solutions for efficiency and simplicity.
Leverage email marketing tools, data to develop data models that enhance business and content strategies to grow BenefitHub user, client, and merchant base.

Basic Qualifications:

We are interested in every qualified candidate who is eligible to work in the United States. However, we are not able to sponsor visas.

Bachelors degree or equivalent experience
5 years of online marketing experience.
Exceptional proficiency of database concepts, especially SQL, Relational Databases particularly for Salesforce Marketing Cloud is required.
Well versed in AI, automation, and personalization trends and techniques.

Experience working with all Marketing Cloud Builders and Studios, including Mobile Connect and Personalization Builder for Emails.

CRM experience with HubSpot, Salesforce etc. is a plus.

Proficient with Google Analytics, PowerBI, or other reporting platforms.
Excellent troubleshooting skills, especially with coding languages and database concepts.
Self-starter/good time management skills.
Detail-oriented, team player with exceptional grammar, written, and verbal communication skills.

BenefitHub is proud to offer highly competitive salaries along with a very generous perks and benefits package including:

Medical and Dental (Employer paid 75% of monthly contributions)
Vision Insurance (Employer paid 100% of monthly contributions)
Domestic Partner Coverage for all insurance plans
100% employer-paid Life Insurance
401(K) retirement plan options
Generous Paid Time Off (PTO)
Generous Volunteer Paid Time Off (VTO) Program
Stock options from the company
Generous Paid Paternity and Maternity Leave Policies
10 Holidays (Including office closed day after Thanksgiving)
Flexible work schedules

Paid wellness rewards program

Flexible Spending Account program
Voluntary Benefit Programs (STD, LTD, Life Insurance, Accident, Cancer)

We also have offices in New York, India, Mexico, and the United Kingdom. And, we are growing!",4.2,"BenefitHub
4.2","Tampa, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
134,Data Analyst,$33k-$59k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Make-A-Wish® America, we are more than a great place to work — our work is life-changing. Together, we create life-changing wishes for children with critical illnesses. Nearly 40 years ago the inspiration for Make-A-Wish began with one little boy's wish to be a police officer. Today, together with our volunteers, donors, staff and supporters, Make-A-Wish has granted more than 500,000 life-changing wishes and transformed countless lives.

THE TEAM

Make-A-Wish America is the national headquarters for our organization, providing resources and support for our 60 Chapters around the country. The Information Technology team is comprised of a diverse team of technologists responsible for building and operating the technologies that enable Make-A-Wish to grant the wish of every eligible child. The Information Technology team is focused on providing innovative solutions across these key areas: Operations, Security, Applications, Infrastructure, Governance, and Analytics.

THE ROLE

The Data Analyst role is a key contributor to our mission by supporting data governance initiatives to ensure data quality and enable greater insights from internal and external information.

WHERE YOU COME IN

As a Data Analyst at Make-A-Wish America you will:
Support the planning, preparation, translation, and execution of data flows and migrations between enterprise platforms.
Evaluate enterprise data and identify opportunities to improve data through governance.
Develop data integrity checks and leads remediation efforts with stakeholders.
Evaluate requirements for data gathered from multiple sources, reconcile conflicts, and build translation models for the Enterprise Data Warehouse.
Partner with stakeholders and subject matter experts to support ongoing documentation and maintenance of data standards within the enterprise knowledgebase.
Partner with stakeholders to identify and implement data enrichment throughout the enterprise.
Evaluate enterprise data to identify emerging trends.
WHAT YOU’LL NEED
Bachelor’s degree in Business, Computer Information Systems, Finance, Industrial Engineering or related field
2+ years relevant experience as a Data Analyst
Demonstrated success supporting data services, integration, migration, and governance
Ability to write and interpret SQL-based queries
Familiarity with translation tools, Master Data Services
DAX coding experience within Power BI
Growth mindset, inspired to innovate and solution
Strong organizational skills to handle multiple projects and deadlines


WHAT WE OFFER
Competitive compensation with annual incentive potential
Comprehensive benefit package: Medical, Vision, Dental, Wellness*
Health and Flexible Spending Account Options
Short Term Disability, Long Term Disability and Life Insurance*
401(k) Retirement Savings Plan
15 PTO days, 10 Sick Days, 10 Paid Holidays, and 2 Personal Days
Maternity Leave
Employee Awards and Recognition Programs
Individual and Leadership Development
Discounts and special offers for theme parks, events, hotels, concerts, and movie tickets
*Make-A-Wish America pays the monthly premiums for employees participating in the HSA qualified healthcare, vision, dental, and short/long term disability plans.

We are more than a great place to work - our work is life changing. We are an inclusive and diverse group of people who, through a mosaic of backgrounds, thoughts, and experiences are united in purposeful work. We are fueled and guided by our values - values that are represented in the inspired people we work with and the transformational work we do every day.

We respect and ensure equal opportunity, regardless of race, religion, ethnicity, national origin, age, gender identity, sexual orientation, disability, perceived disability and other legally protected characteristics.

Required Skills

Required Experience

Job Location
Remote,",3.8,"Make-A-Wish Foundation of America
3.8","Phoenix, AZ",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1980,Nonprofit Organization,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
135,Data Standard Analyst - Biostatistics Team,$34k-$82k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview :

Medpace is a full-service clinical contract research organization (CRO). We provide Phase I-IV clinical development services to the biotechnology, pharmaceutical and medical device industries. Our mission is to accelerate the global development of safe and effective medical therapeutics through its scientific and disciplined approach. We leverage local regulatory and therapeutic expertise across all major areas including oncology, cardiology, metabolic disease, endocrinology, central nervous system, anti-viral and anti-infective. Headquartered in Cincinnati, Ohio, employing approximately 3,500 people across almost 40 countries.

Job Summary:

Our corporate activities are growing rapidly, and we are currently seeking a full-time, office-based Data Standard Analyst to join our Biostatistics team. This position will work on a team to accomplish tasks and projects that are instrumental to the company’s success. If you want an exciting career where you use your previous expertise and can develop and grow your career even further, then this is the opportunity for you.

Responsibilities :
Create annotated CRFs per CDISC SDTM standard and mapping specifications for study level data collection source data to CDISC SDTM;
Implement data standard and create SDTM data;
Perform validation of CDISC SDTM data in accordance with SOPs and guidance documents; and
Ensure SDTM data conforms to the data standards expected by regulatory agencies.
Qualifications :
Bachelor's Degree in Math, Statistics, Life Sciences, or equivalent; and
SAS knowledge preferred.

TRAVEL: None

Why Medpace?:

When you join Medpace, you become part of a team dedicated to supporting the development of ground-breaking drugs and devices. Our employees provide hope for those living with debilitating diseases. We invite you to be a part of something that is impacting millions of people around the globe while enjoying a competitive total compensation and benefits package and internal growth opportunities.

Awards:

Medpace historically named a Top Cincinnati Workplace by the Cincinnati Enquirer
Medpace ranks amongst top CROs for site ratings across all 10 important attributes including CRA training, preparation & organization, accessibility of staff, open communication, and ensuring timely drug availability
Continually recognized with CRO Leadership Awards from Life Science Leader magazine based on expertise, quality, capabilities, reliability, and compatibility

What to Expect Next:

A member of our recruitment team will review your qualifications and, if interested, you will be contacted for an interview.

EO/AA Employer M/F/Disability/Vets
WARNING: Please beware of phishing scams that offer opportunities with Medpace in exchange for sending money. These scammers pose as legitimate employees from actual companies. Please be advised that a Medpace employee will never ask you for a credit card, send you a check, or ask you for any type of payment as part of consideration for a role with our company. All of our careers require that you first complete an online application and go through some sort of interview process.",2.7,"Medpace, Inc.
2.7","Cincinnati, OH",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1992,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
136,Sr. Programmer/Analyst - Data Analytics,$44k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"Technology is the tool, data the medium, and insights the art.

Sound a little pretentious? Maybe, but as a data analytics professional you know that providing data-driven insights can make an impact. That’s why you got into this field! Now, you’d like to do it not just for one company, but for many. Read on to find out how!

Resource Data has been in the business of providing custom software and data-driven business applications for over 30 years. We’ve built a reputation of being trustworthy, competent, and dependable. Clients rely on us to help them effectively use technology to improve their business. We don’t just give them buzzwords and jargon; we provide practical advice based on our technical expertise and inside knowledge of their business. Data analysis tools and insight are a growing part of our services.

Intrigued? Let’s look at what a successful career at Resource Data might look like.

After three months here…

You jumped right in. After a period of acclimation with your new teammates, you started work on an existing data analytics project, helping the team complete key objectives on time.
You’ve had a role in several other projects building ETL processes and expanding data warehouse capabilities. This has allowed you to build connections across the Resource Data offices.
You’ve started working with the business users to understand what they’re after and how you can help.
You’ve identified datasets that look intriguing. You’re comfortable working directly with the client and have started discussing how they might use them for better insights.
Three months in and you’re a bona fide member of the Resource Data team. The client sees Resource Data as their data analytics experts.

At six months you’re developing opportunities.

You’ve started working with the client on a new initiative. You’re leading the research and developing a proof-of-concept to validate the idea and turn it into a full project.
You have identified work that could be handed off to someone more junior. We’ve started hiring for a new position.
You’ve continued to build your network at Resource Data and leverage expertise from across the company. You appreciate the depth of technical knowledge and the diversity of skills available to assist on specific problems.
You’ve led an internal discussion about common tools used in data analytics and the problem sets they are applied to. This has led to requests from other branches to support developing data analytics practice areas.

After one year, you’re building Resource Data and have a vision of a data analytics team.

You’ve identified several other clients in the local area in need of data analytics services. You have worked with the proposal team to develop technical estimates and present proposals. New clients are coming on board.
You’re able to market the breadth of services Resource Data can offer and are expanding our presence with clients outside of data analytics.
You’re working with the hiring team to identify colleges and programs that provide the right mix of technical and analytical education so you can help hire the best candidates for a growing practice.

This is just year one. Imagine what you can accomplish after that!

We expect you’ve got a few years’ experience in a business setting applying your statistical and machine learning background using tools like R and Python. In addition to data manipulation and modeling, you should have some exposure to software development and technical projects. Ultimately, we’re more interested in what you’ve done than years of experience, so please feel free to highlight your accomplishments.

We often say Resource Data is consulting done right. We work hard to provide stability and flexibility so that our employees can grow and experience long-term successful careers here. We take our commitment to clients seriously and strive to do our best work for them while also having a rewarding personal life.

If this sounds like the right place for you to continue you’re career journey, send us an application. We’d love to talk more about this opportunity and what Resource Data can offer.

Starting in Alaska over 30 years ago, Resource Data has grown to over 180 professionals across 5 offices. We’re ready and eager to demonstrate high value results to local clients through our commitment to people, technology, and results.

Resource Data is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Unfortunately, we are not able to provide any visa sponsorship or transfers for this position.",4.2,"Resource Data
4.2","Boise, ID",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
137,Data Analyst,-1,"The Sports Medicine Research and Testing Laboratory (SMRTL) is a small, independent non-profit corporation dedicated to the fight against doping in sport. SMRTL analyzes biological specimens from athletes competing at all levels of sport; we analyze over 50,000 samples annually performing over 90,000 different analytical tests on those samples. We are one of only two laboratories in the United States accredited by the World Anti-Doping Agency (WADA) to test for performance-enhancing substances.

SMRTL also performs clinical analysis for the novel coronavirus which causes COVID-19 through its subsidiary Sports Drug Testing Laboratory (SDTL). SDTL provides COVID-19 testing services for sport agencies such as MLB and local healthcare providers.

We are seeking a highly skilled IT professional for a Data Analyst position. This role requires someone with technical knowledge and experience with Oracle database systems and demonstrated expertise writing queries in Structured Query Language (SQL). Experience in Data Extract, Transfer and Load (ETL) are a must. Experience with Linux OS and Python are preferred

.

Candidates must have at least 3 years of previous IT experience; possess strong troubleshooting and critical thinking skills; can prioritize and multitask; and be deadline and detail oriented.
Responsibilities: *
Maintain, update, and enhance the LIMS system running on an Oracle Database.
Design and implement LIMS system integration with other operational and business systems (lab instrument data, accounting, client FTP sites, shipping/receiving, etc.).
Conduct reporting and business intelligence activities from the LIMS via online dashboards, Actuate Report Designer, web portals and other automated reporting system
Identify information system needs
Establish priorities for system maintenance and upgrades
Skills Required: *
Oracle Database Administration and Reporting
Scripting/Programming (PL/SQL, PowerShell, etc.)
Base knowledge of Networks, Windows 10 Operating Systems and MS Office Software tools
Experience with LIMS software
Communication with non-IT personnel, including SMRTL/SDTL lab technicians and external clients
Skills Preferred: *
Horizon LIMS experience
Experience working for an analytical laboratory and familiarity with the process flow involved in sample testing
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $35.00 - $43.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Weekends
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
www.smrtl.org
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",4.2,"Sports Medicine Research and Testing Laboratory
4.2","South Jordan, UT",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,Research & Development,Business Services,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
138,Data Analyst,$39k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"Reproductive Medicine Associates of New York (RMA of NY), a world-class, patient-centered, integrated, academic reproductive endocrinology medical center, is one of the nation's premier centers for excellence in clinical care, biomedical research and medical education. Visit our website to learn more: http://rmany.com/

Position Summary:

We have an exciting opportunity to join our team as a Data Analyst. In this role, the successful candidate will execute ongoing analysis of research, practice management, finance initiatives related to scientific studies, health policy, health choice/behavior, health economics, and population health at RMA of NY. The candidate will work with a dynamic and active research group dedicated to determining the influence of practice care on patient health and cycle outcome. The candidate will assist in evaluating and interpreting data with a dynamic staff and collaborating researchers, students and physicians to verify results, conclusions and discussions for all production of but not limited to abstracts, manuscripts, social media post, and marketing campaigns. The data analyst will process data from conceptualization through presentation. The programmer/analyst will become a critical link that is accountable in his/her role to support the vision and goals of RMA while maintaining the center’s integrity as a strong leader in reproductive medicine. A strong area of interest for the group is growing our capacity to use machine learning techniques to enhance patient care.

Job Responsibilities:
Cultivate deep familiarity with methodological approaches and data from diverse sources including big data platforms, large administrative databases, small-scale survey data, electronic health trackers, GPS units and others
Monitor, evaluate and improve the quality of data; prepare reports, charts and tables of data for faculty and staff
Source, Clean, Blend and transform data from structured and unstructured data sources
Develop, manage, and improve databases to track provenance and versioning
Use various statistical methodologies and data analysis techniques for cross-sectional and longitudinal research studies ( e.g., Logistic Regression, GLM, mixed-effects, Chi-Sq, ANOVA)
Detect and address issues in data and analytic results
Accurately and appropriately interpret and communicate results
Develop programs, methodologies, and files for analyzing and presenting data
Clearly communicate processes used and results achieved, suggest new and alternative approaches
Participate in data-driven decision making with investigators
Conduct relevant literature reviews to inform cohort selection, variable definitions, and analytic methods
Assist in writing and editing manuscripts for publication.
To qualify you must have, at minimum, a Bachelor's Degree in Biostatistics, Mathematics, Computer Science, Health Science, Public Health or Economics, Statistics or related research field. Master’s degree preferred. Strong statistical computing skills in SAS and/or Python and proficiency with SQL – understanding of relational databases and experience with querying and munging large datasets.

Experience creating data visualizations and dashboards (e.g. Tableau, Seaborn), knowledge of scripting language and analytical libraries (e.g. Python, pandas, numpy), integrating VBA macros with excel and MS Access and/or publishing for peer-review are desired.

Excellent written and oral communication skills, attention to detail and good documentation habits are required. Must be self-directed and able to manage priorities on multiple projects simultaneously. Must work and communicate effectively with staff. Strong ability to identify, analyze and solve problems, time-management and prioritization skills are required.

RMA of NY offers a competitive salary and a comprehensive benefits package. We are located in a beautiful office in midtown Manhattan. If you are the outstanding professional we are seeking, apply now. This could be the start of something great. For immediate consideration, please submit your cover letter, with salary requirements, and resume to:

Director of Human Resources

RMA of New York

635 Madison Avenue, 10th floor

New York, NY 10022

Please visit our website: www.rmany.com

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
On call
Experience:
Data Analysis: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",3.1,"RMA of NY
3.1","New York, NY",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Private Practice / Firm,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
139,Data Analyst (Entry),$32k-$58k (Glassdoor Est.),"Nursery Coordinator

No corp to corp or sponsorship

Responsibilities

- Assist in the design, creation and management of nursery trials;

- Submit capacity and assay requests to partner labs and teams through enterprise IT systems

- Work with large, complex datasets and computer systems to provide insights for data- driven decisions;

- Work with stakeholders across site functions to track KPIs;

- Assist with in-depth and ad-hoc analysis of information from multiple data sources;

- Increase data accessibility within the organization by enabling scheduled reporting and monitoring in non-graphic or graphic form;

- Use forecasts to help manage greenhouse capacity;

- Accurately forecast, create and analyze molecular assay projects to advance elite genetics while ensuring trait quality;

- Be able to work extended hours during peak seasons;

Required Skills / Experience

- BS in data science, life sciences, engineering, statistics or related field PLUS at least one year of work experience with reporting, data management, or data analytics

OR

- An equivalent combination of related experience/education

ALSO

- Experience with large data sets

- Excellent Excel skills

- Ability quickly understand a number of processes with consistency and attention to data quality and accuracy

Desired Skills and Experience

- Experience with visualization software (Tibco SpotFire, Tableau, Power BI, etc.)",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Tucson, AZ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
140,Energy Research and Data Analyst,-1,"Company Overview:

Edison Energy, a wholly owned subsidiary of Edison International (NYSE: EIX), provides independent, global advisory solutions to help large corporate, industrial, and institutional clients better understand and navigate the choices and risks of managing energy. Through a portfolio approach, Edison Energy enables decision-makers in organizations to deliver on their strategic, financial and sustainability goals.

Providing a suite of specialized services across sustainability, analytics, renewables, supply, and demand, Edison Energy addresses the three biggest challenges in energy today: cost, carbon, and complex choices.

Position Overview:

This role is an entry-level position within Edison’s Integrated Services team.

The primary goal for the Integrated Services team, which the Energy Research and Data Analyst position reports to, is to gain efficiencies through process development and standardization for client service delivery while maintaining the highest level of accuracy, timeliness and professionalism.

The Energy Research and Data Analyst will help internal and external customers achieve their goals by developing and maintaining custom reporting comprised of accurate and reliable data. This position is also responsible for maintaining various internal and external software programs utilized in data management and reporting.

Primary Responsibilities:
Prepare and develop various customer accounting and management reports (month-end costs, marked-to-market, budget reports, unit cost, volume/spend analyses, etc.)
Thoroughly analyze and validate key customer metrics across multiple data management systems to ensure accuracy and to identify trends and anomalies
Audit invoices against applicable tariff and/or contract terms
Resolve discrepancies directly with vendors and track avoided costs
Process invoices for payment according to customer parameters
Special Projects
Conduct research pertaining to industry, clients, utility tariffs, rate schedules and riders
Support energy managers with complex supply RFP activities
Collaborate with internal teams to serve client needs
Seek operational efficiencies through process development and standardization
Job Requirements:
Previous exposure to the energy industry is preferred, specifically doing data analysis and reporting
Attention to detail
Ability to prioritize multiple responsibilities and deadlines
Customer service, analytical and organizational skills
Proficient in Microsoft Office; particularly Microsoft Excel
Motivated to continually improve processes and tools
Eager to learn
Interpersonal skills with ability to communicate both written and verbally in a professional manner
Aptitude to define problems, collect data, establish facts, and create plan for resolution
Ability to decipher and process data points from multiple channels
Ability to effectively learn and work independently in a remote environment
Education Requirements:
Bachelor’s Degree (Business, Finance, Accounting or Engineering preferred)
Work Environment:
Regular professional, office business setting
Noise level ranges from low to moderate (if in office setting)
Noise level ranges from moderate to high (if on construction worksite)
Benefits for Full-Time Employees:
Generous Paid Time Off (includes but not limited to Paid Parental Leave, Bereavement, Jury Duty, Sick, Vacation, etc.)
National Holiday Pay& Float Holidays
401(k) Employer Matching
Health Benefits: Medical, Dental, Vision
Employer 100% Paid Life Insurance Benefits
Employer 100% Paid Short Term and Long Term Disability
Supplemental (Flexible Spending Accounts, Commuter Benefits, Cancer/Critical Care, Hospitalization, Accident)
Recognition of Hard Work and Exemplary Performance
Clean, Air Conditioned, Friendly Working Environment
Discretionary Bonus Based on Several Factors
LOCATION: This position will be located in Dublin, OH.",2.6,"Edison Energy
2.6","Dublin, OH",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Energy,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
141,Grants Manager/Data Analyst,-1,"Responsibilities

• Management of grant-funded projects

• Administrative tasks in support of grant applications

• Develop and implement systems for generating project reports

• Generate grant reports and ensure timely submission

• Develop project evaluation components

• Generate data dashboards

• Analyze data and generate data-driven reports

Duties

• Supervise the development of policies or procedures for specific grants received

• Collaborate with local organizations and agencies

• Provide guidance and monitoring regardomg the performance of grant activities

• Assist the CEO and CFO in complying with grant requirements, including providing reports, billing, and other data as required by funders.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Grants Management: 2 years (Required)
Project Management: 2 years (Required)
Data Analysis: 3 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Language:
Spanish (Preferred)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Company's website:
www.cwwilliams.org
Company's Facebook page:
@CWWCHC
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",1.0,"C. W. Williams Community Health Center, Inc.
1.0","Charlotte, NC",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
142,Data Analyst,$29k-$38k (Glassdoor Est.),"Smith is an entrepreneurial company with global reach, a casual environment, and limitless paths for success. For over 35 years, we’ve offered a place for driven, creative people to set and achieve ambitious goals in sales, procurement, and our supporting departments.

Opportunities await around the world. If you’re curious to see how you can help Smith grow while pursuing the next step in your own growth and development, apply today.

This Data Analyst will be responsible for data mining and building mining data tables, along with researching external methods, processes and software to provide business solutions tailored to new trends, demands and concepts. This person will need to have experience with the ETL process and strong experience with working with data coming from various sources, channels and in different formats. The candidate will also need to have the ability to structure the data for a software architect, correspond directly with clients, project or department managers, and/or business leaders to identify analytical requirements. This person will also be working with Project Managers, Architects, DBA, and Data Scientists. He or she must be comfortable utilizing both quantitative data, and qualitative knowledge. Other typical functions include but are not limited to:
Perform routine trend analyses and evaluations.
Analyze audit findings, identify trends and assist in the development of programs.
Brainstorm and form effective solutions to business problems.
Develop, maintain and assist in the implementation of programs and business solutions.
Monitor correction action follow-up from audits in business units.
Provide status reports to management, identify problem areas and verify compliance.
Clean, update and aggregate the data into more operable formatting.
Required Skills:
Bachelors Degree in MIS and/or CS.
Experience with tools such as SQL, Oracle & MongoDB.
Any ETL too experience (ex: Informatica, Oracle Data Integrator or Warehouse Builder)
Ability to work with relational and non-relational databases.
Ability to handle multiple tasks simultaneously and switch between tasks quickly.
Ability to facilitate discussion, drive consensus and build partnerships.
Detail oriented and able to work in group projects and take direction.
Excellent verbal and written communication skill is a must.
Experience as a Business Analysis is preferable.
If you like wild growth and working with happy, enthusiastic over-achievers, you'll enjoy your career with us!",4.2,"N.F. Smith & Associates
4.2","Houston, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1984,Company - Private,Wholesale,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
143,IBOP Reporting & Data Analyst,$53k-$95k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

WMATA is looking for a Reporting & Data Analyst for our IBOP procurement team. This position is very critical in inventory sourcing day to day functions as it entails validating inventory data and preparing packages for sourcing. The successful candidate will provide very critical data driven decision making support to the Commodity Managers in managing inventory contracts and the inventory sourcing process. In addition to performing extensive inventory data analysis, the successful candidate will create reports for the group on productivity, workload and outstanding issues. The candidate will also provide data analysis support for the procurement team for performance Service Level Agreements (SLAs) for vendors, spend analysis, contract goals and item category enterprise-wide management strategies.

Minimum Qualifications

Education

A Bachelor's degree in Computer Sciences or similar fields of study

Experience

Five (5) years of experience of data mining and analysis experience. Must have experience using Microsoft Access, Visual Studio, SQL and other database reporting tools. Must also include experience performing full analysis of the results reporting summaries, identifying trends and patterns and producing results for actionable management decisions.

Medical Group

Satisfactorily complete the medical examination for this position, if required. The incumbent must be able to perform the essential functions of this position either with or without reasonable accommodations.

Job Summary

The IBOP Reporting & Data Analyst functions as an expert for IBOP analytics and proactively analyzes relationships between data. Provides strategic analysis of data from multiple datasets to help drive informed decisions made by IBOP and WMATA management. Acts as a consultant to the department and organization in understanding IBOP data landscape and provides information regarding the location of and how to compile and organize it into actionable data to inform business outcomes.

ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS

Analyzes grievances throughout the various steps of the grievance process providing trends and predictive modeling. Creates efficiencies in work and processes through data mining.
Analyzes metrics throughout IBOP identifying trends and creates predictive modeling that enhances IBOP.Collects, stores, compiles and analyzes data provided by IBOP teams. This data is documentation of IBOP staff interaction with WMATA customers. Monitors and measures activities to understand and meet productivity requirements that align with the GM's customer service goals.
Using data from various systems within IBOP and other departments such as Microsoft Access, Visual Studio and SQL, provides analysis and summaries reporting the effectiveness of IBOP Department for the Executive Vice President of Internal Business Operations (IBOP) staff meetings. Also, provides other performance effectiveness measures and requirements that are based on quantifiable historical data. Ensures that these are aligned with the GM's customer service goals.

The essential duties listed are not intended to limit specific duties and responsibilities of any particular position. Nor is it intended to limit in any way the right of managers and supervisors to assign, direct and control the work of employees under their supervision.

Evaluation Criteria

Consideration will be given to applicants whose resumes demonstrate the required education and experience. Applicants should include all relevant education and work experience.

Evaluation criteria may include one or more of the following:

Skills and/or behavioral assessment
Personal interview
Verification of education and experience (including certifications and licenses)
Criminal Background Check (a criminal conviction is not an automatic bar to employment)
Medical examination including a drug and alcohol screening (for safety sensitive positions)
Review of a current motor vehicle report

Closing

WMATA is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, status as a protected veteran, or any other status protected by applicable federal law.

This posting is an announcement of a vacant position under recruitment. It is not intended to replace the official job description. Job descriptions are available upon confirmation of an interview.",3.6,"Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority
3.6","Washington, DC",-1,10000+ Employees,1967,Government,Passenger Rail,Travel & Tourism,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
144,Data Analyst,-1,"Doximity is transforming the healthcare industry. Our mission is to help doctors be more productive, informed, and connected. As a Data Analyst, you'll work within cross-functional delivery teams alongside other analysts, engineers, and product managers in discovering data insights to help improve healthcare.

Our team brings a diverse set of technical and cultural backgrounds and we like to think pragmatically in choosing the tools most appropriate for the job at hand.

About Us
Here are some of the ways we bring value to doctors
Here is an introduction to our tech stack
We use UNIX command-line interface and standard programming tools (vim/emacs, git, etc.) and have over 350 private repositories in Github containing our applications, forks of gems, our own internal gems, and open-source projects
We have worked as a distributed team for a long time; we're currently about 65% distributed
Find out more information on the Doximity engineering blog
Our company core values
Our recruiting process
Our product development cycle
Our on-boarding & mentorship process
Here's How You Will Make an Impact
Leverage Doximity's extensive datasets to identify and classify behavioral patterns of medical professionals on our platform.
Play a key role in creating both product and client-facing analytics.
Inform data team strategy by working with the product leaders and managers. Actively participate in execution and some planning of organizational data team strategy.
Collaborate with a team of product managers, analysts, and other developers to define and lead data projects from data ingestion to analysis to recommendations.
About you
At least 2 years of professional experience as a data analyst.
Knowledge of statistical concepts, especially exploratory data analysis techniques, and probability theory.
Excellent SQL skills to create and evaluate complex statements involving numerous tables and data relationships.
Excellent visualization and storytelling skills to explain your results and solutions to the stakeholders, clearly and compellingly.
Experience with Python and understanding of the object-oriented programming concepts and testing as it relates to data and Python.
Prior exposure to distributed data processing concepts and execution (e.g., working with column stores, leveraging spark, etc.)
Fast learner; curiosity about and passion for data.
Benefits
Doximity has industry-leading benefits. For an updated list, see our career page
More info on Doximity

We're thrilled to be named the Fastest Growing Company in the Bay Area, and one of Fast Company's Most Innovative Companies. Joining Doximity means being part of an incredibly talented and humble team. We work on amazing products that over 70% of US doctors (and over one million healthcare professionals) use to make their busy lives a little easier. We're driven by the goal of improving inefficiencies in our $3.5 trillion U.S. healthcare system and love creating technology that has a real, meaningful impact on people's lives. To learn more about our team, culture, and users, check out our careers page, company blog, and engineering blog. We're growing steadily, and there's plenty of opportunities for you to make an impact.

Doximity is proud to be an equal opportunity employer and committed to providing employment opportunities regardless of race, religious creed, color, national origin, ancestry, physical disability, mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, marital status, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, pregnancy, childbirth and breastfeeding, age, sexual orientation, military or veteran status, or any other protected classification. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state, and local law.",4.7,"Doximity
4.7",United States,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
145,Remote Data Analyst,-1,"Remote Sales & Marketing Data Analyst

NBHR is a provider of behavioral health services for adolescents and adults. We are dedicated to serving those in need by clearing pathways to gain access to life changing addiction recovery services. At NBHR we are committed to providing the highest standard of care for our clients. All NBHR facilities are fully accredited by the Joint Commission and collectively offer the full continuum of care for our clients. We are opening rehabilitation facilities nationwide and searching for positive, hardworking individuals to join our growing company, and who want to make a difference in people’s lives.

We are seeking a Sales & Marketing Data Analyst to join our team!

This position can be located anywhere in the continental U.S.

This role is responsible for managing, monitoring, and administering operations within the Outreach Department; responsibilities include, but are not limited to, process improvement, training & development, CRM administration, and onboarding.

Responsibilities:
Support the Regional Outreach Directors for successful development and monitoring of departmental goals
Develop onboarding process and systems; onboard and train all Outreach personnel in conjunction with Regional Outreach Directors
Develop sales training material and implement in various settings such as; remotely, one-on-one, small and large groups
Identify and execute strategies to improve performance, eliminate root causes of inefficiencies, and show tangible performance improvement
Manage current CRM sales tools (Salesforce & Zoho), monitor daily performance usage, develop new reporting tools and processes, work to drive adoption and accuracy of information; project and manage CRM/Tool improvements and changes
Present analysis and strategic recommendations on objectives needed to grow relationships with referral sources for improved performance outcomes
Facilitate weekly sales meetings including reporting on key performance indicators and pipeline activity
Support Business Development Representatives in exceeding their quotas, including posting quarterly, monthly, and weekly marketing goals in the CRM
Ensure compliance with all laws and regulations and the department meets or exceeds accreditation standards
Identify and implement “best practices’’ in all departmental activities

Qualifications:
4+ years’ experience in Sales Operations, supporting a Sales team with Data Analytics and training, preferably within the Healthcare Industry
Bachelor’s Degree in Math, Finance, Economics, or similar degree is preferred
Exceptional presentation skills with recent experience leading teams and implementing training courses from start to finish with measurable results and operational impact
Experience as a CRM administrator and an in-depth understanding of Saleforce.com
Knowledge of and ability to set up the following tools: Data Visualization (ex: Tableu, PowerBI, DataStudio, Qliksense, and etc.)
Programming languages like SQL or Python, a plus
Self-starter with proven ability to organize and follow through multiple complex tasks and projects simultaneously
Experience analyzing data to identify complex issues and recommending and implementing strategies to resolve problems and drive improvement
Proficient with Google programs such as Gmail, Hangouts, Docs, Sheets and Calendar
Experience in behavioral health is a plus

We offer a challenging and rewarding work environment, growth opportunities, competitive compensation, and a benefits package that includes medical, dental, vision, and etc.
Please, no phone calls. To be considered for this position, click apply and follow the steps.
To all recruitment agencies: NBHR does NOT accept agency resumes. NBHR is not responsible for any fees related to unsolicited resumes.
#IND",3.0,"Niznik Behavioral Health Resources
3.0","Houston, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
146,Healthcare Data Analyst - Orthopaedics Administration,$36k-$63k (Glassdoor Est.),"Penn State Health Milton S. Hershey Medical Center

Location: US:PA:Hershey

Work Type: Full Time

FTE: 1.0

Shift: Days
Hours: Monday - Friday ; 8:00 AM - 4:30 PM

Penn State Health Milton S. Hershey Medical Center is searching for an outcome driven Healthcare Data Analyst to support our Orthopaedics Administration team!

The Healthcare Data Analyst, Orthopaedics Administration is responsible for customer-focused reporting, analysis, and data visualization, providing support to the leadership of the Academic Practice Division of the Penn State Health System. In addition, the analyst facilitates the development and maintenance of data collection, analysis, and reporting of internal and external information to assist leadership in making sound business decisions.

The Department of Orthopaedics and Rehabilitation at Penn State Health Milton S. Hershey Medical Center is committed to advancing our field through scientific discovery and education. Our faculty, clinicians, and researchers have been recognized by U.S. News & World Report, ranking as one of the best hospitals in the nation for 2020-21 in orthopedic care.

The Healthcare Data Analyst selected for this vital role will promote data integrity through using and developing standard based measures and will be tasked with data preparation for submission of data to national and specialty registries as well as creating functional department dashboards to present to department leadership.

Penn State Health offers exceptional benefits including healthcare beginning day one, multiple time off programs to ensure that our employees can enjoy strong life/work balance, and tuition programs to ensure that our team members have the resources to grow professionally.

MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS:

Bachelor's Degree in Business, Mathematics, Statistics, Applied Science, Healthcare Management, or related field. Three (3) years of experience in data analysis, reporting, and documentation.

Ability to work collaboratively in a team structure.

Strong Excel skills (pivot tables, v-lookups, graphing, macros and VBA scripting). Understanding of relational databases and querying techniques (e.g. SQL).

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:

MBA/MHA preferred. Experience with Cerner EMR preferred.

Experience with Qlik (BI Analytics tool) is advantageous.

Experience in and/or understanding of the academic healthcare environment is a plus.

Process improvement experience is desirable.

If chosen for this position, you may be required to pass a Post Offer Employment Physical Exam in accordance with the measurements listed in the Work Task Analysis (WTA) report. This job description is a general outline of duties performed and is not to be misconstrued as encompassing all duties performed within the position. All individuals (including current employees) selected for a position will undergo a background check appropriate for the position's responsibilities.

Penn State Health is fundamentally committed to the diversity of our faculty and staff. We believe diversity is unapologetically expressing itself through every person's perspectives and lived experiences. We are an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, color, disability, gender identity or expression, marital status, national or ethnic origin, political affiliation, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, veteran status, and family medical or genetic information. If you are unable to use our online application process due to an impairment or disability, please call 717-531-8440 between the hours of 8:30 AM and 4:30 PM, Eastern Standard Time, Monday – Friday, email hrsolutions@pennstatehealth.psu.edu or download our Accommodation Instructions for Job Applicants PDF for more detailed steps for assistance.

Union: Non Bargained

IND123

#LI-TB1",3.7,"Penn State Health Milton S. Hershey Medical Center
3.7","Hershey, PA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,-1,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
147,Data Analyst - Case Specialist,$40k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join a fast-growing company with a vibrant, entrepreneurial culture, dedicated to being the top provider in the class action recovery space! Financial Recovery Technologies has become a trusted partner to hedge funds, mutual funds, custodians, sovereign wealth funds, and other institutional investment firms. Our best-in-class people and technology have made FRT a market leader.

As a Data Analyst – Case Specialist, you will work with case and client data to ensure we deliver accurate, high-quality damages and eligibility information to our clients, providing the information they need in order to make decisions about whether and how to pursue recovery opportunities after portfolio losses.

The Role: As a Data Analyst – Case Specialist, you will:
Own and master case (lawsuit) information, as well as client data as it relates to specific cases
Dig deeply into clients’ transactions and holdings data to perform reconciliation, identify data gaps, and find potential solutions
Ensure the accuracy and quality of data relating to clients' eligibility to recover funds in connection with the settlement of lawsuits and enforcement actions
Bridge the gap between the technical and the nontechnical
Translate between our legal and technical teams, ensuring an accurate interpretation of legal and financial language in legal documents and an appropriate application of that language to the data at hand
Understand corporate actions and their impact on clients' trading history
Communicate results of client data analysis to non-technical client service professionals to facilitate client decision-making
Ask questions and test assumptions made in the handoff of information between our legal, case, and data operations teams
Build strong relationships with peers across corporate functions, including:
Client service professionals, who you’ll work with to provide clients with complex eligibility analyses
Operations professionals, who will rely on your analysis skills in filing claims, remediating deficiencies, and remitting payments
Product and technology teams, who will count on you to serve as a resource as they develop technology to support operational requirements
Our ideal candidate has:
Deep analytical experience, including hands-on work processing information and testing assumptions - a minimum of 3 years' overall professional experience is necessary
Solid experience in financial services (experience in trading or with derivatives would be a plus!), as well as strong SQL skills
Top candidates will be able to recognize and understand the relevant features of various financial instruments in client-provided data and incorporate that understanding into high-quality loss analytics
Experience evaluating existing processes and developing effective process improvements;
An ability to multitask, prioritize, and balance varied tasks on a daily basis;
Strong verbal communication skills
Self-confidence sufficient to execute on tasks independently, trust his/her judgment, and yet know when to ask questions
An intellectually curious personality and a demonstrated commitment to continuous improvement
WHAT FRT OFFERS:
Competitive salary and bonus
Health, dental, vision
401k (with company match)
Income protection plans (life, accidental death and dismemberment, short- and long-term disability) and access to a suite of voluntary benefits
Fun, smart, diverse colleagues
Currently we are remote but under normal circumstances we also offer:
Close to public transit (walking distance to Wellington T on Orange Line)
Free drinks and snacks
Free parking onsite
Free access to onsite gym
THIS POSITION IS BASED IN OUR MEDFORD, MA HEADQUARTERS. LOCAL CANDIDATES ONLY, PLEASE.

AGENCIES: WE ARE NOT WORKING WITH AGENCIES ON THIS REQUISITION.",4.5,"Financial Recovery Technologies
4.5","Medford, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
148,Data Exploitation Analyst,$50k-$90k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

Job Description:

We have an exciting opportunity for a Data Exploitation Analyst to support a client’s requirements in a challenging, dynamic setting located in the Washington Metropolitan Area. The position is for the Pathfinder contract. The Data Exploitation Analyst will be responsible for improving the completeness of data in TIDE by using a variety of methodological tools and approaches to enrich terrorist identity information, including social media networking. The Analyst will require to complying with customer policies and strategies. The Analyst will use techniques, procedures, and mechanisms to reveal the true identity of individuals, personas, or groups by analyzing and exploiting data related to sets of specific identity attributes to build a comprehensive terrorist identity record.

Requirements:

• 4 to 10 years of experience is required

BA/BS degree is required. However, 6 years of work experience may be substituted

for a Bachelor's degree

Knowledge of IC mission, organizations, policies, procedures, and requirements

• Experience in IC related data science research and analysis

• Experience with data science analytic tools including data correlation technologies

• Experience with all-source intelligence sources

• TS/SCI with Polygraph security clearance

External Referral Bonus:
Eligible

Potential for Telework:
No

Clearance Level Required:
Top Secret/SCI with Polygraph

Travel:
No

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
40

Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Intelligence

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world’s toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company’s 38,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Va., Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $11.09 billion for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2020. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.7,"Leidos
3.7","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
149,"Senior Data Analyst, Customer Operations",$85k-$146k (Glassdoor Est.),"We’re looking for a Senior Data Analyst who has a love of mentorship, data visualization, and generating actionable insights from raw data. You will join the Insights & Analytics team, a team tasked with developing insights and reporting to support our customers and advisors’ needs. This team sits within the Customer Operations team, but is also connected to the Product organization.

The majority of your work will be with Customer Operations stakeholders to set Indicators and evaluate the effectiveness of current strategies and workflows. You’ll be an organizational influencer—generating insights with a good degree of autonomy. You will be involved in many aspects of data operations, from data auditing to building dashboards and analytical insights. In addition to reporting and dashboarding, you will analyze the customer journey on our Help Center page and analyze text-based interactions with our advisors and chatbot to improve care quality. You will be a mentor to all other members of the analytics team, which demands that you excel in a culture of teaching and learning.

You will report to the Manager of the Insights & Analytics team, Customer Operations in Squarespace’s New York offices.

RESPONSIBILITIES
Develop KPIs, reports, and dashboards using BI/data visualization tools
Perform and communicate impactful analyses, using SQL and R/Python to improve the customer experience and influence Customer Operations and Product roadmap
Raise the skill level of the analytics team through reviewing code, organizing training sessions, acting as a mentor, and introducing methods and tools
Help design experiments and pilots, setting clear hypotheses and success metrics, and using the right statistical methods for analyses
Work with Customer Operations and Product partners.
Partner with the Data Engineering team in pursuit of better data modeling and data quality
QUALIFICATIONS
4 or more years of experience as a data analyst, data scientist, or in a relevant field in which you have worked with large datasets to transform data to meaningful insights
Mastery of SQL, and experience with R/Python
Experience with dashboarding/BI tools like Chartio, Looker, Tableau
Experience with data cleaning, analysis, and presentation to non-technical partners
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative or logic-driven discipline
Deep love of mentorship and generating insights
Preferred: Advanced degree (Master’s or PhD) in quantitative field
Preferred: Experience with topic modeling, text analytics/natural language processing
About Squarespace

Squarespace makes beautiful products to help people with creative ideas succeed. By blending elegant design and sophisticated engineering, we empower millions of people — from individuals and local artists to entrepreneurs shaping the world’s most iconic businesses — to share their stories with the world. Squarespace’s team of more than 1,000 is headquartered in downtown New York City, with offices in Dublin and Portland. For more information, visit www.squarespace.com/about.

Benefits & Perks
Health insurance with 100% premium covered for you and your dependent children
Flexible vacation & paid time off
Up to 20 weeks of paid family leave
Equity plan for all employees
Retirement benefits with employer match
Fertility and adoption benefits
Free lunch and snacks at all offices
Education reimbursement
Dog-friendly workplace in New York office
Commuter benefit in the form of reduced tax (Ireland) and pretax (US)
Today, more than a million people around the globe use Squarespace to share different perspectives and experiences with the world. Not only do we embrace and celebrate the diversity of our customer base, but we also strive for the same in our employees. At Squarespace, we are committed to equal employment opportunity regardless of race, color, ethnicity, ancestry, religion, national origin, gender, sex, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, age, citizenship, marital or parental status, disability, veteran status, or other class protected by applicable law. We are proud to be an equal opportunity workplace.",3.4,"Squarespace
3.4","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
150,Data Integration Analyst,-1,"Data Integration Analyst (Logistics)*
Distribution Technology*
Charlotte, NC*
_JOB DESCRIPTION_*
New Position. Seeking a proven Data Integration Analyst for our Third-Party Logistics operation. The ideal candidate will work with many tasks involving SQL, EDI, SSRS, Data mining and Dashboard reporting. You will be working with both Warehouse Management and Transportation Management Systems. SQL coding over both oracle and SQL data bases.
_ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS: _*
Maintain high level of Customer service skill set both internal and external.
Self-starter working independently as well as following instructions with focus and good attention to detail.
Technical and Application Software troubleshooting.
Microsoft Windows and Office support.
Develop strong working knowledge of application software.
Dashboard reporting via SQL.
Interpret retailer routing and instruction guides including EDI requirements.
Manage EDI mapping. Document specifications.
_QUALIFICATIONS: _*
Degree in Technology or Logistics related field or equivalent work experience.
Minimum of (3) year’s SQL coding.
Oracle data base knowledge a plus.
EDI experience is a plus.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Intermediate level knowledge of Microsoft Office products.
Technical and application troubleshooting.
Must be able to travel to all company and outside locations.
Ability to cooperate and communicate effectively, both orally and in writing, with users, technical staff and management.
Linux/Unix is a plus.
Project management
Maintain excellent vendor relationships
_REQUIRED EXPERIENCE: _*
SQL coding
Technology and Application support
Windows and Microsoft Office support
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $52,000.00 - $72,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Location:
Charlotte, NC 28273 (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
No",4.2,"Distribution Technology
4.2","Charlotte, NC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1969,Company - Private,Logistics & Supply Chain,Transportation & Logistics,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
151,HR Data Analyst,$36k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"The outdoors is a big place and just as it offers endless adventures, so does our company.
Camping World is your premier one-stop-shop for everything RV. Along with RV parts and accessories, we also offer a full selection of new and used RVs for sale. Once you buy an RV, should it need a little TLC, our RV Spa detail and refurbishment centers are there to make it shine like new. However, if the problem is under the hood, our nearly 2,000 service bays, over 1,600 technicians and 100+ collision centers scattered around the country are ready to get you back on the road in no time.
As the RV industry leader, Camping World is always looking for new and better ways to enhance your RV and outdoor experience. Camping World - like the great outdoors - is a big place, full of opportunity and we make it our mission to equip you for it. We've got an awesome team already, but there's always room for more! Are you ready for a new adventure?

We're looking for a passionate and creative HR Data Analyst who will partner with the Human Capital Operations Director to provide data integrity, testing of system changes, report writing, analyzing process, and data flows for process improvement opportunities. This role will partner with regional Human Capitals teams to create executive dashboards and ad-hoc analytics as well as senior leadership for national trending.
We offer an exciting opportunity for you to be the sole HR analyst who will move our talent strategy to the next level!
What you'll do:
Partner with HR and Organization leaders to create and maintain data to support analytics needs and to ensure integrity and consistency of reporting
Conduct data gathering and needs assessments on an ongoing basis to provide quantitative analysis that produces actionable insights for the business
Provide timely updates to reports and scorecards in support of organizational changes
Provide Regional and Central Management with meaningful HR metrics, reporting, and advanced and predictive analytics
Use data to provide insights into key strategic issues related to workforce planning and management
Monitor relevant data to assess key drivers and trends in assigned HR areas and recommend process improvements for areas of responsibility
Develop and deliver timely and accurate HR scorecards dashboards, and reports that are aligned with business requirements
Share insights to inform design of processes and programs to strengthen employee perception of the work environment
Communicate analyses and provide insights to leadership by summarizing conclusions, translating analytics into clear, understandable themes, and identifying analytic results that drive actionable insights.
Extract and summarize data related to culture, employee engagement and other work environment factors
Serve as a partner to the administrative activities related to design and delivery of employee engagement surveys, including: Employee hierarchy mapping
What we're looking for:
Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Human Resources or related field or equivalent experience
3 or more years of progressive experience in HR Data Analytics and Insights
Technical experience with Analytics tools such as Power BI preferred
A commitment to HR principles of confidentiality
Ability to work both independently and within a team environment
Excellent attention to detail, technical aptitude, solid verbal and written communication skills, effective listening skills, and analytical skills
Ability to organize, prioritize, and multi-task in a professional and efficient manner, and drive for results.
Full-time associates are offered a comprehensive benefit package including medical, dental, vision, PTO, 401k and more!
We don't just accept diversity - we support it, celebrate it and thrive on it for the benefit of our associates, our customers and our company. We are proud to be an equal opportunity workplace where we strive to think outside - and not simply check - the box.

Camping World is the leading outdoor lifestyle retailer. Since the Company's founding in 1966, Camping World has grown to become one of the most well-known destinations for camping, boating, hunting, fishing, biking, winter- and water sports, to name a few. The outdoors is a big place, bigger than just RVs, but when it comes to your RV needs, we're your one-stop shop for sales, maintenance, repair and the industry's broadest and deepest range of services, protection plans, products and resources. We have over 200 locations all over the U.S. under our ever-growing company and brands. Just as the outdoors offers endless adventures, so does our company. Stay tuned to see how and where we grow next.
We consider Military experience equally as valuable as civilian work experience. Veterans, Reservists and Transitioning Service Members are encouraged to include Military duty and certifications on their resume and applications when applying for a position.

Job Type: Full-time",3.0,"Camping World
3.0","Lincolnshire, IL",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1966,Company - Public,Sporting Goods Stores,Retail,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
152,Healthcare Data Analyst (Accountable Care Organization),$37k-$72k (Glassdoor Est.),"Excellent career opportunity. Rapidly growing healthcare network / organization is seeking a motivated and focused team player. This is a tremendous opportunity for an individual who wants to join one of the United States premier healthcare companies. Ideal candidate will have a strong working knowledge of SQL, ISOM, Data Analytics, Statistics & Microsoft Office
IMPORTANT APPLICATION INSTRUCTIONS: *
Submit: Cover letter with salary requirements
Submit: Resume
Essential Duties and Responsibilities: *
Applies knowledge of data, data structure and analytical tools to research or identify trends, expenditures, and utilization of healthcare providers/practices.
Applies in-depth knowledge of health care operations and systems
Responds to requests for data by determining user’s needs, collecting, organizing, and analyzing data, and providing accurate and complete reports and information.
Works with other analysts to perform evaluate the performance of facilities, practices, provider services, and utilization.
Works with other analysts to perform a variety of ad-hoc analysis and assessments or initiatives as requested.
Identifies, develops and implements methods for improving reporting efficiency for department.
Performs checks and audits of various data sources to ensure data adheres to data governance and maintenance policies.
Maintains and applies knowledge of current trends, practices and developments in health care.
Educates and assists in problem solving to promote the implementation of the health care initiatives and research.
Suggests ways to both increase healthcare quality and reduce costs.
Applies knowledge of commonly-used concepts, practices, procedures, and programs within healthcare technology field.
Contributes in the data integrity, governance, and data structure standards and policies.
Abides by all HIPAA, Confidentiality and Privacy laws.
Other duties as assigned within the scope of responsibilities and requirements of the job; not limited by this job description.
Supervisory Responsibilities: *
This job has no supervisory responsibilities.
Competencies: * To perform the job successfully, an individual should demonstrate the following competencies:
Analytical and advanced problem solving strategies.
Strong knowledge of health care models including ACO’s.
A working knowledge of industry coding (revenue codes, ICD 9/ICD10 classifications, CPT codes, etc.).
Strong knowledge of data, data objects, data structure, and industry standards.
Advanced-level computer skills in a Microsoft Office environment
Strong skills in Microsoft Office
Strong internet research capabilities
Bi- or Multi- lingual skills (written and verbal): A Plus
Attention to detail
Report Writing
Problem Solving
Systems/Workflows/General IT
People Skills
Assertive / Reliable
Oral Communication - Speaks clearly and persuasively in positive or negative situations; listens and gets clarification; responds well to questions
Safety and Security - Uses equipment and materials properly
Attendance/Punctuality - Is consistently at work and on time
Knowledge of legal and ethical consideration related to patient information.
Qualifications: *
To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily. The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
Education and/or Experience: *
Required: Bachelor's degree in a related area and 2-4 years of experience in the field or in a related area.

Preferred: Master’s degree in a related area (ex. MHA, MBA, Master's Information Systems, etc.)
Language Skills: *
Ability to read and comprehend simple instructions, correspondence, and memos. Ability to write simple correspondence. Ability to effectively present information in one-on-one situations to visitors, clients, and other employees of the organization.
Reasoning Ability: *
Ability to think critically and objectively and unbiased. Quickly learn/adapt to healthcare industry standards, codes, data, and business practices.
Computer Skills: *
MS Office Productivity Tools (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint) Intranet, Internet, SQL & Data Objects, various report writing tools.
Other Skills and Abilities: *
High accuracy and extreme confidentiality a *MUST* .Highly detail-oriented and must possess a very high degree of organization.
Physical Demands: *
While performing the duties of this Job, the employee will have a combination of standing, sitting, bending and reaching. May work at a computer monitors for prolonged periods. The employee may lift and/or move up to 20 pounds.

Job Type: Full-time

COVID-19 considerations:
Mask required within offices at all times.

Experience:
Data Analysis: 2 years (Required)
Healthcare: 3 years (Preferred)
SQL: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",3.8,"Palm Beach Accountable Care Organization, LLC
3.8","West Palm Beach, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
153,Data Analyst I - Data Science Team,$78k-$129k (Glassdoor Est.),"Wednesday, October 14, 2020

The Data Science Division works on projects to help the Department of the Navy and other government agencies to develop advanced analytics and algorithms for systems, sensors, networks, and platforms to ensure America's defense in the 21st century. DSD researchers have relevant experience (either in course work, previous job experience, or military experience) in programming, machine learning, model building, and data visualization.

CNA fosters an inclusive culture that values diverse backgrounds and perspectives. Our flexible and engaging work environment encourages iterative and creative collaboration at every stage of the problem solving process. Our employees are committed to helping clients develop effective solutions to better manage their programs through scientific, data-driven approaches.

We are looking for creative and innovative individuals to help carry out our mission.

JOB DECRIPTION/ DUTIES

Data Analysts I in the Data Science Program work on projects to develop advanced analytics and algorithms for the Department of the Navy and other government agencies to ensure America's defense in the 21st century. Data Analyst I learn CNA's unique approach to analytics that combines an understanding of the technical capabilities with insights acquired from up close and current experience with real-world military operations.
1. Leverage R and/or Python to develop machine learning models for, e.g., regression, classification, natural language processing, and/or image recognition.

2. Develop an understanding of Navy and Marine Corps operations, maintenance, supply, training, and personnel datasets.

3. Extract, transform, load (ETL) data from various data sources in order to initiate analysis.

4. Conduct data preparation including cleaning, wrangling, joining, and converting data in order to provide a useable analytic dataset.

5. Conduct Exploratory Data Analysis (EDA) to include the use of data visualizations (e.g. Dash, MATPLOTLIB, R Shiny, ggplot2, Power BI, etc.), correlations, empirical/theoretical distributions of data, and summary statistics.

6. Apply statistical methods including descriptive and inferential techniques using parametric and nonparametric statistics.

7. Communicate analysis and results clearly, concisely and precisely.

8. Support projects by analyzing complex datasets and using effective visualizations of data in their results.

9. Serve as an effective team member by fulfilling assignments in a timely and efficient manner. Works cooperatively and accepts guidance and direction from others. Exhibits a positive attitude, and takes responsibility for own actions and outcomes.

10. Interact with functional peers within the organization, as well as sponsors / clients/ vendors; sometimes with guidance from others. Interaction normally involves exchange or presentation of factual, but somewhat varied and complex information.

JOB REQUIREMENTS

1. Education: Bachelor’s degree in Data Science, Programming, Statistic or related field or equivalent experience required.

2. Experience: Relevant experience demonstrated from course work and/or relevant work history including internships.

3. Skills: Ability to construct effective briefings using MS PowerPoint and intermediate skills with MS Word and Excel and other standard software packages. Ability to apply machine learning techniques, building models (statistical, mathematical, simulation, etc.) in programming languages such as R or Python. Ability to analyze complex datasets using effective visualizations of data in achieved results; skilled in programming, statistics, machine learning, and data visualization. Working knowledge of data and information management analysis techniques and best practices.

4. Other: Ability to obtain and maintain an Active Security Clearance.

CNA is committed to providing equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy, gender identity, and sexual orientation), parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service and protected veterans, or other non-merit based factors. In addition to federal legal requirements, CNA complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. These protections extend to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting and hiring practices, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training and career development programs. For more information about EEO protections, please view the EEO is the law posters below: ""EEO is the Law"" Poster; ""EEO is the Law"" Poster Supplement. The pay transparency policy is available here: Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Poster

To be considered for hire, all individuals applying for positions with CNA are subject to a background investigation. For positions requiring access to classified information, U.S. citizenship is required. Individuals will also be subject to an additional government background investigation, and continued employment eligibility is contingent upon the ability to obtain and maintain an active security clearance.

Other details
Job Family
Technical
Job Function
Career Path I - Research
Pay Type
Salary",3.3,"CNA Corporation
3.3","Arlington, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1942,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
154,Intern - Data Analyst or Business Analyst,-1,"Data Analyst or Business
Analyst Intern
2021 Paid Summer Intern

Zions
Bancorporation’s Enterprise Technology and Operations (ETO) team is transforming
what it means to work for a financial institution. We operate in a fast-paced,
information-driven environment, which means we need people who bring diverse
experiences, perspectives, and expertise to meet the ever-changing demands of a
technology-driven world. We are grounded in the belief that “improving the work
is the work” as we drive to create simple, easy, and fast solutions for our
customers. Your ability to adapt, learn, and innovate helps increase revenue,
reduce operational costs, and mitigates risk.

ETO
provides opportunities for you to own your career growth through Diversity,
Equity, and Inclusion, Women in Technology, and Workforce of the Future
initiatives that allow you to network across the organization, volunteer in our
community, and build your technical and soft skills. Together we are building a
culture that values diversity and creates a space of belonging for all our team
members. We believe that investing in your success is an investment in our
customers and our business. Our people are what sets us apart and make us
great.

Members of the FutureCore team
are building the next generation of banking technology at Zions Bancorporation.
By joining our team, you can make a difference in the lives of our customers
and help us develop innovative banking solutions for them.

We are currently seeking a
highly-motivated Data Analyst or Business Analyst Intern to join our team. In
this exciting role, you will work with a team of dedicated individuals
committed to deliver results and support program objectives. You’ll also have
opportunities to collaborate with others to develop creative solutions for
challenges.

You will be an excellent fit
for this position if you have the desire, skills, and experience to:
Review,
analyze, and evaluate functional aspects and data requirements of an
application or system to develop solutions for system interfaces.
Actively
participate in requirements, design, development, and quality assurance (QA)
processes of the project.
Perform
data analysis and research activities.
Assist
in producing project documentation and specifications.
Identify
opportunities for process automation and implement solutions.
Track
project performance against key performance metrics
Create
and distribute status reports and other project communications.
Qualifications:

Must
be working toward Bachelor's (taking upper division courses) or Masters degree
in Information Systems, Data Analytics or other related field.
Strong
analytical, organizational, and problem-solving skills.
Well-developed
communication skills (both written and verbal).
Ability
to work and contribute in a collaborative team environment.
Strong
interpersonal skills and the ability to work with management, peers, and
technical staff.
Adapts
well to change and is comfortable with the dynamics of a fast-paced environment
Ability
to take initiative and ownership to see assignments and projects through to completion
High-level
of proficiency using Microsoft Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Visio and SQL.
Experience
using scripted languages to develop automated solutions is desired
Analysis
skills to use data to make recommendations",3.3,"Zions Bancorporation
3.3","West Valley City, UT",-1,10000+ Employees,-1,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
155,Senior Healthcare Data Analyst,-1,"Job Summary*
The Senior Healthcare Data Analyst position involves programming, data mining and analysis of healthcare data with an emphasis on medical economics, clinical and financial reporting.

An inquisitive and detail oriented mind and a passion for using data and analytics to drive results

is critical to the success of this position.
Essential Functions*
Analyze medical cost and utilization trends is support of medical economics and population health initiatives supporting our ACO
Work with key business owners to establish and meet their analytic needs and the analytic needs of the organization
Execute the various outcome and predictive analytic studies that support MHN’s model of care.
Management, maintenance, and design of integration strategies regarding eligibility and empanelment including data quality, reporting and retention initiatives.
Assist with the design, development, and maintenance of the Analytic DataMart including quality checks, identifying data issues and working with partners to create solutions
Complete a variety of clinical and financial client ad hoc analyses in an efficient and timely manner.
Developing and using risk models for comparative analysis and patient stratification
Work with IT teams to operationalize analytic and reporting innovations
Conduct analysis to support Shared Savings and other key improvement programs
Develop actionable dashboards and reports to support care management and ACO operations
Competencies*
Must be analytical, detail oriented, and a problem solver
Expertise in data manipulation, analysis, and presentation
Advanced knowledge of medical claims, pharmacy, and eligibility data
Ability to work independently on multiple projects. Must have strong organization and time management skills
Experience with risk adjustment methodologies and predictive analytics
Experience developing visualizations and working with BI tools
Experience developing medical performance metrics and clinical quality measures (Physician Scorecards, HEDIS, PQRS, etc.)
Required Experience*
Minimum 4 years of professional experience in a data analytics role within healthcare (payer, provider, consulting)
4 – 10 years of experience using Base SAS, SAS/Macros, and SQL
Required Education*
Bachelor’s degree in statistics, public health, information systems, computer science, or a comparable program with a quantitative emphasis. Master’s degree preferred.

Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
data analytics in healthcare field: 4 years (Required)
SAS work: 4 years (Required)
Additional Compensation:
Bonuses
Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Professional development assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Other
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Medical Home Network,"Chicago, IL",-1,Unknown,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
156,Sr. Principal Data Ingest Analyst (TS/SCI Poly),$81k-$137k (Glassdoor Est.),"At the heart of Defining Possible is our commitment to missions. In rapidly changing global security environments, Northrop Grumman brings informed insights and software-secure technology to enable strategic planning. We're looking for innovators who can help us keep building on our wide portfolio of secure, affordable, integrated, and multi-domain systems and technologies that fuel those missions. By joining in our shared mission, we'll support yours of expanding your personal network and developing skills, whether you are new to the field or an industry thought-leader. At Northrop Grumman, you'll have the resources, support, and team to do some of the best work of your career

Are you ready for a new mission? Our Cyber & Intelligence Mission Solutions Division and Software & Digital Technology team is looking for a Sr. Principal Data Ingest Analyst to work in Chantilly, VA.

If you are interested on working for the good of safety everywhere, you enjoy the challenge of solving difficult problems, and you are excited to get started then apply today. The search for your new career starts here!

Primary Responsibilities:
Apply technical skills and experience in working with structured and unstructured data for ingest into a variety of applications.
Write/edit and test macros, scripts, parsers, and small programs to process, load or analyze data, and perform configuration management before entering into production baseline.
Monitor data loads, fix errors during the load process, and perform quality control on ingested data.
Provide daily logs and statistics, and output from utility tools, as well as track and provide daily, weekly, monthly and yearly reports and statistics/metrics, and support COOP and emergency response activities.
Work under only general direction, and independently determines approaches and develops innovative solutions to improve efficiency and quality of data loads.
CYBERINTEL
NGMSCIMS
#LI-M-105
CIMS

Qualifications:

Basic Qualifications:
Active TS/SCI with polygraph clearance
Bachelor's Degree in Computer Science, Information Technology, Electrical Engineering, Math or related field plus a minimum of seven (10) years of professional experience. Or, 8 years with a Master's Degree. Overall years will be considered in lieu of degree.
Previous years of experience working with structured and unstructured data for ingest into a variety of applications.
Experience with computer file management in Windows and UNIX/Linux environment.
Preferred Qualifications:
Experience with a variety of scripting languages
Java, C, Shell Scripting, Perl, Python, HTML, JavaScript, PS/SQL, JSON, XML, CSV,CSS , HTML, YAML
Demonstrated ability to work in teams with a collaborative interpersonal style
Ability to interact with various stakeholders to include senior management and customers
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Excellent interpersonal skills
Experience in the Intelligence Community
Experience working in a Customer Facility
Ability to perform with minimum direction
Ability to work in a demanding environment with changing priorities
Northrop Grumman is committed to hiring and retaining a diverse workforce. We are proud to be an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer, making decisions without regard to race, color, religion, creed, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, national origin, age, veteran status, disability, or any other protected class. For our complete EEO/AA and Pay Transparency statement, please visit www.northropgrumman.com/EEO. U.S. Citizenship is required for most positions.

#NGFeaturedJobs",3.8,"Northrop Grumman
3.8","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1939,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
157,Data Analyst,$46k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"For more than a decade, Asembia has been working with specialty pharmacies, manufacturers, prescribers, payers and other industry stakeholders to develop solutions for the high-touch specialty pharmaceutical service model.Through collaborative programs, contracting initiatives, patient support hub services and innovative technology platforms, Asembia is committed to positively impacting the patient journey.

Asembia focuses on the specialty pharmacy segment and offers comprehensive hub services, pharmacy network management, group purchasing (GPO) services, innovative technology platforms and more.As a leading industry voice and advocate, Asembia is committed to bringing strategic channel management solutions, leading-edge products and high-touch services to the specialty pharmacy industry that help our customers optimize patient care and outcomes.

Primary Function:

The Technical Analystis responsible for implementing data solutions for varied data reporting needs and act as a Subject Matter Expert (SME) for technical data product offerings.

Job Scope and Major Responsibilities:

·Follow all policies and internal processes to ensure data programs and files are delivered in accordance with the provisions of the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 and its implementing regulations, as amended (“HIPAA”).

·Design, develop and validate data reporting solutions with minimum supervision

·Evaluate data and report findings for accuracy, completeness, per the data specifications.

·Responsible for monitoring file/data receipt per expected schedules. Identify/escalate/ resolve nonconformances.

·Meet data reporting schedules to external stakeholders/ parties for designated data programs.

·Seek and adopt best practices in data reporting, make recommendations for data processing improvements. Identify opportunities to improve the process and data accuracy.

·Provide ad hoc data analysis to internal and external parties as requested.

· Successful collaboration with other Asembia team members to attain a common goal.

Qualifications:

·Bachelor’s Degree required. B.A./B.S. Information Systems or similar field preferred.

·Minimum 1 to 3 years of experience working in data analytics or Software Quality assurance – preference towards Prescription / pharmaceutical data.

·Must have a working knowledge of SQL.

·Advance level skills in developing solutions using SQL and SSIS preferred, not required.

·Must be detail oriented with the ability focus on complex processing steps.

·Proven track record with taking ownership in data analytics or Software QA analysis.

·Ability to manage multiple initiatives in a fast paced, dynamic environment.

·Strong self-starter with a sense of ownership.

·Excellent organizational and collaboration skills.

Asembia is committed to Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) and to compliance with all Federal, State and local laws that prohibit employment discrimination on the basis of race, color, age, natural origin, ethnicity, religion, gender, pregnancy, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity and expression, citizenship, genetic disposition, disability or veteran's status or any other classification protected by State/Federal laws.",3.5,"Asembia
3.5","Florham Park, NJ",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$5 to $10 million (USD),-1
158,Data Intelligence Reporting Analyst,-1,"Process and automation/application development and financial reporting for Financial Shared Services.

2-4 years of equivalent work experience in Financial Reporting and Information Systems.

• THIS POSITION IS IN LEXINGTON, KY - not eligible to work remotely.
• Develops and maintains processes using Access, Excel, VBA, and SQL.
• A strong understanding of Excel functions and formulas is a must.
• A strong understanding of VBA automation or Visual Basic programming is a must.
• Experience with SQL and SQL Server preferred.
• Executes day-to-day financial reporting responsibilities for multiple business units to include the review and distribution of financial data and aging, scorecard preparation and explanations, and various other financial and trending reports.
• Ensures the integrity of all financial data.
• Validate data sources.
• Review data accuracy with each LOB
• Perform other duties as required or assigned.

Microsoft Access, MS Access, MS Excel, Excel VBA, Visual Basic for Applications (VBA), SQL, MS SQL Server, Financial Reporting, IIS - Internet Information Services, MS Office

• 2-4 years of equivalent work experience in Financial Reporting and Information Systems.
• Flexible and able to multi-task.
• Ability to coordinate multiple projects with deadlines and changing priorities.
• Proficient in Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, PowerPoint, Access, and MS Project).
• Knowledge of macros and automation (VBA preferred).
• Knowledge of SQL (SQL Server preferred).
• Knowledge of Oracle and OLAP tools (OBIEE preferred).
• Knowledge of web development (PHP preferred).
• Strong technical understanding of computer systems, networking and functionality.
• High level of organizational skills, integrity and accuracy.
• Strong written and verbal communication.
• Strong attention to detail.
• Analytical and problem-solving skills.
• Strong time management and prioritization skills.
Ability to work independently as well as be part of a team.

Robert Half Technology matches IT professionals with some of the best companies on a temporary, project or full-time basis. From roles in software and applications to IT infrastructure and operations, we provide you unparalleled access to exciting career opportunities. Our personalized approach, innovative matching technology and global network with local market expertise help you find the technology jobs that match your skills and priorities — fast. By working with us, you have access to challenging opportunities, competitive compensation and benefits, and training to enhance your skill sets.

From philanthropy to environmental stewardship to employee programs, Robert Half is proud to have an active role in the communities in which we live and work. Our company has appeared on FORTUNE’s “Most Admired Companies” list every year since 1998.

Download our mobile app to take your job search on the go!

Contact your local Robert Half Technology office at 888.490.4429 or visit www.roberthalf.com/jobs/technology to apply for this job now or find out more about other job opportunities.

All applicants applying for U.S. job openings must be authorized to work in the United States. All applicants applying for Canadian job openings must be authorized to work in Canada.

© 2020 Robert Half Technology. An Equal Opportunity Employer M/F/Disability/Veterans.

By clicking 'Apply Now' you are agreeing to Robert Half Terms of Use .",3.6,"Robert Half
3.6","Lexington-Fayette, KY",-1,10000+ Employees,1948,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
159,LookML Data Analyst,-1,"LookML Data Analyst
If you are a LookML Data Analyst with experience, please read on!

Please only Apply if you have experience with LookML. If you do not have experience, you will not be considered.
What You Will Be Doing
Data Implementations
Building complex queries and models
Data visualization
ETL Work
What You Need for this Position
LookML
Looker
Data Analytics
Data Analyst
So, if you are a LookML Data Analyst with experience, please apply today!
Applicants must be authorized to work in the U.S.
CyberCoders, Inc is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, or any other characteristic protected by law.

Your Right to Work – In compliance with federal law, all persons hired will be required to verify identity and eligibility to work in the United States and to complete the required employment eligibility verification document form upon hire.",4.2,"CyberCoders
4.2","Mountain View, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
160,Principal Data Analyst,$64k-$114k (Glassdoor Est.),"Principal Data Analyst
Job Code

4018

Location


US - Carson, CA Corporate HQ

Position Type


Regular Full-Time

Apply Now

Dermalogica is looking for a talented PRINCIPAL DATA ANALYST

The Principal Data Analyst, through research and analysis of data from different functional systems, will develop data integration/aggregation solutions to support data analytics and visualization tools. The ideal candidate will partner with executive stakeholders, finance/operations/sales subject matter experts and functional leaders in creating robust and scalable data analytics solutions for business insight. The data analyst must possess a collaborative attitude, strong oral/written presentation skills, excellent problem-solving skills, and solid analytical/critical thinking skills.

Essential Duties:
Design and implement a flexible data access platform for operational data stores/islands, data warehouses, data marts and data lakes using standard practices as well as documenting the systems of record, data dictionaries and data flow diagrams for strategic data management
Using logical data models, help build data marts for analysis to determine trends and significant data relationships across different functional areas
Translate business needs into data modeling and reporting initiatives
Work with business stakeholders to interpret data to identify trends to go across future data sets
Adapt standard or develop novel applications of classification, forecasting, simulation, optimization, and summarization techniques
Create compelling interactive visualizations and presentations to enhance decision making capabilities throughout the company
Develop extracts, transforms, and loads with SQL
Drive AWS/Azure cloud data platform architectural decisions and development standards
Actively contribute towards data migration tasks from on-premises to cloud
Multi-task across several ongoing projects and daily duties of varying priorities as required
Ability to make good judgments, decisions, negotiate and drive problem resolutions
Create detailed technical specifications and release documentation for assigned ETL and reporting projects
Qualifications

Education and/or Experience:
Experience with Data Warehousing methodologies and concepts
Experience working with large data sets.
Expert knowledge of analytical tools and scripting languages
Extensive experience with BI/DW lifecycle including source data analysis, ETL, data marts, reporting, dashboards, and analytics
8+ years of experience working with MS SQL Server database. Mastery of SQL, specifically MS SQL Server 2012 and higher.
8+ years of experience developing ETL processes with large scale data warehouses required
2+ years working in DevOps, automating, and deploying packages between different environments
5+ years working in Alteryx, Power BI
Specific Skills/Knowledge:
High proficiency in dimensional modeling techniques and their applications including star schemas
Familiarity with Data Governance and Master Data Management principles
Ability to work with structured and unstructured source data
Apply now and become a team member for a company that provides competitive salaries, outstanding benefits including Health Benefits, Monthly Product Allowances, Profit Sharing, Annual Fitness Reimbursement, Domestic Partner Benefits, 401(k) Matching, not to mention a host of other perks!

To be considered for this role, please click on ""Apply Now"" to complete the online application. Please know that all applications are reviewed for consideration. A member of the Human Resources team will contact you if your experience and skills are a match for the position.

Dermalogica is an equal opportunity employer that embraces diversity.",3.9,"Dermalogica
3.9","Carson, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1986,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
161,"Data Analyst, Governance and Quality",$43k-$77k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

Boston Private is a leading provider of fully integrated wealth management, trust and private banking services. For more than 25 years, Boston Private has taken a highly personalized approach to serving the complex financial needs of individuals, families, business owners, private partnerships, nonprofits and community partners. Boston Private is also an active provider of financing for affordable housing, first-time homebuyers, economic development, social services, community revitalization and small businesses.

Headquartered in Boston, Boston Private has offices across the U.S. including Boston, San Francisco, San Jose, Los Angeles and South Florida. Private banking and trust services are provided through Boston Private Bank & Trust Company. Wealth management services are provided through Boston Private Wealth LLC, an SEC registered investment adviser and a wholly owned subsidiary of Boston Private Bank & Trust Company.

Responsibilities:

As a member of the Data, Analytics and Reporting Team (DART) and reporting to the Head of Data Management, the Data Analyst – Governance and Quality will play a critical role to establish Enterprise Data Governance. Under the direction of the Head of Data Governance, this role will administer all aspects of the Data Governance (DG) process as well as serve as lead analyst for issues related to data standards and data policies. The role will also involve a component of change management for the definition, creation, and enforcement of DG processes.

This role will not only play an integral role in helping to stand up DG, but it will also play a role in shaping and evolving it. This is a great opportunity for an experienced and organized Business Analyst with data background to learn and grow along with Boston Private’s DG data function. Key stakeholders include the Data Governance Leadership Team, Data Analysts, BI Report Developers, Data Engineers, Data Stewards, and business data consumers.

Key responsibilities include:

Create and maintain BP’s Enterprise DG tools (e.g. Data Glossary, Master Report Inventory, Standards & Policies)
Collect and maintain a master list of DG required actions and their progress
Proactively gather, document data requirements and analysis including data integrity and data consistency related to DG standards
Establish DG monitoring processes and related reporting to track the organizations progress.
Work closely with DART Data and Reporting Analysts to inform data transformations, reporting and analysis.
Coordinate and prepare for Data Leadership Group, Data Steward Working Group, and Data Quality Working Group
Serve as curator for DG assets to help DART members and business stakeholders gain ready access to reference materials and tools.
Work closely with the Data Architecture team to enhance existing tools and data architecture to ensure a best in class control framework.
Leverage DART processes and tools to communicate, develop, and maintain DG assests such as documentation and analysis including Jira and steps required as part of DART’s development and launch control processes.
Qualifications:
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, information technology, or a similar subject required.
Master’s degree in Technology preferred, or equivalent work experience using software tools for data interrogation is a plus.
Demonstrated attention to detail and teamwork.
Exceptional written and verbal Communication skills.
Financial Services industry experience desired.

Skills & Experience

3+ years’ hands-on experience as a Business Analyst or equivalent required.
Experience producing and/or maintaining business and/or data requirements required.
Experience with SQL and demonstrated understanding of relational databases required.
Experience working on or directly supporting a data management team is desired.
Prior experience serving as part of a Data Governance organization or supporting one is a plus.",3.5,"Boston Private Bank & Trust Company
3.5","Boston, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1987,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
162,Data Quality Control Analyst,-1,"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking multiple Data Quality Control Analysts to work on customization and optimization of Publicly Available Information (PAI) data ingestion. The analyst will work closely with technical teams to execute on client expectations concerning evolving technical requirements, breadth and depth of collection, and accuracy of content. The selected candidates will perform testing on collected media content that has been processed using natural language processing and machine learning to provide feedback to the Machine Learning Team. In addition, they will coordinate and customize human analyst workflow.

Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree required
Strong quantitative reasoning and writing skills are a must as well as the ability to work well with teams or individually with minimal supervision
Technical proficiency with web-based applications
Apply filters and parse data sets
Demonstrated competency analyzing geopolitical affairs and world event
Conduct quality control analysis of geopolitical content and provide feedback to technical development team
Desired Skills:
Prior experience utilizing traditional intelligence collection and analysis tools
Prior experience conducting manual testing on intelligence related products
Experience integrating multiple data sources to produce analytics and reports
Capability to apply principles of data science and data management to identify trends and patterns in unstructured news media content
Academic-quality research and writing skills
Capability to rapidly master and apply specialized software suites to daily workflow
Foreign language proficiency (Russian, Mandarin, or Farsi) preferred
Security Clearance:
Candidates must be eligible for a security clearance, ACTIVE Secret clearance is preferred.
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.

For more details, or to submit a referral: bit.ly/NovettaReferrals

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"Novetta
4.5",Remote,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
163,Data Quality Control Analyst - Tier II,$67k-$115k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

Novetta is seeking multiple Data Quality Control Analysts to work on customization and optimization of Publicly Available Information (PAI) data ingestion. The analyst will work closely with technical teams to execute on client expectations concerning evolving technical requirements, breadth and depth of collection, and accuracy of content. The selected candidates will perform testing on collected media content that has been processed using natural language processing and machine learning to provide feedback to the Machine Learning Team. In addition, they will coordinate and customize human analyst workflow.

Basic Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree required
Strong quantitative reasoning and writing skills are a must as well as the ability to work well with teams or individually with minimal supervision
Technical proficiency with web-based applications
Apply filters and parse data sets
Demonstrated competency analyzing geopolitical affairs and world event
Conduct quality control analysis of geopolitical content and provide feedback to technical development team
Prior experience in Html, CSS, Python, and Javascript (including DOM load/execute for web page scraping)
Experience web scraping (e.g. Phantomjs, Selenium, Beautiful Soup, etc...)
Prior usage of 3rd party APIs to include but not limited to: Azure Translate, Google Translate, and Crawlbot with Diffbot API
Prior experience using GIT for version control and Kubernetes for automated testing
Desired Skills:
Prior experience utilizing traditional intelligence collection and analysis tools
Prior experience conducting manual testing on intelligence related products
Experience integrating multiple data sources to produce analytics and reports
Capability to apply principles of data science and data management to identify trends and patterns in unstructured news media content
Academic-quality research and writing skills
Capability to rapidly master and apply specialized software suites to daily workflow
Foreign language proficiency (Russian, Mandarin, or Farsi) preferred
Security Clearance:
Candidates must be eligible for a security clearance, ACTIVE Secret clearance is preferred.
Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.

Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.

Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.

For more details, or to submit a referral: bit.ly/NovettaReferrals

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"Novetta
4.5","McLean, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
164,Data and Policy Analyst - Statistical Programmer,-1,"Job Description

At Acumen, LLC / The SPHERE Institute, Data and Policy Analysts provide analytical support for research and consulting projects for government and private clients, primarily in the area of health policy. This position is responsible for managing and analyzing data, researching and interpreting policy, and communicating findings to multiple audiences.

Data and Policy Analysts perform a wide array of functions as part of the research process. Those applicants interested in focusing on statistical programming help create and report descriptive statistic, conduct econometric and statistical analyses of data using statistical software such as SAS and STATA, interpret study specifications, research findings, and quantitative analyses for relevant audiences, develop research files from large confidential datasets, and perform other duties as assigned.

Required Skills

As we review your materials, we are looking for candidates who best exemplify the following qualifications:

Qualifications Required:
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative, public policy, or related field or equivalent relevant experience
Good quantitative analytical skills
Good oral and written communication skills
Good organizational skills and strong attention to detail
Familiar with one or more of the following technical competencies: statistics, programming, policy writing, research methods documentation, or project management
Able to demonstrate initiative, critical thinking, and problem-solving
Able to work in a team-oriented environment
Able to prioritize tasks and meet deadlines in a fast-paced environment
Demonstrated aptitude and enthusiasm for learning
Qualifications Desired:
Demonstrated interest in health and social policy
Master's degree in a quantitative, public policy, or related field or equivalent relevant experience
Any application without a cover letter will not be considered. Transcripts and coding samples are not required, however highly preferred and may be requested. We ask that you submit an application for only one office location. We are excited to review your application and look forward to seeing how you may best contribute to our work.

Job Location

Burlingame, California, United States

Position Type

Full-Time/Regular",3.5,"Acumen
3.5","Burlingame, CA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
165,Associate Analyst Data Warehouse,$43k-$89k (Glassdoor Est.),"Location 18101 SE 6th Way, Vancouver, Washington Job Type Full-time regular

Summary and Qualifications:

The primary purpose and function of the Associate Analyst Data Warehouse is to participate in Tier 1 Data Warehouse and Analytic production support including as a liaison between end users and the data warehouse team and management of the support intake site. The position will also assist with validating acceptance criteria, performing data quality tests as well as performance testing.

Essential Responsibilities and Tasks:

Live and exemplify the Five Principles of Mars, Inc. within self and team.
Provide Tier 1 support to business users using the following skills: data mining/SQL skills, strong analytic skills to work backwards from problem to solution, ability to read and interpret PL/SQL.
Build and maintain strong collaboration with our upstream and downstream partners.
Manage Data Warehouse Team support intake site and backlog.
Administer technical debt backlog to ensure forward progress.
Partner with architects and developers to translate business requirements into technical specifications.
Assist with validating acceptance criteria and service level agreements are being met by solutions provided by data engineers.
Perform system diagnostics, troubleshooting and performance testing.
Test the usability of data (speed and ease of querying, readability of our documentation, etc.) to provide optimal user experience and decrease support needs.
Develop/maintain reporting for data warehouse performance metrics.
Other job duties as assigned.

Special Working Conditions:

Ability to work at a computer for long periods of time.
Project timelines and work volume / deadlines may often require more than 40 hours per week to complete essential duties of this job.
Must have mental processes for reasoning, remembering, mathematics and language ability (reading, writing, and speaking the English language) to perform the duties proficiently.
Ability to carry out instructions furnished in written, oral, or diagram form and to solve problems involving several variables.
Ability to stand, walk, stoop, kneel, crouch, and climb as well as manipulate (lift, carry, move) up to 50 pounds.
Requires good hand-eye coordination, arm-hand-finger dexterity with the ability to grasp, and visual acuity to use a keyboard and operate necessary equipment.
The noise level in the work environment is normally moderate.
Environment where pets are present.

Experience, Education and/or Training:

Bachelor’s degree in Information Technology, Computer Science, Business or related field is required, or the equivalent combination of education, training and experience that provides the required knowledge, skills, and abilities.
Experience using data warehouse or analytics tools for business purposes is required.
Oracle SQL or SQL Server is required.
Exposure to Microsoft Power BI or other analytics tools, Oracle PL/SQL, experience collaborating across multiple business functions is preferred.

WE ARE A DRUG-FREE, SMOKE-FREE, EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER.

Banfield Pet Hospital® strongly supports and values the uniqueness of all individuals and promotes a work environment where diversity is embraced. Banfield Pet Hospital is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, religion, color, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, genetic information, status as a protected veteran, or status as a qualified individual with disability. Banfield Pet Hospital complies with all applicable federal, state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every Banfield location.",3.2,"Banfield Pet Hospital
3.2","Vancouver, WA",-1,10000+ Employees,1955,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
166,Healthcare Data Analyst,-1,"Xtend Healthcare, established in 2009, is seeking professionals to fulfill a specific need at one of our key clients of EY (Ernst & Young) within its Indianapolis healthcare advisory practice. These full-time positions offer a competitive salary and an attractive benefits package. The positions are long-term with no scheduled end date. Many current Xtend Healthcare employees have been contracted in similar roles at EY for multiple years -- some well over a decade.

EY is a globally recognized professional services firm and its Indianapolis healthcare advisory practice serves a variety of healthcare clients nationally. EY is looking to expand its existing team of Xtend Healthcare data analysts. Xtend Healthcare employees who act in these contracted roles have data analytics, informatics or business backgrounds. Some individuals do occasionally travel for work, but travel is not required by all. Candidates are expected to work daily in EY's downtown Indianapolis, Indiana office location.

EY offers our team members a highly inclusive, flexible work environment. Benefits also include the opportunity to develop and build upon deep technical skills, healthcare industry knowledge, and consulting skills through on-the-job training. The services provided include assisting their clients in complying with Medicare, Medicaid and other regulatory requirements, in addition to helping them receive the appropriate amount of reimbursement from these programs.

We are seeking qualified candidates for ourHealthcare Data Analystposition. This position will work with our client's proprietary tools to analyze large volumes of hospital data. The candidates must employ various technical data manipulation techniques to analyze large complex data sets, identify data patterns, data mine, etc. Through training, candidates must learn and apply relevant regulations to compile data sets. Candidates must be able to communicate results of the analysis to project managers.

JOB SUMMARY:

1. Analyze large volumes of hospital data.

2. Employ various techniques to analyze large complex data sets:
Data manipulation
Data mining
Identifying data patterns
3. Learn and apply relevant regulations to compile data sets.

4. Communicate results of analysis succinctly to project managers.

MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS:
Bachelor's Degree in Business, Informatics, Data Analytics, Finance, Accounting, or a related field.
2+ years experience in Business, Informatics, Data Analytics, Finance, Accounting, or a related field.
Intermediate level proficiency with Microsoft Excel required, with Microsoft Access, SQL or other database software experience recommended.
Successful reference check, background check and drug screening (required).
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS:
Experience with Medicare or Medicaid reimbursement, including cost reports, Medicare DSH and/or Medicare bad debts, is a significant advantage.
Intermediate level proficiency with Microsoft Excel (required) with Microsoft Access, SQL or other database software experience (recommended).
Acute attention to detail and strong analytical skills (required).
Strong written and verbal communication skills.
Ability to employ critical thinking skills and work independently while also working well within a team environment.
Receptiveness to differing views and ideas with the ability to apply industry-specific concepts.
Highly adaptable to changing circumstances and/or directives in day-to-day priorities.
Ability to perform well on frequent repetitive tasks while continually improving skills and competencies.
Willingness to travel occasionally (plus).
All offers of employment are contingent on standard background checks. Navient and certain of its affiliated companies are federal, state and/or local government contractors. Should this position support a Federal Government contract, now or in the future, the successful candidate will be subject to a background check conducted by the U.S. Government to determine eligibility and suitability for federal contract employment for public trust or sensitive positions. Positions that support state and/or local contracts also may require additional background checks to determine eligibility and suitability.

EOE Race/Ethnicity/Sex/Disability/Protected Vet/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity. Navient Corporation and its subsidiaries are not sponsored by or agencies of the United States of America.

Navient is a drug free workplace.",3.3,"Navient
3.3","Indianapolis, IN",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,2014,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
167,Data Analyst/Scientist,$41k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"One in five Oregonians face mental health and addictions issues every year; one in four face addiction issues. When left untreated, these issues often manifest into chronic health conditions and uncounted social costs to families, loved ones and the larger community. LifeWorks NW has helped more than 22,000 people in their journeys toward restored wellbeing. From keeping children safe and building stronger families to our integrated approach that combines behavioral and primary healthcare, LifeWorks NW provides essential services that make our community healthier.

The Data Analyst/Scientist position is responsible for all aspects of data analytics including mining, generation, and visualization. By transforming data into readable, actionable reports for continued improvement and growth, this role will contribute to strategic decision making, operational improvement activities and organizational alignment.

Pay/Benefits: $53,452 to $58,129 per year. Full benefits

Essential Responsibilities:

Work closely with management and internal teams to understand and maintain focus on their analytical needs, including identifying critical metrics and KPIs, and deliver actionable insights to relevant decision-makers
Define and implement data collection and transformation logic, selecting appropriate combination of methods and tools to ensure data integrity while optimizing scalability and performance of the solution
Develop and maintain databases by acquiring data from primary and secondary sources, and build scripts that will make our data evaluation process more flexible and scalable across data sets
Present and explain information and data, communicating data interpretation and analysis, suggesting operational improvements. Communicating information in digestible and accessible way both orally and written including creating and maintaining rich interactive visualizations which integrate various reporting components from multiple data sources
Interpret and analyze data to discover discrepancies or to identify trends and patterns in complex data sets
Build models and analyzing data to unearth trends and patterns to address business opportunities to drive business performance, investigating and communicating areas for improvement in efficiency and productivity
Uses appropriate software programs and tools, including statistical packages and programming languages to query, process, analyze, and present data and findings including required documentation
Understand health care operations and systems
Ability to handle protected health information (PHI) in a manner consistent with the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (HIPAA).
Exhibits an excellent attention to detail and multi-tasking ability with the capability of working independently
Acts professionally with a passion for assisting others and problem-solving
Meets performance standards set by assigned project work/objectives and organizational policies and norms.
Continually increases level of cultural sensitivity, awareness and competency.

Qualifications:

Bachelor's in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics required.
Proven working experience as a data analyst or similar required.
Preferred experience in clinical/healthcare reporting and analysis
Strong SQL proficiency with the ability to learn other analytic tools
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design, data mining and segmentation
Strong knowledge of and proficiency with reporting packages (Business Objects etc), programming (XML, Javascript, or ETL frameworks)
Practical experience in statistical analysis through the use of statistical packages (Excel, SPSS, SAS)
Strong analytical skills including collection, mining, evaluation, analysis, and visualization to disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings
Experience using business intelligence tools (e.g. Tableau) and data frameworks (e.g. Hadoop)
Ability to work effectively on a team, and to work independently with minimal supervision. Self-motivated. Proven success in a collaborative, team-oriented environment.
Demonstrates critical thinking and analytical capability; Ability to learn new technologies quickly
Demonstrates punctuality, accountability, and patience
Ability to perform under pressure, be flexible, and effectively manage workload.
Strong business acumen
Outstanding organizational and problem-solving aptitude
Demonstrates effective communication and presentation skills (both written and oral) and maintains a cooperative working relationship with others in a culturally diverse environment
Organizational agility with the ability to facilitating complex projects and project specific discussions with multiple stakeholders with diverse professional backgrounds.
Must be able to pass a DHS background check.

LifeWorks NW believes that diversity strengthens our workforce and empowers our community. LifeWorks NW is an EEO/AA employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, or any other status in accordance with law.

www.lifeworksnw.org Drug Free/Tobacco Free Site 01/09",2.8,"LifeWorks NW
2.8","Portland, OR",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1961,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
168,Data/Business Analyst,$49k-$73k (Glassdoor Est.),"Infosys is seeking a Data/Business Analyst. This position’s primary responsibility will be to help clients with strategy definition, value realization, implementation, and operations. The role holder will be a key player in the consulting team that helps discover and define the problem statement, evaluates the solution options and makes recommendations. You will create detailed design, architecture and process artifacts and implement the deployment plan. You will also support knowledge transfer with the objective of providing value-adding consulting solutions that enable our clients to meet the changing needs of the global landscape.

Required Qualifications
• Bachelor’s degree or foreign equivalent required from an accredited institution. Will also consider three years of progressive experience in the specialty in lieu of every year of education.
• At least 4 years of experience in Information Technology.
• Candidate must be willing to relocate to either Cleveland, OH. This position may also require relocation or travel to project locations.
• U.S. citizens and those authorized to work in the U.S. are encouraged to apply. We are unable to sponsor at this time.
• Experience as a Data/Business Analyst.
• Certified Scrum Master

Preferred Qualifications
• At least 5 years of experience in a client facing role as Business Analyst/Data Analyst, experience creating requirement specifications documents, BRDs, Functional Specifications documents and interfacing with Business.
• Certified Scrum Master
• Strong SQL and data skills
• Experience in Tools like MS Word, Excel, Power Point, Visio, Project, JIRA, Confluence, SharePoint
• Exposure to various SDLC methodologies
• Dealing with and supporting users including for BAU prod issue
• Strong communication and Analytical skills
• Ability to work in team in diverse/ multiple stakeholder environment
• Experience and desire to work in a Global delivery environment

The job entails sitting as well as working at a computer for extended periods of time. Should be able to communicate by telephone, email or face to face. Travel may be required as per the job requirements.

About Us
Infosys is a global leader in next-generation digital services and consulting. We enable clients in 46 countries to navigate their digital transformation.

With over three decades of experience in managing the systems and workings of global enterprises, we expertly steer our clients through their digital journey. We do it by enabling the enterprise with an AI-powered core that helps prioritize the execution of change. We also empower the business with agile digital at scale to deliver unprecedented levels of performance and customer delight. Our always-on learning agenda drives their continuous improvement through building and transferring digital skills, expertise, and ideas from our innovation ecosystem.

To learn more about Infosys and see our ideas in action please visit us at www.Infosys.com

EOE/Minority/Female/Veteran/Disabled/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin",3.3,"Infosys Limited
3.3","Cleveland, OH",-1,10000+ Employees,1981,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
169,Sr. Business Analyst with Data Analysis,$75k-$134k (Glassdoor Est.),"We are looking for an experienced Business Analyst/Data Analyst who is able to work with end users to gather requirement on data/report, analyze business procedures and recommend specific types of data that can be used to improve upon them

Primary Responsibilities:
Reporting & Analysis: Enable effective decision making by retrieving and aggregating data from multiple sources, identifying key indicators and actionable insights, and effectively communicating the most important information to drive decisions.
Process Documentation: Work with various functions and end users to identify, document, and communicate business/data processes.
Project Management: Produce detailed business/data requirements, coordinate and manage user acceptance test plans, and participate in stakeholder management.
Problem Solving: Demonstrate good judgment in solving problems as well as identifying problems and possible mitigation plans in advance. Strong desire and ability to dive deep into a given problem statement.
Subject Matter Expert: Develop deep knowledge of related sub brands data architecture, system map and relation to product/feature use by customers. Act as a trusted adviser to internal stakeholders by sharing best practices and requirements for optimal use of these systems and data.
Required Qualifications: *
Bachelor’s degree -5+ years of relevant professional experience as a Business Analyst, Data Analyst, or related role
Expert in SQL
Experience with data visualization and reporting tools like Tableau, DataStudio, PowerBI
Strong business analysis and functional experience, including requirements gathering, creating/deploying solutions to end users, writing user acceptance test scripts and facilitating UAT sessions
Proven ability to manage multiple, competing priorities simultaneously and work well in an ambiguous and dynamic environment. -Ability to use data to develop insights, recommendations, and business cases
Excellent written and oral communication skills, including translating findings into compelling recommendations, polished deliverables, and actionable solutions.
Ability to partner with and communicate across business functions,
Excellent problem-solving skills
Willingness to roll up your sleeves and do whatever is necessary
Preferred Qualifications: *
Proven ability to communicate with business and technical audiences at all levels, including demonstrated success influencing senior leaders and decision-makers
Demonstrated ability to dive deep in understanding our business, projects, and opportunities to improve the outcomes of our largest strategic projects and programs
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
SQL: 4 years (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.4,"FPT Software
3.4","Atlanta, GA",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
170,Data Analyst,$52k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Laulima Government Solutions, LLC is looking for a qualified Data Analyst to support the U.S. Army Institute of Surgical Research (USAISR) at Fort Sam Houston, TX.

JOB DESCRIPTION:
Provides reporting capability and data analysis utilizing data from the Extremity Trauma and Amputation Center of Excellence-Registry (EACE-R) and Department of Defense Trauma Registry/Military Orthopaedic Trauma Registry (DoDTR/MOTR).
Run queries on the EACE-Registry data. Produce standard weekly and monthly reports on the EACE’s population of interest. Respond to ad hoc data requests for information as approved by the EACE Director.
Extract, manipulate, analyze and array data for easy understanding.
Develop, modify, or provide input to data analytics project plans, and implements project plans to meet or exceed objectives.
Run periodic integrity checks and analyze results to identify areas to address which serves to ensure data is accurate.
Identify gaps in data comparisons between the databases.
Provide presentations or briefings on all aspects of the data analysis
Maintain analytics project SharePoint libraries providing versioning and historical background on project-related documents.
Implement or maintain quality control processes with the goal of maintaining high fidelity data in the databases.
Make improvements, solve problems, or take corrective action when problems arise.
Adhere to applicable data information and data release standard operating procedures.
Provide analytic support and coaching with clinical community customers to more completely identify the appropriate data elements to answer the research question or performance improvement queries.
Manage all access requests and coordinate with leadership for approval.
REQUIRED SKILLS AND EXPERIENCE:
Must have at least 4 years of experience.
Possess current familiarization in Microsoft C# application and SQL.
Demonstrate proficiency in highly advanced MS Excel skills and be an expert in constructing and manipulating pivot tables to collate and array data.
Must Be a US Citizen.
DESIRED SKILLS:
Health data analytics experience is a plus.
DEGREE/EDUCATION/CERTIFICATION REQUIREMENT:
BS degree in Computer Science, Computer Engineering or related field.
CITIZENSHIP/SECURITY CLEARANCE REQUIREMENTS:
Currently have a NACI background investigation or able to obtain and maintain.
Laulima Government Solutions, LLC is a fast-growing government service provider. Employees enjoy competitive salaries; a 401K plan with company match; medical, dental, disability, and life insurance coverage; tuition reimbursement; paid time off; and 10 paid holidays. Laulima Government Solutions, LLC is proud to be an equal opportunity employer.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Referral program
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Day shift
Experience:
Excel: 5 years (Required)
Data Analysis Skills: 4 years (Required)
Health Data Analytics: 1 year (Preferred)
SQL: 1 year (Required)
C#: 1 year (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.alakainafoundation.com",3.7,"Alaka`ina Foundation Family of Companies
3.7","Fort Sam Houston, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,-1,Government,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
171,Senior Data Analyst,$73k-$124k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join our team dedicated to developing and executing innovative solutions in support of customer mission success.

Job Description:

The Data Analyst will apply expertise in quantitative analysis, data mining, and data presentation to comprehend and identify trends and will provide technical solutions to a wide range of difficult problems.

The selected candidate will have the unique opportunity to support the customer through the application of programmatic and quantitative methods to identify patterns and relationships in large data sets using mathematical, statistical, and other data-driven analysis to address intelligence questions. The Data Analyst will apply and enhance their skills with developing, running, and analyzing results of complex queries against massive scale data stores/data processing environments.

Basic Qualifications:
The Data Analyst will provide imaginative, thorough, practicable, and consistent solutions with organizational objectives, work under general direction, and determine and develop approaches to solutions independently.
Present findings to both technical and non-technical collaborators and stakeholders.
Gather and analyze data across sources and systems to identify trends and derive recommendations or make predictions.
Generate and compile reports to provide a holistic comprehension of important performance metrics for more informed decision-making.
Position requires a Bachelor's degree.
Position requires five (5) years of related experience.
Experience with All-Source data analysis to perform technical targeting analytic support in the Intelligence Community.
Developing and using computer languages (e.g. Python, R, Pig, Java, C, SQL, ECL) to perform large scale parallel processing of data, and to develop, validate, and use methodologies to support analytic requirements in clustered computing environments.
Knowledge of SQL and databases
Experience using analytic techniques and tools to conduct technical targeting analytic support to the customer.
Ability to collaborate with technical teams to provide solutions.
Experience developing custom algorithms to support analytic requirements against massive data stores.
Desired Skills:
Experience in the Intelligence Community.
Security Clearance:
Active TS/SCI Poly security clearance required.

Novetta, from complexity to clarity.

Novetta delivers highly scalable advanced analytics and secure technology solutions to address challenges of national and global significance. Focused on mission success, Novetta pioneers disruptive technologies in machine learning, data analytics, full-spectrum cyber, cloud engineering, open source analytics, and multi-INT fusion for Defense, Intelligence Community, and Federal Law Enforcement customers. Novetta is headquartered in McLean, VA with over 1,000 employees across the U.S.


Our culture is shaped by a commitment to our core values:

Integrity • We hold ourselves accountable to the highest standards of integrity and ethics.

Customer Success • We strive daily to exceed expectations and achieve customer mission success.

Employee Focus • We invest in our employees' professional development and training, respecting individuality and fostering a culture of diversity and inclusion.

Innovation • We know that discovering new and innovative ways to solve problems is critical to our success and makes us a great company.

Excellence in Execution • We take pride in flawless execution as we build a company that is best in class.


Earn a REFERRAL BONUS for the qualified people you know.
For more details or to submit a referral, visit bit.ly/NovettaReferrals.

Novetta is an equal opportunity/affirmative action employer.
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, gender identity, sexual orientation, race, color, religion, national origin, disability, protected veteran status, age, or any other characteristic protected by law.",4.5,"Novetta
4.5","Herndon, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
172,Data Analyst Entry,$40k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"Responsibilities:

- Accountable for the creation and ongoing maintenance of customer master data in SAP and ancillary systems (Integrated Reference Data (IRD), SalesForce, Master Data Management (MDM), etc.) to ensure the availability of timely, accurate, high quality customer master data.

- Accountable to proactively identify and resolve customer master data related issues.

- Identify best practices and process improvements for data management based on investigation/analysis and solicited feedback.

- Incorporate process changes into appropriate audit and training materials.

- Coordinate with IT support for enhancements and production support issues.

- Participate on or manage small customer data related projects within or outside of the team.

- Maintain key operational metrics: timeliness and accuracy to support operational excellence and a strong internal control environment.

Required Skills / Experience:

- Bachelor’s Degree

- Fast learner; seeks to understand a number of processes with consistency and accuracy

- Detail oriented and highly focused on delivering results

- Self-starter and ability to work as part of a team

- Proactive problem solving skills with the ability to identify, analyze and interpret data

- Strong communication skills to interact with internal and external stakeholders

- Assist with writing documentation as needed for customer master training, policies, standards and procedures and train accordingly

Desired Skills / Experience:

- Knowledge of breeding, agriculture, and/or biotechnology

- Experience in ERP data governance, data management or working with customer or supply chain data

- Understanding of complex database systems and management of large data sets",4.5,"Envision LLC
4.5","Saint Louis, MO",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
173,Sr Data Science Analyst,$61k-$107k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary
The Sr. Data Science Analyst operates as an internal consultant, finding solutions to the most critical organizational challenges in a fast-paced health care environment, leading to improved patient outcomes and performance for our business partners. The challenges that are complex from a methodology or business perspective are frequently the types of projects that this role tackles.
Reponsibilities
Successfully guide Data Science projects from concept to completion as a combination of Data Science subject matter expert, project manager, and business analyst.
Perform Research and Development to generate new products and/or ways to use our data to improve patient outcomes.
Translate identified business challenges or opportunities into actionable project efforts with defined scope and goals.
Create visual concepts/mockups that foster a shared understanding of business challenges or opportunities.
Coalescing stakeholders toward reasonable project objectives that address the most pressing challenges of our business.
Collaborate and coordinate with clinical, business, IT and engineering partners in the design and development of products that address key business challenges using internal and/or external data.
Effectively communicate the practical nature of the results of various analyses to business stakeholders using illustrations and practical language.
Pilot a proposed solution to demonstrate its effectiveness and/or suggest improvements.
Create reports documenting key findings, observations, outcomes, and/or recommendations clearly.
Develop, document and maintain code in a clear and reproducible manner.
Perform other duties and responsibilities as required, assigned, or requested.
Qualifications
Bachelor’s degree in Engineering, Computer Science, Business Information Systems, Mathematics, Economics, Statistics or related technical field required; advanced degree preferred
5+ years of experience in analytics role
3+ years of experience with SQL; fluent in basic operators, joins, date and character functions;
3+ years of experience with R or Python, particularly with ggplot/matplotlib, statistics and analytics packages
3+ years of experience addressing practical business challenges in a Data Science/Analytics role
Professional experience as a project/program manager and/or business analyst preferred
Certifications in Data Science, Health Information Technology, Lean, Six Sigma, project management and/or business analysis a plus
Experience with RegEx, RShiny, R Markdown, Atlassian suite (Jira, Bitbucket, Concurrence), MS Excel (particularly pivot tables) and MS Access (VBA) preferred
Results-oriented mentality, capable of fluidly moving between roles and projects.
Team-first orientation, thriving in a collaborative, team-based work environment.
Self-starter mindset with desire to learn on an ongoing basis.
Problem-solver mentality – one who finds creative solutions instead of accepting obstacles as fixed.
Prioritization skills that allow one to cope well with ambiguity, changing requirements, dynamic scope, competing objectives and changes in direction
Willingness to lead the charge to change assumptions, risks and issues into reasonable project direction
Inquisitive nature and reasonable degree of comfort in asking tough questions when needed
Ability to accept and internalize coaching guidance
Willingness to adapt to approaches that meet stakeholder needs
Solid facilitator skillset – one who can align a room full of stakeholders with competing interests toward a narrow set of key objectives
Ability to tell stories through pictures and whiteboarding, often off-the-cuff
Ability to alter communication styles effectively for stakeholders varying from Specialists to C-Suite
Ability to serve as a liaison between business, clinical and IT professionals
Willingness to unearth, track and resolve the detail-level challenges that frequently derail project efforts
Conceptual understanding of Big Data methods
Ability to identify trends or correlations between factors and responses using methods such as trend analysis, regression modeling, clustering, principal components analysis and various feature engineering methods
Ability to conduct designed experiments to establish cause-effect relationships, as well as optimization experiments
Honesty, integrity, and emotional intelligence
Working knowledge of classical statistical / hypothesis testing techniques.
Experience with geospatial analytics platforms, particularly Esri, a plus
Experience with visualization tools, including Tableau, a plus
Experience with prototype development and/or UI/UX Design a plus
Experience with other programming languages and data exchange formats (Java, C#, XML, JSON) a plus
Experience with deep learning (particularly Tensorflow or other GPU-based) a plus
Experience with Natural Language Processing a plus
Experience with automated machine learning (H20, DataRobot) a plus
Experience with big data environments and methodologies (NoSQL, MongoDB, Spark, Hadoop) a plus",3.7,"naviHealth, Inc.
3.7","Brentwood, TN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2012,Company - Public,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
174,Financial Data Analyst,$59k-$69k (Glassdoor Est.),"Financial Data Analyst
Location: El Segundo, CA
Education Required: Bachelor’s degree required, preferably in math, engineering, business, or the sciences.
Skills Required:
The position requires at least 5 to 15 equivalent years of experience in cost estimating and analysis, preferably with the United States Air Force (USAF), comparable Department of Defense (DoD) agency, or hardware contractor
Familiarity with USAF or equivalent DoD acquisition programs and processes is highly desired; Space systems and ground cost estimating experience is a plus
Bachelor’s degree required in engineering, business, math or the sciences; Masters’ degree in one of these disciplines is preferred
Certification in cost estimating by a recognized professional society/educational organization (i.e., ICEAA or DAWIA) is desired
Experience developing hardware and software cost estimating relationships and cost methodologies, building cost models, applying inflation, phasing, collecting and normalizing data, performing detailed risk analysis, and documenting all results
Strong verbal and written communications skills, as well as strong analytical, interpersonal and presentation skills
Experience leading independent cost estimates and reviews are a plus
Proficient using MS Office Suite
Ability to work in a fast paced environment
Knowledge and experience with ACEIT is preferred
DoD Secret security clearance required; Top Secret/Sensitive Compartmented Information (TS/SCI) security clearance is desired
Responsibilities:

Individuals will perform a wide variety of cost estimating and engineering studies for USAF/ Space & Missile Systems Center (SMC) programs. Principal responsibilities include supporting and leading space system estimates, evaluating proposals, researching and developing cost methodologies, developing cost estimates, performing risk analyses and generating associated documentation. Work will include parametric cost estimating, life-cycle cost analysis, cost estimating relationships and model development, cost risk analysis, independent cost estimates, and should-cost assessments.
Benefits:
We offer competitive salaries commensurate with education and experience. We have an excellent benefits package that includes:
Comprehensive health, dental, life, long and short term disability insurance
100% Company funded Retirement Plans
Generous vacation, holiday and sick pay plans
Tuition assistance

Benefits are provided to employees regularly working a minimum of 30 hours per week.

Tecolote Research is a private, employee-owned corporation where people are our primary resource. Our investments in technology and training give our employees the tools to ensure our clients are provided the solutions they need, and our very high employee retention rate and stable workforce is an added value to our customers. Apply now to connect with a company that invests in you.",3.8,"Tecolote Research
3.8","El Segundo, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1973,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
175,Senior Business Analyst - Data Ops,-1,"About the Role:

We are seeking a detailed-oriented analytical team member for our Revenue Operations team to support our Industry Partnerships Team. You will work at the intersection of consumers and providers, helping our Industry Partnerships team sell innovative data products, transform their operations, and drive results with insightful analytics.

If the idea of transforming a business unit with your unique data-storytelling skills, thoughtful scoping, and push for operational efficiency excites you, read on!

You will work with a multi-sided marketplace:
Consumers that want to conduct research and potentially have procedures completed
Providers that want to attract quality patients and help them by performing procedures
Brands that want to get their products in front of consumers and into the hands of providers
In this role, you will also:
Feel comfortable with statistical significance and are prepared to set up tests for humans (product tests) and by humans (sales tests)
Write in-depth assessments that change behavior and drive significant revenue for our Industry Partnerships Team
Be comfortable rapidly building data visualizations to tell a compelling data-driven narrative
Be ready to use the right tool for the job: Looker, DBT, Google Slides & Sheets, Salesforce, or Python all could be tools you would use
Work with significant autonomy and discretion, setting the direction for your work as a business owner
Avoid providing raw data dumps, inspiring stakeholders with insightful recommendations that push the business towards innovation and growth
Mentor more junior-level team members on best-practices and diagnostic techniques
Work on sample projects like standardizing ad product ROI, automating framework for data-driven storytelling, and operationalizing Sales Metrics
Other duties, responsibilities, and activities may change or be assigned at any time with or without notice.

About You:

You love developing your analytical skills and have the grit to make smart changes happen. You enjoy working with a small team and know you can rely on them to help you along the way. Below are some of the qualifications we'd love for you to have.

You may be the right fit if you have:
Prior experience in a high-impact analytics role
The ability to communicate with your stakeholders and set clear expectations throughout your work
Experience using SQL and a scripting language in a business setting
Advanced Excel/Google Sheets and/or data manipulation skills
A passion for using data to find ways to create clear visualizations that tell a compelling story
A desire to grow with a team that will push and inspire you to be your best
Rigor, fortitude, and a self-disciplined approach to quality
Prolific analytic skills that bring high-performance results
The ability to take an ambiguous request and translate it into a scoped action plan with clear timelines and milestones stakeholders understand and appreciate
Highly analytical and positive mindset -- you're curious, quantitative, and meticulous
Experience with Google Analytics, Google Ad Manager, or other web analytics tools is a plus
Don't think you fully fit the bill? Apply anyway! Internally, we're in the business of building leaders.

Travel

Not expected for this role

Work Environment

The RealSelf office sits in a historic Pioneer Square building. Employees also have the option to bring their dogs to work! Telecommute option dependent on job function at the discretion of the manager. *Due to COVID-19, RealSelf employees are currently remote.

About RealSelf

RealSelf is the world's largest online destination to learn about elective cosmetic procedures and to find the right doctor or clinic for you. More than 10 million people visit RealSelf each month to find out which treatments and providers live up to their promise of being ""Worth It."" RealSelf is powered by unbiased experiences shared by consumers for hundreds of treatments, ranging from simple skincare to high consideration cosmetic surgeries. Offering millions of photos and medical expert answers, RealSelf has become an essential resource and service for those seeking to find the right local provider.

About the Industry

According to a 2016 ASAPS (American Society for Aesthetic Plastic Surgery) study, Americans spent more than 13.5 billion dollars on combined (surgical and nonsurgical) aesthetic procedures in a single calendar year for the first time on record. The total reflects a 1.5-billion-dollar increase from 2014. Surgical procedures accounted for 58% of the total expenditures, surpassing the 8-billion-dollar mark for the first time, and nonsurgical procedures accounted for 42% of the total spending, surpassing the 5-billion-dollar mark for the first time. This dramatic increase in demand speaks to the rapidly increasing need for consumer education and engagement - a role RealSelf is proud to own in the industry. RealSelf is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status.

RealSelf is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status.",4.0,"RealSelf
4.0",Remote,-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,"Health, Beauty, & Fitness",Consumer Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
176,Project Data Analyst,$46k-$84k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


A&B Process Systems, a business unit of JBT Corporation, is an industry leader in the design, fabrication, automation and installation of stainless steel process systems used in a variety of industries. At A&B Process Systems, our quality stainless steel process vessels, stainless steel process modules, skidded systems and process automation systems are all developed at one location in Stratford, Wisconsin. Our advanced 175,000 square-foot manufacturing facility is distributed over five physical plants. As a member of the JBT team, you will find that you are joining a world class organization with an entrepreneurial work environment and innovative spirit.

We have an immediate opportunity for a Project Data Analyst

Responsibilities


Position Summary:

The Project Data Analyst is a key member of the project management team and will work closely with project managers and finance to ensure effective and proactive monitoring, tracking and trending of project execution. Critical to execution is a near real-time understanding of the status, financials, concerns and critical dependencies required to successfully meet project budget and schedule. The Project Data Analyst is responsible for ensuring alignment and consistency with data reporting as well as supporting activities to improve processes and tools for standardization in tracking and reporting. This individual will also support communications to senior executive management. Tasks may include statistical analyses, managing key performance indicators, cost monitoring and control services and monitor project schedules and procurement status throughout the execution of projects.

Duties/Responsibilities:
Dashboard management - Develops, tracks and managing dashboards, metrics,
Project Financials – budget, actuals and forecast, analyzing results of project financial status,
Analyzes variances by function and reports out to the project teams including root cause analysis
Project leader for PM database – structuring data from ERP/ROMA/PM Tool & creating management reporting
Maintains project change order database – including aging and reporting
Interface with functional groups for project updates, variances to budget and awareness of issues
Interface with procurement for project material tracking (ordering and delays) and reconciliation
Develop and assist in managing project Bill of Materials and assure that the Purchase Reqs. match the project budget.
Supports recurring financial update meetings reporting with PM’s
Liaison between AR and PM team to resolve invoicing & collection issues
Qualifications


Education & Experience:

BS degree Data Management, Finance, or other related field. Five plus years of experience. Experience interfacing data from various tools such as ERP systems, Finance, Portfolio Project Management Tools, Procurement, Tableau (or visual dashboard) etc. in order to provide Project Managers, Finance and functional leads a complete picture of the project status.

The successful candidate will be comfortable working in various tools and with data, must have the ability to analyze data and report/present information to all levels of management.

It is critical for the successful candidate to possess accurate documentation practices, be detailed orientated, maintain and follow deadlines and demonstrate the ability to effectively multi-task.

This is a service-orientated position. The successful candidate must genuinely enjoy working with people and be willing to advance the goals of the organization by demonstrating competence in relevant subject areas and a willingness to be helpful.

AN EQUAL OPPORTUNITY EMPLOYER

It is the policy of JBT Corporation to provide equal opportunity for qualified persons and not to discriminate against any applicant for employment because of race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, veteran status, citizenship, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local law at the JBT Corporation location to which this application is submitted. In addition, as a Federal Government contractor, JBT Corporation is an affirmative action employer. If you require accommodation during the application process, please contact the local Human Resources department. EOE-Females/Minorities/Protected Veterans/Individuals with Disabilities

If you have a disability or impairment that prevents you from completing the online application, please seek the assistance of your local employment services agency. JBT maintains active relationships with local employment services agencies, and they have pledged their support in assisting any applicant needing help in applying. To find information on agencies throughout the United States, please go to www.careeronestop.org

You may also call Megan Centers at 844-286-4524 if your disability or impairment prevents you from applying online. NOTE: Do not use this number unless you need assistance because of a disability or impairment. The personnel attending this phone line will not be able to give you a status update regarding your application and will not be the individuals making a decision regarding your employment.",3.5,"John Bean Technologies Corporation
3.5","Stratford, WI",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1884,Company - Public,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
177,Data Analyst,$47k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Nolij Consulting LLC is a certified Women-Owned Small Business (WOSB) that provides information technology services in test and evaluation (T&E), enterprise architecture (EA), electronic health record (EHR) modernization, infrastructure operations and maintenance (O&M), data analytics and visualization, and agile transformation. Our mission is to understand the challenges and goals of our clients, address them with innovative solutions, and work together to achieve project success. Were eager to hear from candidates like you that can join and contribute to our team.

Nolij Consulting has an opening for a Data Analyst to join our team based in Falls Church

Requirements:
Must have good interpersonal and communication skills both verbal and written.
Must have strong time management and organizational skills, attention to detail and ability to multitask.
Must have a good understanding of data structure and management.
Must be organized, self-motivated, and self-directed.
Note: Since this position is for a Federal Project, a candidate must possess US Citizenship to obtain Clearance.
Desired Skills:
A fair understanding of SQL, Python and R is a plus.
Experience in developing Pivot Tables/Charts as well as complicated formula is desirable.
BI Dashboards
QLIK OR Tableau
Excel:
V lookup
Data Validation
Data Clean up
Education:
Must have a bachelors degree (in a similar discipline preferred) in any related field.
Do you like the idea of being a driver on a team of distinction? If so, we want to hear from you. To apply, go tohttps://www.nolijconsulting.com/careers/

Nolij is an EEO/Affirmative Action employer and encourages all qualified applicants to apply.",4.1,"Nolij Consulting
4.1","Falls Church, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
178,Data Analyst - YouTube Trust & Safety,-1,"Google via Webhelp – San Bruno, CA*
YouTube's user base is growing and changing, which presents unique challenges and opportunities to support over a billion users globally. Fast-paced, dynamic, and proactive, the YouTube Trust and Safety team provides scaled support to keep YouTube safe for the 1+ billion viewers, creators, and advertisers. The team provides scaled, effective reporting for the YT trust and safety operations and driving actionable insights for future investments.*
\*
\*
\*
The Data Analyst will be responsible for driving the integrity and completion to our most important data set: our Trust and Safety workflow data. You have technical aptitude and are able to handle large data sets with facility, but can also patiently work through individual issues. You are comfortable analyzing the key causes of data integrity and duplication issues and driving processes/systems that solve these issues.

Most of all, you have a commitment to providing internal and external YouTube customers with the best possible experience.

Responsibilities:
Experience of working with large data sets to develop analytics pipeline, build dashboards that drive business insights
Data validation and reporting to business partners to monitor trends in YouTube operations
Ability to respond to one off escalations with quick data insights
Streamline operations with quick and easy automation solutions
Requirements:
BA/BS Degree in Business, Finance, Engineering or related technical field, or equivalent practical experience
4+ years professional experience with SQL, reporting tools and advanced spreadsheet skills
Experience with Google proprietary tools preferred
Strong written and verbal communication skills
Attention to detail and work ethic for dealing with a variety of data issues
Strong grasp on data structure and data integrity issues.
Experience in business or operations analysis
Able to thrive in the hands-on, high-growth environment of YouTube
Aggressive problem solver, curious for challenges as opposed to committed to reproducing former structures
Ability to work for any US employer (we do not provide visa sponsorship)
\*
\*
Additional Notes:
Resumes without professional SQL experience will not be considered
We do not provide visa sponsorship nor C2C transfers
Non-local resumes require a cover letter mentioning availability for interviews, as this is not a remote or telecommute role
Resumes should be no longer than two pages
We do not provide relocation packages
\*

\*
About the Company

Webhelp is a global outsourcing company specializing in Sales, Service, Support, Human Resources, Training and Back Office. We are a trusted partner of Google in the promotion of Google Apps and related products.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $1.00 - $2.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Day shift
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Professional SQL: 4 years (Required)
Data Visualization: 3 years (Required)
License:
authorization to work in the US without visa sponsorship (Required)
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
webhelp.com
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Webhelp Americas,"San Bruno, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
179,Senior Marketing Data Analyst,$55k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"As part of the Marketing Analytics & Reporting team at Plymouth Rock Assurance, this position will play a critical role in extending Plymouth Rock’s digital data analytics and reporting capabilities. The Senior Marketing Data Analyst is responsible for customer and prospect interaction analysis, attribution models for eSales program, digital campaign and mobile app program analysis. The analyst will be an expert resource on all digital marketing related data analysis and reporting. The role is also responsible for producing ad hoc analysis on a wide variety of insurance and marketing topics as necessary.
A key part of this role will be to expand the capabilities of bridging customer information from intricate internal and external data sources, including digital customer data (such as site interactions and digital engagement data from third parties, e.g. Google, Adobe, Facebook, etc.), and internal core customer data (policy datamart, quote datamart, claims datamart, etc.). As we continue to expand our digital capabilities, it is crucial to integrate our data analysis to better understand our customers.
Essential Functions and Responsibilities
Use SQL and SAS to mine large relational database to drive data-oriented insights, such as sales trends, loss trends, business mix, standard vs nonstandard policies, as well as provide customer behavior insights and overall insurance book trends.
Analyze website and mobile app data on traffic sources and patterns. Provide insight on data trends and anomalies, making recommendations where appropriate to improve business performance.
Create model-driven customer segmentations for current customers, prospect customers, and agency customers.
Design A/B digital marketing test models, analyze, and report outcomes of marketing tests.
Conduct analysis related to the quality of leads, quotes, and sales from different marketing programs, by integrating both internal data in multiple business data marts and external data from partners, and developing in depth analysis to evaluate the effectiveness of each initiative.
Develop sales and KPI forecast for a broad range of marketing campaigns and programs, report periodically on performance against the forecast.
Perform complex data analysis in support of ad-hoc and standing requests and demand for insights and be able to present results to non-technical audiences.
Coordinate with cross functional teams, Product, Claims, and IT Team, and build relationships with business users of the data to support their requirements through effective communication, data governance and documentation.
Develop and maintain digital marketing and ecommerce site performance reports by using SQL and Adobe Analytics.
Build a reliable attribution model using stochastic modeling approach, such as Markov Chain, to capture the effectiveness of digital campaigns in various channels.
Set up automation in the data flow with the Media vendors to expand capabilities to bridge digital customer data (site interactions, digital engagement, etc.) with core customer data.
Build and enhance existing reports, and develop new reporting products in Excel, Tableau, and Salesforce Service Cloud.
Conduct data profiling and data quality analytics.
Stay up-to-date with data-driven technologies to keep us ahead of the competition, including new innovations in tracking social media marketing efforts, sales attributions, and related AI applications.
Qualifications and Education
Excellent analytical, critical thinking and problem-solving skills.
Excellent technical skills: expert SQL, experience with a statistical processing language (R, Python), and experience with a data visualization / BI tool (Tableau).
Relevant data and analysis experience, and work experience in dealing with complex data environment.
Proficient at statistical modeling, especially regression model and logistic model.
Working knowledge of mainstream marketing analytics tool, including Omniture/Adobe Analytics, and Google Analytics.
Ability to communicate effectively at all levels (including executive team) and articulate ideas, analysis results, and recommendations.
Ability to prioritize work independently, ensuring accuracy while meeting rigid deadlines.
Bachelors/Master Degree in Business Analytics, Statistics, Applied Mathematics or similar required
Minimum 3-5 years of relevant analytics experience, ideally in a tech savvy company
About the Company
The Plymouth Rock Company and its affiliated group of companies write and manage over $1.4 billion in personal and commercial auto and homeowner’s insurance throughout the Northeast and mid-Atlantic, where we have built an unparalleled reputation for service. We continuously invest in technology, our employees thrive in our empowering environment, and our customers are among the most loyal in the industry. The Plymouth Rock group of companies employs more than 1,800 people and is headquartered in Boston, Massachusetts. Plymouth Rock Assurance Corporation holds an A.M. Best rating of “A-/Excellent”.",3.6,"Plymouth Rock Assurance
3.6","Boston, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
180,Pharmaceutical Data Analyst,-1,"Our Pharmaceutical client has engaged us to provide a Data Analyst contractor to support operational data analysis and support.

The ideal candidate:
Provides support to the organization in regards to the processing and validation of various Pharmaceutical data sources like IMS/iQVIA Prescription data (DDD, Xponent) utilized by field and home office personnel.
Responsible for the accurate integration of supplemental data sources, validation, and system monitoring. Provides integration support as it relates to the company's data warehouse, including product performance metrics, managed care information, customer profile information for use in incentive payouts, targeting, segmentation, and field reporting. Follows Standard Operation Procedures (SOP's) to assure quality assurance and timely delivery of information.
Responsible to initiate ad-hoc analysis to verify the accuracy of sales results when necessary. Partners with IT to develop necessary data integration processes that assure consistent and accurate tracking and reporting of sales metrics. Provides sales data and any relative insights to internal partners.
Partners closely with Information Technology and various vendors to ensure flawless implementation and execution of various business rules, processing procedures, and validation processes.
Work with Data Providers to capture and integrate sales data for use in internal deliverables such as Field Reporting, Incentive Compensation, Analysis, and Targeting.
Investigates and resolves data questions/inquiries from the field and internal partners. Creates solutions to data issues in a timely manner.
Monitor and execute needed weekly quality control checks for accurate and timely processing of data warehouse updates. Validates information to ensure it conforms to specification and within defined thresholds.
Communicates with sales management on data status, creation, and distribution of sales reports to field sales and in-house partners. Work with data suppliers to assure compliance in the timing, accuracy, and format of data received.
Requirements
Must have extensive experience with IMS Sales data packages and the pharmaceutical sales process
Project Management is a key factor; the candidate must feel comfortable working with people.
Must be organized and have the ability to present themselves to others
Competent in MS Excel, PowerPoint and Access and familiar with data warehouse environments.
Knowledge of data training methodologies preferred.
Candidates must have the ability to manage multiple priorities successfully and work independently while demonstrating initiative and strong analytical skills.
Experience with SAS and SQL and adept at manipulating and analyzing data through Access and Excel
Individual must work well in a dynamic environment and be able to recommend and implement process improvements and handle multiple projects simultaneously.
Excellent written and communication skills and demonstrated leadership experience is required.
Experience with system integrations/change management

Benefits

Company Description:

Keen360 is a Management Consulting firm that specializes in advising organizations to design Business strategies, develop operational efficiencies and deliver innovative solutions to achieve measurable results. Our projects range from pure design and development topics to more transverse transformation involving multiple business lines or regions.

]]>",5.0,"Keen360, Inc.
5.0","Horsham, PA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
181,Data and Business Operations Analyst,-1,"Department: Call Center Operations

FLSA Status: Exempt

Job Status: Full Time

Reports To: ASO Customer Service Manager

Positions Supervised: None

Work Schedule: Flexible, during normal business hours, Monday-Friday.

Assessments: PI Behavioral and Cognitive Assessments

POSITION SUMMARY:

The purpose of this position is to provide support on various projects and initiatives primary within the Call Center Operations and other departments as assigned. The role will also act as support to pilot and execute new processes or improvements. The Data and Business Operation Analyst role will maintain the following responsibilities: Write and maintain process documents, assess current workflows and processes to identify areas of improvement and work with department subject matter experts on implementing those improvements, and will act as a support function to execute special time-sensitive projects as assigned.

ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS:
Analyze current processes and procedures providing feedback and recommendations on process improvement
Collaborate with department leaders on process improvement and reporting opportunities
Own development, maintenance, and generation of weekly, monthly, and quarterly KPI reporting in collaboration with department managers.
Demonstrate understanding of Allied’s business needs, systems, and workflows
Executes daily processes and procedures as assigned
Pilots new internal processes and procedures
Writes and maintains process documents
Coordinates with other Allied operational units to resolve problems and implement enhancement requests
Bridge communications between technical and non-technical teams
Assist with various team projects as assigned
Perform other duties as assigned
POSITION QUALIFICATIONS:

Analytical – Takes action in an analytical, methodical and process oriented way, being able to determine essential features and their relations to one another in order to produce, resolve or enhance process(es).

Communication – Communicates effectively both internally and externally, where applicable. Includes both written and verbal communication.

Initiative – Takes action independently, seeks new opportunities, and strives to see projects to completion.

Interpersonal Skills – Builds strong relationships, is flexible/adaptable, works well with others, and solicits feedback.

Job Knowledge – Understands the facets of job, aware of duties and responsibilities, and keeps job knowledge current.

Problem Solving – Strives to understand contributing factors, works to resolve complex situations.

Productivity – Manages workload, works efficiently, and meets goals and objectives.

Quality – Strives to eliminate errors, accurate work is a priority, seeks opportunities to improve product/services

Self-Development – Looks for opportunities to increase knowledge, works to increase responsibility, strives to achieve personal goals and/or maintains licenses and other pertinent requirements.

Teamwork – Accountable to team, works to meet established deliverables, appreciates view of team members, and respectful.

Technical Skills – Maintains current understanding of technical process/equipment, uses technology to increase performance/productivity; effectively uses online tools and resources.

Requirements

Experience:
2-3 years related experience as a business, systems, or data quality analyst
SKILLS & ABILITIES:
SQL (specifically, SQL Server) and report writing
Expertise with MS Office and VBA, especially Access
General familiarity with project management, especially in a waterfall methodology
Technically capable of understanding and adapting to new software programs
Communication Skills – excellent written and verbal
Certificates & Licenses:

None required

Physical Demands:

Must be able to sit for long periods of time

WORK ENVIRONMENT

Remote office space",3.6,"Allied Benefit Systems
3.6","Chicago, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1980,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
182,US Data Analyst - MB,$60k-$103k (Glassdoor Est.),"Position Summary:

At Martin Brower we are on a Journey to change our culture to be more data driven. The Data Analyst will be a key resource on the Data and Analytics team, working on critical Data Analytics efforts. This role is responsible for supporting the development of interactive and actionable dashboards, analyses and reporting through partnership with senior level staff on the Data Analytics team.

Position Responsibilities may include, but not limited to:

Develop, update and maintain the BI dashboards we provided to our brand customers and internal user stakeholders
Help perform ad-hoc data analysis that supports strategic growth and leadership initiatives
Obtain and integrate data from new sources to help expand the breadth and depth of our analyses and resulting insights
Have fun and work with a scrappy, optimistic, energetic new team
Use state-of-the-art technology and programming tools
Collaborate on the roll-out of internal solutions, prioritizing automation
Be encouraging, supportive, kind, fun, sensitive, honest, a great teacher, and above all, a great student
Any other duties as assigned.

Required Skills and Experience:

Bachelor’s degree in relevant field
Strong business orientation with experience deriving value from data.
Knowledge of Business Intelligence tools including, but not limited to, Cognos and Microsoft Power BI.
Experience creating data models, working with Data Warehouse/Data Lake, creating ETL pipelines
At least 3 years of experience in a BI or Data Analytics role, in which the following occurred:
Demonstrated capabilities in building reports and dashboards to meet business needs.
Worked successfully in Customer- and Business-facing roles.
Experience gathering business requirements while influencing decisions to drive change and modernization.
Proven ability to collaborate with IT and business teams.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills, with the ability to communicate technical subjects to non-technical audiences.
Strong teamwork and interpersonal skills.
This position must pass a post-offer background and drug test.

Preferred Skills and Experience:

Experience as BI or Data Analyst.
Experience within the distribution or Food Service industry.
Familiarity with data science concepts like machine learning and forecasting models with an ability to explain them to non-technical audiences.
Experience creating moderately complex to advanced SQL queries to explore data.
Experience with the following tools and technology – Snowflake, Azure Data Factory, Azure Data Lake, Azure Bricks, Power BI

Physical Demands and Work Environment:

Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions. Due to the nature of our business in regard to such things as delivery schedules, order inputs, selection, and Department of Transportation Hours of Service, overtime,
attendance and punctuality are essential job functions. Should an individual in this classification not be able to adhere to this requirement due to a disability, they should contact their Human Resources department to see what, if any, reasonable accommodation may be made.

As an Equal Opportunity Employer, Reyes Holdings companies will recruit and select applicants for employment solely on the basis of their qualifications. Our Practices and Procedures, including those relating to wages, benefits, transfers, promotions, terminations and self-development opportunities, will be administered without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation and gender identity, age, national origin, disability, or protected veteran status and all other classes protected by the Federal and State Government. Drug Free Employer.",3.4,"Martin Brower
3.4","Rosemont, IL",-1,10000+ Employees,1956,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Wholesale,Business Services,$10+ billion (USD),-1
183,Data Informatics Analyst,-1,"You could say Brightree by ResMed is a technology company. And that’s true. But Brightree is, at its heart, about people. We develop innovative, end-to-end technology solutions and services for people facing everyday challenges in the post-acute care industry. Brightree helps streamline processes, improve efficiency, and increase profitability. For over fifteen years, organizations big and small have put their trust in us—for our wide-ranging solutions, our leadership, and our unmatched customer service. Going to work each day and creating new ways to positively impact our customers’ businesses and the lives of patients is just what we do. Because Brightree is, after all, about people.

To learn more about Brightree technology and solutions watch this short video by our CEO: https://vimeo.com/293016800

.

Let's talk about your responsibilities:
Work on a team of co-located Data Architects, Business Analysts and Engineers on the Advanced Analytics solution.
Collaborate with Product Owners and Technical Directors to align priorities and approach employing agile software development methodologies.
Partner with key stakeholders (internal and external) to interpret, define, and document requirements
Create data cubes within a SQL Datawarehouse, schedule the import of those cubes into a Business Intelligence tool.
Design BI dashboards and reports.
Coordinate with DBAs to derive data from various source systems
Be cognizant of internal and external customer’s expectations on timelines and work diligently towards achieving that goal
Partner with multiple stakeholders to deliver Ad Hoc reporting and analytics as requested
Effectively communicate with internal and external customers in non-technical language
Identify and communicate the potential for enhanced business opportunities based on data
Design, implement, and support Brightree Data architectures applying standards for security (HIPAA/HITRUST), scalability, performance, and reliability.
Load domain-specific data marts for consumption by analytic processes, reporting, and BI tools.
Ensure security and availability of information for our analytics consumers.
Collaborate effectively with stakeholders and subject matter experts to define and interpret requirements in non-technical language.
Be a key contributor in democratizing Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence innovation initiatives.
Leverage data to identify trends and patterns to articulate ROI for Brightree products and services.
Deliver Ad Hoc reporting and analytics as needed.
Commit to timelines and exceed customer expectations.
Let's talk about skills and qualifications:
2+ years experience
Passionate about people, learning, data, and creating business impact.
Fascinated by data and find reward in the analysis of business data/metrics to identify trends and implement solutions.
Creative, analytic problem solver with diligent attention to detail.
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.
Ability to collaborate on solutions and develop successful business partner relationships at all levels of an organization
Exposure to data management technologies including SQL Databases, data warehouses, data lakes, data marts, and NoSQL data stores.
Experience writing T-SQL and performance tuning queries.
Experience working with BI Tools (such as Tableau, Power BI, Sisense)
Experience with Sisense strongly preferred
Experience working with cloud technologies (Azure) a plus.
Experience in programming/scripting languages a plus; such as R, Python, NodeJS, AngularJS, VueJS, and .NET core.
Experience in Healthcare IT a plus.
Bachelor's degree in any technology discipline, or equivalent experience.
#LI-DF1

Joining us is more than saying “yes” to making the world a healthier place. It’s discovering a career that’s challenging, supportive and inspiring. Where a culture driven by excellence helps you not only meet your goals, but also create new ones. We focus on creating a diverse and inclusive culture, encouraging individual expression in the workplace and thrive on the innovative ideas this generates. If this sounds like the workplace for you, apply now!",3.5,"Brightree
3.5","Peachtree Corners, GA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2002,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
184,"Data Analyst, Senior",$74k-$128k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

Job Description:

Leidos is a Top 10 Health IT provider drawing on decades of success in delivering solutions to meet the healthcare challenges of today. Our unique position as a technology company with deep health and life sciences expertise equips us to transform patient care, as well as provider and payer operations in commercial and government health organizations. Everything we do is built on a commitment to do the right thing for our customers, our people, and our community. We’re looking for talented people to join our team and help us revolutionize the future of health.

The Senior Data Analyst designs and develops methods, processes, and systems to consolidate and analyze structured and unstructured, diverse sources including big data sources. Develops and uses advanced software programs, algorithms, querying and automated processes to cleanse, integrate and evaluate datasets and models complex business problems. Is familiar with disciplines such as Natural Language Processing, Machine Learning, Predictive modeling, Statistical Analysis and Hypothesis testing. Works with cross-discipline teams in order to ensure connectivity between various databases and systems. Identifies meaningful insights and interprets and communicates findings and recommendations. May develop information tools, algorithms, dashboards, and queries to monitor and improve business performance. Maintains awareness of emerging analytics and big-data technologies.

Primary Responsibilities

The Senior Data Analyst will have experience in consolidating data by designing and developing methods and processes. Will have experience in developing software programs, algorithms and automated processes to evaluate datasets and models. Will have experience in using software programs, algorithms and automated processes to evaluate datasets and models. Will have experience in ensuring connectivity between various databases and systems.

Will have the ability to interpret and communicate findings and recommendations. Will have experience in monitoring business performance by developing tools, algorithms and dashboards. Maintains awareness of emerging analytics and big-data technologies.

Basic Qualifications

Familiarity with Natural Language Processing, Machine Learning, Predictive modeling, Statistical Analysis and Hypothesis testing.
Experience with analysis stemming from multiple databases: SQL Server, Oracle, MySQL
Ability to work with cross-discipline teams.
Proficient MS application knowledge (Outlook, Word, Excel, PowerPoint, SharePoint).
Excellent analytical and organizational skills.
Ability to work with the customer to define requirements.
Excellent writing and research skills

Preferred Qualifications

Expertise in working with National VHA program deployment centered on patient scheduling (VistA, VSE, Cerner, etc.)

External Referral Bonus:
Ineligible

Potential for Telework:
Yes, 100%

Clearance Level Required:
NACI

Travel:
Yes, 10% of the time

Scheduled Weekly Hours:
5
Shift:
Day

Requisition Category:
Professional

Job Family:
Data Scientist

Leidos is a Fortune 500® information technology, engineering, and science solutions and services leader working to solve the world’s toughest challenges in the defense, intelligence, homeland security, civil, and health markets. The company’s 38,000 employees support vital missions for government and commercial customers. Headquartered in Reston, Va., Leidos reported annual revenues of approximately $11.09 billion for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2020. For more information, visit www.Leidos.com.

Pay and benefits are fundamental to any career decision. That's why we craft compensation packages that reflect the importance of the work we do for our customers. Employment benefits include competitive compensation, Health and Wellness programs, Income Protection, Paid Leave and Retirement. More details are available here.

Leidos will never ask you to provide payment-related information at any part of the employment application process. And Leidos will communicate with you only through emails that are sent from a Leidos.com email address. If you receive an email purporting to be from Leidos that asks for payment-related information or any other personal information, please report the email to spam.leidos@leidos.com.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to sex, race, ethnicity, age, national origin, citizenship, religion, physical or mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, pregnancy, family structure, marital status, ancestry, domestic partner status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, veteran or military status, or any other basis prohibited by law. Leidos will also consider for employment qualified applicants with criminal histories consistent with relevant laws.",3.7,"Leidos
3.7","Reston, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10+ billion (USD),-1
185,Data Analyst 1,-1,"AccruePartners values our contract and consulting employees. We offer a competitive benefits package to meet the diverse needs of all of our contractor and consulting employees and their family members. Here is a listing of what our company offers: 401(k) Medical, Dental, Vision, Life Insurance, Employee Assistance Program, Medical and Prescription Drug, Short and Long-Term Disability Insurance.

THE TEAM YOU WILL BE JOINING:

Fortune 500 manufacturing and technology organization with significant investment in R&D and Innovation
Rich history with over 150 years of significant growth and innovation
Expanding global footprint in North America, South America, Europe and Asia
Industry leader within all 8 divisions and leader in each
Known for growing talent internally and promoting internally

WHAT THEY OFFER YOU:

Culture: Highly collaborative, teamwork-oriented environment
Growth: Make an immediate impact in this high visibility role
Opportunity: Ability to drive change within organization with a focus on process improvement
Stability: Strong executive leadership team investing in its talent and elevating the global footprint

WHERE THIS POSITION IS LOCATED:

Tewksbury, MA

WHY THIS ROLE IS IMPORTANT:

Support for analyzing capability of processes and activities (tracking, performance standards, conformity and compliance) within the Supply Chain Group:
Run operational KPI targets (e.g. Line Fill, Order Promise, Backorders, Steris)
Inform the stakeholders on key metrics, reports and analysis which will support Supply Chain Performance
Update master data, KPI and analysis reporting on a regular level, and automate reporting tool

THE BACKGROUND THAT FITS:

Knowledge and at least 5 years’ experience in Supply Chain systems: forecasting, planning, inventory management, warehousing and distribution
Knowledge of Supply Chain processes
Excellent communication and interpersonal skills (customer focused, enabling, engaging).
Results oriented, detailed oriented, rigorous, forward looking.
Technical education and experience in query tools, data compilation and manipulation for trend analysis and suggested solutions.
Advanced Excel skills
Excellent analytical skills
Experienced with Project management",2.6,"AccruePartners
2.6","Tewksbury, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2002,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
186,Senior Data Analyst,-1,"Connecticut Coalition to End Homelessness*
Senior Data Analyst *
Job Description *
Organization Description: *The Connecticut Coalition to End Homelessness supports our members and communities across the state to achieve our collective vision of an end to homelessness in
Connecticut. We pursue this mission through program innovation, policy advocacy, training and technical assistance, public engagement and partnerships, data collection, and research.

CCEH was founded in 1982 by staff and volunteers of homeless services organizations in response to the emerging crisis of homelessness. Nearly forty years later, as the tragedy and crisis of homelessness persist in our state, CCEH continues the fight to achieve an end to homelessness to respond to the needs of people experiencing homelessness and the people who serve them, applying and scaling solutions, adapting to new frontline challenges, and advancing policy and systems change to improve access to housing and reduce inflow into homelessness. Among our recent accomplishments include leading the creation of a coordinated statewide homeless response system, advancing the statewide adoption of shelter diversion interventions, raising and administering flexible financial and rental assistance funding, and creating a statewide housing assistance program for returning citizens. Through these and other efforts, Connecticut has achieved a 35% decrease in homelessness since 2007 – in contrast to trends in many states where homelessness in increasing.
Position Summary*: CCEH is the statewide lead or data collection and analysis on Connecticut’s homeless population and programs. The majority of data collected is through a single statewide database known as the Connecticut Homeless Management Information System (CT-HMIS). The
Senior Data Analyst is member of the CCEH data team, responsible for a wide variety of tasks related to data collection and analysis, including through CT-HMIS, relating to programs that serve people experiencing homelessness in Connecticut.
Primary Tasks: *
• Lead data analysis efforts o Proficiency in data extraction and analysis o Ability to convert data into actionable insights

• Produce research briefs on behalf of CCEH in conjunction with the Community Impact and Training and Technical Assistance teams.

• Create content for CCEH website and for community partners including qualitative research of trends in HMIS data, creation of infographics, and other visual representations of data.

• Act as a community liaison to CCEH partner organizations as well as other homelessness service providers.

• Present data and research internally and externally to community partners.
• Assist in CT HMIS management, including interacting with agencies.
• Assist vendors, contactors, and partners in large scale research initiatives.

• Assist in report auditing and continuous quality improvement initiatives.
• Develop and maintain interactive data dashboards for statewide and community-level reporting o Includes ETL of HMIS data o Direct connection to underlying HMIS SQL tables o Ongoing maintenance and updating data o Revising designs as necessary o Creating new dashboards as needed
• Other duties as assigned.
Supervised By: * Director of HMIS & Strategic Analysis
Position Requirements: *
• Data management skills (database design and management, data analysis, visualization of data insights)
• Proficiency with MS SQL and data warehousing programs
• Excellent analytical and critical thinking skills
• Proficiency with Tableau or other data visualization tools
• Excellent communication and presentation skills (written and oral)
• Proficiency with Microsoft Office Suite (Word, Excel, Access, Outlook)
• Team player
• Sense of humor
Required Education & Experience: *
• Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Information Systems, or relevant field
• At least four years’ of relevant work experience
Preferred Qualifications: *
• Experience with homelessness work and/or passion for ending homelessness
• Experience with statistical analysis and related tools (R Studio, SAS, SPSS, etc.)

_CCEH is committed to creating a diverse environment and is proud to be an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity or expression, sexual orientation, national origin, genetics, disability, age, or veteran status. CCEH considers lived experience as a valued source of expertise. _

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $55,000.00 - $70,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Parental leave
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Staff are currently encouraged to work entirely remotely and we have adopted technologies to facilitate virtual communication and work, including more flexibility in schedules. Office use is allowed but with measure to ensure low occupancy and safety.

Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
SQL: 1 year (Preferred)
Tableau: 1 year (Preferred)
Microsoft Excel: 4 years (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
Company's website:
https://cceh.org/
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/CtCEH
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",5.0,"Connecticut Coalition to End Homelessness
5.0","Hartford, CT",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Nonprofit Organization,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
187,Principal Business Analyst - Enterprise Data,$70k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"Our Fortune 500 company is driving a digital transformation and looking for forward-thinking innovators to disrupt how our industry thinks about and uses technology. As one of the world's leading employee benefits providers, we help millions of people gain affordable access to benefits that help them protect their families, their finances and their futures.

Are you an asker of questions, a solver of problems, and a challenger of the status quo? Our mission is to provide a differentiated customer experience and exceed the expectations people have of technology at any company — not just insurers.

We are seeking individuals to join our team of talented IT professionals who share never-ending passion and an unwavering focus on our customer experience. Team members comfortable working in an agile, fast-paced, and delivery-focused environment thrive in our environment where we value an entrepreneurial spirit and those who challenge the status-quo.

Unum is changing, and we’re excited about what’s next. Join us.

General Summary:
Unum's Enterprise Data & Insights team are seeking a Principal Business Analyst to join the leadership team. The successful applicant will be responsible for collaborating with Architects, Product Owners, strategy consultants, and business partners in the development of capability roadmaps for Enterprise Data & Insights. They will take the lead in ensuring that initiatives are prioritized and executed in alignment with the long-term business strategy. They are accountable for the tactical delivery of the strategic components through development of business cases and collaboration and oversight of deliverables with agile teams. They will also contribute ideas and suggestions to the strategic roadmap for the company based on the needs and direction of Enterprise Data.

Job Specifications
Bachelor’s degree required, relevant professional qualification or acceptable industry experience.
8+ years of demonstrated Business Analysis experience
Demonstrable experience working in Agile SDLC environment
Strong insurance or relevant industry experience
Proven track record of success with business delivery (software solutions)
Demonstrates a metrics and financial mindset to ensure ROI for business
Excellent communication skills, both written and oral; ability to translate business strategy into business capability roadmaps.
Demonstrates strong leadership skills
Strong team player; able to lead and work effectively within a team and more broadly with people from a variety of backgrounds and areas across the organization
Proven collaborative and negotiation skills with Technology and Business
Able to deal with significant ambiguity and translate into more tangible outcomes
Certifications strongly encouraged

Principal Duties and Responsibilities
Responsible for the creation and maintenance of an annual or bi-annual capability roadmap for that domain consisting of the highest priority business deliverables
Responsible for the realization of capabilities as features on product backlogs
Collaborates with the business leaders, IT Leadership, Chief Product Owner(s) and Product Owner(s) to ensure the capabilities deliver the expected return on investment and are prioritized accordingly
Collaborates with architects to create digital business capabilities that are innovative and highly capable. May be involved in the definition of external partnership engagement/agreements.
Co-ordinates or participates in tool, technology and service selection, risk assessments and sunsetting in conjunction with technical and business stakeholders ensuring consistency with existing business needs and architectural sustainability.
Leads discussions with Business Analysts, Product Owners, Leaders of Agile Teams and the corresponding management and teams to ensure alignment of priorities. Helps team translate strategic themes and roadmaps to tangible deliverables which can become backlog items
Promotes the development of a strong customer experience
Provides coaching and mentoring for Senior Business Analysts and Business Analysts and ensures consistency of business analyst artifacts and quality of business analysis. Develops and presents business cases for high level initiatives for approval, funding and prioritization
Takes responsibility for Business strategy for that domain through analysis and ensures that feature definitions will deliver the capabilities identified on the short to midterm roadmap
Collaborates with Test Engineers to define and articulate capability acceptance criteria
May serve in a Scrum Master role for an agile team
Effective facilitation of cross team priorities and alignment of short term priorities
Completes business architecture deliverables as part of broad capability team to ensure clarity of direction
Optimizes the user experience across multiple business applications including cloud/third party solutions

#LI-SM!

#LI-MULTI

~IN1

Our company is built on helping individuals and families, and this starts with our employees. We want employees to maintain a positive balance, which is why we provide access to the benefits and resources they need to invest in themselves. From our onsite fitness facilities and generous paid time off to employee professional development programs, we are committed to helping employees live and work their best – both inside and outside the office.

Unum is an equal opportunity employer, considering all qualified applicants and employees for hiring, placement, and advancement, without regard to a person's race, color, religion, national origin, age, genetic information, military status, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability, or protected veteran status.

Company:

Unum",3.7,"Unum
3.7","Chattanooga, TN",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1848,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
188,Data Management Analyst F-35 JPO,$36k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"JOB TITLE: Data Management Analyst F-35 JPO

PROJECT OVERVIEW:

Project provides support to the F-35 Lightning II Joint Strike Fighter Joint Program Office (JPO) located in Crystal City (Arlington), VA. The JPO manages the development, test, production, fielding and sustainment of the F-35 Lightning II Joint Strike Fighter for the USAF, USMC, USN, and International Partner and FMS customer nations worldwide.

JOB DESCRIPTION AND RESPONSIBILITIES:

The Data Management Analyst will assist the Configuration Management/Data Management IPT Lead and other team members in the review, processing disposition, and status accounting of DM documentation. Responsibilities will include the following:
Analyze program requirements, status, budget and schedules
Perform program management, technical, or business case analyses
Participate as a member of and/or supports the specified Program Integrated Product Teams (IPTs); and IPT directed business meetings
Collect, complete, organize and interpret technical data and financial information relating to aircraft acquisition and product programs
Track program/project status and schedules
Applies policies and procedures for financial planning
REQUIRED SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS:

Security Clearance: Secret
Active Secret Security Clearance is required
Bachelors degree from an accredited university in Business, Management or a degree relevant to the position Allowable substitution:
Associates degree from an accredited university and an additional four (4) years of experience;
Or an additional eight (8) years of experience may be substituted for a Bachelors degree
Demonstrated program experience in the configuration management process must include: configuration identification, control, audit, and status; DOD configuration management policies, procedures, review cycles, instructions and standards; engineering change proposal evaluations
Demonstrated Configuration Management experience with development, production, ancillary equipment, ground support equipment, test & evaluation, and fleet operations of a DoD acquisition domestic and international aircraft program
Analytical and communication abilities (both written and verbal)
DESIRED SKILLS AND QUALIFICATIONS:

WORK LOCATION: Crystal City, VA

TRAVEL: 5%

KEY WORDS: DoD, IT, configuration management, CM, configuration identification, control, audit, engineering change proposal evaluations, development, production, ancillary equipment, ground support equipment, test & evaluation, T&E, fleet, international, aircraft. #MON

WBB is a technical and management consulting company that provides innovative products and services that solve government and commercial customers toughest problems. For more than 30 years, WBB has set the standard for excellence in consulting services, while providing its employees with an outstanding work environment with ample opportunities for growth and success. WBB continues to enjoy impressive growth, which is directly attributed to the companys hiring practice of always hiring the very best professionals from government, military and industry.

We are proud of our diverse environment and are an Equal Opportunity Employer. WBB is committed to a policy of equal employment opportunity. WBB participates in E-Verify.

WBB does not accept unsolicited resumes through or from search firms or staffing agencies. All unsolicited resumes will be considered the property of WBB and WBB will not be obligated to pay a placement fee.",4.1,"Whitney, Bradley and Brown
4.1","Crystal City, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
189,Collections Data Analyst,-1,"Octane is a Fintech company whose mission is to connect people with their passions. The $21B powersports market is fast and fun, but the purchasing process is slow and frustrating. Octane is changing that through automated underwriting, innovative credit products, and financing through our in-house lender Roadrunner Financial. Octane reaches millions of riders through editorial brands like CycleWorld.com and helps consumers buy their favorite vehicles with instant, frictionless financing on Octane.co.

Octane is gaining traction quickly with customers, as evidenced by growth in originations through our platform of more than 3X year-over-year. Octane works with more than 3,500 dealers in the USA, provides financing coverage for most major powersports makes, and offers promotional financing with low rates for 40 OEM brands. Because we're the platform and the lender, we have both high growth and positive unit economics - rare for a fintech. We have raised more than $139M in venture capital from leading investors such as IA Ventures, Valar Ventures, and Contour Venture Partners.

We are seeking an experienced Collections Data Analyst to analyze data and provide business insights to stakeholders. You will be working in a fast-paced fintech company and cooperate with a diverse team to complete projects.

Specifically, you will:
Manage routine MIS reports.
Collect and analyze data for collection efficiency.
Analyze and monitor collection strategy to optimize collection efforts
Influence stakeholders to support business projects
Lead projects and coordinate with other teams to produce better business outcomes
Test business processes and recommend improvements
Your background includes:
Bachelor's degree or higher in business analysis, business administration, finance or related field, followed by 3 or more years of Business Analyst experience
Excellent SQL and Excel skills
Excellent written and verbal communication skills, along with great analytical, critical thinking and problem-solving abilities
Strong adaptability and capacity to work in fast-paced environments
In-depth understanding of organizational data flow and its use in management decision-making
Industry experience within Consumer Credit, FinTech, Financial Services, or similar preferred
Benefits
Robust Health Care Plans (Medical, Dental & Vision)
Up to 5 weeks PTO (self-managed)
Generous Parental Leave
Retirement Plan (401k) with Company contribution
Educational Assistance/Tuition Reimbursement up to $3K/year
Powersports Safety Benefit: reimbursement of up to $500/year for the purchase of any powersports safety equipment
Life Insurance (Basic, Voluntary & AD&D)
Short Term / Long Term Disability & Life insurance
Team Activities (remotely)
Monthly company gift
Octane Lending is an equal opportunity employer committed to providing equal employment opportunity without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, disability, or any other protected status with respect to recruitment, hiring, promotion and other terms and conditions of employment.",4.1,"Octane
4.1","Irving, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
190,Master Data Management Analyst,-1,"Master Data Management Analyst

The successful candidate will have the opportunity to work with our client, a multinational IT company specialized in consumer products (hardware & software) and services.

Location: Cupertino, CA

Duration: 10 months contract with possibility of extension.

Candidate must be eligible for direct W2 contract without employment sponsorship.

Job Descriptions:

The Master Data Management Analyst will be responsible of:

Data management, auditing, cleansing, and migration in PLM and SPA ECC environment.
Analyze issues including large data sets to determine root causes and recommend solutions
BOM setup, breakdown and analysis
System implementation and enhancements including scenario development, user acceptance testing, and go-live readiness.

Job Requirements:

Bachelors’ Degree in related fields.
Minimum 3 years of working experience in master data management with experience in analyzing large data set.
Well-versed with SAP ECC, Agile PLM & Excel.
Strong BOM knowledge to setup, breakdown and analyze
Experience in data management, auditing, cleansing, and migration
Strong analytical, debugging and problem-solving skills; must be able to analyze issues including large data sets to determine root causes and recommend solutions
Excellent communication skills, written and verbal, with ability to understand technical problems and clearly explain solutions
Capable of handling multiple deliverables simultaneously with the ability to set priorities
Previous experience with system implementation and enhancements including scenario development, user acceptance testing, and go-live readiness

Why Kelly®?

As a worker today, it’s up to you to take charge of your career and look for opportunities to learn, grow, and achieve your potential. Helping you find what’s next is what we’re all about. We know what’s going on in the evolving world of work—just ask the nearly 500,000 people we employ each year. Connecting with us means getting the support, guidance, and opportunities needed to take your career where you may have never imagined.

About Kelly®

At Kelly, we’re always thinking about what’s next and advising job seekers on new ways of working to reach their full potential. In fact, we’re a leading advocate for temporary/nontraditional workstyles, because we believe they allow flexibility and tremendous growth opportunities that enable a better way to work and live. Connecting great people with great companies is what we do best, and our employment opportunities span a wide variety of workstyles, skill levels, and industries around the world.

Kelly is an equal opportunity employer committed to employing a diverse workforce, including, but not limited to, minorities, females, individuals with disabilities, protected veterans, sexual orientation, gender identity. Equal Employment Opportunity is The Law.
#KellyGTS

]]",3.4,"Kelly
3.4","Cupertino, CA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1946,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
191,Drug Safety Data Analyst,-1,"Drug Safety Data Analyst
South San Francisco, CA
Initial 6-month contract - client is known to extend contractors out up to 3-years (based on multiple factors such as contractor's performance, business need, budgets etc.)

Duties:
The Drug Safety Data Analyst / Business Systems Analyst reports to the Principal Project and Execution Manager and is part of the Project and Execution Group in US Drug Safety. The Data Analyst is responsible for analyzing and trending a variety of datasets
across USDS, including areas in: Compliance and Training, Safety Case Management and Project Tracking as part of the Project Portfolio Management. The role of the Data Analyst is to provide analytic support by developing a USDS metrics dashboard to the USDS Leadership Team in order to further understand project status and trends within safety reporting and ultimately result in more efficient and improved pharmacovigilance processes.

Job Duties/Responsibilities:
Write, modify and maintain programs that perform complex data analyses
Responsible for data transfers, including documentation and correspondence with internal and external partners
Manage data from multiple sources
Develop programs to provide ad-hoc reports for data review to support USDS across the department: Compliance and Training, Case Management, Portfolio Management
Design and develop a USDS Dashboard on Project Tracking, Compliance and Training metrics
Design and develop Excel macros, Qlikview or Tibco Spotfire visualizations
Programming activities and usage for data management and data review
Develop and maintain Excel, Qlikview or Tibco Spotfire programs including testing and organizing datasets, programs, and related documentation
Ensure all of the programming activities and processes are conducted according to standard operating procedures and good programming practice
May collaborate members of the leadership team to address internal and external data needs/gaps

Skills:
Competencies Identified for Success:
Works effectively, independently and collaboratively
Demonstrates initiative and accountability
Strong organizational skills, detail oriented, ability to adapt to change
Ability to interact effectively in a multifunctional, multidisciplinary team setting
Understands the business, scientific, and regulatory aspects of the organization
Ability to balance competing interests of various stakeholders and strive for achieving mutually beneficial and compliant solutions
Influence decision makers
Education, Experience, and Other Requirements:
Strong Excel programming skills required
Strong Visualization programming skills: Qlikview or Tibco Spotfire
Experience in SAS programming a plus
Experience in programming with large datasets and developing programs, testing and documentation
Extensive experience of handling external data
Knowledge of developing reporting or other systems using Excel and SAS
Working knowledge of statistical research methodology
Good understanding of data cleaning process
BS/MS/MPH in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics or equivalent
Minimum 3 years in Pharma Industry preferred

Education:
BS/MS/MPH in Computer Science, Mathematics, Statistics or equivalent

Additional info:
Reason: Special Project
Job Category: Drug Devt - Med/Clin Affairs
Hours Per Week: 40.00
Is this contractor working in a GMP environment?: No",4.4,"Ascent Services Group
4.4","South San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2000,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
192,Data Science Support Analyst (Journeyman),$89k-$147k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description BAE Systems is seeking to hire multiple Journeyman Data Science Support Analysts to help support counterterrorism intelligence integration on a multifaceted U.S. Government program. The Journeyman Data Science Support Analyst will leverage numerous analytic tools and databases to evaluate information that bolsters the U.S. Governments response to and prevention of potential threats to the homeland and interests abroad.

The Journeyman Data Science Support Analyst is responsible for constructing scripts and configuring controls to support analysts performing repeatable complex database queries in multiple databases. This role is responsible for creating automated-scripting to assist analysts with data discovery. Responsibilities include working independently and collaboratively to identify and implement solutions.
Required Skills and Education
Degree : BA/BS in a technical field such as mathematics, engineering, or computer science (6 years of work experience may be substituted for a Bachelor's degree)
Experience supporting complex data science and analytic projects
Experience/knowledge of computer science concepts including programming, statistics, data architecture, and data analytics
Experience with quantitative and qualitative content analytics
Excellent reading comprehension skills
Detail-oriented with a proficiency for researching, analyzing, and prioritizing intelligence reports and cables
Ability to work with IC tools and databases
Strong problem-solving, analytic, and written and oral communication skills
Excellent attention to detail and ability to accurately follow SOPs
Ability to work shift work/extended hours
Strong interpersonal skills and the ability to work well both independently and in a team environment
Preferred Skills and Education
Demonstrated knowledge of intelligence analysis and experience with synthesizing large amounts of data
Familiarity with analytic tools; experience with constructing and performing complex database search queries across multiple databases
Proficiency with software applications/databases used in support of research and analysis for the U.S. Government
About BAE Systems Intelligence & Security BAE Systems Intelligence & Security, based in McLean, Virginia, designs and delivers advanced defense, intelligence, and security solutions that support the important missions of our customers. Our pride and dedication shows in everything we dofrom intelligence analysis, cyber operations and IT expertise to systems development, systems integration, and operations and maintenance services. Knowing that our work enables the U.S. military and government to recognize, manage and defeat threats inspires us to push ourselves and our technologies to new levels. Thats BAE Systems. Thats Inspired Work. Equal Opportunity Employer/Females/Minorities/Veterans/Disabled/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/Gender Expression. To see Inspired Work in action, visit www.baesystems.com and follow us on Facebook: www.facebook.com/baesystemsintel.",3.7,"BAE Systems USA
3.7","McLean, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
193,Sr Data Analyst - Digital,$80k-$136k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

The Data Analyst - Digital role provides a fantastic opportunity to work with a fast-paced and highly functioning Digital Marketing team. This role is responsible for modeling complex Industry problems, discovering Industry insights and identifying opportunities through the use of statistical, algorithmic, mining and visualization techniques. This role is also proficient at integrating and preparing large, varied datasets, architecting specialized database and computing environments, that will integrate with the Adobe Experience Cloud (e.g. Adobe Campaign, Adobe Analytics, Audience Manager etc.) focusing in areas of customer segmentation and analytics. Data Analyst work closely with SMEs, data stewards, project/scrum teams, and other IT teams to turn data into critical information.

They will need to validate their findings using an experimental and iterative approach. Also, the Data Analyst will need to be able to present their findings by exposing their assumptions and validation work in a way that can be easily understood using strong written and communication skills. These professionals will need a combination of business focus, strong analytical and problem-solving skills, and programming knowledge to be able to quickly cycle hypothesis validation.

Responsibilities:

JOB DUTIES

Leads discovery processes with GMF stakeholders to identify the business requirements and the expected outcome
Models and frames business scenarios that are meaningful and which impact on critical business processes and/or decisions
Works with and alongside business SMEs by suggesting other products of interest
Collaborates with Institute subject matter experts to select the relevant sources of information
Identifies what data is available and relevant, including internal and external data sources, leveraging new data collection processes
Makes strategic recommendations on data collection, integration and retention requirements incorporating business requirements and knowledge of best practices
Develops innovative and effective approaches to solve client's analytics problems and communicates results and methodologies
Works in iterative processes with the client and validates findings
Develops experimental design approaches to validate finding or test hypotheses
Validates analysis using scenario modeling
Identifies/creates the appropriate algorithm to discover patterns
Assesses, with the business, opportunities to enhance the qualification and assurance of the information to strengthen the use case
Defines the validity of the information, how long the information is meaningful, and what other information it is related to
Partners with the data SMEs in continuous improvement processes impacting data quality in the context of the specific use case
Recommends ongoing improvements to methods and algorithms that lead to findings, including new information
Educates the organization both from IT and the business perspectives on new approaches, such as testing hypotheses and validation of results
Helps the organization understand the principles and the math behind the process to drive organizational buy-in
Contributes business metrics to show performance contribution over iterations
Contributes to on-going reporting metrics and data usage patterns to provide feedback to Marketing Management
Leads the design and deployment of enhancements and fixes to systems as needed
Interface with customers to provide issue resolution for products and processes
Maintain technical and functional awareness and competence of supported business applications, and organizational and industry technology standards
May participate in an on-call rotation that requires after-hours and weekend support for production outages and issues
Perform other duties as assigned
Conform with all company policies and procedures
Qualifications:

Knowledge

Data Strategies including customer segmentation, market segmentation
Marketing Campaign architecture
Marketing Analytics
Data Modeling/Engineering best practices
Delivery Methodologies including Agile, Waterfall, etc.
Thorough working knowledge of information systems and operations
Functional knowledge of the business area or areas assigned to them
Full technical knowledge of systems analysis techniques
Preferred Marketing/CRM platform(s) knowledge such as Adobe Experience Cloud and Google Marketing Suite

Skill

Analysis and reporting using knowledge in one or more of the following frameworks: SQL Server, SAS, or Power-BI
Excellent analytical, organizational, problem solving and follow-up skills with the ability to meet time sensitive deadlines
Must be a self-starter and able to manage the investigations function with minimal supervision
Proficiency with Microsoft Office products
Ability to interact with staff at all levels
Ability to make sound decisions and exercise good judgment
Promote a cooperative and productive team environment
Strong communication and interpersonal skills

Education

Bachelor’s Degree in mathematics, statistics or computer science or related field

Experience

5-7 years of relevant quantitative and qualitative research, analytics experience and SQL experience preferred
Knowledge in statistical analysis, quantitative analytics, forecasting/predictive analytics, multivariate testing, and optimization algorithms

Working Conditions

Normal office environment subject to stressful situations

Work is conducted in a professional office environment subject to stressful situations arising from meeting deadlines and managing multiple priorities

Evening and weekend work as required

Some travel to company and vendor sites may be required, including outside the United States

A passport is recommended

#DICE

#LI-KD2",3.2,"GM Financial
3.2","Irving, TX",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1992,Company - Public,Lending,Finance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
194,Programmer and Data Analyst,$38k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Carillon Assisted Living is actively seeking a Programmer and Data Analyst for our corporate office in Raleigh, NC. The Programmer and Data Analyst manages the Programming and Analysis department including developing project plans from internal requests and implementing those plans from initial concept to full production. The department runs primarily on ad-hoc requests with a wide variety of skills necessary to implement the associated projects. The Programmer and Data Analyst must be versatile and excellent at time management. A typical week involves:

Meeting with the CEO and VPO to discuss priorities, statuses of current projects and any requests for new projects
Meeting with outside software vendors to discuss any necessary implementation, customization or integrations
Aiding in the implementation, customization and integrations for third-party software
Designing and proposing plans for projects or analysis necessary to fulfill new requests
Completing or delegating to the team tasks related to any current projects. Tasks generally include:
Developing SQL databases to store data for either program development or data warehousing
Pulling data through outside vendor APIs to move into on-prem data warehouse or to use in in-house programming or reporting
Supporting business decision making processes through analytical analysis of available options
Full-stack programming of any requested web applications
Determining necessary data and analyzing that data to answer questions posed by the VPO and CEO
Developing data visualizations and reports for ad-hoc or continual business analysis
Developing mathematical models for predictive analysis and forecasting
Scheduling and managing team meetings and deadlines for timely project completion
Ensuring all auto-generated reports send on the proper schedule

Qualifications

Required

Bachelors degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or other analytical field
5 or more years of experience in programming and analysis
2 or more years in a management role
1-2 years of experience in business decision making processes, including analyzing and determining a cohesive software suite and developing technical policies and procedures
Excellent communication skills for conveying technical material to non-technical audiences
Experience with full lifecycle project management, including both application development and other large scale projects directed from initial request to full production
Ability to manage multiple project requests with varying priorities and deadlines
Experience maintaining company software suite including implementing customizations and integrations
Experience in full-stack web application development, preferably with C# and Angular 5+
Experience with report development and data visualization, preferably with SSRS
Experience in database development and management including on-prem data warehousing
Experience writing advanced SQL queries and procedures
Working knowledge of REST API's
Experience analyzing data to answer business questions, both on an ad-hoc and routine basis
Experience with Microsoft Excel including writing custom VBA add-ins

Preferable

Masters degree in computer science, mathematics, engineering or other analytical field
7 or more years of experience in programming and analysis
3 or more years in a management role
3 or more years in business decision making processes
Experience with BPM tools
Advanced skill set in Microsoft Office Suite including Excel, Word and Visio
Mathematical modeling abilities including stochastic models and linear optimization",2.0,"Carillon Assisted Living
2.0","Raleigh, NC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
195,Senior Health Data Analyst I,$74k-$127k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Senior Health Data Analyst contributes to the overall success of the organization by developing analytic solutions that support activities related to health services utilization management, care coordination, quality improvement and population health. Through analyzing patient claims, member enrollment, and other data, the Senior Health Data Analyst participates in identifying progress, performance and opportunities for improvement on programs, quality of care, patient experience, and other metrics. The Senior Health Data Analyst requires a thorough understanding of healthcare data and workflows, combined with an extensive experience creating large data sets, conducting statistical data analysis (SAS), and using BI tools (Tableau).

Works closely with other members of the Health Analytics team, as well as the Financial Analytics and Data Warehouse teams to gather key data from various internal and external systems.
Creates data sets, extracts and synthesizes data; conducts and interprets quantitative analyses.
Prepares a variety of reports, including statistical analyses and dashboards that allow key stakeholders to make informed business decisions based on data.
Assists in design and development of data collection strategies, aggregation, analysis, and reporting to ensure data integrity and enhance information value.
Generates a quality work product, presentable for content and audience, in a timely manner while maintaining strong attention to detail.
Manages and prioritizes workload while meeting deliverables and expectations.
Works autonomously and collaboratively with report requestors, providing guidance to define report requirements and validate results.
Works collaboratively across departments to understand and meet analytic needs.
Researches and recommends areas for improvement of data quality and reporting.
Maintains in-depth knowledge of health plan operations, including claims processing, utilization management, quality improvement activities and pay for performance programs
Documents report processes/logic and actively engages in department’s documentation efforts to improve knowledge base of team.
SECONDARY DUTIES AND RESPONSIBILITIES
Performs other assigned or needed activities required to assure success of the organization.
Participates in special projects as needed.
Performs other duties as assigned.

Education and Experience
Bachelor’s degree with concentration in health informatics, health administration, public health, computing, epidemiology, statistics or related field, Master’s degree preferred. Minimum four (4) years of experience in data analysis and reporting.
Special Skills, Licenses and Certifications
Knowledge of major health plan operations: healthcare claims processing, membership, provider, and benefits; or equivalent combination of education and experience. Excellent knowledge of data collection, analysis, statistics and data presentation with experience in data mining techniques and procedures. Experience using statistical packages for analyzing large data sets. Experience working with administrative data, ideally health care data. Understanding of health data formats including claims, lab and pharmacy. Knowledge of clinical coding systems (e.g., ICD9, ICD10, CPT). Proficiency in inferential and predictive statistical analysis. Proficiency in business software applications such as Microsoft Office Suite, SQL, SAS, and Tableau.
Performance Based Competencies
Must demonstrate strong verbal and written communication skills. Ability to clearly communicate complex information to diverse audiences. Ability to communicate data needs to various customers (internal and external) in order to compile and produce necessary reports. Excellent analytical, problem solving, investigative and research ability. Ability to work in a team environment, take and give direction, follow through with tasks and projects, compromise, negotiate and achieve consensus decisions, support consensus decisions, be flexible and adaptable to changes in assignments and the work environment, work independently, manage time efficiently and multi-task effectively. Ability to make decisions that require significant analysis and investigation with solutions requiring critical thinking. Ability to quickly acquire in-depth knowledge of various systems related to claims processing, membership, provider, and benefits at PHC. Ability to present complex information in an understandable and compelling manner. Ability to interpret and understand technical requirements. Must be highly organized and proficient at multi-tasking. Must be willing and able to provide gracious assistance to users, providers, and other constituents of PHC.
Work Environment And Physical Demands
More than 50% of work time is spent at a video display terminal. May be required to bend, stoop, kneel, crawl, or work in other non-standing and non-sitting positions to install cabling, systems hardware, and other related equipment.
All HealthPlan employees are expected to:
Provide the highest possible level of service to clients;
Promote teamwork and cooperative effort among employees;
Maintain safe practices; and
Abide by the HealthPlan’s policies and procedures, as they may from time to time be updated.
IMPORTANT DISCLAIMER NOTICE
The job duties, elements, responsibilities, skills, functions, experience, educational factors and the requirements and conditions listed in this job description are representative only and not exhaustive or definitive of the tasks that an employee may be required to perform. The employer reserves the right to revise this job description at any time and to require employees to perform other tasks as circumstances or conditions of its business, competitive considerations, or work environment change.",3.5,"Partnership HealthPlan of California
3.5","Fairfield, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1994,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
196,Workforce Data Analyst,$33k-$60k (Glassdoor Est.),"*Career Steps Inc.*

*Position Description*

*Title*: Workforce Analyst

*Reports To*: President/CEO

*Exempt*: Yes No

*Supervisory Responsibilities*: No

*Position Summary*

The Workforce Analyst will be part of the CSI Management team to track and report on internal performance, . The position will additionally work with Center staff to ensure that the local operating procedures provide appropriate guidance for front line staff and to evaluate system efficiencies. *This is not an IT position.*

*Essential Skills*

* Strong analytical skills
* Strong data analysis skills
* Solid communication skills
* Detail-oriented/critical thinking skills
* Creativity - thinking outside the box
* Excellent problem-solving skills

*Essential Responsibilities*

* Oversees, collects, compiles, analyzes, and interprets workforce data and information data for the workforce system, management and staff
* Provides detailed analysis of the data in support of the workforce system goals and provides staff with the tools to monitor and achieve performance targets
* Evaluate center staff caseloads and performance then share information with management
* Prepares and provide presentations for staff to individual or in a group setting.
* Track Internal performance using Power Bi and Excel
* Review State performance reports
* Provide guidance on Local Operating Procedures
* Identify CSI and Career and Training Services front line staff in need of training
* Report identified training issues to the and CSI management
* Report weekly trends to CSI management staff
* Other duties as assigned

*Qualification Requirements*

Bachelor’s degree or higher preferred.

PBA (Professional in Business Analyst) preferred

Proficient in Microsoft Office Products including Power BI and expert level Excel skills

Exceptional Customer Service

Excellent oral and written communication skills

Knowledge of the Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act preferred.

*Working Conditions*

This is an administrative office occupation comprised of work that generally involves sitting at a desk or standing in office situations. Travel may be required between all 3 CSFV centers.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $24.00 - $30.00 per hour

Benefits:
* 401(k)
* 401(k) matching
* Dental insurance
* Disability insurance
* Health insurance
* Life insurance
* Paid time off
* Vision insurance
Schedule:
* 8 hour shift

Benefit Conditions:
* Only full-time employees eligible

Work Remotely:
* No",3.0,"Career Steps, Inc
3.0","Daytona Beach, FL",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1992,Company - Private,Education Training Services,Education,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
197,Digital Transformation and Data Analyst (Claims),$40k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"Are You Driven?® We Are.

We are a company of driven, enthusiastic and determined people. We celebrate achievement and success. We foster innovation, determination and recognition. Because of that, our employees feel recognized and rewarded for the contributions they make on a daily basis. At GAINSCO, It is our people that set us apart.

If you are looking for a place where you can make a difference, perceive how your work impacts the company, and be recognized for your efforts and passion, then GAINSCO is the company for you.

Why Join GAINSCO?

By joining GAINSCO, you become part of a dynamic and growing organization that has been recognized as a Top Workplace in both our Dallas and Miami offices.

GAINSCO’s work environment rewards engaged individuals who have a desire to contribute and succeed. That’s because our culture encourages individuals to grow their skills as they build their careers. Come join us and become a champion with GAINSCO.

What does a DIGITAL TRANSFORMATION& DATA ANALYST (CLAIMS) do?
Uncover and communicate performance trends and actionable insights to the business.
Leverage data insights and incorporate these findings to accelerate the digital transformation efforts of the Claims Department.
Complete ad-hoc analysis and offer recommendations based on your findings.
Proactively collaborate with all levels of the Claims organization and offer data-focused support to any relevant business challenges.
Interpret data and analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports
Develop, implement and maintain business monitoring reports
Perform data validation and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and data quality/accuracy
Work with IT to maintain accessibility to databases/data systems
Additional projects as requested
What is required?

Education:
Bachelor’s degree in Mathematics, Risk Management, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management, Statistics or Actuarial.
Experience:
1-2 years of working experience as a data analyst preferred
Ability to identify potentially hidden trends and communicate actionable insights based on your findings.
Experience working within an Auto Insurance Claims department is preferred.
Advanced skills in performing mathematical calculations
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques
Advanced computer skills, specifically in databases and spreadsheets (Excel, SAS, MSSQL preferred, Python, R)
Experience with Machine Learning and Artificial Intelligence is preferred.
Excellent written and verbal communication
Excellent organization skills
Other skills and abilities:
A strong desire to be a part of the conversations that result in improving business processes and results.
Ability to communicate and simplify the complex with a wide variety of stakeholders.
Ability to manage own time while prioritizing multiple tasks
Required behaviors for all positions:
Communicate with co-workers, management, customers, vendors, and others in a courteous and professional manner
Conform with and abide by all Company codes, regulations, policies, values, work procedures and instructions
Regular attendance
What else do you need to know?
Competitive Salary based on experience.
Excellent benefits package: medical& dental (Basic plan FREE), vision insurance, life insurance, short term and long term disability insurance.
Parental Leave Policy.
401K + Company Match.
Paid Vacation + Sick days + Floating Holidays + Company determined Holidays.
All offers are contingent upon a background investigation (including employment, education, criminal and DMV verification- when applicable) and a pre-employment drug test with results satisfactory to GAINSCO.",3.8,"GAINSCO
3.8","Dallas, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1978,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
198,People Data Analyst,-1,"About the team


The Analytics team at Miro has a clear mission - use data to make better decisions. We are a highly leveraged team of folks who pride ourselves on finding ways to answer even the most challenging business questions.

About the role


You understand people and the HR team, and enjoy using data and analytics to bring order to ambiguous problems. From building visualizations to help our People team understand talent trends, to helping model out our plan to meet our hiring goals, you will bring the analytical power to help us win the talent marketplace.

What you'll do


You will be working closely with the Head of People and Head of Business Recruiting. The work will be split among the following 3 buckets:
Design source of truth tables for level 0/1 metrics. Enable access to key metrics and data for non-analysts. Promote use of 'self service' analytics tools by associated teams.
Help structure People Analytics at Miro - work with the stakeholder to identify the right metrics to track and guardrails to monitor to measure success. For example, help us understand our diversity and retention or model capacity based on historical data.
Measure the progress of the People team at Miro - build the core dashboards to help us understand the performance and throughput of our recruiting funnels.
Know where to find the right data to answer a question. Be persistent in ensuring data quality and resourceful in getting data that is not immediately available
Support everyday decision making process for People team
Build next generation reporting for team level 0/1 metrics
Participate in team meetings, understand key metrics of team performance, suggest key metrics and visualizations that need to be regularly reviewed
Provide the team with weekly metrics updates. Proactively analyze large week-over-week or Plan vs Actuals deviations. Recommend operational changes that can drive increased performance. Generate business hypotheses of what drove those deviations.
Find the stories buried in data and build insightful dashboards that enable everyone at Miro to be an analyst
Ensure the team leadership is focused on the most critical questions to optimize Miro's business opportunity
For example, produce recruiting competency factor analysis to improve our hiring process
Bring clarity to overall recruiting funnel and areas that strategically require the most attention
Be a vocal and proactive partner to stakeholders. Guide their line of questioning rather than just fulfilling requests. Provide insights and conclusions rather than data outputs
What you'll need
4+ years of Analytics experience
Some experience in People Analytics/People Ops is required
Experience working in a fast growing startup is a plus
You deliver results quickly with iteration, instead of waiting for perfection
You love telling stories with data - numbers are key, but a business is built with people.
Cross-functional relationships and effective communication are critical to make an impact
Humble, no ego
What's in it for you
Excellent Medical, Dental + Vision health benefits
Scrappy startup environment with hyper growth potential where you'll learn best in class skills
Competitive salaries + Flexible time off
401k matching + Stock options
Free lunches + Office snacks
Be a part of a culture of learning that will take your professional growth to another level with collaborative + thoughtful team members
Distributed team across offices globally in San Francisco, Los Angeles, Austin, Amsterdam, + Perm
About Miro


Miro is an online collaborative whiteboard platform that enables distributed teams to work effectively together, from running brainstorming sessions and workshops to planning projects, from designing new products and services to facilitating agile ceremonies. With over 8 million users, Miro is trusted by Dell, Cisco, Salesforce, PWC, EY, Deloitte and many more global companies of all sizes.

At Miro, we are a team of dreamers. We look for individuals who dream big, work hard and above all stay humble. Collaboration is at the heart of what we do and through our work together we hope to create a supportive, welcoming, and innovative environment. We strive to play as a team to win the world and create a better version of ourselves everyday. If this sounds like something that excites you, we want to hear from you!

Check out our career page for all our open roles or hop onto this Miro board to learn more about us!",4.7,"Miro
4.7","Austin, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
199,Data Quality Analyst,$40k-$71k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

The Data Steward at Southern Management Corporation is responsible for helping drive that improvement in the accessibility and quality of our data assets and tools and allow us to deliver data solutions faster than we do today. This role will be intertwined will all aspects of the business and their vendors to accomplish a robust and comprehensive understanding of the data and how it is intertwined. Our goal is to ensure ability to grow is unconstrained by any limitations of our data.

Responsibilities:
Create and evolve Enterprise Data Standards for SMC including:
Business Terms
Business Definitions
Critical Data Elements
Business Rules
Define and execute processes to monitor data integrity and privacy, establish consistent data definitions, and monitor overall data quality for assigned data entities
Partner with Data Architect Team and business to maintain a business data model and ensure data is aligned across the business
Keep management informed on day-to-day activities and potential risks found
Keep customer engaged by providing feedback on data quality trends and making sure that they are part of the resolution process
Other tasks as assigned
Qualifications:

Education & Experience

Bachelor's degree or equivalent experience
1-3 years of experience in Data Quality, Data Stewardship, Business Analytics, ETL, Business Intelligence

Knowledge, Skills & Abilities:

SQL experience preferred
Passionate about Data Quality
Ability to triage and prioritize tasks based on the business needs
Knowledge of data quality, data management, and master data management concepts
High level of accuracy and attention to detail
Ability to deal with ambiguous situations
Understanding of Data Warehousing concepts
Ability to interface with the business leaders
Proactive and able to work in an autonomous work environment
Proven data gathering and analytical skills
Expertise with Microsoft Office",3.3,"Southern Management Corporation
3.3","Greenville, SC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1986,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
200,Data Analyst - Brand Strategy & Communications,$37k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview


Ayco is an industry pioneer and preeminent leader of company-sponsored financial counseling services.

We believe companies best serve their stakeholders and the greater economy when their employees’ financial lives are clear, understood and in their own control. For nearly 50 years, we’ve aspired to deliver a more productive and engaged workforce to our clients by providing their employees a path to financial well-being through holistic and personalized services tailored for each stage of the career cycle—from entry-level to C-suite.

Training: Ayco has a best-in-class new hire training program, covering the technical and practical elements of the job. Initial new hire training includes a combination of classroom learning, practical exercises, and shadowing of existing associates. Through Ayco and Goldman Sachs University, new hires have access to classes that focus on building foundational professional and technical skills, to culture and learning focused training. We take a personal approach to talent development and foster an environment that values different perspectives, challenges thinking and maximizes the potential of our people. Our annual and ongoing feedback ensures our people and their managers have the information they need to excel in their careers.

Diversity & Inclusion: Ayco values the different perspectives and experiences our associates bring. The firm supports the Ayco Diversity Network, an employee-led initiative open to all associates that provides education and awareness on topics of interest to diverse communities. In addition, our firm wide diversity and inclusion efforts expand professional and career development opportunities through programs such as the Women’s Advisor Initiative to support our commitment to having the best talent at all levels.

Benefits & Wellness: From benefits to wellness, we aim to support your commitment to your job as well as your priorities and interests outside of work.

Career Advancement: Ayco offers coaching, mentoring and on-the-job learning that supports your growth and development.

Visit Ayco.com/careers for more information about the firm

Responsibilities


We have an exciting opportunity for a Data Analyst to join the Brand Strategy and Communications group in Cohoes, NY. This role sits at the intersection of marketing, product, sales, and customer engagement teams, providing measurement and reporting support for cross-channel campaigns.

• Measure and analyze marketing performance of owned channels and cross-channel campaigns (e.g., Web, SEO, Paid Ads, Affiliates, Email, Social Media, etc.) and prepare regular performance reports for the Brand Strategy team and senior management• Work with the website product owner on design of site experiments, implementing and testing personalization opportunities and A/B testing• Continually assess and audit web analytics effectiveness, funnel optimizations and ensure data is accurate • Work with team leads across marketing, engagement and sales on key growth metrics and reporting framework and lead the build of cross-channel dashboards through use of data visualization tools • Be an analytics lead to identify improvements to reporting procedures or advise on technology gaps• Support the implementation of additional analytics toolsets (e.g., Qlikview, Content Square, Tableau, etc.)• Collaborate across functions – Sales Strategy, Sales, Product, and Technology- to discover new sources of data and evangelize data-driven decision making• Mine data from existing databases and extract clear and actionable insights • Work with the Brand Strategy team to develop strong content around extracted data insights that support Ayco’s business goals • Work with the Brand Strategy team to develop, analyze and report on bespoke research studies with internal and external audiences• Work with the Lead management team to develop processes to automate the ingestion, cleaning and categorization of leads• Create reports and dashboards that track leads across the Marketing and Sales funnel, clearly tracking lead stages, lead velocity, lead conversions, revenues • Deliver on ad-hoc data requests, queries, reports and analysis as required

Preferred technology experience: • R / Python / SQL / Alteryx• Tableau / Qlikview• Adobe Analytics / Google Analytics• Adobe Campaign (reports) / Marketo / Pardot• Adobe Dynamic Tag Manager / Google Tag Manager• Adobe Target or other site personalization/recommendation tool• Salesforce / other CRM platforms

Qualifications


• Minimum 2 years of professional experience in an analytics role working full-time with Marketing or Data Analytics teams• Minimum Bachelor’s degree required; Major in data science, mathematics, statistics, engineering, computer science, business analytics or related field • Hands on analytical and measurement experience of digital channels such as Web, SEO, E-mail, Affiliates, Paid Ads, Social Media • Basic understanding of the Adobe Marketing Cloud products• Knowledge of web development technologies - JavaScript, HTML, SQL is preferred• Experience with web personalization, A/B Testing, funnel conversion optimization is preferred• Creative mindset to ideate and test concepts to optimize online and offline audience experiences and maximize user engagement for each digital channel• Experience in modeling and creating compelling insights from data• Highly organized with excellent attention to detail",3.3,"Ayco, a Goldman Sachs Company
3.3","Cohoes, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1971,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
201,Data Reporting Analyst for Non-Profit Service Program,-1,"The Data Management & Reporting Manager provides overall Data Analysis and reporting support for the Mission Services Department of Goodwill. This is an exciting career opportunity to gain relevant work experience in Data Analysis.

40%- Oversees the management of the Front Desk Operations of the Center, including supervising one full-time Reception Clerk. Develops methods to further automate intake processes as well as automate support and administrative processes and Information. Maintains department Sharepoint to ensure ease of use and completeness of materials shared.

60%- Oversees the client tracking database structure. Ensure quality data within the database. Prioritizes inbound data analytics and reporting work requests. Works with program staff and leadership to consult, advise, and perform various ad-hoc and project-based data analysis and reports. This includes both routine operational data analysis and reporting, as well as customized, ad-hoc and business intelligence oriented work.

Required:

1) Knowledge of SharePoint tools like ULS Logs, workflows to automate business processes, and SharePoint forms for tasks as well as document storage.

2) Advanced Excel.

3) Database structure knowledge

4) Some SQL preferred

5) Loads of customer services

No certifications are required. Preference will be given to candidates with a related degree from an accredited college or university.
Please complete the two Indeed Assessments required to be considered for this position: 1) Data Analysis and 2) Phone Screening.*
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $14.00 - $16.00 per hour

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
COVID-19 considerations:
Daily temperature checks, masks and sanitizing supplies required.

Experience:
Office Management/Supervising front desk: 1 year (Required)
Sharepoint (Office 365): 1 year (Preferred)
Data Analysis: 1 year (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Location:
Tallahassee, FL (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
goodwillbigbend.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/GoodwillBigBend
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,"Goodwill Industries, Big Bend","Tallahassee, FL",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
202,Data Analyst,$41k-$73k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst *
National healthcare organization offering a work atmosphere committed to statistical and analytical quality while exploring and leveraging leading edge methodologies for product customization and development. We are looking for an individual who enjoys designing and building report deliverables and using data to answer challenging patient care and business questions, all within a dynamic team environment. We are interested in individuals with the ability to learn quickly, solve problems creatively, and that bring strong communication skills and work ethic while delivering innovative, high quality reporting and analyses to our clients.

This role plays a critical part in designing and building standardized health outcomes reports for our clients. Applicants should have SQL expertise in a SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS) environment that includes, at minimum, experience using subqueries to pull database results. Technical report building skills, combined with data management and statistical skills, will be used to drive improvements in patient care. Advanced knowledge and experience with “real world” data and an interest in behavioral health/clinical outcomes are required. A successful member of our data science team will have a natural curiosity for research, an aptitude for analytics, a desire for data-driven decision making, and interest in improving mental health treatment and outcomes.
Summary of Major Functions *
Provide support to Senior Data Scientist and other Data Scientists in standardized report design and building, data management, data cleaning, and analysis. Drafting both standardized and ad hoc analytics reports for non-technical audiences including visual displays of results. Write new SPSS syntax code and/or modify existing code to conduct analyses. Verify accuracy of reports produced by other Data Scientists.

_The ideal candidate has experience building automated reports in an SSRS environment, or at minimum a desire to learn this skill. _
Minimum Qualifications *
_*Ability to: *_
• Conduct complex SQL queries, including the use of subqueries within a main query
• Perform analytics to drive clinical decision making.
• Use statistical modeling software (i.e., SAS/R/Python Pandas/Stata/SPSS experience) to perform analytics, including writing syntax or code.
• Communicate complex statistical results to non-technical audiences orally, in text, and with visualizations.
• Conduct statistical tests, including but not limited to t-tests, Pearson’s correlation, cross-tabulation with chi-square, and one-way ANOVA.
• Meet deadlines and work diligently as both part of a team and individually.

_*Has: *_
• Organizational and problem solving skills, attention to detail, and strong communication skills, oral and written.
• Critical thinking and logical, analytical skills.
• Proficiency in Microsoft Suite products such as Word, PowerPoint, and Excel.
• Bachelor’s degree in Statistics, Mathematics or another quantitative field, such as Psychology, Economics, or Sociology and 2+ years of experience.
Preferred Qualifications *
_Also Has: _
• Experienced in using BIDS (Business Intelligence Development Studio) or SSRS to build reports containing data tables and visual displays of data
• Experience using Python within SPSS
• Exposure to health care data, specifically mental health and surveys.
• Research/publication background
• Proficiency in more advanced multivariate statistical models, such as MANCOVA, multiple regression, or logistic regression.
• Exposure to nonparametric statistical tests like Spearman’s correlation, Mann Whitney U, or Kruskal Wallis.
• Master’s degree in Statistics, Mathematics or another quantitative field, such as Psychology, Economics, or Sociology and 5+ years of experience.
To submit your resume please click ""Apply Now"". *
Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
SPSS, SAS, Stata, Python Pandas, or R statistical software: 2 years (Required)
SQL queries: 1 year (Required)
t-tests, Pearson's correlation, chi-square, one way ANOVA: 2 years (Required)
Work authorization:
United States (Required)
Application Question:
WILL YOU NOW OR IN THE FUTURE REQUIRE SPONSORSHIP FOR EMPLOYMENT VISA STATUS? (E.G. H-1B VISA STATUS)",3.2,"Horizon Health
3.2","Lewisville, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1981,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
203,Intern - Data Analyst,-1,"Join Episerver in an exciting Internship as a Data Analyst with our Product Team.

As a Data Analyst Intern, you will:
Analyzing historical win/loss data as well as identifying trends in the business
Analyzing product usage by region and customer
Developing reports for C suite
Requirements:
Interested in business
Must be pursuing a Bachelors degree with a major finance or business
Needs to know Excel with experience building pivot tables
This internship will be for 6 months long, 20-25 hours/week, remote-based USA. You will be compensated at $18.00/hour. There are no benefits offered.",4.3,"Episerver
4.3",United States,-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1994,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
204,Intern - Data Analyst - Summer,$57k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Lumen’s internship program is a 10 week, fast-paced and exciting opportunity to gain professional experience within your field of study and career interest. Interns within the Strategic Planning and Transformation organization will be part of an accelerated learning experience, to challenge skills learned in the classroom and develop new skills while working on active Lumen work projects. Data Analyst interns will have the potential to assist in data governance initiatives through data modeling and centralization. The internship will take place in Broomfield, CO from 6/1/2021 - 8/13/2021.

In addition, interns will connect to our company culture through community outreach projects, engaging with our employee resource groups and developing their professional skills and business acumen through exposure to senior leadership, cutting-edge technology, groundbreaking projects, and a network of mentors and fellow interns. Launch your career with Lumen and be a part of something amazing!

Job Description
Implement software to master key data sets and attributes
Set up a common repository for data for cross- functional use across the organization
Consolidate data sets
Qualifications

Minimum Requirements:
Enrolled at a 4-year accredited college or university
Graduating between August 2021 – May 2023
In pursuit of bachelor’s or master’s in information systems or related degree program
Intern is responsible for their travel to/from work location
Must be available to work 30 – 40 hours, during the specified 10-week timeframe
US work authorization is required
Experience with data analysis, statistics, and database management
Experience using PowerPoint, Vizio, Sway, or similar tools
Preferred Qualifications:
Cumulative GPA of 3.0 or higher
Oral presentation skills
Problem solving abilities, techniques
Data visualization tools
Knowledge of data modeling concepts
Basic programming and user experience design knowledge
SQL (structured query language)
Scripting languages (shell scripts, python, Perl, others)
Web design and build – HTML5, JavaScript, CSS
Programming language – any one of Java, JavaScript, C#, R, Python, others
Organizational skills
Ability to work well in team settings, collaborative environment
Negotiation, convincing, consensus building skills
Requisition #: 234855

EEO Statement
We are committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all persons regardless of race, color, ancestry, citizenship, national origin, religion, veteran status, disability, genetic characteristic or information, age, gender, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, family status, pregnancy, or other legally protected status (collectively, “protected statuses”). We do not tolerate unlawful discrimination in any employment decisions, including recruiting, hiring, compensation, promotion, benefits, discipline, termination, job assignments or training.

Disclaimer
The above job definition information has been designed to indicate the general nature and level of work performed by employees within this classification. It is not designed to contain or be interpreted as a comprehensive inventory of all duties, responsibilities, and qualifications required of employees assigned to this job. Job duties and responsibilities are subject to change based on changing business needs and conditions.",3.2,"Lumen
3.2","Broomfield, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,1930,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
205,Senior Data Analyst - CRM,$44k-$85k (Glassdoor Est.),"Zeta Global CRM division provides email, database and interactive marketing services worldwide to clients, the company’s services include strategic campaign planning and optimization, test design, creative development (including rich media), campaign execution, web application development, research, and advanced analytics.

The Analytics team is currently seeking a Senior Analyst. As a Senior Analyst, you will use a variety of data sources and software tools such as SQL, Excel and internal tools to develop reports and insights based on specification provided by clients or client analytical leads.

Primary Job Responsibilities:
Work with digital marketing and CRM partners to understand clients’ requests, design proper metrics reports and dashboard.
Handle data gathering and analysis construction with a variety of data sources and tools.
Develop reports and customized analysis, data organizing and cleansing, and analysis and presentation
Create easy-to-understand data visualization, presentations and provide logical insights and actionable recommendations to clients.
Work with BI and technical team to prioritize and identify the opportunity to automate reports.
Streamline the reporting process; develop repeatable and scalable process and coding across multiple systems and platforms
Work with various businesses and technical teams to make sure the data presented are accurate and flawless.
Well document the standard reporting or analysis procedures and other necessary documents.
Job Requirements:
Minimum Bachelor’s degree in Computer Programming, Statistics, Marketing Analytics or related technical/quantitative field; Master degree a plus
Minimum 3 years of professional experience in an analytical role (prior experience in Agency/consulting or Email industry a plus), digital marketing, database marketing and web analytics a plus
Experience working in rational database, SQL coding, SAS or R or Python programming and extensive Excel skills
Experience working in BI tools, such as Tableau, Microstrategy, Jasper, etc.
Experience in development, presentation and/or deployment of predictive model and segmentation is strongly preferred; knowledge of Machine Learning approaches a plus
Experience working with 3rd party data providers such as Acxiom, IRI a plus
Able to take broad specifications or requests from client and ask the right “questions” to help fine tune the request to help deliver reporting needs. Be able to conduct data investigation when issue arises both independently and/or working with cross functional technical resources, if required, to solve problem
Good verbal and written communication skills; Attention to details, be able to identify data gaps/abnormality in output
Able to plan, organize, & work on multiple projects at once
#LI-MC1

About Zeta Global
Zeta Global is a data-powered marketing technology company with a heritage of innovation and industry leadership. Founded in 2007 by entrepreneur David A. Steinberg and John Sculley, former CEO of Apple Inc and Pepsi-Cola, the Company combines the industry’s 3rd largest proprietary data set (2.4B+ identities) with Artificial Intelligence to unlock consumer intent, personalize experiences and help our clients drive business growth.

Our technology runs on the Zeta Marketing Platform, which powers ‘end to end’ marketing programs for some of the world’s leading brands. With expertise encompassing all digital marketing channels – Email, Display, Social, Search and Mobile – Zeta orchestrates acquisition and engagement programs that deliver results that are scalable, repeatable and sustainable.

Zeta Global is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action employer and does not discriminate on the basis of race, gender, ancestry, color, religion, sex, age, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, medical condition, disability, veterans status, or any other basis protected by law.

Zeta Global Recognized in Enterprise Marketing Software and Cross-Channel Campaign Management Reports by Independent Research Firm

https://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/zeta-global-opens-ai--data-labs-in-san-francisco-and-nyc-300945353.html

https://www.prnewswire.com/news-releases/zeta-global-recognized-in-enterprise-marketing-software-and-cross-channel-campaign-management-reports-by-independent-research-firm-300938241.html",3.3,"Zeta Global
3.3","East Lansing, MI",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2007,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
206,Data Analyst,$38k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"Aculabs, a biomedical laboratory located In East Brunswick New Jersey, is a leader in providing laboratory services to the geriatric population in the mid-atlantic region. Aculabs is accredited and certified by both the Clinical Laboratory Improvement Amendments (CLIA) and the College of American Pathologists (CAP), the most prestigious organizational accreditation awards within the United States.

We are currently seeking an enthusiastic data analyst who is experienced or interested in the healthcare field to gather, combine, and interpret data from numerous platforms in order to assist in enhancing the quality of care to our facilities and improving efficiencies.

Our ideal candidate will have the following qualifications:

· Attention to detail

· Extremely organized

· Excellent verbal, written, and communication skills

· Extensive computer skills including SQL, Access, Excel

· Ability to develop analytical strategies to resolve issues with a mindset for growth

· Ability to interpret statistical data in order to create meaningful solutions that will aid in increasing company efficiency

· Collaborate with company President, Director of Operations, and departmental heads in order to create necessary reports

· Prior experience in the healthcare/laboratory space preferred

· Bachelor’s Degree in related field preferred
Willing to work out of East Brunswick, NJ office. This position does not offer remote days.",2.3,"Aculabs Inc.
2.3","East Brunswick, NJ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
207,"Analyst, Enterprise Data Office",$38k-$68k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description Summary

The HarbourVest Enterprise Data Office acts as a facilitator and coordinator of data governance, data acquisition, and data strategy across the organization. The Analyst will be responsible for measuring data quality, performing root cause analysis, building data remediation plans, implementing data controls, reviewing and maintaining data quality standards, as well as other activities oriented towards improving data management across the organization.

Job Skills & Abilities
Experience doing data analysis is required
Strong analytical capabilities
Comfortable working with large datasets and multiple data sources
Good communication and persuasion skills
Demonstrated understanding of data quality principles and measurement
Project team experience is a plus
Highly proactive and self-motivated with the ability to meet objectives under minimal supervision
Strong presentation abilities
Experience working in an enterprise or cross-functional role is a plus
Private Equity industry knowledge is a plus
Excellent organization skills
Good time management capabilities
Strong affinity for data and attention to detail
Experience using data management tools is a plus
Responsibilities

Data Quality Monitoring and Reporting: 75%
Monitor and report on data quality across the organization, particularly for designated Critical Data Elements
Create and update data quality dashboards for respective data domains on a regular (monthly) basis
Design and develop data quality monitoring, including the development of data quality rules, thresholds and metrics for key investment management data concepts
Prepare materials for regular routines with business and IT stakeholders
Participate in data quality issue root cause analysis and assist in designing action plans for remediation
Partner with domain data stewards to deep dive into data quality issues
Stay current with industry trends on data quality evaluation strategies, automation techniques and data visualization tools
Data Strategy and Standards: 25%
Maintain Enterprise Data Office SharePoint site, including the business glossary
Assist in creating data policies and procedures and ensure teams adhere to these standards
Define and measure cross-domain performance against data quality standards
Education

BS/BA or equivalent

Work Experience

2-5 years of relevant experience",4.0,"Harbourvest
4.0","Boston, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1982,Company - Private,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
208,SAP Data Analyst,$75k-$100k (Employer Est.),"POSITION PURPOSE:

The Data Analyst will be part of the OWI Analytic team, working closely with our business partners, proactively developing and delivering analytic solutions. The primary deliverables include creating data visualization such as Dashboards, Charts, Histograms and Projective Analysis. This will be accomplished by utilizing OWI data architecture, data workflows from local data sources.

OWI is a fast-paced and dynamic organization. Individuals will be handling multiple activities in a team as well as individual contributor environment.

DUTIES, TASKS AND RESPONSIBILITIES:
Experience and expertise creating visualizations that provide business insights for our global customers. Examples: Pie Charts, Dashboards, Cash-flow projections with Histograms– Projections analysis– Financial Analysis – KPI’s Service level Agreements
Expertise in SQL, independently mine data to translate Business data needs into creative visualizations.
Performance tuning specific to Tableau data sets– requires in depth understanding of data.
Assist the Enterprise Data Warehouse team create, design data models that will be published to our Tableau environment.
Assess data quality, design data quality management procedures, clean and correct data quality defects, establish data governance.
Experienced utilizing HANA studio including calculations and analytical views, data base schemas, creating attribute user/role creation.
Assist setting up security, Analytic privileges, user integration services, SQL script, SLT, SDA, SDI and HANA Live solution models.
Demonstrate critical thinking, analytical skills, and employ judgment to offer thoughtful, concise input toward resolutions of problems.
Assist team building the BW4HANA modeler including standard and custom development and deployment of EWD design building BW objects e.g. Composite Providers, Advanced DSO’s, ODS Views, Data Sources, Data Loading using SLT.
Requires the skill set to work with a wide range of stakeholders and functional teams and data analysts/scientists to develop data visualizations that provide business insights
Finance/Operations/Sales/Marketing/IT functional leads PTP/PTM/RTR etc.
Projects management capabilities - include requirements gathering, design, deployment, and change request, future enhancements management
Capabilities to build/design prototypes to demo to stakeholders - peer groups, Business partners, and senior leaders.
Training and support peers and stakeholders e.g. Subject Matter Expert (SME) throughout the report creations and support - troubleshooting, analysis of results.
Leadership skills needed to successfully promote ideas, coordinate work activities, and plan deliverables within a project team.


SKILLS, KNOWLEDGE AND ABILITIES:


Advanced expert database handling languages (SQL and variants)
Experience with data analytics, diagrams, data dictionary, data mapping, normalize de-normalize, agile data modeling
Practical skill sets in BI and Data visualization tools
Working knowledge of ETL
Working knowledge of SAP
Basic Project Management and Business Process modeling
Minimum Bachelor’s Degree in Engineering Technology, Computer Science, or closely related field.
A minimum of 3 years’ experience in Tableau, SAP Data Governance, SAP Data Services (Data Extract, Data Profiling, de-duplication)
Advanced competency in Tableau and Alteryx
Excellent verbal and written communication skills with a strong focus on the ability to clearly articulate and discuss technical issues with both technical and business personnel.
Bachelor’s degree in computer science, Math or a related IT field or equivalent work experience in an IT field required
Strong analytical skills, able to effectively solve problems in a timely manner",3.1,"Old World Industries
3.1","Northbrook, IL",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1973,Company - Private,Chemical Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
209,Business Data Analyst - Medical Economics,$60k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"As a member of the Medical Economics team, you will manage the data and analytic reporting and analysis to support CareCentrix strategic and tactical needs, and to fulfill contractual requirements for external health plan clients. You will analyze extensive financial and healthcare utilization data to develop insights that support business decision and cost savings for CareCentrix.

In this Job, you will:
Under the direction of senior team members, perform analysis of complex and varied healthcare data.
Extract, collect, analyze and interpret data of various types from various sources/
Create Ad-Hoc reports using SQL.
Develop and maintain dashboards of key performance metrics.
Make assessments about health care costs and trends, quality and outcomes.
Present reports and analytic results.
Document issues and problems regarding data sets.
Provide design support for the development of business intelligence solutions.
You will enjoy this role if:
You love data mining and data manipulation, the larger the data set the better!
You love to learn and are curious to understand the nuances of a situation.
You like to move fast.
You enjoy working through ambiguity and a changing market environment.

This job is for you if:
You have a Bachelor's Degree in Machine Learning, Information Technology, Finance, Economics, Statistics or similar.
You have 1-3 years background in data management and healthcare industry (preferred).
You think in quantitative terms. You know Excel, SQL, Tableau and a little about Teradata or Vertica.
You have knowledge of big data concepts.
You have strong focus on process, continuous process improvement and quality
You have some answers but not all of them. You approach problems with questions not answers.
You are fun to work with! We take our commitment to patients seriously, but we don’t take ourselves seriously. We are looking for team members who bring joy to the work they do.

CareCentrix maintains a drug-free workplace.
We are an equal opportunity employer. Employment selection and related decisions are made without regard to age, race, color, national origin, religion, sex, disability, sexual orientation, gender identification, or being a qualified disabled veteran or qualified veteran of the Vietnam era or any other category protected by Federal or State law.",3.9,"CareCentrix
3.9","Tampa, FL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
210,Configuration and Data Management Analyst III,$37k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"Business Group Highlights

Defense

The Defense group supports the Department of Defense (DoD) mission to keep our homeland and its citizens safe. We provide solutions to improve the Nation's defense by providing software, systems engineering, IT, training and logistics and fleet management solutions.

Responsibilities

The successful Configuration Management and Data Analyst will support a new program at Perspecta, focused on baseline establishment and management of a new Space Domain architecture. This CM Analyst will be responsible t establish the technical baseline including all cross-space and ground segment interfaces and to lower levels for interfaces considered to be key to inter- or intra-segment interoperability; Support baseline development for the Segments; Identify disconnects between segments and external agencies, and work the issues to closure; Develop system and segment level requirements that allow the Mission Users to effectively and efficiently interoperate and submit the requirements to the change process.

Baseline Management tasks include establish a formal process for capturing the baseline and managing changes and distribution; Employ this process to identify, control, maintain, make recommendations to evolve, and execute changes to technical baselines; Use change management software to mitigate the risk of unauthorized and unplanned changes to the technical baseline, including document content and the associated links; Provide user access to all databases used to manage the technical baseline; Perform requirements analysis in response to requested changes, addressing flow‐down, and changes to systems engineering products such as ICDs and verification plans; Maintain interface control for all ICDs/ISs that involve interaction between segments, contractors, or external agencies.

The CM Analyst will organize, facilitate and provide agendas, briefings and minutes for all System and Segment level CM‐related boards, forums and working groups.

Qualifications

Requires 5 to 8 years with BS/BA or 3 to 5 years with MS/MA or 0 to 2 years with PhD, or at least 5 years as a CM/DM Analyst.
Experience required supporting similar DoD or Space Domain Configuration Management Efforts
Experience with agile COTS Configuration Management Tools
Minimum TS Clearance required

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
211,"Data Analyst, Payments",$68k-$125k (Glassdoor Est.),"Build out rigorous observability and optimizations across the Stripe Payments Stack

About our Team:


Payments are the core of Stripe's business, and the groups and teams within Payments Infrastructure are broadly responsible for processing and moving these funds at a huge scale.

From the outside, a customer's credit card is charged and the merchant receives a payout to their bank account. On the inside, we have a network of teams that build infrastructure for charging the credit cards (or other payment methods, like bank transfers or Alipay), integrations with our banking partners to send transfers to our users across the globe, systems that collect Stripe's revenue, and more. Collectively, this group powers all payments products at Stripe, and we're looking for talented analysts to come help us organize and understand the data surrounding these complex processes.

You will:
Work closely with product and engineering teams to identify important questions around how to define key metrics
Conduct analyses and opportunity sizing to define addressable markets and operational opportunities for improvement
Develop compelling dashboards and automated reporting related to key performance metrics
Communicate results and influence key decision makers, including engineering, and business leaders
You'd ideally have:


3+ years experience in product analytics
Extensive experience and passion for metrics and dashboards visualizations
Highly skilled at writing SQL to query relational databases; knowledge of R or Python is a plus
Strong communication and presentation skills
Degree in a quantitative field (e.g., Statistics, Economics, Math, Sciences, Engineering)
You should include these in your application:
A resume and LinkedIn profile
A dashboard sample
What's it like to work at Stripe?


Stripe is helping the internet fulfill its potential as a platform for economic progress by building software tools that accelerate global economic access and technological development. Stripe makes it easy to start, run and scale an internet business from anywhere in the world.

We look at Stripe as a constant work in progress and the same is true of our people; for all of us, we believe the best is yet to come. We're here to support each other in our curiosity and creativity – which we pursue through thoughtful discussion and knowledge-sharing among a diverse set of peers and colleagues.

We want to work in a company of warm, inclusive people who treat their colleagues exceptionally well. The kind of people who are committed to going out of their way to help other Stripes in the short-term and pushing them to improve over the long-term (by helping them to get better at what they do).

We're a highly cross-functional organization and view that as part of the fun: we design our space to encourage as much collaboration as possible. We have long tables in the kitchen for a reason (to enable everyone to meet new people and learn from them). We also have a culture of transparency that we carry through to email communication, ensuring that Stripes all around the world have the information they need to make good local decisions.

In both our products and our people, we aim to reflect, represent and advocate for all of our users, globally. Our users transcend geography, culture and language; what we share, collectively, is a drive to create a fairer, more economically interconnected world.",4.1,"Stripe
4.1","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
212,Senior Marketing Data Analyst,$58k-$109k (Glassdoor Est.),"Avant is revolutionizing the world of lending by lowering the costs and barriers of borrowing for everyday people. At our core, we are a technology company that builds advanced platforms and uses custom analytics. Today, we help underserved consumers, the majority of whom get fast funding on our online platform without having to talk to anyone. Tomorrow we plan to use our world class technology and underwriting capabilities to launch new products and bank partnerships that improve people’s financial lives.

We are looking for a highly energetic Marketing Analytics Associate to join our Marketing Team as we grow Avant’s digital banking business, loan, credit card, and more. The right candidate possesses a passion for driving Marketing initiatives using analytical techniques and thrive in the complex environment of experimentation design, marketing optimization, and ROI. This position will report to the Head of Marketing Analytics and work with cross-functional teams consisting of Product, Risk, Operations, and Compliance. Do you want to help a rapidly ascending FinTech company drive its next phase of growth? If so, Avant is looking for you.
What you do at Avant:
Own and drive strategic analytical projects and insights to influence and support Avant’s Marketing initiatives
Perform in-depth Marketing funnel analysis to drive insights on attribution, causation, and incremental lift
Choose accurate metrics for tracking, measuring, optimizing, and improving marketing campaigns across traditional and digital channels.
Drive standardization for data collection procedures to generate information that is relevant for building analytic systems
Develop reports and provide insights behind the data to help marketers be effective.
Collaborate with stakeholders to define and operationalize KPIs for short- and long-term measurements that align with company financial goals and marketing strategy.
Implement and analyze A/B or Multivariate Tests to provide measurable insights to the marketing team on the test data.
Present findings to senior management to drive business and marketing decisions.

Why you are a fit for Avant:
Bachelor’s or Master’s degree in a field that requires quantitative analysis
Advanced SQL, Python or R
Proficiency with Excel or a similar analytical tool (exposure to Looker, Tableau, PowerBi or similar tools is a plus)
Work experience in Marketing Analytics function
Demonstrative management or leadership experience
Experience with Marketing “tech stack” including (not limited to) Google Analytics, Tealium, Heap, Responsys are a huge plus
Understanding of data architecture and how to structure customer and campaign data
Ability to think strategically to understand key stakeholder requests and advocate for data-driven solutions.
An inquisitive, logical mindset with an attention to details- they matter!
Ability to break down complex issues into manageable pieces
Strong written and oral communication skills with both technical and non-technical audiences
Thrives in a fast paced and dynamic environment
Why Avant is a fit for you:

At Avant, we believe our values make a difference:
-We value, support, and help each other grow
-We are committed to active inclusion and diversity
-We are transparent and believe the best idea wins
-We succeed when our customers succeed
-We get sh!t done… responsibly
-And we keep it fun!

We believe that ideas are more important than titles, everything is more fun together, everyone drives change, and everyone is an owner. While we believe the perks and benefits that we offer are terrific, nothing excites us more than having the ability to collaborate with intelligent, highly-motivated and talented people on challenging problems as we work to change the face of online lending.",3.2,"Avant
3.2","Chicago, IL",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
213,Data Analyst,$38k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst

Classification:

Exempt

Reports to:

Manager of Data Analytics & Reporting

JOB DESCRIPTION

General Summary: Fusion Medical Staffing works to provide top healthcare professional talent to our clients nationwide. Our thriving culture, both internally and externally, allows us to focus on our core values and improve the lives of those we touch. Fusion Medical Staffing is an equal opportunity employer.

Essential Functions:

Understanding of the ETL process, data warehousing and associated activities to implement the best programs to use in managing the data
Mine data, analyze data, and assist in the build out of internal analytical tools to improve decision making and support for the analytics team and reporting to cross functional teams.
Assist in the Design, development, and automation of metrics-based internal reporting, including visuals and Ad-Hoc reporting packages
Gather requirements and define scope for reporting needs, meeting to ensure specific data needed on a project basis.
Ability to manage multiple data sources and systems with logic to ensure proper data file creation.
Ensure a high level of communication and liaison duties with IT/Technology and Operational departments.
Work closely with the Finance Team and financial data on performance and variance analytics.
Ensure a high degree of data quality and accuracy in all results and reporting
Special projects, as requested

Competencies:

Strong written and verbal skills
Exceptional attention to detail
Excellent critical thinking skills
Team Player
Humble
Positive
Driven

Work Environment:

This job operates in an office environment and routinely uses standard office equipment.

Physical Demands:

The physical demands described here are representative of those that must be met by an employee to successfully perform the essential functions of this job.

Employee is regularly required to talk or hear
Is frequently required to sit; stand; walk; use hands to fingers, handle or feel;

Position Type/Expected hours worked:

This is a full-time, permanent position. Hours of work and days are Monday through Friday, in between the hours of 8:00am and 5:00pm (there may be some flexibility with start/end times). Regular, consistent and punctual attendance is required.

Required Education and Experience:

3+ Years Relevant Experience in the following focus areas:

BA/BS Business Science or Business Administration, MIS, analytics, statistics, Economics or related field
Experience with Business Intelligence (BI) tools such as Tableau
Strong experience with Tableau
Advanced proficiency in Excel, as well as MS office suites and including MS SQL
Experience in data extraction, data manipulation, synthesis and creating presentations
Experience with analytical initiatives with demonstrated ability to problem solve and think critically; ability to recognize key trends and evaluate results of analysis.
Proficient knowledge of financial and accounting practices and techniques.

Preferred Education and Experience:

Proficiency with SQL and VBA coding
Experience in recognizing, analyzing and communicating descriptive and predictive data for reporting and statistical methodologies.

Other Duties:

This job description is not a comprehensive list of all activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job and is subject to change at any time with or without notice.",4.6,"Fusion Medical Staffing
4.6","Omaha, NE",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2009,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
214,PMC: Senior Data Analyst,-1,"PMC: Senior Data Analyst

COVID-19 HIRING UPDATE: We have transitioned to a remote work model and are continuing to hire during this time. This role is expected to begin as a remote position. We appreciate this is unprecedented times and will work closely with you, taking into account your individual circumstances.

PMC is seeking a Senior Data Analyst who will turn data into information, information into insight, and insight into business decisions. This role will support the subscription strategy team and work heavily with paywall and engagement tactics to drive revenue growth. This position can be based in our West LA headquarters or can be remote in the following states: Arizona, California, Colorado, Delaware, Idaho, Illinois, Maine, Massachusetts, Nevada, Oregon, New York, Texas.

Responsibilities
Interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing visualization and reporting;
Develop and implement data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality;
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain databases/data systems;
Process confidential data and information according to guidelines;
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets;
Filter and clean data to ensure accurate analysis;
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs;
Training end users on new reports and dashboards;
Locate and define new process improvement opportunities.
Requirements
Work experience as a senior data analyst or in a related field;
Technical expertise regarding data models, data mining and segmentation techniques;
Experience in handling large data sets and relational databases;
Strong knowledge of and experience with reporting packages, SQL databases, programming (python, XML, JavaScript);
Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing datasets (Excel, R or SPSS);
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy;
Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings;
Visualization expertise (Looker/Tableau/PowerBI/etc);
Ability to translate business requirements into non-technical, lay terms. High-level written and verbal communication skills. Comfortable presenting analysis.
BS/MS in Mathematics, Economics, Computer Science, Information Management or Statistics a plus.
About PMC:


Penske Media Corporation (PMC) is a leading digital media and information services company whose award-winning content attracts a monthly audience of more than 180 million and empowers more than 1 million global CEOs and business thought-leaders in markets that impact the world. Our dynamic events, data services, and rich content entertain and educate todays fashion, retail, beauty, entertainment and lifestyle sectors. Headquartered in New York and Los Angeles with additional offices in 11 countries worldwide, Penske Media is the way global influencers are informed, connected, and inspired. To learn more about PMC and its iconic brands, visit www.pmc.com.",4.4,"Penske Media Corporation
4.4",Remote,-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
215,"Senior Product Data Analyst, Consumer",$58k-$106k (Glassdoor Est.),"Car shopping is complicated. At CarGurus, we use data and technology to make it simple, giving people the tools they need to confidently find, buy, finance, or sell a car. The best part? Our work makes a real impact. We're the most-visited car-shopping site in the US, and we're expanding globally. Ready to come along for the ride?

About the Role

At CarGurus we use data, not hunches, to inform decisions. Product Analysts play a key role in crafting the data narrative for these decisions. We love to collaborate, we're excited by a challenge, and we believe that ownership enables us to grow.

This Product Analyst role will support the Consumer Products team, where you will have opportunities for outsized positive impact. Your data insights will play a big part in helping millions of site visitors have a more transparent and enjoyable car shopping experience. We are looking for thoughtful, daringly curious candidates who can dive into complex data and draw insightful conclusions. You'll work cross-functionally with many departments and partners, and gain exposure to multiple dimensions of the business.

Our team values diversity in experience and backgrounds—we do our best work when we create a space for different voices and perspectives. Whatever unique experiences or skill sets you bring to the table, we look forward to learning from each other

What You'll Do:
Conduct exploratory data analysis across disparate data sources (e.g. website usage, dealer behavior patterns and customer insights) to understand the performance of existing products and see opportunities for new product offerings
Partner with the product, engineering, marketing, sales, and finance departments to grow our business, including recommending and advocating for performance improvement ideas
Define metrics to evaluate business performance, products and experiments; build reports and dashboards to monitor and understand them
Communicate and present data analysis, visualizations, and insights to key partners
Be a voice and advocate for using data to improve the quality of our decision making
Mentor data analysts on technical and professional development
Who You Are:
4+ years of experience in data analysis (experience in consumer internet, digital marketing or SaaS product data a plus)
Proficiency in SQL and Python/R, or other scripting language
Strong grasp of statistical concepts (confidence intervals, hypothesis testing, regression models)
Knowledge of BI and reporting tools, or demonstrated ability in learning new tool
Ability to influence multiple stakeholders to adopt new data-driven approaches and achieve shared business goals
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
CarGurus Culture:

At CarGurus, we invest in our people's professional growth with everything from learning and development programs to tuition reimbursement. Want to work on projects that expand your skill set without sacrificing your work/life balance? You got it. We also strive to provide perks and benefits that employees actually care about like free lunch, commuter subsidies, and more. That includes equity in the company—our way of showing that we want you here for the long haul.

We work hard every day to build the world's most trusted and transparent automotive marketplace, but trust and transparency don't just apply to our consumers. They extend to our talent, too. We aim to create a workplace where everyone feels they can bring the ultimate expression of themselves and their potential—where you don't just fit, you thrive. We don't discriminate based on race, color, religion, national origin, age, sex, marital status, ancestry, physical or mental disability, veteran status, gender identity, or sexual orientation.

In addition to the US, CarGurus operates sites in Canada, the UK. We have offices in Cambridge, MA; Detroit, MI; Dublin, Ireland; San Francisco, CA and London, UK. Check out our careers page to learn more.",3.9,"CarGurus
3.9","Cambridge, MA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2006,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
216,Data Analyst,$42k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Purpose of Position
The Data Analyst is responsible for the financial planning for managed clients to include creating and managing client operating budgets and client financial workbooks. In addition, the Data Analyst provides business review presentations, client operational analysis, client savings data, and non-standard or customized analysis and reporting.
Tasks and Responsibilities
Creates and presents annual operating budgets for managed clients. Generates business review presentations to support quarterly or annual client meetings. In addition, work on continuous improvement of the budgeting process and templates.
Develops new client workbooks and provides monthly or quarterly client workbook updates. These updates include budget updates and variance analysis in addition to summary updates, operational updates, and additional analysis or reporting as requested or customized for each client.
Creates ad-hoc or customized reports, as requested by clients or OS teams, including savings data or pro forma budgets.
Supports the Owner Services and Managed Sales team with other duties as assigned.
Education
Bachelor's in Finance or Accounting
Years of Experience
0-2 years of experience
Core Competencies
Attitude
Communication & Listening Skills
Initiative
Interest in Company & Position
Knowledge of Specific Job Skills
Related Education or Training
Related Job Experience
Knowledge, Skills, Abilities and Other (KSAOs)
Work experience, preferably in financial/operation analysis and/or planning environment
Strong analytical and organizational skills
Strong communication skills; capable of presenting complex financial information in an easy-to-understand format
Familiar with concepts, practices, and procedures of financial planning & analysis
Advanced proficiency with excel, access and other Microsoft Office applications
Advanced proficiency with Tableau Software
Strong multi-tasking skills
Aviation experience also preferred

Benefits Package:
Full complement of attractive benefits to our team members, including Medical, Dental and Vision Insurance
401(k) Savings Plan. The company provides a 57% matching contribution of your pretax contributions, up to the first 20% of your contributions per pay
Company provided Short Term Disability
Flexible Spending Account (FSA)
Prescription Drug Benefit Plan
Two-week paid vacation
Executive Jet Management is an equal opportunity employer.
To ensure a safe environment, we conduct pre-employment drug screening and background checks.",4.3,"NetJets
4.3","Cincinnati, OH",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1964,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Charter Air Travel,Travel & Tourism,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
217,Jr. Business Data Analyst,$37k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"WebFX is looking for qualified candidates to fill the position of Jr. Business Data Analyst. Employees in this role will gather and analyze campaign data and consult with clients about their business goals and propose solutions and strategies that meet their needs, among other responsibilities.

What You'll Do
Gather and analyze campaign data
Consult with clients about their business goals and propose solutions and strategies that meet their needs
Analyze competitors’ websites and online marketing initiatives
Perform industry analysis and forecasting of trends
Interpret web analytics, demographic data, market research, and buyer behaviors
Optimizing client websites for search engines (on-page SEO)
Create and manage all aspects of SEO, PPC, and paid search ad campaigns for clients
Manage email marketing, website analysis and online advertising programs
Prepare monthly digital marketing campaign reports
Correct technical issues on the backend of website
Perform A/B, website usability, and website conversion rate testing
Responsible for driving client success on the web
5% analyzing clients’ competitors
10% writing ad copy, emails, etc.
10% working in the backend of websites/fixing technical issues
10% creating revenue, ROI and traffic reports for client campaigns
10% managing client projects and ad campaigns
15% performing industry, demographic and market research, and trend forecasting
20% client strategy and analytics
20% client interaction- phone calls, emails, in-person meetings

Note: The Jr. Business Data Analyst is a client-facing position

Training

Our “Bootcamp” web marketing training program will be provided for new WebFX “family members”.
On-site, state of the art training amenities to facilitate departmental trainings, trend watch reports, and monthly Lunch-and-Learns

What You'll Get

WebFX grew 250%+ over the past 3 years, and merit-based promotional opportunities are abundant for new family members who meet or exceed position performance metrics.

Potential Promotional Path for Jr. Business Data Analyst:

Digital Marketing Research Consultant
Director of Digital Marketing
Sr. Digital Marketing Research Consultant

Compensation

$35.5k to $38,500k (potentially higher based on work experience)

GPA 3.8+ : add up to $3k to high range
Elite college or university & graduation with high honors: Add $3.5k-$5k to high range

Candidates interested in the Jr. Business Data Analyst position may also have interest in:
digital marketing, online marketing, paid advertising, search marketing, inbound marketing, web marketing, social media, content marketing, PPC, SEO, SEM, blogging, Facebook, customer service, writing, editing, research, communications, etc.",4.6,"WebFX, Inc.
4.6","Harrisburg, PA",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
218,Data Analyst 2,-1,"Data Analyst 2
Flux Location


Oregon, Portland

Employment Type

ONFT

Apply Now


Data Analyst 2

Flux is currently seeking a Data Analyst 2 to join our project team onsite with our client in Portland, OR. This full-time contract position is located in the Data Integration and Reporting organization within the IT department. This position will draft Extract, Transformation and Loading procedures for implementing data integration and data migration tasks in support of Data Warehousing and other data integration projects. This position will also support operations and maintenance, as well as provide 24x7 production support on a rotational basis.

Position Responsibilities include:
Draft Extract, Transformation and Loading (ETL) procedures for implementing data integration and data migration tasks in support of Data Warehousing and other data integration projects.
Draft ETL procedures, batch processes, and scheduling; troubleshoot problems and make suggestions for performance tuning and system integrity.
Develop mappings and workflows in Informatica to automate data integration.
Develop data models and database design techniques, including relational and dimensional modeling.
Effectively map source to target data to meet business/system requirements.
Implement management approved SQL stored procedures and advanced SQL queries.
Assist with the development of functional and technical requirements documents for diverse audience (technical and non-technical), including migration, implementation and test plans.
Draft working documents for interfaces with non-Standard systems.
Debug, analyze and troubleshoot data quality issues.

Position Requirements:

Education/Experience:
Bachelor’s Degree in Information/Computer Technology or a closely-related field is preferred.
With an applicable Bachelor’s Degree, 5 years of experience in Computer Technology or closely-related field is required.
Without a degree, 9 years of experience in Computer Technology or a closely-related field is required.
Technical Requirements:
5 years of experience in Data Integration Techniques.
Demonstrated experience using an ETL tool such as Informatica Suite (including Power Center and Power Exchange) or an equivalent tool.
Experience with Oracle 11g, 12g, 18c or 19c.
Experience writing DDL and creating database objects.
Experience partitioning database tables.
Experience creating Oracle procedures, functions and views.

Flux Resources, LLC is proud to be an AA/EEO employer and we are committed to engaging with diverse populations. It is our priority to be a leader in creating a workforce that represents the citizens we serve. While providing EEO self-identification information is voluntary, we encourage you to do so as it is pertinent to our commitment of creating a diverse workforce.

All candidates will receive consideration without regard to characteristics protected by applicable local, state or federal law such as race, color, sex, age, religion, national origin, physical or mental disability, pregnancy, marital status, veteran or military status, genetic information, gender identity, or sexual orientation.

FLUX Resources, LLC. wants to ensure applicants who apply for jobs electronically are informed of their equal employment opportunity (EEO) protections as part of the application process through the EEO is the Law and Supplement to EEO is the Law posters. In addition, you can review the prescribed pay transparency nondiscrimination provision.

If you are a qualified individual with a disability or a disabled veteran you have the right to request an accommodation, which can be done by e-mailing us at accommodations@workwithflux.com and providing us with your name and contact information",4.7,"Flux Resources
4.7","Portland, OR",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
219,Data Analyst,-1,"Company*
Juniper is a fast-growing luxury Architectural lighting brand with locations in New York and Connecticut. We serve the high-end Architectural lighting industry; providing innovative, custom solutions to luxury office and hospitality spaces globally.
Job Description: *
The Data Analyst will work under the general direction of the ERP & Inventory Control Manager, responsible for collecting, analyzing, and reporting data to monitor business performance and quality plans to identify improvements; and to ensure the quality and accuracy of that data is used in ways to assist the business make better decisions.
Essential Duties & Responsibilities: *
Collect, interpret data, analyze results using statistical techniques.
Provide reports and ongoing results back to the relevant members of the business.
Develop and implement databases, data collection systems, data analytics and other strategies that optimize statistical efficiency and quality.
Acquire data from primary or secondary data sources and maintain ERP.
Identify, analyze, and interpret trends or patterns in complex data sets.
Work with management to prioritize business and information needs.
Providing technical support across the company.
Identify areas of improvement in business processes and apply support changes to the organization.
Effectively communicate with outside vendors.
Manage and assist with special projects.
Perform other duties as assigned.
Qualifications: *
Bachelor’s degree in Information Management, Computer Science, Business or a related field.
At least two years experience as a Jr. Data Analyst or in a similar role.
Strong analytical skills with the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy.
Able to analyze existing tools and databases and provide software solution recommendations.
Strong verbal and written communications skills.
Excellent computer skills.
Able to work independently with minimal supervision.
Able to work in a support team environment.
Benefits: *
Full Health, Dental, and Vision
Paid time off
401K matching plan
Generous bonus plan
Excellent advancement opportunities

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $0.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Information Management: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Work Remotely:
No",3.8,"Juniper
3.8","Southington, CT",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Public,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
220,Clinical Data Analyst - Indpls Infectious Disease Care,$37k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"We Are Hiring

Clinical Data Analyst - Indpls Infectious Disease Care - Full-Time, Day - Infectious Disease of Indiana - Carmel, IN

Schedule may vary. May work weekends.

Why Join Ascension?
In Indiana, St. Vincent operates 24 hospitals in addition to a comprehensive network of affiliated joint ventures, medical practices, and clinics. St. Vincent's more than 15,000 associates and 3,000 providers offer expertise in a wide range of services including acute/long-term acute care, bariatrics, cancer care, cardiovascular services, emergency/trauma services, neuroscience, orthopedics, pediatric services, primary care, urgent/immediate care, women's health and more. St. Vincent has been serving central and southern Indiana for 145 years.

Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, with special attention to persons living in poverty and those most vulnerable. In FY2019, Ascension provided $2 billion in care of persons living in poverty and other community benefit programs.

Ascension includes more than 150,000 associates and 40,000 aligned providers. The national health system operates more than 2,600 sites of care – including 150 hospitals and more than 50 senior living facilities – in 20 states and the District of Columbia, while providing a variety of services including clinical and network services, venture capital investing, investment management, biomedical engineering, facilities management, risk management, and contracting through Ascension’s own group purchasing organization.

What You Will Do

As an Associate with St. Vincent Health-IN, you will have the opportunity to collects and analyzes clinical data from multiple sources for the development of reports and statistical information.

Responsibilities:
Compiles analytical and statistical reports.
Formulates, defines and recommends scope and format of reports.
Oversees provision of ad hoc management reports.
Reviews information for accuracy and reconciles data on a regular basis.
What You Will Need

Licenses/Certifications/Registration:
Preferred Credential(s):
Minimum Qualification: None Required
Education:
Diploma
High school diploma/GED with 2 years of experience, or Associate's degree, or Bachelor's degree required
Work Experience:
None required.
Equal Employment Opportunity
St.Vincent is an EEO/AA Employer M/F/Disability/Vet. Please click the link below for more information.
http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/eeopost.pdf
EEO is the Law Poster Supplement
http://www.dol.gov/ofccp/regs/compliance/posters/pdf/ofccp_eeo_supplement_final_jrf_qa_508c.pdf
Please note that Ascension will make an offer of employment only to individuals who have applied for a position using our official application. Be on alert for possible fraudulent offers of employment. Ascension will not solicit money or banking information from applicants.

E-Verify Statement

This employer participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify links below for more information.

eVerify

Right to Work",3.4,"Ascension
3.4","Carmel, IN",-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
221,Senior Analyst/Data Scientist,$141k-$225k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Edmunds were driven to make car buying easier. Ever since we began publishing printed car guides in the 60s, the company has been in the business of trust, innovating ways to empower and support car shoppers. When Edmunds launched the car industrys first Internet site in 1994, we established a leadership position online and have never looked back. Now, as one of the most trusted review sites on the Internet, millions of visitors use our research, shopping and buying tools every month to make an easy and informed decision on their next car. For consumers, we bring peace of mind. For dealers, we make tools to help them solve their problems and sell more cars. How do we do it, you ask? The key ingredients are our enthusiastic employees, progressive company culture and cutting-edge technology. Want to join the team? Read on to find out how!

What Youre Applying For:

Edmunds is seeking a skilled, creative and enthusiastic Senior Analyst/Data Scientist experienced in generating actionable insights from large sets of data, measuring business performance, and identifying areas of growth and optimization using advanced analytical (modeling, machine learning) and experimental approaches.

The ideal candidate is also a natural problem-solver that enjoys working with large data sets and is proactive in exploring database tables and using data to make clear and convincing business cases.

The analyst will play a crucial role in supporting our Tier 1 team by developing, improving, and maintaining digital advertising revenue forecasts & models, monitoring major KPIs, and understanding impact to other areas of the business. This person will be expected to understand the details and complexity of the companys digital advertising revenue to ensure that the executive team has a clear and accurate pulse of the business, and recommend action plans to optimize against the companys revenue goals, and identifying areas of optimization and growth by extracting insights through modeling, testing and experimentation.

In addition, this person will be expected to take ownership of projects to continually improve reporting quality through automation. This person will also be expected to promote the use of self-service analytic tools across internal clients, and provide training for these tools.

This individual will be tasked to work cross-functionally with Product, Sales, Ad Operations, and Paid Media teams to optimize digital advertising products and revenue through A/B testing and experimentation, measuring and uncovering results based on changes to website traffic & consumer site behaviors, and recommending areas of paid marketing spend.

The right candidate will have experience working across business and functional boundaries, partnering with internal clients to provide decision-making support through analytic insights.

This is a great opportunity for an individual with significant business acumen that is interested in playing with the wealth of structured and unstructured data that is available within the car buying ecosystem. Curiosity and business intellect a must.

What Youll Do:
Develop, evaluate, refine, and automate analytic models using data to address business needs, and identify areas of optimization and growth
Prepare visualizations of data in order to explain and persuade
Design, conduct and lead complex analyses that mine, extract, track, report and analyze performance metrics
Provide recommendations to key stakeholders and support the business need
Create and produce forecasts, reports, ad hoc requests, dashboards, etc. utilizing our data warehouse and other data source systems and summarize your findings
Interact with multiple teams in different departments and define requirements for reporting
Challenges:
Edmunds is a fast growing and innovative company. Qualified candidate should possess strong project management skills, and an ability to multitask and balance competing priorities
What You Need:
Strong analytical and data mining skills
Excellent data extraction and manipulation skills - SQL experience required
Strong data modeling / statistical analysis / predictive modeling experience required (R and/or Python)
Excellent presentation and communication skills
Exposure to BI tools such as Tableau is a plus
Bachelors degree in a quantitative field, such as mathematics, statistics, physics, computer science, business analytics, etc. with at least 5 years of relevant and progressively complex work experience
Working @ Edmunds.com:

Employees think its a pretty great place to work and some pretty impressive publications think it is too: we have been recognized as one of the best places to work by the Fortune Magazine and Great Places to Work, LA Business Journal (for the last 6 years!), Computerworld, and Built in LA. We've also been identified as one of the best workplaces specifically in Technology and also for Diversity and Asian Americans. In fact, our CEO, Avi Steinlauf, was rated as one of Glassdoor's Highest Rated CEOs! If youre interested in learning more and joining our mission, wed love to hear from you!

Edmunds will consider for employment qualified candidates with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the requirements of all applicable laws.

*LI-POST",3.6,"Edmunds.com
3.6","Santa Monica, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1966,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
222,DATA SCIENCE & TAGGING ANALYST,$55k-$98k (Glassdoor Est.),"DATA SCIENCE & TAGGING ANALYST BETHESDA, MARYLAND DESCRIPTION Mission Essential is currently seeking Data Science & Tagging Analysts. REQUIREMENTS · Applicable degree(s): Computer Information Systems, Computer Science, Database Administration, Data Science, Engineering, IT Management, Mathematics, or Statistics (or another quantitative field). · Minimum five (5) years of experience manipulating data sets and building statistical models, and familiarity with: · Coding knowledge and experience with several languages (C, C++, Java, JavaScript, etc.); · Statistical and data mining techniques (Regression, Random Forest, Boosting, Trees, text mining, social network analysis, etc.); · Querying databases and using statistical computer languages (R, Python, etc.); · Using web services (Redshift, Spark, DigitalOcean, etc.); and · Creating and using advanced machine learning algorithms and statistics (regression, simulation, scenario analysis, modeling, clustering, decision trees, neural networks, etc) · These five (5) years may be concurrent with requisite years of experience. · Strong problem solving skills with an emphasis on product development. · Proven ability to drive business results with data-based insights. · Demonstrated expertise with developing and implementing data management strategies, processes, and technical solutions. · Demonstrated expertise with one of the key data management knowledge areas: data management, data quality, metadata management, data governance, data modeling and design, data storage and operations, data integration and operability, document and content management, reference and master data. · Outstanding oral and written communication skills with the ability to conduct independent research, filter and synthesize data, and produce clear, logical, and concise recommendations to policy and decision-making data management and governance professionals. · Outstanding interpersonal skills, including the ability to work independently and in a team or collaborative environment, to work with all levels of employees from support staff to senior leadership, and to be proactive and responsive in communicating with all stakeholders. · Knowledge of advanced statistical techniques and concepts (regression, properties of distributions, statistical tests and proper usage, etc.) and experience with applications. · Expert Level Must have Masters + 10 yrs experience, OR BA + 12 yrs experience, OR, AA +14 yrs experience, OR No degree +20 yrs · Senior Level Must Have Masters + 8 yrs experience, OR BA +10 yrs, OR AA +12 yrs, OR No degree +18 yrs · Mid-Level Must Have Masters + 2yrs, OR BA +4 yrs, OR AA +6 yrs · TS/SCI Clearance with CI Polygraph Required · Experience analyzing data from 3rd party providers (Google Analytics, Site Catalyst, Coremetrics, Adwords, Crimson Hexagon, Facebook Insights, etc.) · Experience visualizing/presenting data for stakeholders using (Periscope, Business Objects, etc.). · Demonstrated expertise managing competing priorities while maintaining a high level of attention to detail; demonstrated ability to work effectively with senior leaders in a high profile and demanding office. · Outstanding analytical and critical thinking skills, including the demonstrated ability to think strategically, identify needs and requirements, and develop recommendations and solutions. · Outstanding leadership and managerial capabilities, including the ability to effectively direct tasking, and assess and manage performance. · Knowledge of the IC, ODNI, DoD, and the overall national security apparatus. · Assist the Government to mine and analyze data from various databases to drive optimization and improvement of strategy and policy development. · Develop custom data models and algorithms to apply to data sets. Recommend, develop and support implementation of best practices for standardizing data across its lifecycle through engineering, development and governance. · Advise on a range of Enterprise and IC data management matters through their application of substantive, analytical, operational, program management, and/or IC expertise. Mission Essential considers all applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or veteran status. Mission Essential is an EEO/AA employer and a VEVRAA Federal Contractor. Job Type: Full-time Pay: $1,200.00 - $4,200.00 per month Experience: * data science: 1 year (Preferred) * analytics: 1 year (Preferred) * data scientist: 1 year (Preferred) * hadoop: 1 year (Preferred) * full agile sdlc methodology: 1 year (Preferred) Benefits: * Other Schedule: * Other",3.9,"Mission Essential
3.9","Bethesda, MD",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
223,Data Analyst - Case Specialist,$40k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Join a fast-growing company with a vibrant, entrepreneurial culture, dedicated to being the top provider in the class action recovery space! Financial Recovery Technologies has become a trusted partner to hedge funds, mutual funds, custodians, sovereign wealth funds, and other institutional investment firms. Our best-in-class people and technology have made FRT a market leader.

As a Data Analyst – Case Specialist, you will work with case and client data to ensure we deliver accurate, high-quality damages and eligibility information to our clients, providing the information they need in order to make decisions about whether and how to pursue recovery opportunities after portfolio losses.

The Role: As a Data Analyst – Case Specialist, you will:
Own and master case (lawsuit) information, as well as client data as it relates to specific cases
Dig deeply into clients’ transactions and holdings data to perform reconciliation, identify data gaps, and find potential solutions
Ensure the accuracy and quality of data relating to clients' eligibility to recover funds in connection with the settlement of lawsuits and enforcement actions
Bridge the gap between the technical and the nontechnical
Translate between our legal and technical teams, ensuring an accurate interpretation of legal and financial language in legal documents and an appropriate application of that language to the data at hand
Understand corporate actions and their impact on clients' trading history
Communicate results of client data analysis to non-technical client service professionals to facilitate client decision-making
Ask questions and test assumptions made in the handoff of information between our legal, case, and data operations teams
Build strong relationships with peers across corporate functions, including:
Client service professionals, who you’ll work with to provide clients with complex eligibility analyses
Operations professionals, who will rely on your analysis skills in filing claims, remediating deficiencies, and remitting payments
Product and technology teams, who will count on you to serve as a resource as they develop technology to support operational requirements
Our ideal candidate has:
Deep analytical experience, including hands-on work processing information and testing assumptions - a minimum of 3 years' overall professional experience is necessary
Solid experience in financial services (experience in trading or with derivatives would be a plus!), as well as strong SQL skills
Top candidates will be able to recognize and understand the relevant features of various financial instruments in client-provided data and incorporate that understanding into high-quality loss analytics
Experience evaluating existing processes and developing effective process improvements;
An ability to multitask, prioritize, and balance varied tasks on a daily basis;
Strong verbal communication skills
Self-confidence sufficient to execute on tasks independently, trust his/her judgment, and yet know when to ask questions
An intellectually curious personality and a demonstrated commitment to continuous improvement
WHAT FRT OFFERS:
Competitive salary and bonus
Health, dental, vision
401k (with company match)
Income protection plans (life, accidental death and dismemberment, short- and long-term disability) and access to a suite of voluntary benefits
Fun, smart, diverse colleagues
Currently we are remote but under normal circumstances we also offer:
Close to public transit (walking distance to Wellington T on Orange Line)
Free drinks and snacks
Free parking onsite
Free access to onsite gym
THIS POSITION IS BASED IN OUR MEDFORD, MA HEADQUARTERS. LOCAL CANDIDATES ONLY, PLEASE.

AGENCIES: WE ARE NOT WORKING WITH AGENCIES ON THIS REQUISITION.",4.5,"Financial Recovery Technologies
4.5","Medford, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2008,Company - Private,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
224,"QA Analyst, Data Quality",$34k-$60k (Glassdoor Est.),"Spokeo is a people search engine that both enlightens and empowers our customers. With over 12 billion records and 18 million visitors per month, we reconnect friends, reunite families, prevent fraud, and more. Every day our nimble team takes on enormous challenges in data science that push the limits of the cloud and search architecture.

The QA Analyst - Data Quality will have the opportunity to impact the quality of the billions of records at Spokeo. QA Analysts collaborate with the Data Engineering team to develop test strategy, test plans, and create test-data to test the business logic and data pipelines. You will get to work with very interesting technologies such as Airflow, Spark, Pentaho. We look for people who are self-motivated and passionate about designing and implementing efficient automated tests to raise the quality of our product.

Responsibilities:
Responsible for analyzing business requirements and creating test plans/test data to ensure that source to target business logic is implemented as expected.
Detailed test plans will ensure the source to target mapping is implemented as expected by the data pipelines.
Review acceptance criteria for the user stories & execute required tests
Collaborate with the Development team members to assess the best strategy to test the ETL jobs.
Own defect management lifecycle
Requirements:
Must have strong data/analytical skills
Extensive experience testing ETL jobs using tools such as Pentaho, Informatica, Talend.
Experience with creating, troubleshooting, and improving complex SQL queries
Experience creating sample test-data from large data-sets
Ability to debug/troubleshoot large sets of data or format related issues
Experience with and a very detailed understanding of data profiling
Bonus:
AWS knowledge - S3, DynamoDB, EMR, etc
Experience working with Pentaho
Privacy Notice for Candidates: https://www.spokeo.com/recruiting-policy

Spokeo is an equal opportunity employer. Applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, disability or protected veteran status. Spokeo fosters a business culture where ideas and decisions from all people help us grow, innovate, create the best products and be relevant in a rapidly changing world.

Recruiters or staffing agencies: Spokeo is not obligated to compensate any external recruiter or search firm who presents a candidate or their resume or profile to a Spokeo employee without 1) a current, fully-executed agreement on file and 2) being assigned to the open position (as a search) via our applicant tracking solution.

]]>",3.6,"Spokeo
3.6","Pasadena, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2006,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
225,Senior Data Systems Business Analyst,$61k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"ROLE SUMMARY

The primary function of the High throughput Clinical Immunoassays and Diagnostics (HCID) team is to generate high-quality assay data in a regulated cGLP laboratory setting to support Pfizer’s vaccine programs. The purpose of this position is join the High throughput Business Analytics team to contribute to a harmonized process across HCID functional areas in the development of written end-user requirements for data systems used in various laboratory processes, and testing of systems prior to validation and deployment in the Production environment.

ROLE RESPONSIBILITIES
Assist in the Development of Laboratory Data Systems
Contribute to a consistent, harmonized process across HCID functional areas for the development of end-user requirements for various internal data systems used in the regulated cGLP laboratory space.
Develop end-user requirements for data system builds requested by HCID functional area managers as well as for functional enhancements to existing builds.
Assist and perform end-user testing of various data system builds against end-user requirements to ensure that these systems function as intended by the end user.
Collaborate with Pfizer IT organizations on data system projects according to VRD priorities.
Attend regular meetings with HCID functional area leaders to review and monitor various data system projects.
Documentation Support
Write and review end-user requirements documents for various data system builds used in HCID per the current good documentation practices.
Review and approve various standard operating procedures (SOPs), as assigned.
Maintain compliance with SOP periodic review process.
Monitor the SOP review and approval workflows for authored SOPs.
Author, review and approve technical reports, as assigned.
Training and Safety
Maintain strict compliance with departmental and site safety regulations.
Take ownership of and successfully complete all assigned training.
BASIC QUALIFICATIONS
MS/MA in a science-related discipline such as computer science / mathematics or biological science with 0+ years of hands-on industry experience with the development and testing of electronic data systems. Or BS/BA with at least 2 years of industry experience.
Must have strong verbal and written communication skills.
Must be detail oriented
Must have a be able to effectively describe complex laboratory and data-handling processes verbally and in writing in a way that is logical and can be understood by both data system specialists and laboratory personnel.
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Working knowledge of laboratory information management systems and a basic understanding / familiarity with SQL and computer programming.
Direct hands-on experience with LabWare LIMS is desired.
1+ years’ experience as a Business Analyst in a corporate environment
Must be able to describe laboratory processes in the form of flow charts and testable, line-item requirements.
Proficient in Microsoft Office 365 applications and MS Visio
Strong attention to detail and commitment to operational excellence.
Basic working knowledge of laboratory assays that measure antibodies and other macromolecules in various biological fluids.
Ability to collaborate and work in a team environment
Direct hands-on experience working in a regulated (cGLP) environment.
The ability to understand, develop and effectively describe complex laboratory and data-handling processes both verbally and in writing is required.
Must be attentive to details and have a passion for data quality.
Occasional evening and weekend work and some business travel is required.

#LI-PFE

Other Job Details:

· Location: Pearl River, NY

· Eligible for Employee Referral Bonus

Relocation support available
Sunshine Act

Pfizer reports payments and other transfers of value to health care providers as required by federal and state transparency laws and implementing regulations. These laws and regulations require Pfizer to provide government agencies with information such as a health care provider’s name, address and the type of payments or other value received, generally for public disclosure. Subject to further legal review and statutory or regulatory clarification, which Pfizer intends to pursue, reimbursement of recruiting expenses for licensed physicians may constitute a reportable transfer of value under the federal transparency law commonly known as the Sunshine Act. Therefore, if you are a licensed physician who incurs recruiting expenses as a result of interviewing with Pfizer that we pay or reimburse, your name, address and the amount of payments made currently will be reported to the government. If you have questions regarding this matter, please do not hesitate to contact your Talent Acquisition representative.
EEO & Employment Eligibility

Pfizer is committed to equal opportunity in the terms and conditions of employment for all employees and job applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, age, gender identity or gender expression, national origin, disability or veteran status. Pfizer also complies with all applicable national, state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment as well as work authorization and employment eligibility verification requirements of the Immigration and Nationality Act and IRCA. Pfizer is an E-Verify employer.
Information & Business Tech",4.1,"Pfizer
4.1","Pearl River, NY",-1,10000+ Employees,1849,Company - Public,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,Biotech & Pharmaceuticals,$10+ billion (USD),-1
226,Associate Research Analyst- Data Science Division,$55k-$112k (Glassdoor Est.),"Wednesday, September 30, 2020

The Data Science Division works on projects to help the Department of the Navy and other government agencies to develop advanced analytics and algorithms for systems, sensors, networks, and platforms to ensure America's defense in the 21st century. DSD researchers have relevant experience (either in course work, previous job experience, or military experience) in programming, machine learning, model building, and data visualization.

CNA fosters an inclusive culture that values diverse backgrounds and perspectives. Our flexible and engaging work environment encourages iterative and creative collaboration at every stage of the problem solving process. Our employees are committed to helping clients develop effective solutions to better manage their programs through scientific, data-driven approaches.

We are looking for creative and innovative individuals to help carry out our mission.

PRIMARY PURPOSE

Staff at this level will provide research, analytical, and technical support on a range of projects.

JOB DESCRIPTION AND/OR DUTIES

1. Under close supervision, conducts research and analysis that meets CNA’s quality standards* on focused, structured questions. Can effectively apply standard, routine, and well-established analytic methodologies. With minimal direction and supervision, routinely produces analysis that is logical and traceable as well as objective and unbiased. Shows some analytic creativity

2. Develops rudimentary institutional knowledge of primary clients/sponsors; their culture, organization, and issues.

3. Contributes productively and harmoniously to the work of others; treats everyone respectfully, professionally and fairly. Keeps others informed. Actively engages with colleagues and works with manager to identify opportunities for collaborations with

4. Supports business development efforts and/or marketing activities by conducting background research and helping prepare materials under the direction of more experienced staff.

5. Limited interaction with sponsors/clients and their study POCs under the supervision of an experienced colleague.

6. Impact largely confined to individual project work.

7. Demonstrates basic, effective communication skills, both written and oral. Can effectively present work to colleagues and CNA managers.

8. Works under close supervision on focused, well-structured pieces of projects.

9. Exhibits a positive attitude in interactions with colleagues and clients/sponsors. Serves as an effective member of project or research team by supporting leadership as needed.

10. Performs other duties as assigned.

JOB REQUIREMENTS

1. Education: Minimum Master’s degree in a relevant field (data science related field) or equivalent experience.

2. Experience: Typical minimum requirements Master’s & 0+ years of experience in research and analysis.

3. Skills: Facility with Microsoft Office applications (Excel, Word, Access, Powerpoint); Ability to manage databases; Ability to gather and organize information on policies, systems, problems, or procedures; Strong critical thinking and organizational skills; Basic knowledge of research techniques; Ability to plan and organize tasks effectively, both as an individual contributor and as a team member; Basic, effective communication skills. Skilled in programming (R or Python), statistics, machine learning, data visualization and other data science fundamentals.

4. Other: Ability to obtain and maintain an Active Secret Security Clearance.

CNA is committed to providing equal employment opportunities (EEO) to all employees and applicants for employment without regard to race, religion, color, sex (including pregnancy, gender identity, and sexual orientation), parental status, national origin, age, disability, family medical history or genetic information, political affiliation, military service and protected veterans, or other non-merit based factors. In addition to federal legal requirements, CNA complies with applicable state and local laws governing nondiscrimination in employment in every location in which the company has facilities. These protections extend to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting and hiring practices, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation, and training and career development programs. For more information about EEO protections, please view the EEO is the law posters below: ""EEO is the Law"" Poster; ""EEO is the Law"" Poster Supplement. The pay transparency policy is available here: Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Poster

To be considered for hire, all individuals applying for positions with CNA are subject to a background investigation. For positions requiring access to classified information, U.S. citizenship is required. Individuals will also be subject to an additional government background investigation, and continued employment eligibility is contingent upon the ability to obtain and maintain an active security clearance.

Other details
Job Family
Research
Job Function
Career Path II - Expert & Research Specialist
Pay Type
Salary",3.3,"CNA Corporation
3.3","Arlington, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1942,Nonprofit Organization,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
227,Tableau Developer & Data Analyst,-1,"We're hiring!

Leaf Group is looking for an experienced Tableau Developer & Data Analyst for Saatchi Art to join our Business Intelligence (BI) team in Santa Monica, CA.

Saatchi Art is the world's leading online art gallery, established with the goal of helping people all over the world connect with art and artists they love. We offer an unparalleled selection of paintings, drawings, sculpture, and photography in a wide range of prices, and provide artists worldwide with an expertly curated environment in which to exhibit and sell their work. Based in Los Angeles, Saatchi Art is redefining the experience of buying and selling art, making it welcoming and accessible for artists and collectors alike.

Leaf Group is a house of digital brands, creating and cultivating digital-first companies in growing lifestyle categories, including Fitness & Wellness, Art & Design and Publishing. Our media and marketplace brands are authentic and authoritative, reaching a large and growing passionate, creative audience.

We work in a fun, collaborative environment that is diverse, adventurous, and open-minded. We look for proactive, accountable people focused on continuous learning and growth to push themselves and our businesses forward. Check us out here: https://www.leafgroup.com/brands/

A big vision calls for a big job. As we grow, our need for a Tableau Developer & Data Analyst grows with us.

You'll Report To: Sr. Director, Business Intelligence

A typical day as a Tableau Developer & Data Analyst might include:
Create complex SQL queries and perform ad-hoc and exploratory data analysis.
Provide data-driven insights to enable decision-making.
Create data visualizations using Tableau
Work with the business units to establish KPIs and methodology, and then create the appropriate reports and analysis.
Develop, own, and present dashboards to Senior Management that provide actionable insights.
Investigate data anomalies and perform Root Cause Analysis (RCA).
Audit peer reports and provide constructive feedback.
You'll be successful if you are a motivated Data Analyst with strong SQL/Tableau skills and are looking to join an energetic, fast-paced, project-driven BI team.

What You Have:
BA in a quantitative field such as Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics or Mathematics or equivalent experience.
3+ years practical experience in SQL query scripting, debugging, and execution.
2+ years of experience building Tableau dashboards.
1+ years of experience working in a data-intensive organization with large-scale datasets.
Excel proficiency is required.
Previous eCommerce experience is a plus.
Proficiency in Python or other scripting language is a plus.
Excellent verbal and written communication.
Not afraid to wear multiple hats - no job being too small or too large.
We're casual and informal but we work hard and work responsibly. Personal accountability goes a long way. We believe we are the change.
What We Have:
eHow is the 2019 & 2020 People's Choice and official Webby Winner for Social Video/How To-DIY
Well+Good is the 2019 People's Choice winner of the Webby's Award for Best Lifestyle Brand
Leaf Group is among TalentDesk's 2019 Best Companies To Work For
Leaf Group is among the 2019 Built In LA Best Companies To Work For
Leaf Group is among Comparably's 2018 Best Companies in Los Angeles
Well+Good is the 2018 winner of Fast Company's Most Innovative Company Award
MyPlate is the 2018 winner of the Webby Award for Best Design
Winner of the 2017 Best Company for Diversity award Comparably
Competitive compensation and benefits packages (i.e., Medical, Dental, Vision, FSA, 401K)
Discounted gym memberships
Paid-to-play vacation rewards
Discretionary unlimited vacation time
Employee discounts for Saatchi Art, Society6, and Deny Designs
Leaf Group, Ltd. is an equal opportunity employer. Applicants for all job openings are welcome and will be considered without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, age, sexual orientation, physical or mental disability, or any other basis protected by state, federal, or local law. It is the intent of the Company to comply with all applicable federal, state, and local legislation concerning equal opportunity in employment.

Agency Disclosure:

If the Leaf Group Talent Acquisition department, or any current company employee, receives an unsolicited resume from a third party recruiting agency and Leaf Group does not have a signed Agency Agreement active, Leaf Group will not be deemed liable to pay a placement fee. The unsolicited resume will be considered a gift and can be considered for our recruitment efforts.",4.1,"Leaf Group
4.1",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2006,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
228,R1939878 -Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst/Data and ETL Architect - Vice President,$141k-$229k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Applications Development Technology Lead Analyst is a senior level position responsible for establishing and implementing new or revised application systems and programs in coordination with the Technology team. The overall objective of this role is to lead applications systems analysis and programming activities.

Responsibilities:

Partner with multiple management teams to ensure appropriate integration of functions to meet goals as well as identify and define necessary system enhancements to deploy new products and process improvements
Resolve variety of high impact problems/projects through in-depth evaluation of complex business processes, system processes, and industry standards
Provide expertise in area and advanced knowledge of applications programming and ensure application design adheres to the overall architecture blueprint
Utilize advanced knowledge of system flow and develop standards for coding, testing, debugging, and implementation
Develop comprehensive knowledge of how areas of business, such as architecture and infrastructure, integrate to accomplish business goals
Provide in-depth analysis with interpretive thinking to define issues and develop innovative solutions
Serve as advisor or coach to mid-level developers and analysts, allocating work as necessary
Appropriately assess risk when business decisions are made, demonstrating particular consideration for the firm's reputation and safeguarding Citigroup, its clients and assets, by driving compliance with applicable laws, rules and regulations, adhering to Policy, applying sound ethical judgment regarding personal behavior, conduct and business practices, and escalating, managing and reporting control issues with transparency.

Minimum education required: Bachelor’s degree or equivalent in Engineering, Computer Science or Technology related or Business Administration
Minimum experience required: 10+ years of experience in Data Integration, Data Architecture, ETL Architecture, Design and Development

Skills required:

Must have 10+ years’ experience in Architecture, Design and Development of Big data platforms, Hadoop, Apache Spark, Hive, Hue, Query IT, Avro, Parquet, Cloudera , Data-mere, Arcadia.

Must have 10+ years of Ab Initio ETL and Data Management solutions including ability to understand the internal working of variety of Ab Initio components.

Must have experience in delivering Metadata management strategy and reusable Bigdata and Rules based Ab Initio solutions using Ab Initio’s technical and business metadata components.

Must have experience creating highly efficient reusable frameworks and design patterns in Ab Initio. Must have experience with performance tuning techniques in Ab Initio.

Must have demonstrated knowledge across full suite of Ab Initio toolsets e.g. GDE, EME, BRE, Express>It, Data Profiler and Conduct>It.

Must have practical experience with number of techniques involved in ETL and Data integration space including ability to Design highly efficient end-to-end large scale ETL solutions.

Must have experience in data management functions including data governance, data design, master data management, metadata management, and data quality management.

Must have experience with Oracle database

Must have experience leading teams to deliver efficient data driven solutions key stakeholder management.

Job Family Group:

Technology

Job Family:

Applications Development

Time Type:

Full time
Citi is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer.
Qualified applicants will receive consideration without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, or status as a protected veteran.

Citigroup Inc. and its subsidiaries (""Citi”) invite all qualified interested applicants to apply for career opportunities. If you are a person with a disability and need a reasonable accommodation to use our search tools and/or apply for a career opportunity review Accessibility at Citi.

View the ""EEO is the Law"" poster. View the EEO is the Law Supplement.

View the EEO Policy Statement.

View the Pay Transparency Posting",3.8,"Citi
3.8","Tampa, FL",-1,10000+ Employees,1812,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$10+ billion (USD),-1
229,Data Analyst II,$44k-$79k (Glassdoor Est.),"You’re not likely to find another company like Vermeer. Our people are from all walks of life in locations around the world, rolling up our sleeves and getting tough work done every day. Together. We’re a family-owned and operated company with an unmatched culture, one that is built on the belief that every Vermeer team member has real, personal impact – on our people, our customers and our world. Whoever you are and where you are in your career, Vermeer helps you be Equipped to Do More®.

Job Summary

Work Shift

1 - First ShiftThe Data Analyst II is responsible for performing complex data analysis to make sense of, and draw conclusions from, information buried in raw data. This position works closely with project team members and business units to identify data-related issues and solve them. This role must be an expert at querying information in relational databases like Oracle, Microsoft SQL, and PostgreSQL and able to document findings in tools such as Word, Excel, or Power BI.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities include the following. Other duties may be assigned.

1. Exhibit the Vermeer characteristics of caring culture, demonstrating agility, customer focused and stewardship while modeling the associated behaviors.

2. Analyze data sets using various statistical methods to identify patterns within data, to gain insight into process performance, and identify opportunities to enhance decision making. Leverage current information sources including databases, process models, business requirements and other artifacts to research and resolve issues. Interpret, draw conclusions, make recommendations, and present findings to customers to support business questions and promote data literacy. Assist the business to take advantage of opportunities to improve data usage, analytical processes, and business process improvements.

3. Contribute to a data strategy and approach including inventory of data sources, metadata, quality, issues, reconciliations and remediations. Participate in planning and execution activities to identify, extract, reconcile, transform, load, and validate and/or converted data. Create mapping specifications, review data models, update business data definitions, and maintain process and project documentation as needed.

4. Define data quality operations and support the development and use of automated tools to deliver comprehensive data cleansing, matching, and quality monitoring capabilities for master and transactional data. Ensure high quality data is collected and discover the source data that causes issues for downstream applications, processes, and reports. Troubleshoot and resolve discrepancies to maintain data integrity and quality of information assets.

5. Prepare data documentation for specific projects or domains. Participate in unit testing and/or user acceptance testing for deliverables. Provide post implementation support for data reconciliation and quality issues.

6. Participate in product evaluations, requirements gathering, and business decisions to ensure new solutions are aligned with the company’s strategic goals and are scalable into the data warehouse platform.

Education and/or Experience

- Bachelor’s Degree in Information Technology, Computer Science, Business or related field.

- Minimum of 4 years previous experience with data and application standards, development, and integration; and/or equivalent combination of education and experience required.

Other Skills and Abilities

- Ability to shorten development cycles by implementing new and reusable technologies at Vermeer. Ability to examine business and development processes and apply continuous improvement methods to identify opportunities.

- Ability to define, create and complete a technical task without guidance.

- Excellent analytical skills.

- Ability to maintain positive interpersonal relationships which encourage openness with customers and peers; ability to develop interpersonal relationships with co-workers, staff, clients and the community to meet or exceed expectations.

- Demonstration of excellent written and verbal communication skills. This position requires presenting design recommendations to both technical and non-technical audiences. Clarity of ideas and overall understanding is crucial.

- Ability to create accurate, professional and error-free documents.

- Ability to manage multiple projects while applying project management and organizational skills for task breakdown, planning, and prioritization.

Travel

Up to 5% domestic and/or international travel by car or plane may be required.

All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, gender, gender identity, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability or veteran status. Applicants requiring a reasonable accommodation due to a disability at any stage of the employment application process should contact Team Member Solutions in human resources at (641) 621-8767 or at hr@vermeer.com.",4.0,"Vermeer
4.0","Pella, IA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1948,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
230,Senior Data Visualization Analyst,$52k-$96k (Glassdoor Est.),"Guild is hiring for a Senior Data Visualization Analyst who will sit at the intersection of data, infrastructure, and analytics, to help shape and deliver business-critical reporting and value-added data insights for Guild. You will be responsible for organizing, standardizing, and analyzing our data to tell deeper stories about our business – where we are, where we've been, and where we need to go. This role will have a critical impact on the business and our students by providing visibility into and opportunities for improvements across all aspects of our operations.

As a Senior Data Visualization Analyst, you will:
Develop a deep understanding of business and operational needs by building strong cross departmental relationships.
Support Guild's Analytics teams by creating, maintaining, and improving insightful reporting which enables our business partners to access actionable, insightful data to drive decision making.
Partner with Data Services teams to deliver clear, accurate analytical datasets which drive high-quality reporting, including creation of production-quality code base.
Perform in-depth data QA by diving in to various data sources to identify and resolve issues
Maintain and manage an intake of requests from stakeholders, understanding the priority and impact of various reporting requests, and managing expectations for delivery.
Translate business questions into analytical requirements as part of a well-defined development cycle.
Monitor performance, accuracy, and usage of existing data and reports.
Act as subject matter expert for Looker within the Analytics team, supporting team members in troubleshooting issues that arise.
In addition to working on the Decision and Data Science team, in this role you will collaborate with other Guild leaders including: Jack Chang (Senior Manager - BI Infrastructure), and Noah Yetter (Data Engineer).

You are a strong fit for this role if you have:
Proven business experience with SQL, Excel/Google Sheets, and BI Tools
Demonstrated attention to detail and commitment to reporting accuracy
Analytical, intellectually curious, creative problem-solver who is comfortable going beyond data access to analytics and strategic insights
Keen design and data visualization skills – you know how to transform data to generate useful insights and be easily digestible
Strong written and oral communication skills – you can build analytical and decision support models, synthesize recommendations, and create effective presentations for all audiences
Team player mindset, with strong interpersonal and influencing skills
Passion for our mission – Guild is pioneering a new path for education as a benefit in a complicated and regulated space – success means quickly and effectively adapting your expertise
Preferred Competencies:
Analytics and reporting experience in a B2B sales environment
Demonstrated experience building insightful reporting in Looker
Something else? Wonderful, we're curious to learn more about you!
About Guild

Guild is increasing economic mobility for working adults by partnering with the largest employers in the country to offer education as a benefit to their employees via our marketplace of nonprofit universities and education institutions. Guild's proprietary technology platform facilitates the administration of this innovative benefit and our team of coaches helps each employee navigate the path back to school, providing individualized support from day one through program completion.

We also just became the latest female-led company to hit a $1billion valuation and the only B-corp with those qualifications. Our Series D round was led by Ken Chenault, General Catalyst Partners chairman and former CEO of AMEX, and joined by Emerson Collective, LeadEdge Capital, and Iconiq.

Guild Education is an equal opportunity employer. We celebrate diversity and are committed to creating an inclusive environment for all employees.",3.5,"Guild Education
3.5","Denver, CO",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
231,Sr. Business Data Analyst,-1,"Responsibilities*:
Performing data cleaning, data modeling, data crunching and in-depth data analysis on KPI’s and optimization of subroutine analytics of communications and data mining methodologies
Develop visual, interactive reports using Tableau, Power BI for effective prediction and understanding of data analysis trends and creating automated data analysis workflows using Alteryx designer.
Supporting the Director of Business Planning Analytics through both ad-hoc and project work by analyzing sales data for new opportunities, providing customize reporting and recommendations in support to on-going business decisions and, conducting quantitative analysis including but not limited to ROI, trending, identification and assessment of opportunities and risk, forecasting, regressions, correlation, cannibalization and probability modeling.
Utilizing Excel advance techniques like Pivot Table, V-Lookup H-Lookup for mining data and performing analysis on various sources and summarizing data.
Implementing statistical algorithms such as Linear, Logistic Regression, and Clustering for segmentation's, Time series model (ARIMA), Factor analysis for building correlation, prediction and visualization of the model.
Performing A/B testing and target vs control analysis and profiling, market basket analysis to identify trends and analyze customer purchase behavior.
Working on Waterfall as well as Agile environment including the Scrum process.
Familiarity with statistical programming languages and packages (SAS, SPSS, R, Python)
Utilizing the knowledge of quantitative analytics, data mining, statistics and data visualization to present insights to the senior management to facilitate in strategic decision making.
Working on various reporting objects like Dimensions, Measures, Filters, Calculated Fields, transformations, parameters, conditional formatting, DAX queries, Interactions etc. in Power BI.
Performing Dimensional Data Modeling, Process Modeling for Data Warehouse /Data Mart design, identifying Facts and Dimensions, the creation of cubes, Star Schema, and Snowflake Schema.
Performing exploratory data analysis and data investigation using Alteryx, SQL and Python.
Data management and analyses to enable customer support teams using Excel, Google Sheets, Tableau, Power BI and SQL
Performing descriptive, diagnostic, inferential, prescriptive, and predictive analysis of data.
Extensively working on the creation of customer segmentation, profiling and defining customer purchase patterns using existing customer demographic/transactional data.
Creating engagement tracking dashboards and funnel reports for the mobile app to assist the
Product development team through Mix-panel and New Relic.
Performing A/B testing
Communicating insights from data analysis and influencing change and generating insights and recommendations and presenting these to the senior management.
Performing descriptive, diagnostic, inferential, prescriptive, and predictive analysis of data.
Extensively working on the creation of customer segmentation, profiling, and defining customer purchase patterns using existing customer demographical/transactional data.
Verification of various offers/promotions set by the business teams with pre/post transactional data.
Extracting data from various sources (Oracle, Databricks, MongoDB) using DB queries, Designing and implementing dashboards based on transformed data.
Required *
At least 5-7 years of experience in Analytics
Experience in business requirements gathering
Ability to problem solve and break down complex problem into solvable pieces
Ability to deliver quick and accurate results for each analysis/task
Good communication skills
Experienced in data management, data analysis, data extractio
Skills Matrix -: *
Strong in SAS, SQL
Strong Analytics Background with good exposure to model development, reporting tools (Tableau, PowerBI)
Strong in Advance-Excel, preferably VBA
Strong in basic Accounting and Finance
Patterned and Trend Analysis
Experience in Alteryx, Python/R, SQL, Spark SQL, Oracle, Microsoft Azure Databricks
Excel (pivots, VLOOKUP’s, basic formulae), Power Point (charts, graphs)
Analytics concepts: Test and Control methodology (Sales data analysis, Loyalty Program Analytics, Customer segmentation, Descriptive analysis, Cohort Analysis, Offers/Promotions data trend analysis (coupons, bonus offers, rewards, member offers)
Statistical Techniques (Probability distributions, Confidence Intervals, Statistical Inference, Average, Median, Time Series, Pre and Post data analysis)

Job Type: Contract

Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Contract Length:
1 year
Varies
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",4.2,"mroads
4.2","Irving, TX",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Private Practice / Firm,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
232,Marketing Data Analyst,-1,"WHO WE ARE*
Wilshire Law Firm is one of Southern California’s largest plaintiff personal injury, employment, aviation and class action law firms, and recognized as a 2020 Best Law Firm by U.S. News & World Report. To date, our team of nearly 200 legal professionals has recovered more than $750,000,000 for the Wilshire Law Firm client family, providing exceptional service every step of the way.

Utilizing diverse talents and a deep-seated drive to succeed, Wilshire Law Firm consistently delivers on our greatest commitment—achieving the absolute best results for our clients. We constantly ask ourselves, “What can we do better?” We dream big, going beyond what we have done before to redefine our future. Bring your knowledge, your creativity, your passion, and your confidence, and help us empower the world to do more.
Job Description *
Wilshire Law Firm is seeking a full-time Marketing Data Analyst to work as part of our stellar, legal marketing team, in our LA office. You must have outstanding analytical skills, a positive attitude, a creative mind, and the ability to handle multiple projects at once. Essentially, you will hit the ground running with the help and support from everyone at our firm.
Your duties and responsibilities include writing content for: *
· Thrives off of data and analytics

· Perform in-depth attribution and data analysis, including web analytics

· Partner with relevant departments, including IT to develop strategic reporting and dashboards

Perform web analytics tracking initiatives using Google Analytics

· SQL knowledge required

· Knowledgeable in marketing business analytics

· Preferable experience with marketing technologies, including Salesforce CRM, Invoca, Tableau, Domo, Python, digital ads, PPC

· Able to handle large data sets, including advanced Excel experience including pivot tables

· Oversees database development and modification efforts.

· Designs and implements secure, efficient, and accurate databases.

· Maintains current and accurate knowledge of data storage and management best practices.

· Ensures that databases are designed to meet specifications and requirements at the lowest possible costs.

· Ensures that database projects are completed on time and within estimated costs.

· Develops and maintains documentation and standards.

· Gathers, organizes, and interprets statistical data from the database to provide reports to, and answer questions from, upper management.

· Performs other related duties as assigned.
To be considered for this position you must: *
• Work extremely well under pressure, adhere to deadlines.

• Be organized and detail-oriented.

• Possess excellent English written and oral communication skills.

• Have an understanding and sensibility of the legal market and consumers.

• Have strong research and analytical skills.

• Be able to perform with little supervision.

• Positive attitude, work ethic, and ability to multitask across a multitude of projects and tasks.

• Agency experience, plus.
Desired qualifications: *
Bachelor’s degree or relevant work experience.

Analytical/Marketing background.
BENEFITS PACKAGE*
Wilshire Law Firm offers competitive pay, great opportunities for growth and advancement and a competitive benefits package, including PTO policy, paid holidays, company-paid medical coverage option, option (plus HMO, PPO and PPO with Health Savings Account options), dental, vision and life insurance. We also provide company-paid life/AD&D coverage, EOP assistance and parking in the office building. We also sponsor professional development trainings and educational conferences.

We strive to maintain a familial atmosphere and team work environment by working collaboratively and hosting various firmwide social events throughout the year.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday",4.5,"Wilshire Law Firm
4.5","Los Angeles, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2007,Private Practice / Firm,Legal,Accounting & Legal,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
233,Laboratory Analyst I (Data Review),-1,"URGENTLY HIRING!!! *
Job Description*
Overview: * ACS Laboratory is the largest Cannabis testing laboratory in the Southeastern USA and we want YOU to join our dynamic team! We are currently seeking a Laboratory Analyst I for Data Review (Full Time).
At ACS Laboratory, we provide a cutting-edge training program with excellent opportunities for growth!

We also offer a total benefits package that includes: 401k, PTO and Flex time off, medical, dental, vision and life insurance. If you are highly motivated, reliable and want to experience working in one of the top laboratories in the nation, please send resume and cover letter.

The Laboratory Analyst I, will play an integral role in the overall support of the laboratory. The Laboratory Analyst I may coordinate and perform tasks and activities in several areas of the laboratory. Each day the Laboratory Analyst I may be assigned specific areas of responsibility within the scope of the job as outlined herein. Depending upon the area of responsibility the Laboratory Analyst I will monitor and prioritize tasks involved, in addition to routine laboratory support duties.
YOU MUST HAVE LABORATORY WORKI**NG EXPERIENCE* (Chemistry degree or Florida licensed technician preferred).
Duties and responsibilities

Reviews and prepares accurate sample results

Assists with training of new employees

Performs and maintains documentation to comply with laboratory requirements

Reviews, maintains, and assists in updating internal SOP. Collects & records QC data or other similar data. Participates in QA processes, accordingly

Practices and actively participates in laboratory safety

Meets annual training requirements

Review instrument qualification documents in compliance with internal guidelines.

Perform data review for analytical test results generated by QC department for compliance with internal SOPs, and Specifications.

Review, support and escalate Out of Specifications (OOS) events. Ensures that investigations assigned to data or documentation are appropriately resolved prior to data verification and final sign.

Discusses data interpretation with individual analysts and elevate, if necessary, to determine data disposition.

Facilitates laboratory data or documentation corrections with analysts to ensure accuracy.

Support in maintaining and updating relevant SOPs for data review and reporting as needed.

Support Laboratory Inspection Readiness at site in coordination with Site QA.

Ensures data integrity through the use of data review controls and electronic data audit trails.

Review stability protocols and reports for commercial and R&D products in compliance with internal SOPs and Regulatory guidelines.

CMTL Analysts must be trained by the CMTL on the minimum requirements for sampling and the Standard Operating Procedures for sampling and security.

Qualifications:

Ability to read and comprehend methods and other instructional documents

Attention to detail and the ability to perform and document work in an accurate and repeatable fashion.

Hands on experience with HPLC and GC including computerized software required for the operation of the equipment or analysis of results, preferred.

Proficiency in computer skills (Microsoft Office: Outlook, Excel, Word etc.…)
Knowledge in sample preprocess, complex preparation, data review, reporting, and instrument maintenance.
Stress and time management skills
Excellent written and verbal communication
Adheres to safety and compliance policies and procedures
Must be available to train and work on weekends
Must be a minimum of 21 years of age
Must be able to pass a comprehensive background check and drug/alcohol test
CMTL Employees must not work for an MMTC, regardless of whether compensation is received; nor shall CMTL Employees receive any form of compensation or benefits of any kind from an MMTC while employed by a CMTL.
CMTL Analysts must have, at a minimum, a bachelor's degree in a natural science, to include, but not be limited to, biology, chemistry, physics, engineering, or environmental sciences; or hold a current license as a Clinical Laboratory Personnel, as defined in s. 483.803, F.S, from the Florida Board of Clinical Laboratory Personnel.
YOU MUST HAVE LABORATORY WORKING EXPERIENCE*
Must demonstrate the following attributes:
Honest and trustworthy
Respectful
Possess cultural awareness and sensitivity
Exceptional attendance & punctuality
Chemistry degree or Florida licensed technician preferred

Hours: Rotating schedules and weekends are required.

Available Shift(s): 6:00 am- 2:30 pm, 8:00 am- 4:30 pm, and 11:30 am- 8:00 pm (this position requires working a full shift every Saturday, taking off one day during the week).

Please note: this job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive list of activities, duties, or responsibilities that are required of the employee for this job. Duties, responsibilities, and activities may change at any time with or without notice.

$15-$17/hr

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $15.00 - $17.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Health insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Night shift
Overtime
Weekends
Experience:
Laboratory: 2 years (Required)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Location:
Sun City Center, FL 33573 (Required)
Shifts:
Evening (Required)
Mid-Day (Required)
Morning (Required)
Working Days:
Saturday (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
acslabcannabis.com
Benefit Conditions:
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",4.0,"ACS Laboratory
4.0","Sun City Center, FL",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
234,Business Data Analyst,-1,"Business Data Analyst

Are you a passionate leader looking for autonomy and exciting career possibilities? Do you take an energetic and resourceful approach to problem-solving while bringing innovative ideas and analytics to life on behalf of your team and your customers? Do you enjoy effectively translating requirements into an efficient process and/or system solution? If so, DHL Supply Chain has the opportunity for you.

Job Description

To apply knowledge and analytics to develop and communicate timely, accurate, and actionable insight to the business through the use of modeling, visualization, and optimization. Responsible for the reporting, analyzing, and predicting of operational processes, performance, and Key Performance Indicators. Communication with site leadership, operations, and finance on efficiency, customer requirements, account specific issues, and insight into to the business, operations, and customer.

• Applies hindsight, insight, and foresight techniques to communicate complex findings and recommendations to influence others to take action

• Uses knowledge of business and data structure to discover and/or anticipate problems where data can be used to solve the problem

• Uses spreadsheets, databases, and relevant software to provide ongoing analysis of operational activities

• Applies data visualization for discovery and timely insights to decrease Cycle Time to Action (CTA)

• Assists site operations in identifying areas for improving service levels, reducing operational costs, and providing other operational enhancements

• Supports account start-up analysis and/or report implementation as needed

• Develop standardized and ad hoc site and/or customer reporting

• Streamlines and/or automates internal and external reporting

• May investigate and recommend new technologies and information systems

• May conduct feasibility analyses on various processes and equipment to increase efficiency of operations

• Partners with Finance to develop financial models to analyze productivity and payroll; calculates cost benefits and business impact and proposes solutions

• Develops predictive models to help drive decision making

• Designs, develops, and implements data gathering and reporting methods and procedures for Operations

• Responsible for tracking, planning, analysis, and forecasting of storage capacities, inventory levels, equipment and/or labor requirements

• Coordinates with Operations Systems group to ensure technical issues and problems are being identified, addressed, and resolved in a timely manner

• May coordinate with ILD group on issues related to modeling customer solutions, including providing data and relevant insight for customer pursuits

• Responsible for assisting finance and senior leadership in modeling yearly labor budget based on operational and profile changes

Required Education and Experience

• Undergraduate degree in business, logistics, mathematics, statistics, or related field, required

• 1-3 years of analytics experience, required

Our Organization has a business casual environment and focuses on teamwork, associate development, training, and continuous improvement. We offer competitive wages, excellent affordable insurance benefits (including health, dental, vision and life), 401K plan, paid vacation and holidays.

Our Organization is an equal opportunity employer.",4.0,"DHL
4.0","Livermore, CA",-1,10000+ Employees,1969,Company - Private,Logistics & Supply Chain,Transportation & Logistics,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
235,Product Data Analyst - Identity Verification,$55k-$102k (Glassdoor Est.),"At Remitly, we help immigrant communities around the world send $6 billion a year to their loved ones. Sending money is faster, easier, and costs less with our all-digital money transfer platform. We want to transform the lives of immigrants and their families by providing the most trusted financial service products on the planet. At Remitly, your work has a direct and positive impact on people around the globe. Your work matters, every day.

The Role:

The Identity Verification Program is a component of Remitly's AML Compliance Program. Anything less than an exceptional product experience for Identity Verification can be a barrier for our customers. As a Product Analyst on this team, you will work with product managers, engineers, and UX designers to help us develop instant verification experiences that strengthen our relationships with our customers so they can send what they need safely, securely and quickly. The quantitative insights you bring will have an out-sized impact on our customers. You will report directly to our Director of Product Analytics.

What You'll Do:
You will develop an understanding of the customer experience and bring it to life in a visual way.
You will uncover customers insights in our compliance experience, with the goal of increasing customer trust through recommendations on the product roadmap.
You ask, ""Why?"" and question the status quo. You view unexpected data results as a puzzle to be solved, a challenge that you accept.
You can explain the methods behind your analyses and validate your results. Once you have data to support your ideas, you're willing to advocate for and move your recommendations forward.
Who You Are:
Bachelor's degree in a technical, business, or quantitative field (Computer Science, Engineering, Statistics, or related field).
Minimum three years of relevant experience in a product or customer analytics role.
Experience designing and analyzing A/B experiments and are comfortable with basic statistical techniques
Experience working at startups or large consumer internet/technology companies
Experience with technical skills (e.g. SQL, R, Python) and data visualization tools (e.g. Tableau)
Who we are:

Remitly is a group of passionate people working to make international payments easier and more transparent on both the web and mobile devices. We are seeking team members to join us that want to make a difference and change an industry. We pride ourselves on aiming high and delivering results, data being at the heart of everything we do, and encouraging our team to own business decisions and outcomes. Sound like the place for you? Join us.

Our Benefits:
Unlimited paid time off
Health, dental, and vision benefits + 401k plan with company matching
Company contributions to your HSA or FSA plan, if you choose one
Continuing education and corridor travel benefits
Scholars program
Remitly is an Equal Opportunity Employer. Equal employment opportunity has been, and will continue to be, a fundamental principle at Remitly. We are committed to nondiscrimination across our global organization and in all of our business operations. Employment is determined based upon personal capabilities and qualifications without discrimination on the basis of race, creed, color, religion, sex, gender identification and expression, marital status, military status or status as an honorably discharge/veteran, pregnancy (including a woman's potential to get pregnant, pregnancy-related conditions, and childbearing), sexual orientation, age (40 and over), national origin, ancestry, citizenship or immigration status, physical, mental, or sensory disability (including the use of a trained dog guide or service animal), HIV/AIDS or hepatitis C status, genetic information, status as an actual or perceived victim of domestic violence, sexual assault, or stalking, or any other protected class as established by law.

Remitly is an E-Verify Employer",4.4,"Remitly
4.4","Seattle, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
236,Data Analyst,$49k-$88k (Glassdoor Est.),"A Data Analyst job in St. Louis, MO is currently available through Belcan. In this role, you will be responsible for creating reports and dashboards. To be considered for this role, you will have a four to six years of experience and experience with SAS, Spotfire, J-Review, R, SAS, JavaScript, Python, and/or Perl. This is a very visible, contract opportunity with a growing company and has excellent upward mobility. Data Analyst Job duties: * Create reports and dashboards * Work with data manager or steward to resolve data quality issues * Work with data scientists to understand their workflows and requirements * Manage model degradation * Ensure models remain predictive Qualifications: * SAS, Spotfire, J-Review, R, SAS, JavaScript, Python, or Perl * Understanding of data standards * Filter, tag, join, parse, and normalize data sets for use in analytical models * Four to six years of experience If you are interested in this Data Analyst job in St. Louis, MO, please apply via the 'apply now' link provided. Belcan is a global supplier of engineering, technical recruiting, and IT services to customers in the aerospace, industrial, and government sectors. Belcan engineers better outcomes through adaptive and integrated services-from jet engines, airframe, and avionics to heavy vehicles, chemical processing, and cybersecurity. Belcan takes a partnering approach to provide customer-driven solutions that are flexible, scalable, and cost-effective. Our unique capabilities have led to continuous growth and success for nearly 60 years. We are a team-driven Equal Opportunity Employer committed to workforce diversity.",3.3,"Belcan
3.3","Saint Louis, MO",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1958,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
237,Healthcare Data Analyst,$42k-$72k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview: *
Recovery Centers of America is looking for an experienced Healthcare Data Analyst to join the Operations Team. Goal of position will be to gather and analyze healthcare data from multiple sources and deliver actionable insights that will guide organization to make well informed decisions. This position will also support Operations and EHR team in development of business requirements and UAT testing for system enhancements and product improvements.
Specific Responsibilities**: *
Designs, develops, maintains, and validates business intelligence and analytics capabilities/tools in support of company’s goals of improving quality/access and reducing costs.
Performs ad hoc analysis from initial ask to delivery, including preliminary conversations with end users, data extractions from various data sources, data visualization, and narrative analysis.
Collaborate with team members to collect and analyze data
Establish KPI’s to measure the effectiveness of business decisions
Structure large data sets to find usable information
Create presentations and reports based on recommendations and findings
Ability to gather and analyze data to solve complex problems and evaluate scenarios to make predictions on future outcomes and support decision making
Leverages thorough understanding of business process and system processes to make recommendations and propose technical/non-technical solutions to meet business requirements
Translate story boards and metrics into technical requirements from which to develop insightful solutions
Work independently as well as in a team to deliver end-to-end analytic solutions within tight deadlines
Ensure quality of deliverables using development testing methods, code reviews and user acceptance testing
Able to adapt quickly to new technologies to create the most insightful analytics for the business need
Strong and effective inter-personal and communication skills and the ability to interact professionally with a diverse group of clients and staff, including management and senior level executives
Analytical mind with problem-solving aptitude
Offer suggestions on ways to improve healthcare delivery, quality, and cost effectiveness for client health plan populations
Responsible for tracking on-going outcomes reports and manage priorities for upcoming reports
· Work closely with the EHR team to understand the workflows and data points that exist in the EHR system, myAvatar.

· Responsible for UAT testing in the EHR to ensure enhancements/product improvements being delivered meet business requirements and delivers on business needs.
Required Education and Experience: *
Bachelor’s degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Operations Research, Economics, Management Science, Mathematics, Industrial Engineering, Statistics, or similar field preferred
Experience in data analysis
Technical writing skills
Analytical and problem-solving skills
Experience working in healthcare setting required
Experience in interpreting data and making the outcomes actionable
Experience developing and deploying BI Solutions with at least one of the following applications: QlikView, Qlik Sense, Microsoft Power BI, Tableau preferred
Proficiency in SQL database design and SQL programming, including stored procedure and table joins preferred
Excellent oral, written, and presentation communication skills
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental insurance
Employee discount
Health insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
No",3.3,"Recovery Centers of America
3.3","King of Prussia, PA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2015,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
238,Data Integration Analyst,-1,"About Us


Riskified is the AI platform powering the eCommerce revolution. We use cutting-edge technology, machine-learning algorithms, and behavioral analytics to identify legitimate customers and keep them moving toward checkout. Merchants use Riskified to increase revenue, prevent fraud, and eliminate customer friction. Riskified has reviewed hundreds of millions of transactions and approved billions of dollars of revenue for merchants across virtually all industries, including a number of Fortune 500 companies.

About the Role


As a Data Integration Analyst at Riskified, you will be using technical skills, analytical insights and business perspective to ensure we have the most accurate and complete data set from each client. You will be responsible for helping new and existing customers to ensure they are receiving the best performance possible and leading the change on processing the data of the largest eCommerce merchants in the world. Riskified's clients come in many different sizes and industries, use different technical platforms, and each one has their own unique data concerns and order flows that have to be uniquely assessed. Our team is the one to fully capture these aspects and recommend the best implementation as well as point out any possible issues.

What You'll Be Doing


Supporting the onboarding of new customers by completing the following:
Working with some of the largest companies in the world to perform comprehensive analysis of their data
Perform due diligence of business models and flows
Data modeling as part of the integration architecture
Combining the technical, business and analytical objectives to come up with tailored solutions for onboarding merchants
Data wrangling & sanitization
Prioritize, track, and communicate data issues internally and externally
Become the subject matter expert of riskified product and technology
Work closely with analysts, research and data science teams to accommodate changes in industry data
Monitoring and resolving data irregularities of existing customers by completing the following:
Monitor key health indicators and automated alerts
Identify, research, and offer system-wide solutions for common issues
Work closely with Account Management to engage customers
Qualifications


Candidates must be eligible to work in the U.S. for other than practical training, without any Visa sponsorship (including OPT Visas)
3+ years of experience in a data-centric industry role (ETL, DBA, etc.)
2+ years with SQL or NoSQL databases
2+ years experience with data wrangling (R, Python for data processing)
2+ years with optimizing technical processes
Strong verbal and written communication skills
Eagerness to learn new technical concepts
Strong analytical skills and attention to detail
Life at Riskified


We are a fast-growing and dynamic startup with 500+ team members between our offices in Tel Aviv and New York City. We value collaboration and innovative thinking. We're looking for bright, driven, and passionate people to grow with us.

Some NYC Benefits & Perks:
Fully-covered medical, dental, and vision insurance from your first day
Stock options for all employees, 401(k) + matching, commuter benefits
Catered lunch, team events, healthy snacks, yoga, pilates, soccer league, and more
In The News


Fortune Magazine: 25 Best Workplaces in New York

Announcing Riskified's $165M Funding Round

Inc Magazine: Best Workplaces

Built In NYC: 100 Best Workplaces

Crain's: Best Places to Work in New York City

TechCrunch: Riskified Prevents Fraud on Your Favorite eCommerce Site

Calcalist: Riskified is the Most Promising Startup in 2019

Riskified is deeply committed to the principle of equal opportunity for all individuals. We do not discriminate based on race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, or any other status protected by law.",4.5,"Riskified
4.5","New York, NY",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Research & Development,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
239,Data Analyst,-1,"We are currently recruiting for an Data Analyst Audit in the White Plains, NY area (remote to start - White Plains office when office reopens). The Audit Data Analyst will support the global audit function and optimize reporting capabilities. This is a unique role in a growing Audit department. The Data Analyst will assist in the deployment and ongoing maintenance of the audit management tool, TeamMate+. This role, provides a unique opportunity for the right candidate to learn both the internal audit function as well as the business. This is an exciting time as the Internal Audit department is undergoing rapid transformation globally. Key to the success of this new global function is the development of innovative data analytics and visualization tools. These tools will range from supporting the auditors in execution of their audits and other assurance work, to providing audit management with insightful dashboards and metrics to both supervise their staff and report the Board Audit Committee. Compensation: 85K – 95K Base +15-20% Bonus + Benefits package
Responsibilities: *
Partner with the global Internal Audit department to create, execute and manage a portfolio of analytic projects for use in Audit execution testing, continuous monitoring and continuous auditing
Develop data analytics and visualization tools, utilizing various data sources from throughout organization
Develop dashboards and metrics reports highlighting key performance indicators
Develop automated quality assurance tools
Assist in Senior Management and Board Reporting data visualization
Contribute to the TeamMate+ global deployment and provide on-going support
Perform iterative analytic scripting of ad-hoc requests supporting audit projects
Work with audit teams to continuously assess results and refine the analytics
Experience & Requirements: *
Bachelor's degree (Master's a plus) in Data Science, Computer Science, Information Technology, Information Systems, Statistics, Applied Math, or any other related field
Demonstrated skills in data analytics and/or visualization is required
Experience in Power BI and Alteryx
Prior role within big-4 consulting or internal audit function covering data analytics/automation/visualization
Experience with TeamMate+ would be an advantage
Excellent analytical, verbal and written communication skills
Strong MS Office skills required
Additional language(s) desirable
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $85,000.00 - $95,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Experience:
Power BI: 2 years (Preferred)
Data Analysis: 3 years (Preferred)
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,Bellwether Staffing Solutions,"White Plains, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2001,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
240,Data Analyst,-1,"Job Description:

Job Title: Data Analyst

Client: State of Arkansas, Department of Health

Location: Onsite – Little Rock, Arkansas

This is a contract position in Data Analysis. You will be responsible for data cleanup and analysis of covid related data.

Must have:

Excel experience
Data Analysis experience (trends, thresholds, queries, etc)
Data Cleanup experience
Data entry experience
Be able to work Full time, Monday through Friday, 8am-4:30pm with possible weekend work

What you will need to be successful in this role:

Strong Excel and data analysis experience
Strong attention to detail
Ability to handle confidential information with discretion and professionalism
Some understanding of medical terms and terminology is preferred but not required

Sounds Great, Right? Here’s What’s Next

Apply online and our team will contact you ASAP to discuss further!

A Little About Us

Learn about TalenTrust – helping clients find, keep and grow the best people

Read This New Book: Solve the People Puzzle

TalenTrust and our partners are Equal Employment Opportunity (EEO) employers and welcome all qualified applicants. Applicants will receive fair and impartial consideration without regard to race, sex, color, religion, national origin, age, disability, veteran status, genetic data, or religion or other legally protected status.",3.4,"TalenTrust LLC
3.4","Little Rock, AR",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
241,Big Data Analyst,$43k-$81k (Glassdoor Est.),"Infosys is seeking a Big Data/Python Developer with experience in platform administration preferred. The position will primarily be responsible interface with key stakeholders and apply your technical proficiency across different stages of the Software Development Life Cycle including Requirements Elicitation, Application Architecture definition and Design. You will play an important role in creating the high-level design artifacts. You will also deliver high quality code deliverables for a module, lead validation for all types of testing and support activities related to implementation, transition and warranty. You will be part of a learning culture, where teamwork and collaboration are encouraged, excellence is rewarded, and diversity is respected and valued.

Required Qualifications:
Candidate must be located within commuting distance of Dallas, TX or be willing to relocate to the area. This position may require travel in the US and Canada.
Bachelor’s Degree or foreign equivalent, will consider work experience in lieu of a degree
2+ years of experience with Information Technology
2+ years of experience in Hadoop ecosystem, i.e. Hadoop, HBase, Hive, Scala, SPARK, Sqoop, Flume, Kafka, Python
1+ years of experience in Python programming - strong understanding and hands-on programming/scripting experience skills – Python, UNIX shell, Perl, and JavaScript.
Strong knowledge in object oriented concepts, data structures and algorithms
Good experience in end-to-end implementation of DW BI projects, especially in data warehouse and mart developments
Knowledge and experience with full SDLC lifecycle
Experience with Lean / Agile development methodologies
U.S. Citizenship or Permanent Residency required, we are not able to sponsor at this time

Preferred Qualifications:
2+ years of experience in software development life cycle
2+ years of experience in Project life cycle activities on development and maintenance projects
2+ years of experience in Hadoop ecosystem, i.e. Hadoop, HBase, Hive, Scala, SPARK, Sqoop, Flume, Kafka, Python
Experience in developing data science/analytics pipeline, i.e. starting from installation of various packages, data engineering, data analytics is preferred.
Working experience with Machine learning libraries, H2O, NLP is preferred
At least 1 year of experience in Relational Modeling, Dimensional Modeling and Modeling of Unstructured Data
Good experience in end-to-end implementation of DW BI projects, especially in data warehouse and mart developments
Good understanding of Data integration, Data Quality and data architecture
Good expertise in impact analysis due to changes or issues
Experience in preparing test scripts and test cases to validate data and maintaining data quality
Strong understanding and hands-on programming/scripting experience skills – UNIX shell, Perl, and JavaScript
Experience with design and implementation of ETL/ELT framework for complex warehouses/marts. Knowledge of large data sets and experience with performance tuning and troubleshooting
Hands-on development, with a willingness to troubleshoot and solve complex problems
CI / CD exposure
Strong written and oral communication skills
Ability to work in team in diverse/ multiple stakeholder environment
Ability to communicate complex technology solutions to diverse teams namely, technical, business and management teams
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Experience and desire to work in a Global delivery environment

The job may entail extensive travel. The job may also entail sitting as well as working at a computer for extended periods of time. Candidates should be able to effectively communicate by telephone, email, and face to face.

About Us
Infosys is a global leader in next-generation digital services and consulting. We enable clients in 46 countries to navigate their digital transformation.
With over three decades of experience in managing the systems and workings of global enterprises, we expertly steer our clients through their digital journey. We do it by enabling the enterprise with an AI-powered core that helps prioritize the execution of change. We also empower the business with agile digital at scale to deliver unprecedented levels of performance and customer delight. Our always-on learning agenda drives their continuous improvement through building and transferring digital skills, expertise, and ideas from our innovation ecosystem.
To learn more about Infosys and see our ideas in action please visit us at www.Infosys.com

EOE/Minority/Female/Veteran/Disabled/Sexual Orientation/Gender Identity/National Origin",3.3,"Infosys Limited
3.3","Dallas, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1981,Company - Public,IT Services,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
242,Data / BI Analyst,$69k-$135k (Glassdoor Est.),"RedCloud is seeking multiple Data and BI Analysts ranging from Mid to Senior level, to support our growing consulting team! If you are a Data or BI Analyst with an eye for capturing what others miss, a strong analytical focus, and the ability to research, model, visualize, and provide insights as well as identify trends, we want to talk with you!

RedCloud Consulting is a business and IT consulting company with local Puget Sound Enterprise and Mid-sized clients. We have been recognized by Seattle Business Magazine and ranked #1 on their “Best Companies to Work for in Washington” for Mid-Sized Businesses list, awarded #1 Fastest Growing Company in Washington by Puget Sound Business Journal, and named on the Inc. 500/5000 list.

**We are currently only considering local candidates, residing in the Greater Seattle area, for this role**

Responsibilities may include but are not limited to (will vary by experience level):
Work closely with client stakeholders and coordinate delivery of projects in scope and on time
Define business requirements and functional specifications for a BI solution – including data requirements, reporting / presentation layer requirements.
Drive data architecture and modeling recommendations
Perform data ETL processing from multiple sources
Conduct data analysis and interpret data to answer key business questions
Develop report deliverables and data visualizations producing valuable insights to stakeholders
Required Knowledge, Skills and Abilities (will vary by experience level):
An understanding of BI solutions best practices and common pitfalls from architectural design, data source, ingestion, storage, analysis and visualization
Ability to articulate BI and reporting concepts in a way that is easy to understand
Demonstrated ability to coordinate and conduct test efforts for a BI solution
Excellent stakeholder management skills and meeting presence
Proven ability to manage your workload, organizing and prioritizing tasks and clearly communicating status
Ability to multi-task and manage multiple projects and priorities
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Education and Experience:
Minimum BA/BS degree from a four-year accredited university
Demonstrated experience from the “Required Skills, Knowledge and Abilities” section above will vary by level from Mid (3-7 years) and Senior (8+ years).
Desirable systems and tools experience, which will vary by role, may include: SQL skills (connecting to databases, joining tables, queries), SSIS/SSAS/SSRS, data analytics (Advanced Excel, Python, R), reporting visualization and presentation (PowerBI, Tableau, SharePoint)
About Us:

RedCloud is a boutique Management Consulting firm founded in 1995, based in Bellevue, WA with a primary goal of empowering businesses to realize their potential and reach peak performance. We do this with a complete and unwavering focus on accountability, dependability and results. We achieve this by providing a broad array of both Business and IT consulting services in addition to staffing solutions to our clients. Our professional services include Strategic Planning, Process Improvement, Project Management, IT Management, Sales and Marketing, Business Intelligence and Cyber Security Services.

Learn more about us at redcloudconsulting.com.",4.6,"RedCloud Consulting
4.6","Bellevue, WA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1995,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
243,(Sr.) Data Analyst -,-1,"Wednesday, August 5, 2020

Merrick Bank is a top-25 credit card issuer and merchant acquirer in the VISA/MasterCard networks, and a major recreational vehicle lender.
The Bank is a Utah Financial Institution and a member of the FDIC.

At
Merrick Bank, we specialize in credit programs that assist people looking to
build or rebuild their credit. We are FDIC insured and recognized as a top-20
issuer of Visa® cards. In total, we proudly serve over 2.4 million cardholders
and have extended over $5.3 billion in credit.

Our
Mission is to make a positive difference in the lives of our customers, our
employees, and our community. We work hard to create a work environment that
empowers our associates to grow, learn, and reach their potential.

This
position is responsible for running multiple monthly processes, extracting
data, maintaining/updating analytical files and data sources, producing ad-hoc
reports and working with the new accounts analytical team. The candidate will improve current processes
through automation, streamlining, and general improvement of the process. Further this candidate will be responsible
for time-sensitive processes requiring audits that involve other departments
and will require being able to explain month to month changes in the audit
reports. This candidate will work
closely with other analysts in the group to assist them in their role through
education of data sources and providing data when needed. Previous experience with large datasets using
R, SQL, or SAS is desired, particularly updating and maintaining
databases. Previous experience with
quality assurance or business intelligence reporting is also useful –
particularly using Shiny or R.

QUALIFICATIONS:

·
Bachelor's degree in a field related to the following skill
set is required. A Master’s degree is
preferred.

·
Expertise with SQL and some familiarity with programming
(SAS being ideal) is required.

·
Knowledge of R, Python, Java script, Shiny, Html, or CSS are
desired.

·
A firm understanding of data manipulation and extraction is
necessary.

BONUS POINTS:

·
Experience with Docker, and Git would is desirable.

·
Experience working with databases is desirable. We are currently using PostgreSQL.

·
Any experience with BI tools such as Shiny (R) or Dash
(python), or writing automated reports with LaTeX is desirable.

·
Experience finding issues with data is desirable.

·
Experience in the banking industry, specifically in credit
cards is desirable.

PRIMARY DUTIES:

·
Monthly process.

·
Prospect selection process and audit.

·
Quality assurance of data processes.

·
Improving the current data environment and making it faster,
and easier to access.

·
Documenting all data and processes the department develops
and utilizes.

·
Effective written and verbal communication skills.

·
Work effectively both individually and in a collaborative
manner with a team.

·
Compliance with Laws & Regulations:

·
Responsible for complying with all of the Bank’s internal
control policies and procedures.

·
Responsible for understanding and complying with all laws
and regulations to which the Bank is subject.

·
Responsible for communicating problems in operations,
noncompliance with the code of conduct, noncompliance with laws and regulations,
policy violations, or illegal acts.

What’s in it for you:

Competitive salary (DOE)

Benefits package
Medical, Dental and Vision (plus much more)

401(k) Plan with Company
Match

Short & Long Term Disability

Group Life and AD&D
Insurance

Paid Vacation, Holidays,
and Personal Days

Employee Events,
including Employee Appreciation Day, Holiday Party, etc.

Tuition Reimbursement
Program

Candidates must have unrestricted authority to work in the
United States without sponsorship.

Merrick Bank is an equal opportunity employer. We
evaluate qualified applicants
without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability,
veteran status, and other legally protected characteristic. The EEO is
the
Law poster is available here: http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/poster.cfm

Please go to our website www.merrickbank.com to apply and learn more about our company

We are an equal opportunity employer. Merrick Bank will do a thorough background check for all hires. This includes a review of your personal credit history, drug testing, background check, and employment/personal references. A good credit history is important.

Other details
Job Family
Account Acquisition & Data Science
Pay Type
Salary",3.5,"Merrick Bank
3.5",Utah,-1,201 to 500 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
244,Data and Policy Analyst - Writer/Coordinator,-1,"Job Description

At Acumen, LLC / The SPHERE Institute, Data and Policy Analysts provide analytical support for research and consulting projects for government and private clients, primarily in the area of health policy. This position is responsible for managing and analyzing data, researching and interpreting policy, and communicating findings to multiple audiences.

Data and Policy Analysts perform a wide array of functions as part of the research process. Those applicants interested in focusing on writing/coordinating will help create and report descriptive statistics, conduct literature searches, independent research and summarize findings, coordinate project activities and communications among diverse groups of internal and external clients and team members, interpret study specifications, research findings and quantitative analyses for relevant audiences, prepare project reports, memos, presentations and proposals, deliver technical assistance and presenting findings to clients, and perform other duties as assigned.

Required Skills

As we review your materials, we are looking for candidates who best exemplify the following qualifications:

Qualifications Required
Bachelor’s degree in a quantitative, public policy, or related field or equivalent relevant experience
Good quantitative analytical skills
Good oral and written communication skills
Good organizational skills and strong attention to detail
Familiar with one or more of the following technical competencies: statistics programming, policy writing, research methods documentation, or project management
Able to demonstrate initiative, critical thinking, and problem-solving
Able to work in a team-oriented environment
Able to prioritize tasks and meet deadlines in a fast-paced environment
Demonstrated aptitude and enthusiasm for learning
Qualifications Desired
Demonstrated interest in health and social policy
Any application without a cover letter will not be considered. Transcripts and writing samples are not required, however highly preferred and may be requested. We ask that you submit an application for only one office location. We are excited to review your application and look forward to seeing how you may best contribute to our work.

Job Location

Washington, District of Columbia, United States

Position Type

Full-Time/Regular",3.5,"Acumen
3.5","Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1996,Company - Private,Federal Agencies,Government,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
245,Product Data Analyst (MUST have SQL exp.),$48k-$89k (Glassdoor Est.),"Grubhub is dedicated to connecting hungry diners with our wide network of restaurants across the country. Our innovative technology, easy-to-use platforms and streamlined delivery capabilities make us an industry leader today, and in the future of online food ordering.
We strive to create a workplace that reflects the diversity of our customers and the communities we serve. When you join our team, you become part of a community that works together to innovate, solve problems, take risks, grow, work hard and have a ton of fun in the process!
Why Work For Us
We have a fast-paced environment and that is what our teams thrive on. Grubhub believes in empowering people and offering opportunities for development, as well as professional growth. We value strong, positive relationships in all areas: with each other, our customers and our greater community. Want to be a part of a team of diverse collaborators in an authentically fun culture? If so, we want to talk to you - and hear what’s your favorite restaurant for food delivery!
About You: You are a smart, world-class, passionate about ecommerce and analytical person who wants to help define and build innovative experiences on both mobile and web platforms. You help develop a strategy and vision and build and execute feature roadmaps from start to finish. You embrace this cross-functional role that requires you to work closely and successfully with senior leaders across the company, engineering/IT, QA, design, customer care, and the rest of the product team.

Participate in defining roadmap projects
Support PMs with data analysis to help inform business decisions (impact analysis, root cause analysis, cost/benefit analysis), expediting product discovery and prioritization efforts
Create SQL queries and dashboards to monitor experiments
Provide insights into product usage to inform innovation or areas of weakness
Work closely with other product team members to help understand how you can provide data to power decision making
Gathering and unearthing unmet customer needs through research, data analysis, user experience analysis and testing, competitive research and any other relevant tools
Be able to prioritize and handle multiple requests for information at any one time
Understand how user interactions translate to data that you can provide insights

2+ years of relevant Product Management experience with 1+ years of that experience in e-commerce preferred
Technically proficient in pulling disparate data sets together to address questions and provide insights
MUST have 2+ years using SQL to build queries, reports and dashboards
Experience building KPI, KEI reporting to monitor performance and quickly respond to changes in performance
A born communicator with strong written and verbal skills
History of teamwork and proven ability to get the job done
Ability to “dive deep” and use data to prioritize a roadmap as well as validate completed projects
Have a natural curiosity that overcomes obstacles to get answers
Well organized, detail-oriented and self-motivated
Comfortable in a fast paced constantly changing environment
A self-starter with a strong bias for action
A team player and fun to work with too

Flexible PTO. Grubhub employees are provided a generous amount of time to recharge their batteries.
Health and Wellness. We provide programs that support your overall well-being such as generous medical benefits, employee network groups, company-wide fitness challenges, and a comfortable and casual workplace! We also support our parents by offering 8 weeks of paid parent bonding time, a 4-week returnship program, and 6-8 weeks paid medical leave.
Learning and Career Growth. Your personal and professional development is a priority at Grubhub. From day one, we empower you to lead and be an active participant in your career growth. We provide continuous learning opportunities, training, and coaching and mentorship programs.
MealPerks. Who’s ready for some lunch? We provide our employees with a weekly Grubhub credit to enjoy and support local restaurants. We also offer company-wide meals several times a year to bring our Grubhub family together.
Fun. Every Grubhub office has an employee-led Culture Crew that connects people through fun, meaningful events and initiatives. Some of our popular past events include: Wing-eating contests, Grubtoberfest, 5k Runs, Bring Your Child to Work Day, regular happy hours, and more!
Social Impact. We believe in the importance of serving the communities that support our business. In addition, employees are given paid time off each year to support the causes that are important to them.


Grubhub is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other legally protected characteristics. The EEO is the Law poster is available here: DOL Poster. If you are applying for a job in the U.S. and need a reasonable accommodation for any part of the employment process, please send an e-mail to TalentAcquisition@grubhub.com and let us know the nature of your request and contact information. Please note that only those inquiries concerning a request for reasonable accommodation will be responded to from this email address.
CA Privacy Notice: If you are a resident of the State of California and would like a copy of our CA privacy notice, please email privacy@grubhub.com.",4.0,"Grubhub
4.0","Chicago, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2004,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
246,"Analyst, CX Data Science",$112k-$176k (Glassdoor Est.),"TriNet is a leading provider of comprehensive human resources solutions for small to midsize businesses (SMBs). We enhance business productivity by enabling our clients to outsource their HR function to one strategic partner and allowing them to focus on operating and growing their core businesses. Our full-service HR solutions include features such as payroll processing, human capital consulting, employment law compliance and employee benefits, including health insurance, retirement plans and workers’ compensation insurance.

TriNet has a nationwide presence and an experienced executive team. Our stock is publicly traded on the NYSE under the ticker symbol TNET. If you’re passionate about innovation and making an impact on the large SMB market, come join us as we power our clients’ business success with extraordinary HR.

JOB SUMMARY/OVERVIEW
The Analyst, CX Analytics will be responsible for conducting Voice of the Customer (VOC) analyses, leveraging a wide range of analytical and data visualization tools to uncover and communicate opportunities to improve the customer’s experience.

The CX Analytics team supports business leaders at TriNet in the Customer Experience organization by providing the customer’s perspective throughout all phases of their tenure and ensuring the customer is at the center of the organization’s most critical business decisions.

Leveraging analytical tools such as Qualtrics, Tableau, and SAS, the Voice of the Customer team analyzes customer behavioral data and open-ended customer feedback TriNet receives through various sources, including: Net Promoter surveys, CSAT surveys, website and app intercept feedback, product feedback, customer engagement data, and customer demographic data.

The Analyst, CX Analytics will collaborate with internal business stakeholders to:
• Deliver real-time, actionable customer insights, leveraging all tools and resources available.
• Integrate qualitative and quantitative customer feedback responses with customer behavioral data to address targeted business questions.
• Supporting the Net Promoter System program, including measurement of NPS, analysis of the drivers of NPS, and management of the Closed Loop process.
• Continuously improve the effectiveness and efficiency of the team’s research and analysis methodologies, processes, and deliverables.

ESSENTIAL DUTIES/RESPONSIBILITIES
• Leverages survey, behavioral, demographic, and transactional data to inform stakeholders and strategic decisions.
• Conducts Voice of the Customer research, including text analytics, synthesis of multiple data sources, and ad hoc analyses.
• Ties customer feedback data to customer behavioral data to drive impactful insights and recommendations.
• Effectively translates data into insights by proactively and effectively communicating the “so what” from the data, as well as issues and opportunities exposed by the data.
• Collaborates with key internal partners to identify and understand customers’ underlying needs and implement solutions that address root causes of customer pain points.
• Continuously drives reporting and dashboard improvement by simplifying and automating, where possible.
• Participates in communicating research results to executives and other stakeholders.
• Collaborates cross-functionally with other teams and departments on complex projects.

JOB REQUIREMENTS AND QUALIFICATIONS
Education:
• Bachelor's degree (B. A.) from four-year college or university, with a focus in analytics, data science, business or psychology; or equivalent combination of education and experience.
• Professional management certification is a plus.

Experience:
• Minimum 5 years’ related experience in large, multi-national environment, high tech or PEO experience is helpful.
• Regular exposure to complex, cross functional projects in either a project or program management capacity.
• Experience in presenting data visually to tell a clear story.
• Experience in presentation and translation of complex findings into layman’s terms.
• Experience with unstructured data analysis, including text analytics.
• Experience with and understanding of data and analysis tools, including Tableau and SAS.
• Experience with and understanding of various statistical methods.

Other Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:
• Proficient in Microsoft Office Suite, particularly Excel and PowerPoint.
• Excellent analytical skills, including strong business acumen.
• Ability to communicate, build trust, and influence employees at all levels of the organization.
• Ability to adapt to a fast paced, continually changing business and work environment while managing multiple priorities.
• A demonstrated commitment to high professional ethical standards and a diverse workplace.

WORK ENVIRONMENT/OTHER INFORMATION (Travel required, physical requirements, on-call schedules, etc.)
• Minimal travel required.
• Work in clean, pleasant, and comfortable office setting.
• The work environment characteristics described here are representative of those an employee encounters while performing the essential functions of this job. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions

Please Note: TriNet reserves the right to change or modify job duties and assignments at any time. The above job description is not all encompassing. Position functions and qualifications may vary depending on business necessity.

TriNet is an Equal Opportunity Employer and does not discriminate against applicants based on race, religion, color, disability, medical condition, legally protected genetic information, national origin, gender, sexual orientation, marital status, gender identity or expression, sex (including pregnancy, childbirth or related medical conditions), age, veteran status or other legally protected characteristics. Any applicant with a mental or physical disability who requires an accommodation during the application process should contact recruiting@trinet.com to request such an accommodation.

#LI-AF1",3.4,"TriNet
3.4","Dublin, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1988,Company - Public,Consulting,Business Services,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
247,Data Analyst,$44k-$79k (Glassdoor Est.),"Collaborate with business stakeholders to understand their needs, then create and manage the on-going use of new data products to support them
Review data from internal and external customers with a view to identify trends that might lead to business insights for our sales team
Generation and maintenance of several daily, weekly, and monthly reports to be used by internal customers
Management of Leadership Team’s Key Performance Indicator Dashboard
Design and build and maintain dashboards to measure, compare, and monitor select productivity data from our warehouse activities
Work with 3rd party datasets to understand and provide descriptive models of our portion of the automotive aftermarket
Look for ways to increase efficiency of data mining, analysis, visualization, and dissemination
Work with category management and sales personnel to create the tables, charts and data insights that will populate customer presentations
Continually improve and help automate the delivery of data driven products to internal and external customers
Work to take ownership of our analysis and reporting structure and seek to take this portion of the business to the next level
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $40,000.00 - $46,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Paid time off
Relocation assistance
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
COVID-19 considerations:
Daily, temperature screening
Daily, spraying and surface cleaning
Bi-weekly, testing on site

Experience:
Data Analysis Skills: 1 year (Preferred)
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
Application Question:
• Are you comfortable with statistical analysis (mean, mode, quartiles, regression, etc.)
• Are you detail oriented
• Are you able to effectively communicate technical topics to non-technical end users
• Do you love data
• Do you love to learn
• Are you comfortable working with multiple teams

Work Location:
One location
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",2.8,"PGI
2.8","Memphis, TN",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1991,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
248,Data Analyst,-1,"This is an opportunity to join the leadership team at our US Corporate Office. Our client is a $2+billion global company focused on delivering the products and services to healthcare, pharmaceutical, and medical device Customers. They have a long history of success and are excited about what the future holds. We are seeking an enthusiastic data analyst professional with a background in accounting, information systems, or comparable business experience who is ready to create and innovate in support of their goals.

What you will do:

The data analyst will be responsible for planning, organizing, and executing analytics related to internal audits and business processes throughout the Company (including IT, financial, operational, compliance, quality and fraud). The role will develop repeatable data analytics processes to provide timely audit assurance, improve audit efficiency, and automate business processes. This position will drive analytics and strategy for Internal Audit and will collaborate with Internal Audit management and business functions within the organization to improve internal controls, create efficiencies, and add value to the business.

Provide an understanding of business and data requirements, and design visualizations for initial concepts and prototypes that can be presented to Internal Audit and business partners.

Perform detailed data analysis (determine data structures, content, and quality of the data through examination of source systems).

Design and create data visualizations (reports and dashboards) using Tableau as required.

Maintain a controlled repository of data visualization templates and views in Tableau.

Contribute to the planning, sampling, and testing of Sarbanes-Oxley controls.

Explore innovative ideas to continuously improve the audit methodology and audit procedures including the strategic deployment of technology to improve the effectiveness and efficiency of audit procedures and increase value to business partners.

Partner with Internal Audit team members to develop and deliver a data analytics strategy in all phases of the audit process including risk assessment, planning and scoping, fieldwork, testing, and reporting.

Develop training and usage of data analytics capabilities within the Internal Audit team.

Work with Internal Audit colleagues to continuously improve the department and achieve department goals.

What you need to be successful:

You must have advanced skills related to Tableau, SQL, and other analytics software such as Alteryx.

You have a Bachelors degree in accounting, information systems, or other related degree.

You are comfortable working in a complex global organization where youve had successful interactions and built relationships across functions, regions and business units. Your excellent verbal and written communication skills helped you influence, consult, and create compelling business cases at all levels of the organization.

You are able to inspire and instill a common vision and framework with individual and team projects.

Candidates with the audit experience and certifications such as CPA, CIA, CISA, CFE, Tableau certification, or other big data type certifications preferred.

This position may be elevated to a Senior Data Analyst role for candidates that possess an appropriate level of relevant experience as determined by STERIS.

Offering You In Return:

The opportunity to join a company that will invest in you for the long-term. Our client offers competitive salaries, healthcare benefits, tuition assistance, paid-time off, holidays, matching 401(k), annual merit, and incentive plans. Join and help write our next chapter.

Must have Sarbanes experience

Finance experience a plus

Audit experience very desirable",4.7,"Job Juncture
4.7","Mentor, OH",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1992,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
249,Data Analyst,-1,"RESPONSIBILITIES:
Kforce has a client in search of a Data Analyst in Philadelphia, PA.

Key Tasks:
Serve as client point of contact for data/statistical analysis workstreams and inputs
Provide statistical, epidemiological, and/or econometric expertise to the development of project methodologies, analysis plans or study protocols
Perform descriptive and advances statistical analysis using large patient and/or claims databases to support project goals
Synthesize findings and package insights on client spending, utilization, quality, and specific clinical areas for use by client services team or client directly
Collaborate with client services team, product team, researchers, and external stakeholders to navigate challenges
Facilitate/attend regular project meetings between the company and client
Work with the company product team to translate analytics processes to repeatable, scalable solutions
Support overall company methodology/strategy development
REQUIREMENTS:
Masters level Statistics, Computer Science, or equivalent degree strongly preferred
2-3 years of experience in health care client services, management consulting or healthcare product delivery
Experience with statistical packages including R, SAS, and familiarity with Python
Extensive experience with analytical work including advanced modeling tools such as R, SAS, Tableau, etc.
Past exposure to payer/provider landscape, value-based care, and specific risk-based payment and delivery reforms encouraged
Demonstrated ability to lead development of core deliverables from cradle to grave (data analysis, strategy development, operations/process improvement, etc.)
Experience owning complex tasks/workstreams and leading others
Excellent verbal/written communications and executive presentation skills required
Passion for improving health care a must - you will get to work alongside some of the country's leading health care experts
Strong work ethic and entrepreneurial spirit - we are building a company from the ground up, so every team member is given a significant amount of responsibility and growth opportunity
Kforce is an Equal Opportunity/Affirmative Action Employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, pregnancy, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, age, protected veteran status, or disability status.",4.1,"Kforce
4.1","Philadelphia, PA",-1,10000+ Employees,1966,Company - Public,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$1 to $2 billion (USD),-1
250,Data Analyst,$41k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"Sony Electronics, Inc. look for the risk-takers, the collaborators, the inspired and the inspirational. We want the people who are brave enough to work at the cutting edge and create solutions that will enrich and improve the lives of people across the globe. So, if you want to make the world say wow, let's talk.

Job Description

Sony Electronics Inc. has an opportunity available for a Data Analyst within the B2B team for Imaging Products & Solutions of Americas – Professional Division. Based in the group’s Paramus, NJ headquarters, the Data Analyst reports into the Business Management (marketing) group, but will support cross-business functions including sales, marketing, and planning and control. The Data Analyst will be the primary point of analyzing various monthly and quarterly reports received such as industry market research reports, channel partner point of sale (POS) reports, channel program utilization reports and financial reporting reports. This highly visible position will be tasked with developing and maintaining databases and automated reporting analytics as well as processes to ensure consistency and accuracy of information that will be used for business decisions by the B2B management team.

Responsibilities

The Data Analyst will have as a key responsibility the gathering, consolidation, reporting and analysis of POS data from multiple sources (internal and external) for the B2B segment on a monthly and ad-hoc basis. Focus will include assessing sales performance versus budget/forecast on a consolidated, territory and individual basis (identifying areas of success and gaps/opportunities) and reporting those results to management. This assessment will go beyond numbers presentation; and will involve identify trends and providing initial insight regarding contributing factors.

The Data Analyst will also prepare monthly & quarterly consolidated revenue attainment results by salesperson for compensation purposes, and actively contribute to and support management during the sales quota-setting process. Working with B2B sales team, will help identify gaps in revenue/quota attainment. In addition, this position will be involved in research and analysis of year-over-year sales results, and marketplace conditions/areas of business growth potential.

With management input, the Sales Analyst will build upon existing corporate analytics to establish the tools, processes and reporting methodology to support these analyses as they relate to the B2B business and modify accordingly based on future business direction and needs.

Minimum Requirements
Bachelor’s Degree.
Must have 2-4 years of related experience.
Advanced Excel proficiency including pivot tables, formulas and macros.
Solid oral and written communication skills, and professional presentation skills.
Must have high level skills in Microsoft Excel, PowerPoint and Outlook.
Preferred Requirements
Bachelors’ Degree concentration in finance, mathematics, statistics is preferred.
Working knowledge of database creation, coding, manipulation preferred.
Experience with Oracle databases and Power BI is highly desired.
Salesforce.com experience is a plus.
Sony Electronics is an Equal Opportunity Employer that values employees with a broad cross-cultural perspective. We strive to create an inclusive environment, empower employees and embrace diversity. We encourage everyone to respond. All applicants will receive fair and impartial treatment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, ancestry, citizenship status, age, legally protected physical or mental disability, protected veteran status, status in the U.S. uniformed services, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, marital status, genetic information or on any other basis which is protected under applicable federal, state or local law.

Disability Accommodation for Applicants to Sony Electronics, Inc.

Sony Electronics, Inc. provides reasonable accommodation for qualified individuals with disabilities and disabled veterans in job application procedures. For reasonable accommodation requests, please contact us by email at talenthelp@am.sony.com, or you can mail your resume to: Sony Electronics, Human Resources Department, 16535 Via Esprillo, San Diego CA 92127. Please indicate the position you are applying for.
EEO is the Law

EEO is the Law Supplement

Right to Work (English/Spanish)

E-Verify Participation (English/Spanish)",4.2,"Sony Electronics
4.2","Paramus, NJ",-1,10000+ Employees,1946,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Consumer Products Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
251,"Intelligence Data Analyst, Senior",$77k-$104k (Glassdoor Est.),"Intelligence Data Analyst, Sr

Job Description: Provides support to the Department of the Army

Intelligence Information Services (DAIIS). Responsible for delivering world

class organizational messaging for the Army intelligence enterprise through

the Multimedia Messenger Manager (M3). Provides data management functions

in the form of data governance, data architecture, data warehousing, data

quality management, metadata management, data security management, data

development management, data operations management, data refinement,

integrated data services, data transformation services, data discovery

services, data tradecraft services, advanced data analytics, and technology

pursuit. Serves as an enterprise access manager/validator for Army

intelligence users to access intelligence community PKI-enabled databases or

communities of interest (COI) on JWICS such as NCTC Online and JEMS.

o Required Skills: Power Business Intelligence (BI), ability to

manipulate data, experience with training

o Desirable Skills: Python coding experience is a plus",4.4,"The Buffalo Group
4.4","Fort Belvoir, VA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2010,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
252,Data Analyst,$60k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Datadog:

We're on a mission to build the best platform in the world for engineers to understand and scale their systems, applications, and teams. We operate at high scale—trillions of data points per day—providing always-on alerting, metrics visualization, logs, and application tracing for tens of thousands of companies. Our engineering culture values pragmatism, honesty, and simplicity to solve hard problems the right way.

The team:

We are building a first-class Internal Analytics team composed of Data Engineers and Data Analysts. We use cutting-edge data collection, transformation, and analysis tools in order to provide other teams with data that will help them better understand both our customers and our own operations so they can make strategic data-driven decisions.

The opportunity:

As a Data Analyst within the Internal Analytics team, you will help ensure all teams at Datadog have the data they need to drive their projects. You will have a chance to interact with all other departments including other Engineering teams, Product Managers, Designers, Marketing, and Customer Success.

You will:
Contribute to building the data model layer that is used by the whole company to query internal data and analytics
Build actionable data reports and visualizations that will help other teams make strategic decisions
Help product managers, designers, and engineers to understand our products usage and user behaviors, and facilitate data-driven decision making
Help marketing teams optimize their initiatives
Run deep data analyses and investigations
Work to discover how different technologies are being adopted over time by different segments of users
Present findings to team leads and executives
Train other employees to use data to answer questions without assistance
Requirements:
You are a clear, concise communicator that works well with others
You can explain complex datasets to non-technical people in understandable ways
You are able to clean a dataset and conduct a data analysis in Python or similar language
You are fluent with SQL and are able to write complex and performant queries with no assistance
You’ve mastered data analysis and visualization in Looker, Excel, Google Sheets, Tableau and/or similar tools
You have a natural curiosity and investigative mindset - driven to know “why”
You want to work in a fast, high-growth startup environment and thrive on both autonomy and collaboration
2+ years of professional experience
Bonus points:
You are familiar with Spark and/or Hadoop
You have some experience with data stores similar to AWS Redshift or S3
You are familiar with data storage optimization (keys, schemas, …)",4.2,"Datadog
4.2","New York, NY",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2010,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
253,Data Integration Analyst 1,$26k-$46k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Integration Analyst I

General Description:

Monitor and manage daily functions and operations of a portfolio of mortgage loans transfer of servicing as related to data mapping to ensure smooth and timely conversion.

Essential Functions and Duties: ·
Complete data mapping for all master fields, special loan and escrow fields for all servicing transfer conversions.
Ensure completion of all tasks in accordance with the Project Plan, updating Plan with tasks, completion dates, etc.
Produce required tables for mapping client codes to applicable fields.
Actively participate in meetings to provide status reports and identify and resolve potential issues.
Maintain accurate and timely communication with sub-servicing clients, prior service's, and internal department personnel to ensure minimal impact to clients and their customers.
Complete detail balancing of mid-size and large transfers including fund reconciliation.
Understand impact of data conversions as they pertain to servicing operations.
Handle related transfer of servicing issues, including research, trial, and final audit and comparison of data.
Manipulate data from various servicing platforms and convert to usable format in MSP (Black Knight).
Required Qualifications:
Advanced PC skills: Microsoft applications, Excel spreadsheets, macros, merge documents, database conversions, record layout, etc.
Working knowledge of accounting functions as they relate to reconciliation and balancing
Strong analytical and problem-solving skills and attention to detail and accuracy
Ability to handle complex, multiple tasks simultaneously in a fast-paced environment
Exceptional organizational and time management skills
Preferred/Other Qualifications:
Experience in mortgage servicing environment
Knowledge of Monarch, Access, Jira
Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Company's website:
https://workforcenow.adp.com/mascsr/default/mdf/recruitment/recruitment.html?cid=fcd47a55-549b-413b-a4e7-c18e32d48625&ccId=19000101_000001&jobId=169880&source=CC3&lang=en_US
Work Remotely:
No",2.2,"Dovenmuehle
2.2","Elgin, IL",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1844,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
254,Business Analyst/Data Analyst Location: Dallas TX. Duration: Long term,-1,"Job title: Business Analyst/Data Analyst Location: Dallas TX. Duration: Long term Overall 7 to 10 years of experience. Expectations Good exp in Insurance domain with metrics in the Property& Casualty insurance business. Should have good oral and written communication skills with good hold on English language Should have fair understanding of Insurance terminologies Should have performed Technical documentation of various data platforms like Data Integration, processes, Data Analytics( Visual Analytics) Good to have : - Definition and documentation of Dossiers, attributes, Data Governance: Definition of business glossary, terms, attributes",3.5,"Data wave technologies.com
3.5","Dallas, TX",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
255,Sr Analyst - Data Analytics,$71k-$118k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Team

The Auto Proceeds Optimization and Data Science Team at Ally is responsible for optimization proceeds across the Ally Off Lease and Repossessed portfolio and manage risk of leasing portfolio as well as support residual setting This includes collaborating with internal (matrix partners) and external vendors to optimize channel, geographic, reconditioning and pricing strategies. Our primary purpose is to provide data & analytic driven solutions to optimize residual setting and used vehicles' proceeds, efficiency, and profitability across Auto line of business.

Job Description

The Remarketing Proceeds Optimization and Data Science team is in the process of innovating their proceeds' and processes' optimization methodologies by embracing the most recent data science & AI technology to boost auto business revenue. As a member of Remarketing Strategy and Decision Science team, the analyst will be responsible for gathering data from multiple resources, improving data quality, developing modern web/BI based data driven products and supporting decision making. The role communicates with data scientists to understand pricing optimization strategies across multiple channels, meanwhile communicates with front end business partners to understand business requirement. The role also will perform data engineering with SQL, SAS, Pyhton or R and develop front applications and choose the right visualization tools that can best convey insight drawn from data. The role will be required to have a strong understanding of business objectives and how analytic outputs drive critical decisions

Additionally, the role will work with IT to ensure solutions are successfully moved to production, and thereafter oversee future application upgrade or adjustment.

Job Responsibilities

Lead all data governance initiatives and action plans to success.
Deep understanding of data management principles and practices.
Gathering data with diverse resources, performing data cleansing, normalization and transformation and integration, etc.
Design application architecture with some well used design patterns like MVC
Develop, test, maintain and improve data driven front end applications
Use visualization tools like Power BI or Packages from Python
Leverage understanding of data and the business to make recommendations to meet business needs
Create logical and physical data models to ensure high data quality
Resolve issues for customers in a timely, efficient manner
Work with 3rd party vendors and IT to install software tools
Use SVN, GIT or similar for source control tools
Research of new technologies and data, such as telematics data usage, and new tools for data exploration and visualization.

Qualifications

3+ Years of Data and Business Analysis Preferred
Bachelor's degree in quantitative or technical field required (Mathematics, Information System Management, Economics, Computer/Data Science, etc). Master's degree strongly preferred
Python charting experience required: using packages including matploylib, Seanborn, Numpy, PYSpark
Some SAS experience preferred
Knowledgeable about unix or linux; shell scripting preferred
Proficient working with databases: Oracle, SQL server, etc
Familiarity with Hadoop, Cloudera, AWS, EC2 or RDS is a plus
Knowledgeable about logical modeling/ data management and mart creation
Able to work effectively in a highly matrixed organization
Automation mindset a must
Facility working with object-oriented programming methods using multiple languages and tools
Experience with JSON or REST API
Comfortable dealing complex problems
Ability to translate analytic insights into actionable applications via visualization tools such as Power BI and Tableau
Ability to work independently with strong attention to detail
Ability to work across cultures and functions Experience Working with - Growing High Potential Talent Strong Written and Oral Communication skills, as well as ability to Manage Large Meetings Strong Microsoft Access, Excel, and Power Point skills Strong organizational, analytical and interpersonal skills Proficiency in Oracle SQL, Cognos, Tableau, and other reporting - analysis tools Technical expertise in data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation Knowledge of statistics and experience using statistical packages for analyzing large datasets
Represents Ally in a professional and positive manner in all situations

Ally Overview

Ally Financial Inc. is a leading automotive financial services company powered by a top direct banking franchise with the opportunity, experience and people to redefine the industry.

Ally's automotive services business offers a full suite of financing products and services, including new and used vehicle inventory and consumer financing, leasing, inventory insurance, commercial loans and vehicle remarketing services. Ally Bank, the company's direct banking subsidiary and member FDIC, offers an array of deposit products, including certificates of deposit, savings accounts, money market accounts, IRA deposit products and interest checking. Ally's Corporate Finance unit provides financing to middle-market companies across a broad range of industries.

Total Rewards

Ally's compensation program offers market-competitive base pay and pay-for-performance incentives (bonuses) based on achieving personal and company goals. But Ally's total compensation - or total rewards - extends beyond your paycheck and is designed to support and enrich your personal and professional life, including:

Time Away: competitive holiday and flexible paid-time-off, including time off for volunteering and voting.
Planning for the Future: benefits to help you plan for the near and long term including an industry-leading 401K retirement savings plan with matching and company contributions, student loan and 529 educational assistance programs, tuition reimbursement and other financial well-being programs.
Supporting your Health & Well-being: flexible health and insurance options including dental and vision, pre-tax Health Savings Account with employer contributions and a total well-being program that helps you and family stay on track physically, socially, emotionally and financially.
Building a Family: adoption, surrogacy and fertility support as well as benefits that help you take care of your family - parental and caregiver leave, back-up child and adult/elder day care program and child care discounts.
Work-Life Integration: other benefits including Life Matters® Employee Assistance Program, subsidized and discounted Weight Watchers® program and other employee discount programs.

Ally is an Equal Opportunity Employer

We extend equal employment opportunities to qualified applicants and employees on an equal basis regardless of an individual's age, race, color, sex, religion, national origin, disability, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, pregnancy status, marital status, military or veteran status, genetic disposition or any other reason protected by law.",3.9,"Ally Financial Inc.
3.9","Fort Washington, PA",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1919,Company - Public,Investment Banking & Asset Management,Finance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
256,Feshers- Data Analyst@Redmond,$42k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Description

Pactera, leading industry in localization and globalization services, is looking for in-house transcribers to work with us in our Redmond, WA office.

These transcribers will work on a project for our well-known worldwide IT client.

Working hours: *29 hours/ week*

Location: *Redmond, in-office*

Job Type: *Part-time*

Salary*: $14.00 /hour*
Role Responsibilities*
· Download existing transcription file and audio file (provided by Pactera)

· Listen to the recording.

· Verify that the transcription represents the recording

· Identify Speaker Name

· Edit Transcription segments

· Insert tags when necessary (background noise or additional voices)

· Submit the task
REQUIREMENTS*
· Native US English Speaker (a must)

· Ability to transcribe English text from audio

· Ability to closely follow guidelines

· Ability to learn new software quickly

· Must type at least 55 words per minute.

· Must be able to proof own work and be at least 98% accurate.

· Impeccable attention to detail

· Must be able to work on-site in Redmond office

Preferred Skills*:

· Past transcription experience preferred.

· Past working experience as content writer, journal editor or other writing experience.

· Good technical and data management skills.

· Good problem-solving and analytical skills.

· Experience in data entry and computer query procedures using a variety of software applications such as Microsoft Office Suite (Excel, Word and Outlook).
Training and guidelines will be provided.*
To be selected you have to pass a screening test.

We are looking forward to meeting you!

Job Type: Part-time

Pay: $14.00 per hour

Job Type: Part-time

Pay: $14.00 per hour",4.5,"Pactera Technologies
4.5","Seattle, WA",-1,10000+ Employees,1995,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
257,Data Analyst - Appraiser,-1,"Valucentric, an employee-based appraisal firm currently operating in 24 states, has an opening for an experienced Certified Residential Appraiser in our Boston office.

This is a full time position in support of our local TEAM of residential appraisers.

The ideal candidate is a currently a Certified Residential level Appraiser with experience in mortgage related residential appraisals. The ideal candidates enjoy having attained an expert level in UAD compliance, are very familiar with the UCDP data-set grading system, and are adaptable and flexible in the needs of the clients and the TEAM. The Valucentric TEAM works collaboratively in all aspects of the business, a truly futuristic approach in our industry.

If qualified and interested, please submit your resume. Qualified candidates will be contacted quickly as this position needs to be filled as soon as possible.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Professional Development Assistance
Vision Insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
Appraisal: 3 years (Required)
License:
Residential or Higher (Required)
Working Days:
Monday (Required)
Tuesday (Required)
Wednesday (Required)
Thursday (Required)
Friday (Required)
Work Location:
One location
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Adaptable/flexible -- enjoys doing work that requires frequent shifts in direction
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
High stress tolerance -- thrives in a high-pressure environment
Company's website:
www.valucentric.com
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/valucentric/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Only full-time employees eligible
Work Remotely:
No",-1,"Valucentric, LLC","Wakefield, MA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
258,HR Data Analyst,$35k-$65k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Details
Level
Experienced
Job Location
Oklahoma City Office - Oklahoma City, OK
Position Type
Full Time
Education Level
Bachelor's Degree
Travel Percentage
None
Job Category
General Business
Description

This position works with HR and the business to develop reports and provides analysis to inform and support decision-making. This role will utilize data analysis methodologies, reporting and data visualization tools, and requires an understanding of data mining/mashing, analytical mindset, data visualization, and the ability to frequently interface with executive and senior leaders.

RESPONSIBILITIES

Conducts analysis of HR and/or business data to identify actionable insights. Merges data from multiple sources/systems and provides ad-hoc reporting when needed
Leverages internal HR and/or business data using internal tools, systems, and data sources
Collaborates with cross-functional teams (HR, IT, Product Management and Development) to develop progressive analytics use cases for Product Management.
Proactively partners with key stakeholders to address business gaps or opportunities identified through analytics.
Develops reports, dashboards, and models to explore data and explain opportunities
Merges structured, semi-structured and unstructured data from several systems to highlight company trends related to recruiting and other business areas
Performs moderately complex data analysis and generates insights to support the HR workforce analytics needs of the business to drive informed business decisions
Delivers high quality analysis, reports, presentations using simple and effective visualizations that can be scaled for consumption by a larger audience
Creates and maintains monthly and quarterly workforce metrics and analysis
Builds strong relationships and collaborates with teammates, business leaders, and other internal clients
Automates data and analytics solutions, builds and prototypes dashboards to provide insights
Continuously monitors data quality and integrity
Manipulates and analyzes large data sets to gain insights and provide recommendations
Documents and maintains procedures for reports and records of information management and storage protocols
Develops and delivers weekly, monthly and quarterly client group metrics
Leverages advanced technical knowledge of excel and other data visualization tools
Qualifications

MINIMUM BASIC QUALIFICATIONS

Education/Certification:

Bachelor's degree in Business, Human Resources

Experience:

2-4 years of experience in Data Analytics
Experience with data visualization and advanced analytics tools
Human Resources experience

PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS

Education/Certification:

Bachelor's degree in Business, Human Resources or Quantitative Analytics preferred

Experience:

4 years of experience in HR Data Analytics
Human Resources/Workforce Analytics experience strongly preferred
Experience with Power BI, Tableau

Skills/Abilities:

Critical, analytical thinker with strong communication skills
Strong analytical skills and the ability to collect, organize, analyze, and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy
Technical expertise regarding data models, database design development, data mining and segmentation techniques
Adept at queries, report writing and presenting findings
Self-starter who thrives in a fast paced environment
Strong understanding of HR processes and procedures
Collaborative partner, builds and maintains professional relationships

Paycom is an equal opportunity employer and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any kind. Paycom makes employment decisions on the basis of business needs, job requirements, individual qualifications and merit. Paycom wants to have the best available people in every job. Therefore, Paycom does not permit its employees to harass, discriminate or retaliate against other employees or applicants because of race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, pregnancy, national origin, military and veteran status, age, physical or mental disability, genetic characteristic, reproductive health decisions, family or parental status or any other consideration made unlawful by applicable laws. Equal employment opportunity will be extended to all persons in all aspects of the employer-employee relationship. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including, but not limited to, hiring, training, promotion, discipline, compensation benefits, and separation of employment. The Human Resources Department has overall responsibility for this policy and maintains reporting and monitoring procedures. Any questions or concerns should be referred to the Human Resources Department.",4.4,"Paycom
4.4","Oklahoma City, OK",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1998,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
259,Junior Data Analyst,$40k-$69k (Glassdoor Est.),"(Req# 4174)

ICI Services is looking for a motivated individual who wants to join our team in support of a major US Navy program office at Naval Sea Systems Command (NAVSEA) at the historic Washington Navy Yard in Washington, DC. We are a mid-sized defense contractor providing Engineering & Integration, Systems Acquisition, Information Warfare, and In-Service Sustainment to government clients in 14 states and the District of Columbia. We need a Junior Data Analyst ready to join a fast-paced and exciting work environment.

Security Clearance:
Applicant must hold an active Department of Defense (DoD) SECRET personnel security clearance
Responsibilities:
Conduct research across various sources to support the Director’s oversight and assessment of various activities related to PEO USC subordinate commands, laboratories and warfare centers
Perform in-depth analysis of existing data and provide recommendations for data not currently tracked or recorded
Generate performance metrics for multiple programs
Provide recommendations for the visualization of information
Interpret data; analyze results using statistical techniques and provide ongoing reports and feedback
Create visual representations, graphs, charts, and tables for a wide range of data
Organize and deliver data in decision-quality form for use in executive briefings, reports to Congress, and other messaging
Support the development of responses to Departmental, Federal, and Congressional data calls and requests for information
Maintain data in appropriate databases, verify accuracy in data sets, and assist in the resolution of data anomalies
Experience Requirements:
3-5 years’ recent and relevant experience in data management and analysis with demonstrated progressive responsibility in support of the DoD enterprise is preferred
Work experience in positions requiring exceptional oral and written communication skills and above-average skills in MS Word, PowerPoint, and Excel applications as well as data analytic and visualization tools
Demonstrated ability to perform at a high-level under short deadlines
Strong organizational skills with the ability to multi-task and prioritize work assignments is required
Education Requirements:
Bachelor degree OR minimum of five (5) years’ active duty military OR minimum of ten (10) years’ industry experience required
EOE/M/F/ Disability/Vet
VEVRAA Federal Contractor

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Experience:
DoD logistics data management and analytical: 3 years (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.icisrvcs.com/careers
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.0,"ICI Services Corporation
3.0","Washington, DC",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1999,Company - Private,Architectural & Engineering Services,Business Services,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
260,Energy Analyst/Data Analyst,-1,"Open until filled

Position Summary:

This position is responsible for assisting the Markets Department in the analysis of electric energy supply strategies, power purchase contracts, project development, load trends and rates and pricing strategies in support of the Cooperative's strategic initiatives.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:

Perform quantitative analysis of historic market pricing data, load data and other factors that drive the strategic decisions for the cooperatives power supply
Create models and tools to automate, increase accuracy and expedite analysis
Assist the Markets Department with database queries, cleaning and formatting of large amounts of data
Identify sources of appropriate economic demographic and load data, design studies to collect and analyze pertinent information in support of load and revenue forecasting activities
Develop and maintain cash flow simulation models for purchased power, load costs and rate recovery
Develop portfolio and market impact analysis based on Nodal Protocols Revision Requests
Develop analytical techniques used in the economic analysis of various supply options and contracts
Develop, analyze and interpret load data to understand customer usage patterns for use in forecasting models, rate design and energy services offerings
Update existing and create new revenue and expense forecasting models using proven methodologies
Compare forecast performance with actual results, explain variances and recommend changes for future forecasting cycles
Perform financial evaluation and analysis of different retail rate structures
Research economic trends, emerging industry issues, impact of technologies, i.e., renewables, energy storage, end-use efficiencies, etc. and develop recommendations regarding their effects on usage patterns and the future demand
Monitor electric market data and factors, regulatory changes and competitor’s rate offerings
Develop and maintain critical information, history and databases
Provide routine and ad-hoc reports and analysis
Develop presentations and reports
Maintain the security of confidential information
Stay abreast of changes in technology

Supervisory and/or Leadership Responsibilities:

May provide technical direction, training and project lead responsibilities

Knowledge, Skills and Abilities:

Knowledge of using computer systems, which may include setting up and using hardware and software programs, entering data, configuration, or processing information
Knowledge of principles and processes for providing customer service
Knowledge of ERCOT market operations
Knowledge of ERCOT’s Nodal Protocols and financial settlement concepts
Skilled in time management
Skilled in prioritizing and managing changing priorities
Skilled in prioritizing, time management and managing changing priorities
Skilled in project management
Ability to function in a complex, rapid changing environment
Ability to query data, manipulate databases, and create reports and dashboards from databases
Ability to compute and interpret complex financial and statistical data
Ability to stay organized amid many evolving projects; detail-oriented and methodical with large amounts of data
Ability to manipulate and analyze data
Ability to work in a team oriented environment providing ideas and open feedback
Ability to maintain confidentiality
Ability to communicate effectively verbally and in writing
Ability to listen and understand information verbally and in writing
Ability to anticipate, identify, analyze and resolve conflict and problems

Minimum Qualifications – (Education, Experience, Certification, & Licensure):

Bachelor’s Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Engineering, Economics, Accounting, Finance or related discipline
Five years relevant experience
Directly related experience may substitute for education
Valid Driver’s License

Preferred Qualifications:

Advanced degree
Forecasting, statistical analysis and financial evaluation experience
Five years querying and managing large data sets
Advanced user of Microsoft Excel
Advanced user of database querying tools
Proficiency with SQL, VBA, and other programming languages
Experience with scrubbing and managing large data sets

Pedernales Electric Cooperative is an Equal Opportunity / Affirmative Action employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, protected Veteran status, sexual orientation and gender identity.",3.0,"Pedernales Electric Cooperative
3.0","Johnson City, TX",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1938,Nonprofit Organization,Utilities,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
261,Data Analyst,$42k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst

At Pactiv, the health and safety of our employees is a top priority. In response to the COVID-19 pandemic and in accordance with guidance from the Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC), we have implemented a number of safety precautions at all of our locations to protect our employees. These precautions include, but are not limited to, mandatory face coverings, daily COVID-19 screenings, including temperature screenings, social distancing requirements and proper hygiene protocols. In addition, we provide all of our employees with regular COVID-19 updates and education.

This position is for Pactiv, a company of Reynolds Group Holding Inc.

Job Description:

Develop digital solutions that address unmet needs, provide new insights or identify opportunities for growth.
Utilize digital solutions to enable more effective strategic, tactical and operational insights to support business functions.
Extract big data and transform it into actionable information for users by using the data visualization software Tableau.
Determine best methods to extract, model, manipulate, and present data that meets the requirements of the business.
Assist in the identification of opportunities across functional areas where the application of improved data would create value for the user.
Assist the Project Management Office with the development of digital reporting and tracking solutions for major company initiatives.
Work cross-functionally with groups such as IT, Finance and Logistics.
Assist in the creation and documentation of Robotic Process Automation (RPA) projects aimed at process improvement.
Assist in the development and coding of RPA solutions using the platform Automation Anywhere.

Qualifications:

BA/BS degree in Data Science, Computer Science, Finance, Statistics or related field.
Experience transforming large amounts of data.
Experience with data visualization software like Tableau a plus.
Comfortable taking initiative and working both autonomously and in a team environment.
Strong analytical skills and exceptional attention to detail
Python experience required
Excellent verbal and written communication skills.

Pactiv LLC is the leading manufacturer of food and beverage packaging solutions in North America and beyond. Since its founding in 1965, Pactiv has grown to support its customers, providing the broadest selection of products made from over a dozen materials. Today, the company is headquartered in Lake Forest, Illinois, and operates over 60 facilities with more than 14,000 employees across the globe. For more information, visit www.pactiv.com.

Pactiv LLC is an equal opportunity employer. We consider applicants for all positions without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, ancestry, citizenship, marital status, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, disability, protected veteran status, or any other legally protected status. ""IND1P"" #LI-TM1 #CB1",2.4,"Pactiv
2.4","Lake Forest, IL",-1,10000+ Employees,1965,Company - Private,Industrial Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
262,Senior Data Analyst,$60k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Known

Known is a modern marketing company engineered for the unprecedented challenges and opportunities facing marketers today. Known pairs PhD data scientists with award-winning creatives, expert research teams and strategists. Known is anchored by two decades of groundbreaking market research and data science capabilities, which uniquely empower our marketing strategy and acclaimed creative groups, who produce some of the most innovative, cutting-edge creative work in culture. The result? Marketing that is predisposed to succeed and be persistently optimized, directly impacting clients' bottom lines. Our clients span the leading brands in finance, technology, media, CPG, real estate and many other categories. Known has over 200 employees in 6 US cities including Seattle, San Francisco, Los Angeles, Austin, Boston and New York. Our teams have won multiple Emmys, Clios, Effies, Cannes Lions Awards and ProMax Agency of the Year three times.

Known's Media Science team uses advanced analytics, machine learning, statistics, and algorithms to plan and optimize advertising dollars. We partner with our clients to translate their business goals into meaningful metrics, and buy media across all channels to drive those target outcomes. We are looking for a Senior Data Analyst to join the team and work alongside other data analysts, data scientists, and software engineers.

The ideal candidate will have:
A BS/BA degree from a well-regarded college or university. STEM degrees are preferred.
2-5 years experience in analytics, advertising, ad tech, or media. Experience utilizing Python (or similar language) and SQL regularly
Proficiency in Microsoft Office (Excel, Word, PowerPoint)
A desire to work on advertising challenges that require flexibility in approach -- everything from on-the-fly analytics to statistics, big data, machine learning, and mathematical algorithms (but not alone!)
A willingness to learn foundational knowledge and skills rapidly
Superb communication and presentation skills
Ability to think strategically, analytically, and proactively about diverse business problems
Passion for managing the quality & accuracy of analytics, including checking your and others' work
Experience multi-tasking in a fast-paced environment is a plus
Experience working directly with clients is a plus
Experience with media buying is a plus
Experience with predictive analytics / data science is a plus
Your responsibilities would include:
Driving performance for our media campaigns and amazing our clients
Day-to-day monitoring, management, optimization, and development of assigned campaigns
Creating and validating data analyses
Building stories and slides for client reports
Developing new approaches (algorithms, models, and automation) to optimize KPIs and improve Known IP
Operating existing software infrastructure to traffic, evaluate performance, and analyze media
Interfacing directly with clients to communicate results",3.5,"Known
3.5","New York, NY",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2004,Company - Private,Advertising & Marketing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
263,Data Analyst,$37k-$66k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Summary*
Advanced Radiology Services is one of the largest physician-owned radiology practices in the country. Our growing practice includes 168 radiologists, 30 advanced practice providers, and more than 100 employees providing administrative support in our wholly owned subsidiary STARS. We value diversity on our team and promote a culture of inclusion. We provide services to more than 60 different sites across the state of Michigan.
Responsibilities and Duties*
The Data Analyst is responsible for using data analytics and financial analysis to assist the billing departments in solving complex business problems and in the development of ongoing monitoring tools.
Responsibilities: *
Serve as the company expert and main source of data support as it relates to Physician billing and billing operations
Identify, analyze, and escalate critical billing risks and issues
Work with internal and external customers to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of billing and billing operations
Coordinate fee schedule updates, analyze potential impact and audit for compliance
Fulfill various data requests using Decision Support tools and databases
Develop and maintain dashboards and reports that assist in monitoring the billing process
Additional duties and projects as assigned
Requirements: *
Bachelor’s Degree in Business Administration, Analytics, Computer Science or Mathematics
Minimum of 2 years of analytic experience is required, medical billing preferred
Experience with medical billing software, Healthpac preferred
Database (SQL) experience is preferred
Proficiency in Microsoft Office products including Outlook, Word, Excel, and PowerPoint
Benefits*
ARS offers career growth opportunity, work-life balance and outstanding compensation and benefits.

Job Type: Full-time

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Dependable -- more reliable than spontaneous
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Autonomous/Independent -- enjoys working with little direction
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.0,"Advanced Radiology Services
4.0","Grand Rapids, MI",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1997,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
264,Data Analyst - Insights,-1,"Doximity is transforming the healthcare industry. Our mission is to help clinicians save time so they can provide better care for patients.

We value diversity — in backgrounds and in experiences. Healthcare is a universal concern, and we need people from all backgrounds to help build a better future for all.

How you'll make an impact:
Play a key role in creating client-facing analytics by working closely with our Client Service Managers and Sales teams.
Showcase your engineering skills by creating data products from scratch and automating code so they can be re-used by other teammates.
Work with your team to build your technical and non-technical skill sets.
Leverage Doximity's extensive datasets to identify and classify behavioral patterns of medical professionals on our platform.
Grow into a presentation/communication-focused role or dive deeper into more-involved technical challenges—the choice is yours.
We're trying something different. In the past we'd throw out a laundry list of requirements but we realized there were 4 key traits we need - everything else can be flexible.

A successful candidate must have at least a three-year track record of these traits:
Collaborative—The best candidates and teammates are not only strong in their own aptitudes but care deeply about supporting each other's growth.
Passion for Data—You're going to help our clients and team members with data-driven decision making. We need someone that can manipulate millions of rows of data and also ask the right questions to find the important insights.
Attention to Detail—Clients expect the right answers and the successful candidate will have a history of error handling and creating quality checks to make sure we provide accurate data.
Time Management—Our team operates in a fast-paced environment. We have a lot of clients with a lot of questions and are looking for the best person to manage competing priorities from various stakeholders.
After 90 days on the job, we expect that you will be:
Able to create and evaluate complex SQL statements involving numerous tables and complex relationships.
Conducting Exploratory Data Analysis using Python using some of the most common modules (numpy, pandas, statsmodels, matplotlib).
Comfortable with UNIX command line interface and standard programming tools (vim/emacs, git, etc.).
Fun facts about the Insights team:
We have access to one of the richest healthcare datasets in the world, with deep information on hundreds of thousands of clinicians and their connections.
The members of our team bring a diverse set of technical and cultural backgrounds.
Business decisions at Doximity are driven by our data, analyses, and insights.
We like to have fun - company outings, team lunches, and other social events.
More info on Doximity

We're thrilled to be named the Fastest Growing Company in the Bay Area, and one of Fast Company's Most Innovative Companies. Joining Doximity means being part of an incredibly talented and humble team. We work on amazing products that over 70% of US doctors (and over one million healthcare professionals) use to make their busy lives a little easier. We're driven by the goal of improving inefficiencies in our $3.5 trillion U.S. healthcare system and love creating technology that has a real, meaningful impact on people's lives. To learn more about our team, culture, and users, check out our careers page, company blog, and engineering blog. We're growing steadily, and there's plenty of opportunity for you to make an impact.

Doximity is proud to be an equal opportunity employer, and committed to providing employment opportunities regardless of race, religious creed, color, national origin, ancestry, physical disability, mental disability, medical condition, genetic information, marital status, sex, gender, gender identity, gender expression, pregnancy, childbirth and breastfeeding, age, sexual orientation, military or veteran status, or any other protected classification. We also consider qualified applicants with criminal histories, consistent with applicable federal, state and local law.

This role is a remote position.",4.7,"Doximity
4.7",Remote,-1,201 to 500 Employees,2011,Company - Private,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
265,Sr. Data Analyst,-1,"You could say Brightree by ResMed is a technology company. And that’s true. But Brightree is, at its heart, about people. We develop innovative, end-to-end technology solutions and services for people facing everyday challenges in the post-acute care industry. Brightree helps streamline processes, improve efficiency, and increase profitability. For over fifteen years, organizations big and small have put their trust in us—for our wide-ranging solutions, our leadership, and our unmatched customer service. Going to work each day and creating new ways to positively impact our customers’ businesses and the lives of patients is just what we do. Because Brightree is, after all, about people.

To learn more about Brightree technology and solutions watch this short video by our CEO: https://vimeo.com/293016800

The Sr. Data Analyst will be responsible for the conversion, the management and the reporting of data within the Professional Services organization for new and existing customers. The right candidate will have an expert level knowledge of SQL Server with particular emphasis on Stored Procedures and SSIS packages. In addition, the candidate will have the ability to collect, organize, analyze and disseminate significant amounts of information with attention to detail and accuracy. Most importantly, the ideal candidate will be a creative thinker with a willingness to go the extra mile in order to satisfy the customer’s needs and assist them in whatever way possible.

Let's talk about you and Responsibilities:
Partner with stakeholders to understand new data requirements to ensure results meet the business needs
Work directly with Brightree customers to interpret their requirements to design and implement solutions
Have an expert level understanding of SQL and stored procedures. Make modification to existing Stored Procedures. Will also be required to define new store procedures and SSIS packages
Create solutions that allow capture of existing data into useable Brightree data formats
Mentor Data Analysts on the Data Services team
Communicate and consult with key accounts and customers in non-technical language
Be cognizant of the customer’s expectations on timelines and work diligently towards achieving that goal
Let's talk about skills and experience:
Must have a Bachelor’s degree in Computer Science, Engineering, MIS or related field required; plus six years of experience performing analysis and design to solve customer technical and business problems
Strong past experience in Microsoft SQL Server software development including 2 years of query tuning and performance troubleshooting and strong experience writing select, update, delete, and insert statements with multiple table joins
Past experience executing on pre-built SSIS/DTS packages to check data and migrate data to and from data staging tables in SQL
Also should exhibit experience with ETL process and concepts
Prior experience communicating ideas and opportunities to stakeholders in non-technical language
Experience in project management and identification of project critical path.
Comfortable working in a continually changing, customer-focused, matrixed environment
Comfortable balancing multiple high-priority deliverables correctly applying the appropriate judgment of what can shift
#LI-RD1

Joining us is more than saying “yes” to making the world a healthier place. It’s discovering a career that’s challenging, supportive and inspiring. Where a culture driven by excellence helps you not only meet your goals, but also create new ones. We focus on creating a diverse and inclusive culture, encouraging individual expression in the workplace and thrive on the innovative ideas this generates. If this sounds like the workplace for you, apply now!",3.5,"Brightree
3.5","Peachtree Corners, GA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2002,Company - Public,Enterprise Software & Network Solutions,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
266,Data Analyst,$41k-$72k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst
U.S. citizenship is required for this position due to Department of Defense restrictions.


Role Summary:

Work to collect, organize and interpret data for WPS that delivers enhanced business value and operational agility. This position will be responsible for inspecting, cleansing, transforming and modeling data to support complex advanced analytical solutions. This position will demonstrate emerging analytical capabilities that align with the business to assist in business decisions and help solve complex business problems.

In this role you will:
Work with internal and external stakeholders in framing business problems, identifying data sources and delivering solutions in an exploratory and production environment.
Apply design and data analysis techniques to organize the presentation of data in effective ways to make it easier to understand, insightful, and actionable.
Collaborate with Reporting& Analytics team members to identify and deliver advanced analytical capabilities to WPS business units.
Drive advanced analytical innovation by removing technical and cultural barriers to innovation process.
Provide guidance into the overall strategy and visualization methodologies used to solve complex business problems.
Maintain team repository of reusable data formulas, visualization templates, and views.
Generate advanced methods of data visualization to allow clearer communication, viewer engagement and improved decision-making.
Evangelize and mainstream advanced analytical solutions to internal customers.
Stay current on new and emerging data management and analytical technologies.
Responsible for data acquisition, translation and validation from multiple sources.
Comfortable in manipulating and analyzing complex, high volume, high dimensionality data from multiple sources.
Proactively identify sources of information either internal or external to enhance the research efforts and develop and test new complex data structures.
Automate data gathering to improve the efficiency and accuracy of data collection.
Design and implement data acquisition strategies for diverse sets of data from internal and external sources.
Provide support for legacy reporting environments, including migration of data delivery assets to current technology platforms.
Optimize the performance of new or existing reporting assets, including analysis of execution plans and implementation of techniques to reduce contention.
Review manually produced and automated delivery of data and reporting assets to ensure timely and error-free delivery
This role could be a good fit if you:
Enjoy solving data and reporting-related problems.
Want to work on a team that is diverse in both location and backgrounds.
Possess a strong background working withSQL Server and T-SQL.
Have strong attention to detail and enjoy analyzing data.
Are creative, innovative, and get excited about using data differently.
You’ll benefit from this experience by:
Expanding your SQL Server skillset working with large datasets.
Working with a forward thinking and highly collaborative team.
Working in an environment that serves our Nation’s military, veterans, Guard and Reserves along with their families.
You need to have:
U.S. citizenship is required for this position due to Department of Defense restrictions.
Bachelor's Degree in related field or equivalent post high school and/or related work experience.
Highly preferred:
2 or more years of progressive technology experience within the data management and analytics domains
2 or more years of database querying& reporting experience with diverse data sets OR a combination of relevant experience.
Experience querying relational and/or multi-dimensional databases (Microsoft SQL Server, Oracle, and MySQL)
Experience with querying NoSQL or other data lake architectures.
Experience with visualization tools such as PowerBI, Tableau or QlikView
Strong communications skills, an affinity for numbers and problem solving.
Your team:

This team is led by 1 manager and has 8 Data Analysts, 2 Process Analysts, and 1 Data Scientist. They are geographically diverse and work together well in their remote setting.

Compensation and Benefits
Eligible for annual Performance Bonus Program
401(k) withdollar-per-dollar match up to 6% of salary
Competitive paid time off
Health and dental insurance startDAY 1
Vision insurance
Flexible spending, dependent care, and health savings accounts
Short- and long-term disability, group life insurance
Dress for your day
Innovative professional and cognitive development programs
Who We Are

WPS Health Solutions is an innovator in health insurance and a worldwide leader in claims administration, serving millions of beneficiaries in the United States and abroad.

Founded in 1946, WPS offers health insurance plans for individuals, families, and seniors, and group plans for small and large businesses. We are a world-class claims processor and program administrator for the government’s Medicare program. And we manage benefits for millions of active-duty and retired military personnel and their families.

WPS has been named one of theWorld's Most Ethical Companies® by the Ethisphere® Institute for 10 years in a row.

Learn more about WPS.

Our Purpose and Values

Our purpose is to make healthcare easier for those we serve.Click Here

Our values– Customer Focused, Individual Responsibility, Mutual Respect, and Driven& Passionate– are the core of who we are and how we conduct business every day.

Health Insurance

WPS Health Insurance offers high-quality health insurance plans for individuals and families, Medicare supplement plans for seniors, and group health plans for businesses of every size.

http://wpshealthsolutions.com/business-units/wpshi.shtml

Military and Veterans Health

WPS Military and Veterans Health administers claims and provides customer service and related activities for the U.S. Department of Defense and the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs and their beneficiaries.

http://wpshealthsolutions.com/business-units/wpsmvh.shtml

Government Health Administrators

WPS Government Health Administrators manages Medicare Part A and Part B benefits for more than 7 million beneficiaries. As one of the largest contractors for the Centers for Medicare& Medicare Services, we’ve served Medicare beneficiaries and their health care providers since 1966.

http://wpshealthsolutions.com/business-units/wpsgha.shtml

Arise

Arise Health Plan provides innovative and high-value health plans to groups and individuals in eastern and northeastern Wisconsin. With our quality Wisconsin-based customer service, Arise offers health care expertise with a personal touch.

http://wpshealthsolutions.com/business-units/arise.shtml

EPIC Specialty Benefits

EPIC Specialty Benefits provides businesses group insurance products that cover:
Life
Disability
Dental
Vision
Voluntary benefits
http://wpshealthsolutions.com/business-units/epicsb.shtml

Stay connected: Sign-up for Job Alerts

FOLLOW US!

Facebook

Twitter

LinkedIn",3.3,"WPS Health Solutions
3.3","Dallas, TX",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1946,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
267,DLP Analyst III (Data Loss Prevention),-1,"Position/Title: DLP Analyst III (Data Loss Prevention)

** NOTE: Must have demonstrated experience with McAfee ePO/HBSS. **

Location: Charlotte, NC (Must be within a few hours of our corporate office in Winston-Salem, NC)

Primary Purpose:

The Data Loss Prevention compliance analyst will be the primary Point of Contact of a critical system and process that will ensure key data is monitored and protected following regulatory and legal compliance standards such as PCI, HIPAA, ISO27001 and NIST Cybersecurity Frameworks. The Compliance Analyst will work with the other members of the team to enhance business practices, internal controls and performs other review related activities to support the execution of the department's annual assessment plan.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities:

Following is a summary of the essential functions for this job. Other duties may be performed, both major and minor, which are not mentioned below. Specific activities may change from time to time.
Monitor the data movement and ensure the security protocols are well designed and in function as per requirement.
Work with Security Architects, Security Analysts, Security Administrators and other IT and business departments to design effective and efficient procedures and controls to meet IT compliance requirements
Monitor the use of the tools and ensure a consistent process of improvement is in place.
Understand Healthcare sector requirements and rules for implementing a DLP solution. Adhere to local policies and laws to ensure data movement is appropriate.
Reviewing BAU processes to ensure they are fit for purpose
Recommend remediation activity for compliance activities found deficient and monitors remediation progress
Provide technical auditing duties as liaison between the IT department and internal and external auditing teams
Review audit trails and access control violations, reporting such violations to Security Analysts and management when necessary
Monitor changes in the IT regulatory and security landscape and reports on the impact of those changes to IT security and operational processes and procedures
Collect and document business requirements for process identification/improvement/automation efforts
Contribute to the development of process improvements
Apply knowledge of key regulations to influence assessment scope
Formulate appropriate conclusions regarding the adequacy of internal controls and procedures based on the assessment work performed and knowledge of company operation, drafts well written, clear and concise finding reports and participates in presenting the findings to the Enterprise Risk & Compliance management
Minimum Skills and Competencies:

The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skill and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.
8+ years substantive experience with End Point protection tools within a licensed financial institution or a regulatory compliance examiner with a federal or state financial services regulator
Bachelors degree in Computer Science or Computer Information Systems or related or equivalent experience
Demonstrated knowledge of HIPAA, PCI, SOX, ISO27000 and NIST Cybersecurity Frameworks
Excellent communication and writing skills
Demonstrated detailed oriented self-starter and the ability to work independently with limited supervision and limited direction, and in collaborative team environments
A strong ability to multi-task and manage varying priorities and projects
Excellent interpersonal, verbal, and written communication skills with the ability to communicate security risk and compliance related concepts to a broad range of technical and non-technical staff
The ability to provide support after normal business hours as needed
Proficient in Microsoft Office (Word, Excel, Outlook, PowerPoint)
Desired Skills:
CIA, CISSP, CISA, CISM, CCRISC, or CGEIT certifications
GRC Tool, Tripwire Enterprise, Tripwire IP360, Nessus, BeyondTrust Retina, Qradar, Trustwave TrustKeeper, Proofpoint, McAfee ePO/HBSS
#LI-PJ1

National General Holdings Corp. is an Equal Opportunity (EO) employer Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment regardless of any characteristic protected by law. Candidates must possess authorization to work in the United States, as it is not our practice to sponsor individuals for work visas.

In the event you need assistance or accommodation in completing your online application, please contact NGIC main office by phone at (336) 435-2000.",3.2,"National General Insurance
3.2","Charlotte, NC",-1,5001 to 10000 Employees,1939,Company - Public,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
268,Data Analyst,-1,"ProVantageX Data Analyst*
Who We Are*
ProVantageX (PVX) is the most complete, two-way connected platform for the buying and selling of local Television media in the US. PVX combines the power of automation and data to bring value and operational efficiency in the first two-way connected platform for local television buyers and sellers. We allow media professionals to focus more time on strategic creativity, while helping them improve value by seamlessly blending and optimizing qualitative and quantitative data to precise campaign designs
Job Description*
Partner with colleagues facilitating the design, build and automation of reports / dashboards that provide insight into behaviors and trends.
Perform data manipulation, cleansing and standardization to provide a framework for advanced reporting capabilities and descriptive analytics.
Review and document the content and structure of existing tables to enhance their utility.
Partner with colleagues facilitating the design, build and automation of reports / dashboards that provide insight into behaviors and trends.
Build intuitive interfaces, infographics, and visualizations to tell stories with data analysis and insights for both technical and non-technical audiences.
Participate and contribute in the analysis, design, development, and implementation of various Business Intelligence initiatives.
Validate source data with data mappings and ensure data integrity.
Write technical procedures for applications including operations, user guide, etc.
Support data integration resolve both design and analytical problems, as well as data processing enhancements.
Work across functional teams to identify and resolve data issues.
Required Skills / Qualifications: *
Implementing and supporting self-service BI tools such as Microsoft PowerBI Desktop/Excel (PowerPivot, PowerQuery)
Analyze reports for trends and communicate those trends in various formats.
Excellent problem-solving skills, particularly with regard to anticipating and solving issues, or concerns before they occur or become critical.
Self-starter with strong quantitative and analytical skills.
Build user-friendly UIs to improve utilization of data.
Must be detail oriented and highly organized.
Team player with strong collaboration skills.
Experience: *
1 to 2 years of analytical experience, using self-service BI tools such as PowerBI Desktop, advanced Excel (PowerPivot, PowerQuery)
Strategic thinker with ability to formulate solutions to complex problems.
Track record of identifying and implementing data focused solutions.
Ability and willingness to roll up the sleeves and get things done.
Demonstrate persistence and resilience at accomplishing difficult tasks, plus proven ability to learn from failures.
Experience with data analysis methods, techniques and understand statistics concepts (e.g., hypothesis testing, regression analysis) a plus.
BA/BS in a quantitative discipline (statistics, mathematics, quantitative finance, economics, marketing, etc.)
Compensation: *
Compensation based on experience.
Full benefits package including medical, dental, QTB, FSA and 401K.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $45,000.00 - $55,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) Matching
Dental Insurance
Health Insurance
Paid Time Off
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
https://www.provantagex.com/
Company's Facebook page:
https://www.facebook.com/ProvantageX/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",-1,ProVantageX,"New York, NY",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
269,Data Analyst,-1,"POSITION SUMMARY *
The Data Analyst oversees and conducts the conversion of data into insights that will lead to informed business decisions. The position works directly with stakeholders and the business’s top management and executives within the assigned departments. The Data Analyst will handle multiple simultaneous tasks, prioritize work, and remain functional under pressure, and aggressive timelines.
ESSENTIAL FUNCTIONS*
Conduct detailed data analysis on data used across business units to evaluate business processes and improve on/create new feature and provide innovative analytical insights
Perform various data analytics in SQL and MS Excel using statistical models or industry accepted tools
Provide relational database expertise to construct and execute SQL queries to be used in data analysis activities
Manage and redesign the reporting environment, including data sources, security and metadata
Support initiatives for data integrity and normalization
Support the data warehouse in identifying and revising reporting requirements
Provide expertise and translate the business needs to design; and develop tools, techniques, and metrics, and dashboards for insights and data visualization
Responsible for developing and executing tools to monitor and report on data quality
Responsible for providing high level advanced triage support to stakeholders, business partners, and product teams in managing specific issue resolution activities
Analyze data from large disparate data sets, queries, and reports from applications for operations or management staff of assigned business unit(s)
Contribute to applying knowledge of best practices to influence transformations in business, data, and technology architecture
Participate in other interdepartmental cross training
Maintain strict confidentiality and discretion
MINIMUM QUALIFICATIONS*
TECHNICAL SKILLS: *
Proficient with T-SQL including stored procedures, views, functions, query optimization
Proficient with SQL Server Management Studio (SSMS)
Data reporting and visualization tools like SQL Server Reporting Services (SSRS) and Power BI
Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Office tools including Outlook, Word, Excel including, pivot charts, pivot tables, macros, and complex formulas
Ability to work with structured and non-structured data sources
PREFERRED QUALIFICATIONS
Experience in ETL technologies and frameworks such as SQL Server Integration Services (SSIS).
DATA ANALYTICAL SKILLS: *
Be able to differentiate and express applications of qualitative and quantitative data
Detailed knowledge of two and multi-dimensional data modeling and shaping
Demonstrated ability to multi-task and prioritize
Master problem solving and creative thinking skills
3-5 years of industry experience as a Business/Data Analyst with 3-5 experience in data analysis using tools such as SQL and Excel
Strong organizational and analytical skills
EDUCATION*
Bachelor’s degree (preferred Master’s degree) in Analytics, Computer Science, or Data Science; Mathematics or in a related field and 3-5 years of industry experience in data analysis using SQL
PREFERRED CERTIFICATIONS
CIPM, CFA, and/or CAIA certification(s) with proven track record of relevant technical experience; SQL and relational database knowledge are required for the data analyst position in the financial sector
COMMUNICATION SKILLS*
The role of a data analyst involves working with people and managing junior team of analysts. It is crucial to have exceptional writing and verbal communication skills to perform job duties and manage others
Job Type: Full-time

Experience:
business analyst: 3 years (Required)
SQL Server Reporting Services: 2 years (Required)
T-SQL: 2 years (Required)
SQL Server Management Studio: 2 years (Preferred)
Location:
Santa Ana, CA (Required)
Work Location:
One location
Benefits:
Health insurance
Dental insurance
Vision insurance
Paid time off
Professional development assistance
Tuition reimbursement
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",-1,Confidential,"Santa Ana, CA",-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1,-1
270,Data Analyst,$32k-$62k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the Position: *
TruHearing’s provider network consists of 6,000+ hearing care professionals. As a Network Adherence Analyst, you will be playing a vital role in ensuring that our provider network maintains the highest quality standards by monitoring, tracking, and reporting satisfaction data for adherence.
Essential Functions & Responsibilities: *
• Convert patient satisfaction data found in various databases into information that supports the decision-making process of quality adherence

• Utilize data to assess overall provider quality by:
systematically track providers past performance of delivering customer satisfaction
develop audit capabilities to ensure adherence to patient care and physical location standards
identify trends that can be used to drive improvements
• Collaborate with Network Management team to improve provider quality outcomes by
providing timely and actionable provider scorecards/ dashboards
make recommendations for provider education opportunities and corrective actions where necessary o
identify and report key, top performing providers
• Support quality improvement initiatives and assist with developing new initiatives

• Interpret and comply with quality adherence standards • All other duties as assigned by your supervisor
Qualifications: *
A minimum of 2 years of experience in a similar analytics role
Proficiency with Microsoft programs including Access, Word, Excel & Outlook (Certifications preferred
Expertise on datasets and reports relevant to provider quality, including trends, and customer facing reports
Highly self-motivated
Problem-solving and decision-making skills
Customer service competence
Ability to work well with a group of people to achieve a shared goal or outcome
Excellent communication skills, verbal and written
Coachable and willing to improve • Ability to be creative and flexible when exploring new ideas
Exude the “TruHearing DNA” which includes being energetic, passionate, empathetic, and mission-driven
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $34.00 - $42.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Relocation assistance
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Detail-oriented -- quality and precision-focused
Aggressive -- competitive and growth-oriented
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Stable -- traditional, stable, strong processes
People-oriented -- supportive and fairness-focused
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
https://www.truhearing.com/careers/
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",4.4,"TruHearing
4.4","Draper, UT",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2003,Company - Private,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
271,Data Analyst,$48k-$89k (Glassdoor Est.),"Symetra is seeking to hire an amazing Data Analyst to join our team!

About the role
Our Data Analyst will be responsible for designing, developing and maintaining reporting and database components. You will be responsible for understanding and documenting business and technical data requirements by partnering with business customers and business analysts. The Data Analyst will also draw out requirements by analyzing existing reports, queries, and data.

What you’ll do
• Collect, compile and analyze data, from various structured and unstructured sources.
• Provide technical consulting in the definition, design, and creation of Microsoft SQL database environment.
• Transform client requests into data deliverables to include data models, data mappings and data transformation rules.
• Debug and optimize existing queries, views, and tables to improve performance.
• Create custom reports to support multiple functional users.
• Design and develop packages to transfer data from source to destinations using ETL process

What we offer you
We don’t take a “one-size-fits-all” approach when it comes to our employees. Our programs are designed to make your life better both at work and at home.
• Flexible work program and telecommute arrangements
• Wellness program offering employees a variety of resources crafted to assist you in reaching and maintaining your optimum health
• Plan for your future with our 401(k) plan and take advantage of immediate vesting and company matching up to 6%
• Paid time away including vacation and sick time, flex days and ten paid holidays
• Give back to your community and double your impact through our company matching

Want more details? Check out our Symetra Benefits Overview
Who you are
• Bachelor’s Degree or equivalent experience.
• Business and data analysis experience.
• Minimum of 3 years of Data Analysis and/or report development with modern visualization tools (preferably MS Power BI).
• Minimum of 5 years of recent IT experience.
• Minimum of 3 years of experience developing complex SQL queries for analytics purposes.
• Strong communication skills; ability to interface with office teams and business stakeholders
• Professional with technical reporting skills and willingness to seek understanding of business goals and the role of data in achieving them. Ability to resolve complex issues in creative and effective ways.

We empower inclusion
At Symetra, we’re building a place where every employee feels valued, respected, and has opportunities to contribute. Inclusion is about recognizing our assumptions, considering multiple perspectives and removing barriers.
We embrace and celebrate diverse experiences, identities and perspectives, because lifting each other up fuels thought and creates a stronger, more innovative company. We invite you to learn more about our efforts here.

In a complex industry, we strive for clarity.
Symetra is a dynamic and growing financial services company with 60 years of experience and customers nationwide. In our daily work delivering retirement, employee benefits, and life insurance products, we're guided by the principles of VALUE, TRANSPARENCY AND SUSTAINABILITY. That means we provide products and services people need at a competitive price, we communicate clearly and honestly so people understand what they're getting, and we build products that stand the test of time. We work hard and do what's right for our customers, communities and employees. Join our team at Symetra to meaningfully contribute to a world where more people have access to financial freedom.

To learn more about Symetra and our careers visit http://www.symetra.com/careers

#LI-KM1",3.5,"Symetra
3.5","Bellevue, WA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1957,Company - Private,Insurance Carriers,Insurance,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
272,Data Analyst I,$35k-$62k (Glassdoor Est.),"Data Analyst I

Job Details
Level
Experienced
Job Location
Ontario - Washington, DC, DC
Position Type
Full Time
Education Level
4 Year Degree
Travel Percentage
None
Job Shift
Day
Job Category
Health Care
Description
Mary's Center is committed to promoting diversity, equity and inclusion (DEI) within our organization and the communities we serve. We embrace diversity of experiences, ideas, and individuals, and seek to bring diverse candidates to the table.

The Data Analyst I with work with other Data Management and Health Analytics (DMHA) team members to run and prepare reports for all Mary’s Center Initiatives to include other departmental requests, grant applications and standard reporting and ad hoc reporting. The Data Analyst I is responsible for running routine quality and outcomes reports, responding to requests for data as well as grant reporting. This position requires proficient command of SQL coding and advanced Microsoft Excel skills, including creating and using complex formulas and manipulating large datasets.

Reportability

This position will report directly to the Director of Quality & Outcomes.

Essential Duties and Responsibilities

To perform this job successfully, an individual must be able to perform each essential duty satisfactorily.
Build complex queries in SQL Server
Build Tableau Dashboards
Analyze large datasets and be able to strategize methods of data collection
Assist other team members with their duties
Run routine quality and outcomes reports by scheduled due dates, validates and analyzes data, sends data to staff responsible for programs.
Prepare patient panels for chronic disease management and group care
Manage health maintenance reminder messages
Qualifications
The requirements listed below are representative of the knowledge, skills, and/or ability required. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the essential functions.

Education and/or Experience – Undergraduate degree in social science research and evaluation field and/or two to three years’ experience working in a research/evaluation setting. Extensive experience with Microsoft Excel, including creating and using complex formulas and large datasets. Knowledge of Word, and PowerPoint is essential, knowledge of SQL, SPSS, preferred, as well as a thorough understanding and working knowledge of patient/client confidentiality issues and HIPAA compliance/regulations. Knowledge of SQL and integration of SQL queries in Tableau. Understanding of data flow. Individual must be detail-oriented and able to coordinate multiple tasks at once.

Physical Demands – Regularly required to sit; frequently required to reach with hands and arms, walk, stoop, kneel, crouch, talk or hear; must be able to lift objects up to twenty-five (25) pounds.

Work Environment – Mostly in a typical office and/or home setting with a quiet to moderate noise level. May be exposed to extreme cold, heat, and humidity due to outside weather conditions.",3.3,"Marys Center For Maternal and Child Care
3.3","Washington, DC",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,1988,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$50 to $100 million (USD),-1
273,Machine Learning Data Scientist/Analyst,$98k-$156k (Glassdoor Est.),"Machine Learning Data Scientist/Analyst Job

Location(s): CO - Alamosa; CO - Arapahoe; CO - Arvada; CO - Aurora; CO - Bayfield; CO - Boulder; CO - Brighton; CO - Brush; CO - Centennial; CO - Cheyenne Wells; CO - Del Norte; CO - Denver; CO - Durango; CO - Englewood; CO - Evergreen; CO - Fort Collins; CO - Georgetown; CO - Glenwood Spg; CO - Golden; CO - Granby; CO - Grand Junction; CO - Greeley; CO - Hayden; CO - Henderson; CO - Hugo; CO - Ignacio; CO - Keenesburg; CO - Lakewood; CO - Leadville; CO - Loveland; CO - Matheson; CO - Meeker; CO - Minturn; CO - Ophir; CO - Platteville; CO - Pueblo; CO - Rifle; CO - Salida; CO - Silverthorne; CO - Sterling; CO - Wiggins; DC - Washington; GA - Atlanta; MI - Ironwood; MN - Albany; MN - Bayport; MN - Becker; MN - Brainerd; MN - Burnsville; MN - Cannon Falls; MN - Dexter; MN - Dodge Center; MN - Edina; MN - Faribault; MN - Gaylord; MN - Glenville; MN - Glenwood; MN - Grand Meadow; MN - Hendricks; MN - Holland; MN - Hugo; MN - Inver Grove Heights; MN - Jeffers; MN - Jordan; MN - La Crescent; MN - Mankato; MN - Maple Grove; MN - Mapleton; MN - Minneapolis; MN - Montevideo; MN - Monticello; MN - Montrose; MN - New Richland; MN - Newport; MN - Northfield; MN - Paynesville; MN - Pipestone; MN - Reading; MN - Red Wing; MN - Roseville; MN - Shakopee; MN - Shorewood; MN - Slayton; MN - St Cloud; MN - St Paul; MN - Wabahsa; MN - Waconia; MN - Waseca; MN - Waterville; MN - Welch; MN - White Bear Lake; MN - Winona; MN - Wyoming; MN - Zumbrota; ND - Courtenay; ND - Fargo; ND - Grand Forks; ND - Kulm; ND - Minot; ND - Rolla; NM - Artesia; NM - Carlsbad; NM - Clovis; NM - Hobbs; NM - Portales; NM - Rogers; NM - Roswell; NM - Santa Fe; NM - Santa Fe; NM - Tucumcari; SD - Canton; SD - Dell Rapids; SD - Lennox; SD - Marion; SD - Salem; SD - Sioux Falls; SD - South Shore; SD - Watertown; TX - Amarillo; TX - Austin; TX - Borger; TX - Canadian; TX - Canyon; TX - Claude; TX - Dalhart; TX - Denver City; TX - Dimmitt; TX - Dumas; TX - Earth; TX - Floydada; TX - Friona; TX - Hereford; TX - Levelland; TX - Littlefield; TX - Lubbock; TX - Muleshoe; TX - Pampa; TX - Perryton; TX - Petersburg; TX - Plainview; TX - Post; TX - Seminole; TX - Slaton; TX - Spearman; TX - Vega; TX - Wheeler; WI - Abbotsford; WI - Almena; WI - Amery; WI - Ashland; WI - Baldwin; WI - Blair; WI - Chippewa Falls; WI - Cornell; WI - Durand; WI - Eau Claire; WI - Ellsworth; WI - Glen Flora; WI - Hayward; WI - Holcombe; WI - Hudson; WI - Jim Falls; WI - La Crosse; WI - Ladysmith; WI - Madison; WI - Manitowish Water; WI - Menomonie; WI - Neillsville; WI - Phillips; WI - Rice Lake; WI - Sparta; WI - St Croix Falls; WI - Trego; WI - Viroqua; WI - Winter

Are you looking for an exciting job where you can put your skills, talents and education to work at a company you can feel proud to be a part of? Do you want a workplace that will challenge you and offer you opportunities to learn and grow? A professional position at Xcel Energy could be just what you’re looking for.

Position Summary

This position will focus on our Machine Learning/Artificial Intelligence business area.

Responsible for providing cyber security guidance, identification, evaluation, design, development, implementation and integration of cyber security solutions, products and services. Provide expertise and execution in the day-to-day operations of all cyber security solutions, technology and procedures including vulnerability management, penetration testing, perimeter management and testing including rogue wireless detection, cyber forensic investigations, and overall security technology and solutions management. Ensure all regulatory, contractual and internal security requirements are met in relation to the day-to-day operations and use of cyber security solutions, technology and procedures. Execute assigned tasks as part of an on-call rotation.

Essential Responsibilities

Manage and operate all security solutions and technology used in cyber security to provide protection and regulatory compliance.
Perform Cyber Security Audits and Penetration Tests as well as mitigation of Cyber Security Vulnerabilities.
Provide cyber security support to business and technical teams in the design of standardized products and customized solutions. Must be flexible to continuously changing demands and technologies and have the ability to maintain a library of security tools used as part of this function.
Develop and maintain a working relationship with 3rd Party service providers responsible for providing technology consulting. Work with business unit executives and service providers to introduce required Cyber Security functionalities into the environment.
Perform Cyber Investigations and maintain forensic evidence as needed.
Provide guidance and training to internal staff including project managers, other Xcel Energy technical areas as well as customers and trade allies on cyber security issues and requirements.
Provide all assigned responsibilities as part of an on-call rotation.

Minimum Requirements

Bachelor’s degree with a concentration in computer science, technology, accounting or business or equivalent combination of education and experience.
Minimum of 5 years experience in I/T including 3 years direct experience in cyber security.
Demonstrated verbal/written communication and presentation skills.
Demonstrated ability to effectively communicate information and recommendations to management.
Demonstrated leadership skills.
Proven problem solving and business risk analysis skills.
Ability to excel in a team environment.
Strong investigative, conflict resolution and negotiation skills.
Must possess a broad knowledge relating to I/T infrastructures and have in-depth and up-to-date experience with multiple operating systems and desk side integration.

Preferred

Experience with machine learning/artificial intelligence, specifically the development of algorithms used for the analysis of security data.

As a leading combination electricity and natural gas energy company, Xcel Energy offers a comprehensive portfolio of energy-related products and services to 3.4 million electricity and 1.9 million natural gas customers across eight Western and Midwestern states. At Xcel Energy, we strive to be the preferred and trusted provider of the energy our customers need. If you’re ready to be a part of something big, we invite you to join our team.

Posting Notes: CO - Denver || CO - Alamosa; CO - Arapahoe; CO - Arvada; CO - Aurora; CO - Bayfield; CO - Boulder; CO - Brighton; CO - Brush; CO - Centennial; CO - Cheyenne Wells; CO - Del Norte; CO - Denver; CO - Durango; CO - Englewood; CO - Evergreen; CO - Fort Collins; CO - Georgetown; CO - Glenwood Spg; CO - Golden; CO - Granby; CO - Grand Junction; CO - Greeley; CO - Hayden; CO - Henderson; CO - Hugo; CO - Ignacio; CO - Keenesburg; CO - Lakewood; CO - Leadville; CO - Loveland; CO - Matheson; CO - Meeker; CO - Minturn; CO - Ophir; CO - Platteville; CO - Pueblo; CO - Rifle; CO - Salida; CO - Silverthorne; CO - Sterling; CO - Wiggins; DC - Washington; GA - Atlanta; MI - Ironwood; MN - Albany; MN - Bayport; MN - Becker; MN - Brainerd; MN - Burnsville; MN - Cannon Falls; MN - Dexter; MN - Dodge Center; MN - Edina; MN - Faribault; MN - Gaylord; MN - Glenville; MN - Glenwood; MN - Grand Meadow; MN - Hendricks; MN - Holland; MN - Hugo; MN - Inver Grove Heights; MN - Jeffers; MN - Jordan; MN - La Crescent; MN - Mankato; MN - Maple Grove; MN - Mapleton; MN - Minneapolis; MN - Montevideo; MN - Monticello; MN - Montrose; MN - New Richland; MN - Newport; MN - Northfield; MN - Paynesville; MN - Pipestone; MN - Reading; MN - Red Wing; MN - Roseville; MN - Shakopee; MN - Shorewood; MN - Slayton; MN - St Cloud; MN - St Paul; MN - Wabahsa; MN - Waconia; MN - Waseca; MN - Waterville; MN - Welch; MN - White Bear Lake; MN - Winona; MN - Wyoming; MN - Zumbrota; ND - Courtenay; ND - Fargo; ND - Grand Forks; ND - Kulm; ND - Minot; ND - Rolla; NM - Artesia; NM - Carlsbad; NM - Clovis; NM - Hobbs; NM - Portales; NM - Rogers; NM - Roswell; NM - Santa Fe; NM - Santa Fe; NM - Tucumcari; SD - Canton; SD - Dell Rapids; SD - Lennox; SD - Marion; SD - Salem; SD - Sioux Falls; SD - South Shore; SD - Watertown; TX - Amarillo; TX - Austin; TX - Borger; TX - Canadian; TX - Canyon; TX - Claude; TX - Dalhart; TX - Denver City; TX - Dimmitt; TX - Dumas; TX - Earth; TX - Floydada; TX - Friona; TX - Hereford; TX - Levelland; TX - Littlefield; TX - Lubbock; TX - Muleshoe; TX - Pampa; TX - Perryton; TX - Petersburg; TX - Plainview; TX - Post; TX - Seminole; TX - Slaton; TX - Spearman; TX - Vega; TX - Wheeler; WI - Abbotsford; WI - Almena; WI - Amery; WI - Ashland; WI - Baldwin; WI - Blair; WI - Chippewa Falls; WI - Cornell; WI - Durand; WI - Eau Claire; WI - Ellsworth; WI - Glen Flora; WI - Hayward; WI - Holcombe; WI - Hudson; WI - Jim Falls; WI - La Crosse; WI - Ladysmith; WI - Madison; WI - Manitowish Water; WI - Menomonie; WI - Neillsville; WI - Phillips; WI - Rice Lake; WI - Sparta; WI - St Croix Falls; WI - Trego; WI - Viroqua; WI - Winter || United States (US) || Customer And Innovation || 56130:Cyber Security || Full-Time || Non-Bargaining ||

Requisition Number: 24749

Equal Opportunity Employer: Minority/Female/Disability/Veteran

Individuals with a disability who need an accommodation to apply please contact us at recruiting@xcelenergy.com

EEO is the Law | EEO is the Law Supplement | Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination | Equal Opportunity Policy (PDF) | Employee Rights (PDF)

ACCESSIBILITY STATEMENT
Xcel Energy endeavors to make https://www.xcelenergy.com/ accessible to any and all users. If you would like to contact us regarding the accessibility of our website or need assistance completing the application process, please contact Xcel Energy Talent Acquisition at recruiting@xcelenergy.com. This contact information is for accommodation requests only and cannot be used to inquire about the status of applications.

Our Values: One Team Powered by Many

Committed
Connected
Safe
Trustworthy",3.6,"Xcel Energy
3.6","Denver, CO",-1,10000+ Employees,1909,Company - Public,Utilities,"Oil, Gas, Energy & Utilities",$10+ billion (USD),-1
274,Business Data Analyst,-1,"Our Customer is an American business and financial software company that develops and sells financial, accounting, and tax preparation software and related services for small businesses, accountants, and individuals. They are laser-focused on their customers, live and breathe innovation, and champion those who dare to dream. Their Mission is powering prosperity around the world. They do it by attracting the world’s top talent, bringing vital partners into their global platform, and leaving the world a better place through exceptional corporate citizenship.

We are seeking a Business Data Analyst on a contract basis to support our Customer’s business needs.

What you’ll do:

• Partner with marketing and Product Management by providing actionable insights from data.

• Apply your expertise in quantitative analysis, data mining, and the presentation of data to see beyond the numbers and understand how our users interact with the product

• Develop a deep understanding of the Small Business Group ecosystem and be able to identify and analyze the impact of marketing and product changes on customer behavior, acquisition and retention.

• Use Hypothesis-driven approach to drive setup and analysis of A/B tests and provide recommendations based on the test performance

• Create dashboards to understand early user engagement and proactively come up with ideas to improve customer experience

• Communicate analytical findings and recommendations in a clear and concise way to non-technical audiences, both in oral and written presentations

Must Haves:

• 5+ years relevant experience with a proven track record of leveraging analytics to drive significant business impact.

• Advanced SQL skills and proficiency in visualization tools such as Tableau Experience with R, Python and Hive Exceptional analytical skills and strong business acumen

• Outstanding communication skills with the ability to influence decision-makers and build consensus with teams

Education: BS or MS degree in Statistics, Mathematics, Operations Research, CS, Econometrics or related field

Hours & Location:

Standard M-F, 40 hours/week. This role will be remote while COVID restrictions are in place. The expectation is to be onsite at Mountain View, CA location once it is deemed safe to do so

Now for the Perks!

Health Benefits: Medical, Dental, Vision, Life (including spouse & child), 401k, STD/LTD, AD&D, and Commuter Benefits program.",4.9,"The Mom Project
4.9","Mountain View, CA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
275,Marketing Intelligence and Data Analyst,-1,"The Kestra team has over 400 years of experience in the external and internal cardiac medical device markets. The company was founded in 2014 by industry leaders inspired by the opportunity to unite modern wearable technologies with proven device therapies. Kestra’s solutions combine high quality and technical performance with a wearable design that provides the greatest regard for patient comfort and dignity. Innovating versatile new ways to deliver care, Kestra is helping patients and their care teams harmoniously monitor, manage and protect life.

The Marketing Intelligence and Data Analyst generates data-driven analyses and develops insights to guide marketing and sales strategy and initiatives related to market entry and product launches. This person plays a key internal consultative role assessing specific market characteristics and developing tailored strategies for Kestra marketing, sales, and operations efforts in the wearable medical technologies space.
ESSENTIAL DUTIES: *
· Derive insights from deep analysis of quantitative and qualitative data from a variety of sources to provide thoughtful and relevant marketing, sales, and operations recommendations.

· Perform and report complex analyses of key health care industry environments including cardiology, durable medical equipment, healthcare systems and payors.

· Act as a project leader owning the research and problem solving with business leaders and team peers to address unique questions regarding market visibility, market opportunity, market segmentation, and market sales performance.

· Validate and integrate the best sources of data and supervise or conduct data mining and alignment across multiple platforms. Where data is scarce or unobtainable, develop logical models and inferences to test and deploy as pathways to understanding.

· Effectively communicate cross-functionally, in all forms of media: making use of visualization, analysis and presentations tools

· Define technical and strategic approaches to researching, profiling, scoring and tailoring marketing efforts to a diverse base of customer types.
COMPETENCIES*
· Ability to be a self-starter, seek new and better methods, and work with minimum supervision

· Demonstrates inherent curiosity, continual learning, and deep expertise in industry best practices

· Ability to collaborate within a Team environment and across functions

· Capability to discern relevant facts and in turn, effectively resolve issues by making good decisions (compliance, quality, integrity, ethics, and critical thinking ability)

· Ability to be flexible in a fast-paced goal-oriented environment

· Demonstrates the understanding of deadlines and time limits, ability to accomplish goals, and the desire to win

· Fluency with data tools and environments including SalesForce, SQL, Excel, Access, PowerBI, Tableau, PowerPoint and others.
QUALIFICATIONS*
Education/Experience Required: *
· Education/Experience Required:

· Bachelor’s degree

· 2+ years of business analytical experience which includes a deep understanding of complex product markets.

· Exceptional written and verbal communication skills (top tier, with prior experience presenting to C-level audiences)

· Strong analytical and problem-solving skills with a solid understanding of statistical techniques

· Demonstrated ability to think and act strategically

· Excellent cross-functional collaboration skills

· Ability to perform as a self-starter and work autonomously
PREFERRED: *
· Master’s Degree in Business

· Knowledge of healthcare, economics, data science, marketing and/or marketing research.

· Familiarity with cardiology solutions, clinical informatics, patient-focused medical technology products, or similar
WORKING CONDITIONS: *
· Fast paced office environment

· Noise level typical of an open office environment
PHYSICAL DEMANDS: *
· Frequent keyboard and mouse usage

· Frequent sitting for extended periods of time

· Occasional bending and stooping

· Occasional lifting up to 20 pounds
TRAVEL: *
· Occasional travel, less than 10%
OTHER DUTIES: *
This job description is not designed to cover or contain a comprehensive listing of activities, duties or responsibilities that are required of the Team Member. Duties, responsibilities, and activities may change or new ones may be assigned at any time with or without notice.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $1.00 - $2.00 per month

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Employee discount
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Referral program
Retirement plan
Tuition reimbursement
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Education:
Bachelor's (Required)
This Job Is Ideal for Someone Who Is:
Detail-oriented -- would rather focus on the details of work than the bigger picture
Achievement-oriented -- enjoys taking on challenges, even if they might fail
Innovative -- prefers working in unconventional ways or on tasks that require creativity
This Company Describes Its Culture as:
Innovative -- innovative and risk-taking
Outcome-oriented -- results-focused with strong performance culture
Team-oriented -- cooperative and collaborative
Company's website:
www.kestramedical.com
Company's Facebook page:
Kestra Medical Technologies, Inc.
Work Remotely:
No",4.1,"Kestra Medical Technologies, Inc.
4.1","Kirkland, WA",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,-1,-1,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
276,Data Analyst,-1,"Paysign is looking for a Data Analyst to join our growing team. The Data Analyst will take responsibility for managing and manipulating various data sources within the organization into useable and impactful reports and dashboards to support business decisions. The role will perform tasks such as data mapping and translation, report and dashboard generation using Tableau, and assisting in translating results.
Essential Functions*
Managing and designing the reporting environment, including data sources, security, and metadata.
Supporting the data warehouse in identifying and revising reporting requirements.
Assist in managing master data, including creation, updates, and deletion.
Assist in administering Tableau, including managing users and user roles.
Helping develop reports and analysis using Tableau
Provide quality assurance of imported data.
Commissioning and decommissioning of data sets.
Processing confidential data according to regulatory guidelines such as PCI and HIPPA.
Supporting initiatives for data integrity and normalization.
Assessing tests and implementing new or upgraded software
Generating reports from single or multiple systems.
Assist in troubleshooting the reporting database environment and reports.
Assist in evaluating changes and updates to source production systems.
Training end users on new reports and dashboards.
Providing technical expertise on data storage structures, data mining, and data cleansing.
Required Skills/Abilities: *
Hands-on experience working with Tableau to create reports and dashboards
Hands-on experience with intermediate-level SQL queries
Ability to translate business requirements into non-technical, lay terms.
Demonstrated experience in handling large data sets and relational databases.
High-level written and verbal communication skills.
Ability to work with stakeholders to assess potential risks.
Ability to analyze existing tools and databases and provide software solution recommendations.
High-level experience in methodologies and processes for managing large scale databases.
Ability to handle changing priorities, deal with ambiguity, and use good judgment in stressful situations
Excellent verbal and written communication skills
Education and Experience: *
Bachelor’s degree from an accredited university or college in computer science.
Three years of experience as a data analyst or in related field.
Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $52,000.00 - $67,000.00 per year

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Vision insurance
Schedule:
Monday to Friday
Education:
Bachelor's (Preferred)
Experience:
SQL: 1 year (Preferred)
Work Location:
One location
Company's website:
www.paysign.com
Benefit Conditions:
Waiting period may apply
Work Remotely:
No",5.0,"Paysign, Inc.
5.0","Henderson, NV",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Public,Financial Transaction Processing,Finance,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
277,Business Intelligence Analyst - Data & Analytics,$37k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Business Intelligence Analyst will be an active member of the Data and Analytics team to design enterprise-wide reporting and analytics solutions to support the information needs of the organization. As a member of the data acquisition team within Data and Analytics, the BI Analyst II will assist in transforming disparate data sources processes into a cohesive reporting tools to help meet the customer?s needs and requirements and enable them to implement their performance improvement projects, vision, and strategy.The successful Business Intelligence Analyst II will be a team player who can understand design concepts and work with business analysts and technologists to assist in determining and implementing the best solutions for complex data needs. The Business Intelligence Analyst II will assist in determining the best method to re-tool data by focusing on data efficacy, data quality, and data reporting in an overall effort to help build confidence in data housed in the data repositories at Tanner. The Business Intelligence Analyst II will also assist members of the Analytics team working closely with customers to provide advice and training on the most efficient and effective BI tools adopted by the organization to help customers manage, analyze, and gain insight from their data.

Education
Bachelor's Degree

Experience
Two years of related experience. Requires working knowledge of specialized practices, equipment, and procedures.

Licenses & Certifications
*NONE REQUIRED

Qualifications
*Ability to apply core mathematical concepts and competencies to develop reports, forecasts, dashboards, and solutions to business problems.
*Demonstrated experience working and collaborating in a team environment with supervision, and following predetermined guidelines.
*Demonstrated knowledge of hospital operations, patient management, the interrelationship of systems and how technology enables business processes is preferred.
*Evidence of problem-solving skills and ability to comprehend database methodology.
*Experience analyzing business processes from a business intelligence perspective and knowledge of how to use validated and timely data to construct update key metrics.
*Experience with Data Warehousing and data repositories is preferred.
*Knowledge of Business Intelligence Tools (e.g. MS Power BI, Tableau,... ) highly preferred.
*Minimum of 2 years experience in supporting a business intelligence reporting solution.
*Minimum of 2 years experience supporting reporting requests utilizing SQL query language is required.
*SQL skills required .",3.8,"Tanner Health System
3.8","Carrollton, GA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1949,Hospital,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
278,SalesForce Data Analyst,$44k-$83k (Glassdoor Est.),"Job Title: SalesForce Data Analyst

Overview

Varonis is a world-class organization with a straightforward mission: protecting vulnerable data.

Did you know that on average, 20% of an organization's data is accessible to every employee? Seventy percent of attacks take months or years to discover. But not for our customers.

At Varonis, we see the world of cybersecurity differently.

Our customers always know where their most valuable data is on premises or in the cloud. Only the right people have access to only the right data. With real-time awareness of how employees use data, our clients flag and stop malicious behavior in its tracks.

Were fighting a different battle than conventional cybersecurity companies, relentlessly focused on securing data. Data assets are the most valuable and vulnerable components of the global economy. Along with employees, data is at the heart of almost every organization, yet conventional cybersecurity solutions, by themselves, have failed to protect it.

Why Join Varonis as a SalesForce Data Analyst?

This is an exciting opportunity to join us as we expand our team!

In this role, you will perform administrative management of data including detection and correction of data-quality issues, process incoming data, and data standardization. You will collaborate with the Salesforce Team and Sales to engage in the ongoing and detailed evaluation of data quality and lead assignments.

You will be responsible for:
Validating and processing data import inquiries
Assisting with lead assignment updates which include: Updating and management of lead assignment rules, reassignment of leads, and validation of lead distribution with stakeholders
Ensuring sufficient data quality is maintained so that the data can effectively support the business process and reporting accuracy
Identifying, investigating, and managing the resolution and escalation of data quality issues
Coordinating ongoing data quality audits
Coordinating various data cleanup tasks which include: ensuring that Leads are assigned to the appropriate owner, standardizing data, and ensuring that necessary data fields are populated
Key skills, experience and personal attributes
BA/BS degree or equivalent practical experience
1-year minimum experience in a data management role
Ability to manage multiple priorities
Logical thinker with superb interpersonal skills
Ability to work well under pressure
Organized and detail-oriented
Comfortable with ambiguity
Customer service oriented
Great teammate
Salesforce experience preferred
We invite you to check out our Instagram Page to gain further insight into the Varonis culture!

@VaronisLife

Varonis is an equal opportunity employer. We evaluate qualified applicants without regard to race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, veteran status, and other legally protected characteristics.",3.9,"Varonis
3.9","Morrisville, NC",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2005,Company - Public,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
279,Reconciliation Data Operations Analyst,$42k-$76k (Glassdoor Est.),"Global Payment Operations organization is hiring a Recon Ops Data Analyst in Austin TX, who will be responsible for day-to-day reconciliation, data analysis and reporting of payment transactions processed through our system and the related general ledger accounts. You will partner closely with our Controlling, Accounting, Payments product and Payments operations Team etc. The ideal candidate will be self-motivated, process-oriented, works effectively with cross functional teams, in addition to strong written and verbal communication skills.

Job Responsibilities:

Reconciles variances by identifying patterns in complex data sets
Works with accounting and product on key performance metrics, reports and analytics related to reconciliation
Manages daily, weekly and monthly reporting for review with Accounting team
Develops standardized reporting packages, and delivers ad-hoc reporting/analysis required to support reconciliation procedures
Works with large volumes of data for extraction and transformation leveraging eBay’s massive and rich databases
Analyze current manual process surrounding Operations for optimization opportunities.
Designs optimal data architecture for data management and high performance.
Designs and execute reports to measure success and performance of business initiatives.
Automates data driven system controls for Operational procedures
Performs data modeling, documents and presents analysis

Job Requirements

Advanced SQL knowledge
General Ledger and Payments Industry Experience
Experienced in data mining and analysis
Expertise in deriving and building Metrics to help quantify Business Processes.
Ability to work with various stakeholders to understand and build project requirements.
Understands SOX compliant processes and builds accordingly.
Experienced in Agile environment.
Problem solving approach with great verbal and presentation skills
SAS, Python, Hadoop experience is a plus
Master+ 3 Years or Bachelors+ 5 Years

This website uses cookies to enhance your experience. By continuing to browse the site, you agree to our use of cookies

View our privacy policy

View our accessibility info
eBay Inc. is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, national origin, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, veteran status, and disability, or other legally protected status. If you are unable to submit an application because of incompatible assistive technology or a disability, please contact us at talent@ebay.com . We will make every effort to respond to your request for disability assistance as soon as possible.

For more information see:
EEO is the Law Poster
EEO is the Law Poster Supplement",3.8,"eBay Inc.
3.8","Dripping Springs, TX",-1,10000+ Employees,1995,Company - Public,Internet,Information Technology,$10+ billion (USD),-1
280,Data Analyst,$45k-$83k (Glassdoor Est.),"Overview:

i3 is seeking a Data Analyst to support Mission Integration Management, Engineering, and Analysis activities. This position is located in Arlington, VA.

This position will support programs in the Office of the Under Secretary of Defense for Research & Engineering (OUSD(R&E)). USD(R&E) requires mission engineering, analysis, and integration expertise to produce objective insights and analytic justification to inform future technology and capability investment decisions within the Planning, Programming, and Budgeting Execution (PPBE) process and aid in the prioritization, alignment and validation of requirements within Joint Capabilities Integration and Development System (JCIDS) to deliver modernized capabilities that enable an all domain joint force aligned with future Joint Warfighting Concepts.

Responsibilities:
Synthesize vast amounts of complex technical data into management level information
Conduct data analysis in support of technical, managerial or operational fields
Support development, maintenance, and curation of government reference architectures used to communicate and guide analysis efforts, document and communicate results, and set the basis for subsequent engineering and prototyping activities
Conduct project management related tasks, meeting management and administrative duties as requested including stakeholder integration working level meetings related to Joint Capabilities Integration and Development System (JCIDS), Joint Force Integration Cell (JFIC), Joint All-Domain Command and Control (JADC2), War gaming/Table Top Exercises (TTX), Service/COCOM Engagement, Industry Engagement, and USD(R&E) Modernization Assistant Directors
Qualifications:
Minimum of a bachelor’s degree in science, technical, engineering or mathematics (STEM) discipline
Minimum of five (5) years of experience
TS/SCI security clearance highly preferred
Experience in supporting technical, managerial or operational fields and mature judgement required to interface with external stakeholders and senior government personnel
Strong organizational and oral and written communication skills are required. Experience synthesizing vast amounts of complex technical data into management level information.
Experience preparing presentations and other visualization forms to communicate results and artifacts to varied audiences
Experience maintaining configuration management on large and complex projects and developing and administering integrated data environments including cloud based storage approaches",4.0,"Integration Innovation, Inc.
4.0","Arlington, VA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
281,Senior Data Analyst (Remote/ Virtual),-1,"We Are Hiring

This is your opportunity to join the growing Ascension Data Science Institute!

Remote opportunity!

Why Join Ascension?
Ascension is a faith-based healthcare organization dedicated to transformation through innovation across the continuum of care. As one of the leading non-profit and Catholic health systems in the U.S., Ascension is committed to delivering compassionate, personalized care to all, with special attention to persons living in poverty and those most vulnerable. In FY2019, Ascension provided $2 billion in care of persons living in poverty and other community benefit programs.

Ascension includes more than 150,000 associates and 40,000 aligned providers. The national health system operates more than 2,600 sites of care – including 150 hospitals and more than 50 senior living facilities – in 20 states and the District of Columbia, while providing a variety of services including clinical and network services, venture capital investing, investment management, biomedical engineering, facilities management, risk management, and contracting through Ascension’s own group purchasing organization.

What You Will Do

Serves as key resource/SME in collection and analysis of data from multiple sources for the development of reports and statistical information.

Responsibilities:
Compiles analytical and statistical reports as needed.
Formulates, defines and recommends scope and format of reports.
Oversees provision of ad hoc management reports.
May provide leadership, orientation, training, coaching, and mentoring to staff on how to access reports and interpret the data.
Identifies data trends and makes recommendations for quality improvement.
Parses, validates and scrubs data of widely differing formats.
Analyzes structured and unstructured data for business insight.
What You Will Need

Education:

High school diploma/GED with 2 years of experience, or Associate's degree, or Bachelor's degree required
Degree in Mathematics, Statistics, Analytics, Data Science, Engineering, Operations Research, Decision Sciences, Computer or Information Science, Physics, Behavioral and Social Sciences or other related technical or quantitative fields strongly preferred.
Bachelor's level or higher is strongly preferred.
Work Experience:
3 years of experience preferred.
Preferred Skills:
1-3 years experience with business intelligence and data visualization tools such as Tableau, Microsoft Power BI, QlikView, or Microstrategy
Web and social media analytics
Scripting language experience in Python, R and SQL preferred
Knowledge of and some experience with Google Cloud Platform preferred
Equal Employment Opportunity
Ascension is an EEO/AA employer: M/F/Disabled/Vet. For further information regarding your EEO rights, click on the following link to the “EEO is the Law” poster:
http://www1.eeoc.gov/employers/upload/eeoc_self_print_poster.pdf”
Please note that Ascension will make an offer of employment only to individuals who have applied for a position using our official application. Be on alert for possible fraudulent offers of employment. Ascension will not solicit money or banking information from applicants.

E-Verify Statement

Ascension participates in the Electronic Employment Verification Program. Please click the E-Verify link below for more information.

E-Verify (link to E-verify site)",3.4,"Ascension
3.4",Missouri,-1,10000+ Employees,1999,Nonprofit Organization,Health Care Services & Hospitals,Health Care,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
282,"Lead Data Analyst, Consumer Experience",$66k-$117k (Glassdoor Est.),"About the role

As a Lead Analyst, you will be responsible for the success of multiple work streams across our consumer product, focusing on the Move Money product experience. You will act as a mentor and manager to your fellow teammates and lead the standardization of our analytical processes and project delivery methods. You'll use data to develop insights, run experiments, and guide decision making to build consumer experiences and features to delight and solve our members' issues.

In this role, you can expect to
Define key metrics used to measure the success of our consumer banking experiences and products and develop dashboards to surface insights to drive decision making
Build a deeper understanding of our members needs and use predictive analytics to develop strategic product and business opportunities for Chime
Closely partner with product, engineering, and operations to translate your data insights into product features or recommendations; you will partner with product to drive roadmap development.
Oversee and help to define the work of other members of the team to ensure consistent delivery of high-quality outputs
Lead experimentation by providing guidance on the experiments that should be run, how they should be run, and evaluating the impact on our key metrics
Foster a data-driven, test-and-learn culture with your passion for telling stories with data
To thrive in this role, you have
A quantitative degree in a field like Statistics, Economics, Mathematics, Operations Research, or Engineering. Advanced degrees preferred
7+ years in analytics. B2C product analytics and FinTech experience preferred
2+ years direct or indirect management experience overseeing the work of 2-4 team members
Advanced SQL skills - familiarity with window functions and query optimization
A high level of comfort delivering reporting and insights within a data visualization platform (eg Looker, Tableau)
Exposure to a scripting language like Python or R and relevant data science packages
Proven experience with data science, experimentation, and statistical analysis used to guide decision making.
Excellent communication skills, a record of working cross-functionally to achieve results.
A little about us

We created Chime because we believe everyone deserves financial peace of mind. By eliminating unnecessary fees and helping people grow their savings automatically, we've empowered millions of Americans to take control of their finances.

Chime is the largest and fastest-growing U.S. player in the challenger-banking space. Through our banking partners, we offer access to bank accounts with fee-free overdraft, provide members the chance to receive early access to their paychecks, help them improve their credit, and more!

We've built one of the most experienced leadership teams in Fintech and were recently valued at over $14.5B. We've raised over $1B in funding from leading investors including DST, Coatue, Tiger Global, General Atlantic, Iconiq, Dragoneer, Menlo, Whale Rock, Access, Forerunner, Crosslink, Cathay, aCrew, and others.

What we offer
Competitive salary based on experience
401k match plus the usual medical, dental, vision, life, and disability benefits
Quarterly stipend to spruce up your home office
Generous vacation policy and company-wide Take Care of Yourself Days
Virtual events to connect with your fellow Chimers- think cooking classes, music festivals, mixology classes, paint nights, etc., and delicious snack boxes, too!
A challenging and fulfilling opportunity to join one of the most experienced teams in FinTech and help create a completely new kind of banking service
We know that great work comes from great and inclusive teams. At Chime, we specifically look for individuals of varying strengths, skills, backgrounds, and ideas. We believe this gives us a competitive advantage to better serve our members and helps us all grow as Chimers and individuals.

We hire candidates of any race, color, ancestry, religion, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity, age, marital or family status, disability, Veteran status, and any other status. Chime is proud to be an Equal Opportunity Employer and will consider qualified applicants with criminal histories in a manner consistent with the San Francisco Fair Chance Ordinance. If you have a disability or special need that requires accommodation, please let us know. To learn more about how Chime collects and uses your personal information during the application process, please see the Chime Applicant Privacy Notice.",4.8,"Chime
4.8","San Francisco, CA",-1,501 to 1000 Employees,2013,Company - Private,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
283,Data Analyst,$41k-$75k (Glassdoor Est.),"EquipmentShare is Hiring a Financial Data Analyst


EquipmentShare is searching for a Data Analyst for the corporate office in Columbia, Missouri to help us drive profitability through data-driven analysis.

About EquipmentShare


EquipmentShare is dedicated to creating a connected jobsite for the modern contractor. We deliver user-friendly technology solutions that help contractors maximize their equipment uptime, reduce risk exposure and increase productivity. EquipmentShare's product offerings include an improved equipment rental experience, fleet tracking and asset management software, hardware security solutions and predictive service and maintenance applications.

EquipmentShare is the fastest-growing, independently owned construction equipment rental company in the country. We serve dozens of markets across the U.S. and are on track to create a national footprint in every major market in the country by the end of 2023. Our branch locations are equipped with a broad range of construction equipment, ranging from 150-foot telescopic booms to 120,000-lb. track excavators.

EquipmentShare's rapid growth goes beyond meeting a demand for equipment rentals in booming new markets. Instead, our mission begins with our rental product, and it's a testimony to our ability to improve industry standards and better serve the customer. Our expansion and customer retention is a validation of strong contractor demand for the smart jobsite technology we've built into our rental fleet. And it's just the beginning of our journey to establishing a global presence.

Your Opportunity to Grow With Us


The EquipmentShare team is a close-knit group of professionals who all share an interest in providing a service and product that improve our customer's experience. Above all, we care about building something people want, and the only way to do that is by assembling a skilled, passionate and talented team. Our mission is to improve productivity and efficiency throughout the entire construction industry, and our people are how we make achieving that goal possible.

We're seeking a Financial Data Analyst who loves a challenge and wants the opportunity to grow with a fast-paced company. Industry competitors often have layers of tenured management that create barriers to career advancement. The opportunity for career growth is unparalleled at EquipmentShare, where you'll find no shortage of challenging yet fulfilling work, chances to build new skills and supportive teammates who will push you to achieve your best.

Primary Responsibilities
Analyze a wide range of data, and turn that data into action, whether that looks like process improvements, best business practices or other data-backed solutions
Use your strong development and analytical skills to solve business problems across the company
Produce reports and models for senior leaders and other key team members
Identify trends, correlations and patterns in data, and present findings to stakeholder
About You


Our mission to change an entire industry is not easily achieved, so we only hire people who are inspired by the goal and up for the challenge. In turn, our employees have every opportunity to grow with us, achieve personal and professional success and enjoy making a tangible difference in an industry that's long been resistant to change.

Skills & Qualifications
Must be qualified to work in the United States - we are not sponsoring any candidates at this time.
2 years of experience in an analysis-focused role
Forecasting, reporting, and analysis experience
You have a proven ability to approach complex problems with curiosity and an analytical mindset.
You roll with the punches and can adapt quickly, manage competing projects and challenge the status quo.
A keen understanding of data interpretation and the ability to swiftly extract key insights
Expert-level Excel skills
SQL experience required
Preferably knowledge of an analytical language like Python, R, SAS, SPSS, etc.
Why We're a Better Place to Work
Competitive salary
Health insurance and medical coverage benefits
401(k)
Generous paid time off
Stocked breakroom and full kitchen
Free weekly team workout at a local gym
Volunteering and local charity initiatives that help you nurture and grow the communities you call home through EquipmentCare
Opportunities for career and professional development with conferences, events, seminars, continued education
Since our founding in 2015, we've had explosive growth—and we're not stopping anytime soon. Ready to invest in our mission, invest in yourself and discover a better place to work? Then we'd love to meet you. Apply today.

EquipmentShare is an EOE M/F/D/V",4.2,"EquipmentShare
4.2","Columbia, MO",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2014,Company - Private,Commercial Equipment Repair & Maintenance,"Construction, Repair & Maintenance",$500 million to $1 billion (USD),-1
284,Data Analyst,$50k-$94k (Glassdoor Est.),"Terrific Contract Opportunity!

Position: Data Analyst
Location: Phoenix, AZ 85007
Term: 8 Months Contract

Day-to-Day Responsibilities:

Lead in data submissions and analysis for two major projects
Working knowledge of SAS and complex data systems is critical.
Data submission, and the design and construction of an integrated database will begin in December and January
Will pursue a detailed medical marijuana data analysis using Behavioral Risk Factor Surveillance Survey (BRFSS) 2019 data

If this sounds like the perfect fit, Apply Today!",4.2,"Matrix Resources
4.2","Phoenix, AZ",-1,201 to 500 Employees,1983,Company - Private,Staffing & Outsourcing,Business Services,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
285,Data Analyst,-1,"Job Responsibilities: *
Provides data driven input, with insight and forward-thinking recommendations to business leaders.
Interpret, evaluate and interrelate company and research data and develop integrated business analyses and projections for incorporation into strategic decision making
Consistently provide proactive and prescriptive analytics
Monitor daily/weekly/monthly metrics and alert business leaders to issues and trends
Conduct insightful, ad hoc analyses to investigate ongoing or one-time operational issues
Analyze business activities and present results and recommendations to enhance operational strategies both for awareness, effectiveness and overall financial benefit.
Review business processes via analysis and involvement to develop optimization strategies the focus on value-add work.
Develop predictive models of customer value, behavior, and responsiveness based on various business activities related to Fraud, Fed Gov, Account Management, Account Recovery, Sales, HR, and Underwriting
Recognizes and communicates financial implications of business decisions and strategy.
Provides support related to data needs stored within databases, including Domo reports.
Maintains relationship with IT and Finance teams to assure data accuracy and integrity.
Conduct and coordinate financial, product, market, operational and related research to support strategic and business planning within the departments you support
Creates process procedures, standards, and flows for current and future state initiatives/analysis.
Completes special projects as assigned for various departments such as Fed Gov, Account Management, Account Recovery, Sales, HR, and Underwriting
Ensure all deliverables adhere to department quality and delivery standards.
Maintaining and staying up to date on the latest analytical tools and trends.
Lead meetings and develop presentations to easily explain analysis and drive actionable results.
Actively participate and partner in operational department financial related meetings.
Incorporate proven modeling that provides future predictions on business operations and financial status.
Requirements & Preferred Skills: *
Bachelor's in Economics, Decision Sciences, Mathematics, Finance or related field
Minimum of 3 years of business analysis experience
Four or more years of extensive experience with SAS and other statistical software packages
Minimum of two years of experience with VBA, SQL, Microsoft Access, BI/data visualization
Advanced Analytic Techniques: Knowledge of advanced quantitative analytic techniques and protocols used to build necessary business models
Advanced knowledge with data analytics and data mining
Experience working with cross-functional teams to build consensus and project plans
Contract length: 8 months

Job Type: Contract

Work Remotely:
No",-1,Microagility,"New York, NY",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Consulting,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
286,Data Governance Analyst,$54k-$97k (Glassdoor Est.),"Ocean Spray believes that our employees are our best asset and we offer an environment where you can work with exceptionally smart, innovative, passionate teams that are motivated to deliver Ocean Spray products around the world. If you are looking for a rewarding career where you can Grow, Own, Live and Drive your career every day, Ocean Spray is for you!

Who We are Looking For:

We are looking for a challenge seeker with a passion for data to help us grow our Data Governance program at Ocean Spray. If you have a deep appreciation for efficiency and for getting things right up-front, this is the role for you! The ideal candidate will possess solid business acumen and the ability to evaluate processes and drive improvements. Self-motivation, strong organizational and prioritization skills, an ability to multi-task and attention to detail are just a few of the competencies that will lead to success in this role.

What You Will Do:

In this role you will help drive forward data governance improvements by developing a deep understanding of business processes, identifying opportunities for fixing broken processes and ensuring quality data capture and maintenance. You will partner with business process subject matter experts across departments to create, document and maintain validation rules for automation. You will also work hand in hand with the Data Architecture team and other members of the Tech team as you gain knowledge of our end-to-end system design and build understanding of data elements and their lineage.

Responsibilities:
Support development of data governance framework and enterprise data governance policies, processes, standards and roles across systems and projects
Own, understand and govern the master data management process (own the rules of the data)
Improve data capture processes to enhance business analysis and decision-making
Improve data accuracy and “tie-out” between systems
Provide clarity to filed values, calculations and reporting to improve internal understanding
Configure attribute workflow management using Ocean Spray’s master data management toolset
Identify opportunities for system automation and reduction of manual data capture
Collaborate with business process SMEs across departments to develop mechanisms and rule sets to validate the accuracy of data
Contribute to Ocean Spray’s Data Governance Policies & Procedures and share with the cooperative to ensure best practices are followed
Audit master and transactional data for SLA compliance
Qualifications:
B.S. or M.S. in either Business or an Analytical discipline – a combination of the two major/minor would be ideal (for example Data Science and Business)
3-5 years of related CPG experience
Knowledge of industry data standards
Experience with Tibco EBX preferred
Strong project management skills
Intermediate understanding of data architecture concepts
Experience with SQL preferred
Excellent verbal and written communications skills
Ability to work independently when needed
Strong “executive presence”
All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to race, color, religion, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, national origin, disability or veteran status.",3.0,"Ocean Spray
3.0","Lakeville, MA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1930,Company - Private,Food & Beverage Manufacturing,Manufacturing,$2 to $5 billion (USD),-1
287,Billing Data Analyst,$38k-$68k (Glassdoor Est.),"The Native American Rehabilitation Association (NARA) is private non-profit that provides culturally appropriate physical & mental health services and substance abuse treatment for Native Americans, Alaska Natives and other vulnerable people. Since 1970 we have provided culturally sensitive care and treatment to the urban Native American population in the Portland metro and surrounding areas.

NARA offers a full benefit package including medical, dental, vision and prescription insurance. We provide company paid STD, LTD, basic Life and A&D benefits. In addition, we offer a 401(k) plan with a company match and supplemental life and accident benefits. NARA provides employees 12 paid holidays a year with generous vacation and sick time benefits.

POSITION SUMMARY:

The Billing Data Analyst will monitor, analyze, distribute and communicate billing data from various sources in order to meet internal and regulatory reporting requirements, and specifically the Medicaid wraparound payment submission to the state. This includes using technical tools to build and maintain reporting solutions for the Medicaid wraparound payment and other initiatives that require a medical billing background. The Billing Data Analyst will identify and provide needed data and analysis through understanding medical and behavioral health billing guidelines within a Federally Qualified Health Center (FQHC)_._

ESSENTIAL JOB DUTIES:

· Design and maintain data collection system to capture encounters eligible for monthly or follow up Medicaid wraparound payment on monthly basis.

· Data analysis and reporting for the monthly and follow up Medicaid wraparound payment submission.

· Develops and maintains data collection, reporting and analysis systems.

· Develops, maintains and produces statistical and analytical reports and/or graphics for the purpose of data interpretation.

· Produces and distributes regularly scheduled reports to various levels in the organization.

· Conducts specialized queries and formulates spreadsheets to support and facilitate data analysis.

· Collaborates with Billing Operations Director and co-workers in design and preparation of data presentations.

· Provides accurate information to co-workers and other customers when requested in order to complete data analysis process.

· Makes sure that all reports are accurate and error free by testing, researching, and validating data in source systems.

· Identifies data quality issues in clinical and billing systems and works with clinical and administrative guidance to implement workflows that provide clean data for reports.

· Works with Billing Operations Director to identify deficiencies and problems with existing data and develops and coordinates plans to resolve

· Communicate effectively, and demonstrate good interpersonal and professional skills when interacting with others throughout NARA.

· May be required to attend group, or individual meetings with physicians or with administration.

· Must be flexible and adapt to changing work assignments.

· Perform other duties as assigned.

QUALIFICATIONS:

· One to two years of preparing and submitting Medicaid wraparound payments to the State preferred

· Bachelor’s degree in data management, business administration, healthcare administration or informatics, or the equivalent combination of classroom and/or job-related experience preferred.

· Experience working in or with Federally Qualified Health Centers preferred.

· Experience using and/or reporting from Electronic Health Records and Practice Management Systems. Centricity and RPMS preferred

· One to two years prior or current experience with insurance coding, billing, or accounts receivable processes in a medical clinic or allied medical entity required.

· Working knowledge of Medicare, Medicaid and private billing and reimbursement processes

· Advanced knowledge of Microsoft Office applications to conduct and deliver complex data reports

· Exceptional interpersonal verbal and written communication skills; organizational skills; high degree of accuracy; flexibility, ability to multi-task and prioritize effectively.

· Ability to maintain professional boundaries with clients, the community, and other staff members.

· Work collaboratively with clients, other NARA staff, team members, and to treat everyone with respect and dignity at all times.

· Demonstrated ability to manage multiple priorities.

· Experience working within the Native American/Alaska Native community is considered a plus.

· If in recovery, must have a minimum of two years sobriety/clean time.

· Ability to pass a pre-employment or for cause drug tests.

· Ability to pass criminal background and DMV checks.

To apply: Please respond to this posting or fax your cover letter, resume, and salary requirements to 503-224-4494.

A minimum of two years sobriety and clean time is required. All employees are asked to commit to model a drug and alcohol free lifestyle. Potential new hires are required to pass a pre-employment (post offer) drug screen and criminal background check.

EEO/AA Employer/Vets/Disabled/Race/Ethnicity/Gender/Age. Within scope of Indian Preference, all candidates receive equal consideration. Preference in hiring is given to qualified Native Americans in accordance with the Indian Preference (Title 25, US CODE, Section 472 & 473). We are mission driven and spirit led.

Job Type: Full-time

Pay: $16.00 - $23.00 per hour

Benefits:
401(k)
401(k) matching
Dental insurance
Disability insurance
Employee assistance program
Flexible schedule
Flexible spending account
Health insurance
Life insurance
Paid time off
Retirement plan
Vision insurance
Schedule:
8 hour shift
Monday to Friday
Supplemental Pay:
Bonus pay
Work Remotely:
Temporarily due to COVID-19",3.9,"Native American Rehabilitation Association (NARA)
3.9","Portland, OR",-1,51 to 200 Employees,1970,Nonprofit Organization,Social Assistance,Non-Profit,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
288,Client Experience Data Analyst,$40k-$74k (Glassdoor Est.),"Client Experience Data Analyst
Location: Atlanta, GA
Department: Client Support
Type: Full Time
Min. Experience: 4+ years

Our Data Analyst will have a passion for using data to solve complex problems through root cause analysis, trend analysis and other analysis techniques. Their talent will be evident for finding compelling stories in customer, operational and financial data that inform the business with easy to follow conclusions and actionable recommendations. The story told will be objective to inform the business, no matter where the data takes them. This person enjoys the act of strategically thinking through the problem and then executing the analysis hands-on by manipulating large datasets using computer languages and analytics tools.

Our Data Analyst role will support the ongoing success of the OxBlue Client Experience team and support other reporting needs for the OxBlue Operations Team. This individual will provide insight and analysis to promote execution, productivity and the growth of OxBlue. In addition, you will be an advisor to OxBlue leadership through your analytics and reporting, to enhance the client experience and employee experience, with the objective of driving executional excellence throughout OxBlue.

As the Client Experience Data Analyst you would:
Provide reporting and commentary to the Vice President of Client Experience and other OxBlue senior leaders to drive business objectives such as improving client experience, employee engagement and profitable revenue growth
Identify, develop and maintain reporting around key success metrics
Develop self-service data tools
Analyze large amounts of information from multiple sources to discover trends and patterns and uncover solutions to business problems
Create models to forecast results of various enhancements to product, technology or procedural changes
Oversee data transmission and automation development, validation and maintenance from internal and external sources
Other analytical and process improvement projects as needed
You Have:
4+ years of related business, financial or data analytics experience
Strong organizational skills and high attention to detail to meet deadlines
Ability to work independently and with little supervision in a project management-like environment
Strong communication skills
1-3 year experience with a data visual program like PowerBI, Alteryx, Tableau or Qlik
Experience with survey tools
Enjoys researching and generating insights to solve problems
SQL coding proficiency
Bachelors degree (Finance, Math, Statistics, Business Administration, Analytics, IT or related field) preferred or equivalent experience
Bonus Points For:
Experience with the following survey tools: Satmetrix, Qualtrics, Medallia or Survey Monkey
Experience with using both customer experience and operations experience data to make recommendations for continuous improvement projects preferred
Our Perks:
Health insurance paid 100% for employee and 50% for family
Dental insurance paid 100% for employee
401k with company match
A fun work environment: casual dress, free snacks, complimentary massages and great parties
Investment in your professional development with internal promotions, continuing education, and tuition reimbursement
Paid sabbatical program: 4 weeks every 5 years
An award-winning culture recognized for its high level of employee satisfaction
Long-term disability paid 100% for employee
Life/AD&D
Paid Parental leave
The above summary of benefits is subject to change, is for informational purposes only and does not create any contract rights to benefits.

If you have what it takes and are looking for a company committed to the success of its clients and its people, we want to hear from you.

Diversity and Inclusion are important to OxBlue. We value the diversity of thought that comes from working with people from varied backgrounds. Our continuous improvement and ability to serve our customers depend on creating a workplace that brings out the best in everyone. Thats why we are committed to continuing to create an atmosphere of positivity, happiness and inclusion.",4.5,"OxBlue Corporation
4.5","Atlanta, GA",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
289,Data Analyst,$37k-$69k (Glassdoor Est.),"Spalding Consulting, Inc.is seeking a Data Analyst, Mid in Lexington Park, MD. Spalding Consulting, Inc. is a professional services firm specializing in Information Technology (IT), Program Management, and Financial Management for the Department of Defense, federal agencies, and commercial clients. We offer excellent salaries, benefits, and outstanding growth potential.

Position Type: Full-Time

Summary/Scope: Ability to acquire & integrate diverse data sets/systems; and apply custom business rules to data. Must possess functional, technical, and analytical expertise to execute workforce management, strategies, and programs using integrated data set, predictive analytics, visualizations and Business Intelligence (BI) solutions.

Essential Functions:

• Gathers and analyzes data from databases, systems, reports, presentations, and spreadsheets.
• Creates and updates mapping spreadsheets and generates reports
• Translates functional requirements into technical specifications
• Prepares reports and presentation material
• Provides functional testing of data mappings
• Other duties as assigned

Qualifications and Experience:

Required:

• 3 years of experience conducting data analysis in an IT environment
• Advanced MS Excel experience required (pivot tables, macros, VBA)
• Proficiency with SQL

Desired:

• Experience providing support to the NAVAIR IT organization/environment
• Experience with Business Objects, Informatica, and TOAD or similar BI tools
• Experience in/knowledge of any of the following systems: Defense Civilian Payroll Data System (DCPDS), Total Force Manpower Management System (TFMMS), Military Personnel System (NTMPS), Workload Requirements and Planning System (WRAPS), Contractor Work Plan (CWP), Exit Interview, Civilian Workload Automation Tool (CWAT), Standard Procurement System (SPS), Contractor Automation Module (CAM), Federal Procurement Data System – Next Generation (FPDS-NG), HEATSM, Standard Work Package (SWP), Procurement Management Tool (PMT) and Common Spend Plan Tool (CSPT)

Security Clearance:
Must be eligible to obtain a Secret clearance. Requirements to obtain a clearance include US Citizenship, security investigation, etc.

Education:
High School diploma or GED
*COVID-19 Procedures: On-boarding/training will be virtual and telework maximized/permitted to the greatest extent possible, however on-boarding/training/tasking may require on-site work a few hours per week during the current COVID-19 situation. Future on-site/telework requirements/schedules may change as additional client direction is received. On-site guidance regarding social distancing, PPE (wearing masks at all times), and proper hand-washing/sanitization procedures are followed.
Spalding Consulting, Inc. is committed to providing equal employment opportunities to all applicants and employees. We will not discriminate against any employee or applicant on the basis of race, color, ethnic origin, national origin, creed, religion, political belief, sex, sexual orientation, gender identity, marital status, age, veteran status, or physical or mental disability. Spalding Consulting, Inc. is an Affirmative Action/Equal Opportunity Employer and encourages minorities, women, disabled, and veterans to apply for job openings within our company.",3.9,"Spalding Consulting, Inc.
3.9","Patuxent River, MD",-1,201 to 500 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,$25 to $50 million (USD),-1
290,Principal Data Analyst,$92k-$151k (Glassdoor Est.),"Description

The primary role of the Principal Analyst is to provide business requirements with associated data analytics to support the ALM, Capital Management, Funding and Liquidity and FTP modeling teams within Treasury and the associated business, management and regulatory processes.

These models describe the projected balance and income for one or more product portfolios (e.g. retail deposits, mortgage backed securities, commercial loans etc.) on Citizens balance sheet over a wide range of potential interest rate and economic scenarios. The results of the portfolio modeling are critical components of the interest rate risk, liquidity risk management, capital and product funding processes for the entire bank.

This role will also have the opportunity to support and interact on a regular basis with Corporate Planning, Treasury Operations, Treasury and Capital Management and other various business units.

Primary responsibilities will include:
Partnering with Treasury’s business team members to incorporate balance sheet and model updates for forecasting the Bank’s balance sheet through a sophisticated model application (QRM).
Documenting and maintaining proper procedures to serve as reference of processes completed in building the balance sheet model and ensuring proper controls, data quality, data integrity and financial validation reports follow best practices.
Validating data information, system and business requirements, testing, and implementation of technology and modeling projects to ensure complete data availability and models function as expected.
Collaborating in the development and testing of tools to automate and streamline processes while improving detail, accuracy, and timeliness of analytics
Creating detailed documentation and model support processes for ALM, F&L, FTP, and Capital Management teams.

Qualifications

Required Skills/Experience:
5 years of financial analysis and/or budgeting / forecasting experience
Demonstrated knowledge of bank products and services.
Strong quantitative, financial, economic, data analytics and statistical skills and the tools in which to leverage them.
Strong interpersonal and communication skills
Well versed in project management basics (emphasis on teamwork and collaboration).
Flexible and resourceful with the ability to work on many project deadlines at the same time
Proficiency on Microsoft’s Excel, Word, Access, SQL and PowerPoint – required
QRM’s ALM model experience – preferred
Essbase database knowledge - preferred
Education, Certifications and/or Other Professional Credentials:
Bachelor's Degree in Business, finance, computer science, math, statistics or other related topic
Hours & Work Schedule
Hours per Week: 40
Work Schedule: Monday through Friday 8:30AM – 5:00PM
#LI-Sourcer #8

Why Work for Us

At Citizens, you'll find a customer-centric culture built around helping our customers and giving back to our local communities. When you join our team, you are part of a supportive and collaborative workforce, with access to training and tools to accelerate your potential and maximize your career growth.

Equal Employment Opportunity

It is the policy of Citizens to provide equal employment and advancement opportunities to all colleagues and applicants for employment without regard to race, color, ethnicity, religion, gender, pregnancy/childbirth, colleague or a dependent’s reproductive health decision making, age, national origin, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, disability or perceived disability, genetic information, genetic characteristic, citizenship, veteran or military status, marital or domestic partner status, family status/parenthood, victim of domestic violence, or any other category protected by federal, state and/or local laws.

Equal Employment and Opportunity Employer/Disabled/Veteran",3.4,"Citizens
3.4","Boston, MA",-1,10000+ Employees,1988,Company - Public,Banks & Credit Unions,Finance,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
291,Data Analyst,$59k-$72k (Glassdoor Est.),"About Foundation Finance:

Foundation Finance Company (FFC) is one of the fastest-growing consumer finance companies in the U.S. We work with home improvement contractors nationwide to help them close more sales through the use of flexible financing plans. FFC's full-spectrum lending approach has driven billions in originations and helped many customers make needed improvements to their homes. We're making big investments in both infrastructure and employee talent to keep up with our growth, so the time is right to join our team! It's a fast-paced environment with room to advance. We offer a competitive salary, medical/dental/vision benefits, 401(k) with company match, a casual dress work environment and much, much, more.

To learn more, check us out on Facebook at ""Foundation Finance Company Careers."" If you think you have what it takes to help our team succeed then apply today!

Data Analyst Description & Duties:

We are looking for a strong analyst to help drive profitable growth by leveraging data and analytics. This is a hands-on role requiring technical skills to query and manipulate data to develop data-driven reports and recommendations. The analyst will have a wide range of exposure to loan originations and servicing areas in consumer lending. The analyst will on a regular basis present reports, findings and recommendations to senior management to improve business strategies and practices

Duties may include, but are not limited to:
Dive into data and quickly become an expert on internal and non-traditional data sets. Maintain data and file integrity. Improve existing data query scripts and develop new ones as needed.
Create user-friendly reports and Tableau visualizations for staff and management. Enhance existing and build new Tableau dashboards as needed.
Track, review, manage and audit software development projects, particularly from database access and usage perspectives.
Work with staff, managers and executives on analytic projects and develop data-driven solutions and recommendations.
The Ideal Candidate:

Applicants must be reliable, dynamic, sociable and enthusiastic team players; while possessing a positive ""can-do"" attitude, excellent judgement and communication skills. Applicants must also have great attention to detail and ability to multi-task under the stress of deadlines with a strong desire to help the organization succeed.

Minimum Qualifications:
Bachelor's degree in Finance, Business, Economics or related field.
Hands-on familiarity with SQL data querying, coding experience and understanding of basic coding syntax.
Advanced Excel skills to create/edit pivot tables, understand/create/manipulate database formulas, create/modify macros (VBA knowledge preferred), adjust formatting to create professional reports.
Advanced data visualization skills, preferably with Tableau.
Must have the ability to research, think through and solve technical and analytic problems.
Strong communication skills, attention to detail, analytical curiosity is required.
Working Conditions:

Office environment with significant time spent sitting, typing and talking on the telephone.

Foundation Finance Company provides equal employment opportunities to all employees and applicants for employment and prohibits discrimination and harassment of any type without regard to race, color, religion, age, sex, national origin, disability status, genetics, protected veteran status, sexual orientation, gender identity or expression, or any other characteristic protected by federal, state or local laws. This policy applies to all terms and conditions of employment, including recruiting, hiring, placement, promotion, termination, layoff, recall, transfer, leaves of absence, compensation and training.

Job Posted by ApplicantPro",4.8,"Foundation Finance
4.8","Weston, WI",-1,51 to 200 Employees,2012,Company - Private,Lending,Finance,$10 to $25 million (USD),-1
292,Data Analyst,$59k-$110k (Glassdoor Est.),"For 25 years, Getty Images has embraced disruption and change; riding the digital wave to evolve from a fragmented, analog stock photo business into a multi-billion-dollar, global e-commerce industry leader and trusted brand. The breadth and quality of our content has always allowed our customers and partners to tell their stories with greater creativity and accuracy, eliciting more emotion and enabling more action. Getty Images moves the world, whether the goal is commercial or philanthropic, revenue-generating or society-changing, market-disrupting or headline-driving. Help us move the world with images! Getty Images is the most trusted and esteemed source of visual content in the world, with over 405 million assets available through its industry-leading sites www.gettyimages.com and www.istock.com. The Getty Images website serves creative, business and media customers in almost 200 countries and is the first-place people turn to discover, purchase and share powerful content from the world's best photographers and videographers. Getty Images works with over 330,000 contributors and image partners to provide comprehensive coverage of more than 160,000 news, sport and entertainment events, impactful creative imagery to communicate any commercial concept and the world's deepest digital archive of historic photography. Getty Images is a world leader in visual content. With over 405 million assets, of which over 285million are digitized, encompassing the latest global news, sports, celebrity, music and fashion coverage; exclusive conceptual creative images; and the world’s largest commercial archive. New content is added daily, with 8-10 million new assets added each quarter. We are inclusive of different voices, perspectives and experience. We believe diversity is critical to our mission to objectively reflect the world we live in and allow our customers to illustrate that world. This means including a diverse range of voices in our content, actively pursuing diversity in our team and sources of content and listening to our customers to make sure we are as open and responsive as possible. Women, gender-nonbinary, people of color, LGBTQIA+ people and people with disabilities are encouraged to apply. We are looking for a Contract Data Analyst to join our AI/ML Team to own the analysis and reporting of our A/B testing and experiments. Sample project topics: Trends in search behavior Preferences in customer search and download behavior Customer segmentation Customer behavior insights based on their site interactions What you’ll need: Strong data analytics and insights Can access data that is messy and from different sources Brings a critical eye to data; cares about data quality Someone who brings a customer focus, can work with user research team to combine qualitative findings with their quantitative insights Research mindset, proactively formulating hypotheses and questions to answer with the data Learns quickly Strong communication for sharing findings SQL, hive, python Education Requirements: A B.A. or B.S. in Statistics, Data Analytics, Data Science, Mathematics, Engineer, Computer Science, Economics, Sociology, Natural Sciences or any other equivalent quantitative field is preferred. If you are self-taught and believe you are a good fit for this role, or have significant work experience, we would love to hear from you as well. Due to the current conditions and impact of Covid-19, this position is a remote work from home 6 month contract with the potential to convert to a Full-time position in the future. As we do not have a timeline to when conditions improve, we are prepared to offer flexibility with the timeline to relocate including relocation assistance. The contract Data Analyst position is not eligible for an H1B Visa transfer or sponsorship. Getty Images is committed to providing Reasonable Accommodations and will work with you to meet your needs. If you are a person with a disability and require assistance to search for a job opening or to submit an online application, please email RecruitingAccommodations@gettyimages.com. We celebrate our inclusive work environment and welcome members of all backgrounds and perspectives. Getty Images is committed to providing Reasonable Accommodations and will work with you to meet your needs. If you are a person with a disability and require assistance to search for a job opening or to submit an online application, please email RecruitingAccommodations@gettyimages.com. Visit Getty Images at www.gettyimages.com to learn more about how the company is advancing the unique role of still and moving imagery in communication and business, and enabling creative ideas to come to life. For company news and announcements, visit our Press Room, and for the stories and inspiration behind our content, visit Stories & Trends. Find Getty Images on Facebook, Twitter, Instagram, LinkedIn, Pinterest and Tumblr, or download the Getty Images app where you can explore, save and share the world's best imagery. Getty Images is an equal opportunity employer. All qualified applicants will receive consideration for employment without regard to age, ancestry, color, family or medical care leave, gender identity or expression, genetic information, marital status, medical condition, national origin, physical or mental disability, political affiliation, protected veteran status, race, religion, sex (including pregnancy), sexual orientation, or any other characteristic protected by applicable laws, regulations and ordinances. Getty Images believes that diversity is critical to our success in moving the world with images and is committed to creating an inclusive, mutually respectful environment which celebrates diversity. We seek to hire on the basis of merit, competence, performance, and business needs.",2.8,"Getty Images
2.8","San Francisco, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1995,Company - Private,Photography,"Arts, Entertainment & Recreation",Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
293,Data Analyst,-1,"This is an opportunity to join the leadership team at our US Corporate Office. Our client is a $2+billion global company focused on delivering the products and services to healthcare, pharmaceutical, and medical device Customers. They have a long history of success and are excited about what the future holds. We are seeking an enthusiastic data analyst professional with a background in accounting, information systems, or comparable business experience who is ready to create and innovate in support of their goals.

What you will do:

The data analyst will be responsible for planning, organizing, and executing analytics related to internal audits and business processes throughout the Company (including IT, financial, operational, compliance, quality and fraud). The role will develop repeatable data analytics processes to provide timely audit assurance, improve audit efficiency, and automate business processes. This position will drive analytics and strategy for Internal Audit and will collaborate with Internal Audit management and business functions within the organization to improve internal controls, create efficiencies, and add value to the business.

Provide an understanding of business and data requirements, and design visualizations for initial concepts and prototypes that can be presented to Internal Audit and business partners.

Perform detailed data analysis (determine data structures, content, and quality of the data through examination of source systems).

Design and create data visualizations (reports and dashboards) using Tableau as required.

Maintain a controlled repository of data visualization templates and views in Tableau.

Contribute to the planning, sampling, and testing of Sarbanes-Oxley controls.

Explore innovative ideas to continuously improve the audit methodology and audit procedures including the strategic deployment of technology to improve the effectiveness and efficiency of audit procedures and increase value to business partners.

Partner with Internal Audit team members to develop and deliver a data analytics strategy in all phases of the audit process including risk assessment, planning and scoping, fieldwork, testing, and reporting.

Develop training and usage of data analytics capabilities within the Internal Audit team.

Work with Internal Audit colleagues to continuously improve the department and achieve department goals.

What you need to be successful:

You must have advanced skills related to Tableau, SQL, and other analytics software such as Alteryx.

You have a Bachelor’s degree in accounting, information systems, or other related degree.

You are comfortable working in a complex global organization where you’ve had successful interactions and built relationships across functions, regions and business units. Your excellent verbal and written communication skills helped you influence, consult, and create compelling business cases at all levels of the organization.

You are able to inspire and instill a common vision and framework with individual and team projects.

Candidates with the audit experience and certifications such as CPA, CIA, CISA, CFE, Tableau certification, or other big data type certifications preferred.

This position may be elevated to a Senior Data Analyst role for candidates that possess an appropriate level of relevant experience as determined by STERIS.

Offering You In Return:

The opportunity to join a company that will invest in you for the long-term. Our client offers competitive salaries, healthcare benefits, tuition assistance, paid-time off, holidays, matching 401(k), annual merit, and incentive plans. Join and help write our next chapter.

Must have Sarbanes experience

Finance experience a plus

Audit experience very desirable",3.9,"Gables Search Group
3.9","Mentor, OH",-1,1 to 50 Employees,2001,Company - Private,Building & Personnel Services,Business Services,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
294,Data Analyst,$45k-$81k (Glassdoor Est.),"Role: Data Analyst
Location: Tempe, AZ
Duration: 6+ Months

Job Description:

A driven, experienced data analyst to join the Vendor Managed Inventory team who has a passion for solving problems with data, an eye for process improvement, and the skill to execute changes.
You'll be a great fit if you have the grit to persevere through challenging or ambiguous problems, love a chance to step away from your desk to understand and improve processes, and get excited about translating data into action.

Â
Use statistical methods to analyze data and generate useful business reports to solve operational problems.
Be responsible for extracting, cleansing, and visualizing large data sets using the tools and techniques described above.
Plan and lead execution of identified process improvements and cross functional initiatives.
Proactively monitor existing reporting, identify areas of concern, and perform any additional analysis needed to understand underlying causes or nuances.
Deliver insights on urgent business challenges by performing ad hoc analysis and crafting accurate, easy to understand findings.
Forecast future performance based on impact of process improvements and changes to the business.
Work with management team to create a prioritized list of needs for each business segment.
Use data to create models that depict trends related to growth, consumption and forecast.
Work with Project managers to outline the specific data needs for each supplier negotiations.

Qualifications/Experience:

Bachelor's degree in Computer Science, Engineering, Math, or similar field from an accredited undergraduate institution required.
2+ years of professional experience in data, reporting, and analytics.
Ability to collaborate effectively and work as part of a team.
Strong attention to detail.
Strong analytical skills with proficiency in Microsoft SQL Server.
Experience with visualization software; Excel, Access, Pivot Tables, V-Look Up, Tableau proficiency a big plus.
Capable of managing competing priorities.
Ability to thrive (and preference to work) in a dynamic, fast-paced environment.
Ability to communicate confidently to senior leadership.",4.3,"Softcom Systems
4.3","Tempe, AZ",-1,1 to 50 Employees,-1,Company - Private,IT Services,Information Technology,$1 to $5 million (USD),-1
295,Data Analyst - Sales Performance,$34k-$59k (Glassdoor Est.),"Summary:

The Data Analyst – Sales Performance is responsible for managing weekly and monthly reporting in conjunction with the Sales Administrator.

Job Duties: -

· Develops data queries and analysis to understand trends across the entire customer lifecycle, lead effectiveness, conversion rates, pipeline analysis, and customer retention

· Creates and maintains weekly informational reports for the Sales and Sales Performance teams, as well as developing data analysis tools

· Analyzes data and key metrics to make recommendations to management on improving sales reporting and sales performance based on the data; Audits and validates data; Ensures consistency in reporting

· Reviews results to determine root cause and leading indicators

· Develops action plans to improve reporting

· Other duties as required and assigned

Requirements:

· Experience working with large data sets and sourcing data from BI tools or CRM tools

· Proficient in Power BI or Tableau

· Proficient with Microsoft Outlook, Word, and Excel

· Ability to read, analyze, and interpret financial or technical reports

· Ability to write reports, business correspondence, and procedure manuals

· Ability to solve practical problems and deal with a variety of concrete variables in situations where only limited standardization exists

· Ability to interpret a variety of instructions furnished in written, oral, diagram, or schedule form

· Ability to multi-task in a fast-paced and demanding environment

· Ability to work flexible schedule and weekends as needed

· Ability to travel as required to support regional labor management activities

Environment:

While performing the duties of this job, the employee is regularly required to use hands to manipulate, handle, or feel. The employee is regularly required to talk, hear and communicate. The employee must occasionally lift and/or move up to 25 pounds. The employee is frequently required to work in both an office setting and a warehouse. The employee may occasionally be exposed to moving mechanical parts. The employee is regularly exposed to ambient lighting and temperate climate conditions.

The following statements are intended to describe the general nature and level of work being performed. They are not intended to be construed as an exhaustive list of all responsibilities, duties, and skills required of personnel so classified.

Job Duties as documented in this job description are considered “Essential Functions” and have been created by the standards of the Equal Employment Opportunity Commission (EEOC). The standards of the Americans with Disabilities Act (1990) require that employees be able to perform “Essential Functions” of the job with or without reasonable accommodation. Reasonable accommodations may be made to enable individuals with disabilities to perform the “Essential Functions”.

The following statements are representative of the work environment and physical demands required by an employee to perform the essential functions of this job, with or without reasonable accommodations.",3.2,"GEODIS
3.2","Brentwood, TN",-1,10000+ Employees,1904,Subsidiary or Business Segment,Logistics & Supply Chain,Transportation & Logistics,$5 to $10 billion (USD),-1
296,Data Analyst- Tiktok Ads,-1,"Data Analyst- Tiktok Ads
Mountain ViewProduct - Data analysisExperienced
Responsibilities
- Apply your expertise in quantitative analysis, data mining, and the presentation of data to see beyond the numbers and understand how our users interact with our ads products
Partner with Product and Engineering teams to solve problems and identify trends and opportunities
Inform, influence, support, and execute our product decisions
Build/maintain reports, dashboards, and metrics to monitor the performance of our products
Mine massive amounts of data and extract useful product insights
Manage development of data resources, gather requirements, organize sources, and support product launches
Qualifications
- 2-5 years experience doing quantitative analysis
BA/BS in Math, Statistics, Economics, Computer Science, or other quantitative field. Advanced degrees preferred but not required
Fluency in SQL or other programming languages. Some development experience in at least one scripting language (PHP, Python, Perl, etc.)
Experience with large data sets and distributed computing (Hive/Hadoop) a plus
Ability to initiate and drive projects to completion with minimal guidance
The ability to communicate the results of analyses in a clear and effective manner
Basic understanding of statistical analysis
Apply
Share to",4.1,"TikTok
4.1","Mountain View, CA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,2016,Company - Private,Internet,Information Technology,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
297,CRM Business Data Analyst,$30k-$56k (Glassdoor Est.),"CRM Business Data Analyst

Position Overview

The CRM Business Data Analyst is responsible for analyzing Customer Relationship Management (CRM) system data in response to channel marketing initiatives. Review online and offline retail sales data and determine effective reporting to drive strategic decisions on future initiatives. Includes analyzing customer information, touchpoints, customer flow and order data by channel.

The Analyst will notice trends, discrepancies, and find effective insights or solutions by taking a holistic perspective. Uses data to predict and address problems or opportunities and finds answers that support strategic goals. Can identify “noise” to ensure focus on key goals and the task at hand.

They will help identify processes, techniques and opportunities for improvement of existing data technology. This person will work closely with the marketing team, corporate IT team and outside agencies. They should be able to work collaboratively and effectively across the team while focusing on action and learning.

Key Responsibilities

Customer Relationship + Engagement

Collaborate with Marketing + Retail teams to build customer life-cycle programs, focusing on engagement, lead generation, and nurturing initiatives.

Re-engage existing customers through the promotion of new products, services, and established relationships.

Educates cross-functional team on customer experience concepts, value, and supporting process impact.

Provides regular competitive benchmarking and customer awareness best practices.

Serves as customer advocate with senior management; ensures that customer findings are understood, tracked, and acted upon.

Insight Mining

Compiles high-quality reports on key performance indicators.

Explains the components of a marketing dashboard and its importance in guiding future marketing initiatives.

Testing + Innovation

Carries out A/B Testing and/or various digital touchpoints campaigns to establish the most effective strategy.

Analyzes basic customer touchpoints and interactions to identify the connection between customers and the brand.

Describes the needs, values, perceptions, emotions, cognitions, and behaviors of target customer profiles.

Leads customer insights gained through analytics to inform design decisions.

Monitors industry best practices and analyzes campaign performance to optimize plans going forward.

Digital Marketing

Identifies opportunities for audience development and growth through analysis of digital customer behavior.

Supports the development of digital marketing multi-channel campaigns aimed at increasing loyalty.

Monitors paid acquisition budget and performance across multiple platforms and develops recommendations on adjustments.

Analyzes creative performance and determines trends based on creative and channel.

Support segmentation initiative to drive enhanced marketing automation capabilities.

Additional Skills

Strong intellectual curiosity, attention to detail, self-motivated, and excellent written and verbal communication skills.

Communicates effectively; ensures that information is passed on to others who should be kept informed, expresses oneself clearly in conversations and interactions; provides background when working through an issue, and proactively provides the necessary level of detail. Interpret information and break down complex topics to digestible, actionable pieces.

Data modeling and familiarity with various Business Intelligent tools, including DOMO.

Experience with Salesforce Service and Marketing Cloud a plus.

Must be able to handle multiple projects simultaneously.

Required Qualifications

Bachelor’s degree in business, marketing, analytics, computer science or related field.

Experience working with CRM system data and online marketing retail with 4-7 years of relevant work experience in an analytical role. Heavy focus on analysis and visual representation of the data, and understanding of ecommerce and business best practices, systems and technology.

Advanced technical experience with Microsoft Excel and PowerPoint.

This position has a partial work from home opportunity with required days at the corporate headquarters in Bassett, VA.

Bassett Furniture Industries is an equal opportunity and affirmative action employer and does not discriminate against any applicant for employment because of race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, age, veteran status or other protected category. Bassett is dedicated to ensuring that qualified applicants are employed and that employees are treated consistently during employment, without regard to their race, color, religion, sex, national origin, disability, age, veteran status or other protected category.

EEO/AA-M/F/V/D

Back Share
Apply Now",3.3,"Bassett Furniture
3.3","Bassett, VA",-1,1001 to 5000 Employees,1902,Company - Public,Home Furniture & Housewares Stores,Retail,$100 to $500 million (USD),-1
298,Data Analyst,-1,"About Trantor

Trantor, Inc., a leading provider of global software services, specializes in Business Intelligence, Software Security, and Web Services solutions. Trantor, Inc. has a proven and demonstrable track record of successful multi shore project delivery since its inception in 2009. Trantor, Inc. is a leading software development company with expertise in both Cloud-based and traditional applications. Trantor understands all aspects and challenges of software development from product and feature definition, though core product development and QA / deployment / ongoing maintenance. We have also developed our own product suite and integrated it to several market applications.

Here’s what we are looking for CMC Product Lead

Position Name: Data Analyst
Location: Rhode Island, US
Duration: 11 Months
Interview Type: Zoom Video Interview 1 G Manager and 1 Client interview
Remote: Until Covid-19 settles

• Data analyst skill set
• Can Work directly with business to understand the requirements
• Build SQL queries and extract data or build reports/visualization.
• Experience with EPIC data warehouse (Caboodle) or Clarity databases would be very helpful.
o Epic Caboodle (also known as Cogito Data Warehouse) is an enterprise data warehouse (EDW) solution designed for healthcare organizations

Additional Information

We offer you a chance to join a highly motivated unit in a fast-growing and dynamic company, and challenging tasks and opportunities for your future career. Find out more at www.trantorinc.com Follow Trantor on LinkedIn

https://www.linkedin.com/company/trantor/",4.0,"Trantor Software
4.0",Rhode Island,-1,201 to 500 Employees,-1,Company - Private,Computer Hardware & Software,Information Technology,Less than $1 million (USD),-1
299,Configuration and Data Management Analyst IV,$37k-$78k (Glassdoor Est.),"Business Group Highlights

Defense

The Defense group supports the Department of Defense (DoD) mission to keep our homeland and its citizens safe. We provide solutions to improve the Nation's defense by providing software, systems engineering, IT, training and logistics and fleet management solutions.

Responsibilities

The successful Configuration Management Analyst will support a new program at Perspecta, focused on baseline establishment and management of a new Space Domain architecture. This CM Analyst will be responsible t establish the technical baseline including all cross-space and ground segment interfaces and to lower levels for interfaces considered to be key to inter- or intra-segment interoperability; Support baseline development for the Segments; Identify disconnects between segments and external agencies, and work the issues to closure; Develop system and segment level requirements that allow the Mission Users to effectively and efficiently interoperate and submit the requirements to the change process.

Baseline Management tasks include establish a formal process for capturing the baseline and managing changes and distribution; Employ this process to identify, control, maintain, make recommendations to evolve, and execute changes to technical baselines; Use change management software to mitigate the risk of unauthorized and unplanned changes to the technical baseline, including document content and the associated links; Provide user access to all databases used to manage the technical baseline; Perform requirements analysis in response to requested changes, addressing flow‐down, and changes to systems engineering products such as ICDs and verification plans; Maintain interface control for all ICDs/ISs that involve interaction between segments, contractors, or external agencies.

The CM Analyst Lead will organize, facilitate and provide agendas, briefings and minutes for all System and Segment level CM‐related boards, forums and working groups. The Lead is also responsible for mentoring and training more junior CM/DM support.

Qualifications

Requires 8 to 10 years with BS/BA or 6 to 8 years with MS/MA or 3 to 5 years with PhD, or equivalent work experience with at least 5 years experience leading a CM/DM Team.
Experience required supporting similar DoD or Space Domain Configuration Management Efforts
Expereince managing a small team of CM/DM professionals
Experience with agile COTS Configuration Management Tools
Minimum TS Clearance required

About Perspecta

What matters to our nation, is what matters to us. At Perspecta, everything we do, from conducting innovative research to cultivating strong relationships, supports one imperative: ensuring that your work succeeds. Our company was formed to bring a broad array of capabilities to all parts of the public sector—from investigative services and IT strategy to systems work and next-generation engineering.

Our promise is simple: never stop solving our nation’s most complex challenges. And with a workforce of approximately 14,000, more than 48 percent of which is cleared, we have been trusted to do just that, as a partner of choice across the entire sector.

Perspecta is an AA/EEO Employer - Minorities/Women/Veterans/Disabled and other protected categories.

As a government contractor, Perspecta abides by the following provision

Pay Transparency Nondiscrimination Provision

The contractor will not discharge or in any other manner discriminate against employees or applicants because they have inquired about, discussed, or disclosed their own pay or the pay of another employee or applicant. However, employees who have access to the compensation information of other employees or applicants as a part of their essential job functions cannot disclose the pay of the other employees or applicants to individuals who do not otherwise have access to compensation information, unless the disclosure is (a) in response to a formal complaint or charge, (b) in furtherance of an investigation, proceeding, hearing, or action, including an investigation conducted by the employer, or (c) consistent with the contractor’s legal duty to furnish information. 41 CFR 60-1.35(c).",3.3,"Perspecta
3.3","Chantilly, VA",-1,10000+ Employees,2018,Company - Public,Aerospace & Defense,Aerospace & Defense,Unknown / Non-Applicable,-1
